The Boy You Loved Is Now The Man You Fear!. This is my third copy of this book that i have purchased if that tells you anything. ive read it 3 times each time learning a little more about this genious. The highly intellectual but highly misunderstood man is revealed. amazing book unless your a closed minded christian! happy reading.Blessed Be
My life is much more fun &amp; balanced since reading this book!. It's truly a shame that this book is no longer stocked.  Since I first read it, back in 1990, I have recycled over 8 hours, per week, back into my personal life.  This is the gift of this book.  I learned that time  management isn't simply a bunch of random techniques that allow you to  spend more time at work.  Instead, it's a set of a few effective principles  that allow you to spend more time in your life.  To play more.  Visit more.  Enjoy more.  It's easy-to-read and easy-to-do.  Within 7 days you'll see  and &quot;feel&quot; the difference in your life
Challenging you to step up to the plate. This story gives me hope in mankind again.  Despite the horrendous abuse, this woman gave herself -- all of herself -- to save a child from the torment she experienced.  I wish there were more people like Torey Hayden in this world.  I can only hope that I can touch lives in the way Ms. Hayden has.  This book will open eyes to the terrors of abuse that does, indeed, occur in this world, despite the fact that we would like to close our eyes to it.  It also demonstrates the hope that victims can overcome and the need for us to step up to the plate to end this war of terror
Return of the Prodigal Son. Buy it. I'm not a big fan of artwork, and I'm certainly not a lover of reading, but more than once I found my eyes locked on a page with jaw-dropped, seeing in words things I've been trying to voice for 51yr. I'll probably buy a few more copies, pass them around when He tells me to. Thank you Lord, for Your sons Rembrandt and Mr Nouwen.Buy it
Had the chance to be excellent, but is only a relatively good one. I have read the whole ender series, but with a strange sequence which may have affected the way I view the different books in the series. The first book I have read was the Shadow of the Hegemon, thanks to a tourist that had left it in the library of a hotel in Skiathos island. This book got me hooked, but it confused me also as I didn't know if I should start reading the next books or the previous ones.The general pattern in the whole series is:The beginning book is Ender's Game. Then we have two subcategories, one the Shadow series (which, with the exception of the first book, take place on earth and are more within military strategy) and one the Ender series (which take place in space and are more into new sci-fi ideas). Shadow series probably can be read from everyone, while I guess that the Ender series (especially from Speaker for the Dead onwards) would be read mainly from sci-fi fans.Below are my comments for the books of the series, in the order I have read them and a marking (10 is the highest mark):Shadow of the Hegemon: The first book I have read, and which I could not leave from my hands. I finished it in 2 days. It was fast paced action, very smart plot and after reading it I believed that Orson Scot Card (OSC) has invented/re-invented a new genre of literature. That of military strategy and adventure combined with brilliance/mind games and hidden portions of romance. Such books always existed but this seemed to be THE book. It was like the way Dan Brown re-invented books with trivials and puzzles, together with fast paced adventure. I strongly recommend it to everybody that likes such type of books. (mark: 10)Shadow puppets: The sequel to the above. I found it interesting but somehow boring as the above story developed little and the focus was on the characters (maybe too much focus so that it seemed to me that it was slightly mumbling jumbling. Strategy, brilliance and adventure seemed to be very low here. I would not recommend it for anybody to read it in isolate, unfortunately you have to read it if you want to go to the next book. I really believe that OSC made a mistake here (deliberately or not) as this book should have been told in 50-60 pages and be included in the previous or the next book. (mark: 6 but you will read it because you will want to read Shadow of the Giant)Shadow of the Giant: (see below)Ender's game: A really great book to read, probably the best of the series, however, as I had read its sequels first, when I reached the 80% of this book, I had predicted the end. However, it's at the highest standards of sci-fi, military strategy, adventure, brilliant mind games and very good depth in the human aspect of the characters. In comparison to the shadow series, it is more "space" sci-fi, while shadow series have much lesser sci-fi elements and are more down to earth. (mark: 10)Speaker for the dead: Another great book, but different style. Less adventure, more human aspect, more maturity. Brilliance yes, but not military, sci-fi yes (some great ideas) but not spaceship style. (Mark: 9)Xenocide: A good sequel of the previous novel. In certain points more brilliant, in other sections more boring, however is again a very good sci-fi book. The only flaw in these series (Speker for the dead, Xenocide, Children of the mind) is the idea behind one of the alien species described which I found outrageously extreme, however if you ignore it becomes first class reading. (Mark: 9)Children of the mind: I think that OSC has wrapped up his case pretty badly in that one. It's a fair book except the fact that I felt that OSC mumbles jumbles for one third of the novel not having decided how to end it. In other critiques I have found it described as nice approach to moral dilemmas, however, moral dilemma is when you describe it once and make your choice, while here the dilemma is repeated and repeated... I felt like I was watching a movie worth 10 oscars and the end did not worth to be included even in a cheap video movie. And again, many open ends at the end (for possible sequels). (Mark: 7 but you will read it as you will be hooked from the previous ones).Ender's shadow: Having read Enders Game and Shadow of the Hegemon, I found this book probably the best of the series, which of course is my subjective preference. I could characterize it as probably the best book I have read ever! Not to repeat myself, it has all that Shadow of the Hegemon and Ender's Game have, and even more...(Mark: the absolute 10).Shadow of the Giant: When I read shadow puppets, I said, "that's it, OSC has lost either his talent or his appetite for good writing...", so I was pretty unwilling to read it. Fortunately I decided to, as it proved to be a good one, were I believe that OSC has nicely wrapped up his story, with two small flaws.* The one is described below (its end needed to be slightly more complete) and,* The other is the fact that although he describes certain smart battles, he does not focus enough on them as it seems that he is in a hurry to wrap all things up. It had all elements to become a masterpiece but it ended up being a good to read book (Mark: 9)In general, both series have three categories of good stuff:1) Some great sci-fi ideas (battle room, battle games, fantasy game, ansible, aia, Jane, in/out travel, raman varelse etc)2) Great military strategy, mind games etc combined with adventure3) In certain books, depth of characters, moral dilemmas etcAnd two main bad stuff:1) Mumbling jumbling in certain books which was completely unnecessary (either OSC wanted just to produce and sell another title - see shadow puppets- or he could not decide how the story will continue-see last book of Ender series).2) One of the alien species described in the Ender series was so too outrageous even for sci-fi that made it look ridiculous. The idea behind it was brilliant in sci-fi terms, but he could try a different living organism...Finally, OSC has left open ends in both series (probably for next sequels), however I believe that there are two things missing. a) the story of the Hive Queen and the Hegemon, told in a metaphorical manner so it means much for humanity. b) In ancient theatre, a story should end in a way that brings "katharsis" to the story, and the souls of the readers. I believe that the end of the shadow of the giant may be smart for commercial purposes but it was very unfair to the reader as it did not bring full "katharsis".
Love You Forever reminds you of what's important in life. The first time I read &quot;Love You Forever&quot; was in the bookstore when my 8 year old grandaughter handed it to me, sat on my lap, and asked me to read it. By the time I got to the page where the son was holding his mother in his arms, I had to keep dabbing my eyes because of the tears. When I've mentioned the book to other women the reaction is always the same. It's almost impossible to make it through the book without bringing tears to your eyes. From the time she becomes a mother, the main character in this book holds her precious child on her lap and rocks him back and forth and vows to love him forever. As he grows older and eventually goes away she still continues rocking him and tells him that she'll love him forever. The day finally comes when she is old and unable to rock her son and the torch is passed to him. He holds his mother and rocks her and at this point you can only assume that she has died. With that, he returns home where he picks up his baby girl and begins the same routine. This book will surely tug at your heart.Marsha Baske
A Wonderful Train Wreck. Having read several of Ford's other novels previously, I pretty much got what I had expected and had hoped for.  No need for outrageous plot twists, chase scenes, or bawdry dialogues.  The disintegration of this family showed me that people never stop growing, learning, and succumbing to not what is expected but what feels right at a particular point in one's life
Fun and interesting, but I got mixed results. If the poor condition of the library copy is any indication, Even More Top Secret Recipes is a very popular book!Todd Wilbur has a number of books, and it can be a little confusing sorting them out.  There are three "Top Secret Recipes" books, Top Secret Recipes, More Top Secret Recipes (this book) and Even More Top Secret Recipes.  These books focus on what Wilbur calls "convenience foods."  That is, most packaged sweets and fast food.  He also has a book Top Secret Restaurant Recipes, in which he attempts to duplicate the foods of mostly casual dining restaurants like Chili's and Applebee's.  He also has a book solely on drinks.Wilbur explains in the Introduction of More Top Secret Recipes that these are not the actual recipes used by restaurants, and he did not obtain them through bribery, theft other illegal or illicit means.  He starts with the ingredient list on packages of food and modifies the relative amounts, or with fast food, tries to identify the ingredients by taste.  He admits that the real producers of these foods often use custom ingredients unavailable to the consumer, and that the goal was to match the texture and flavor of the food, and appearance is secondary.So why try to clone commercially-available food?  In both More Top Secret Recipes and Even More Top Secret Recipes, the author mentions availability.  Some of the foods are regional, and you may not get them where you live.  In the introduction to More Top Secret Recipes, he gives a list of reasons including low cost and curiosity.  I'm not so sure about the cost argument, since I have to sacrifice two boxes of Macaroni and Cheese to make half a box of Cheese Nips, but the curiosity is what applied to me.  I just wanted to know, "Can I really duplicate these commercial foods at home?"This book contains 88 recipes, a big increase over the 37 of the previous book.   The recipes clone the likes of McDonald's, Nabisco, Carl's Jr. and Taco Bell.  Every recipe includes a history of the food item, something alone which makes this book valuable, and a dimensioned engineering graphic of the product.   Even More Top Secret Recipes includes an interesting introduction discussing the fast food industry, and gives some tips on creating the clones.  The recipes make as much use as possible of premade food and mixes.  For example, most candy bars are coated with melted chocolate chips, so you will not find that you have to crush cocoa beans, or perform any such low-level task.From this book, so far, I attempted to make Girl Scout Thin Mint cookies,  (I AM a Girl Scout after all.  Really.  My wife signed me up.  It was a surprise to me, too!) and Nabisco Cheese Nips.  The thin mints turned out pretty good.  The flavor and texture were pretty close.  The only problem is that the chocolate was a little thick.  Applying it to a desired thickness is difficult.  Also, the chocolate remained quite soft.  A little more experimentation with cookie thickness and baking time and temperature might make the centers a little more consistent, too.  The Cheese Nips are made using the cheese packets from Kraft Macaroni and Cheese (Cheese and Macaroni?).  They turned out crispy, and although bright orange like the real thing before baking, turned out grayish-tan when done.  Although crispy, they weren't light and bubbly like the real thing, but were more like crispy cookies.  They needed to be cheesier.  They tasted like the flour and shortening.  They weren't bad, though, and my wife liked them, but they weren't much like Cheese Nips.  A lot of recipes would benefit from the use of rolling pin rings to establish uniform dough thickness.I also had mixed results with the recipes from More Top Secret Recipes. You can read my amazingly similar review on that book for more details.Using this book was fun and informative.  I've had mixed results using these books.  In short, have fun, but don't expect miracles with every recipe.
I nearly wet myself every time. I may be a Kinsey 6 homo male, but this show leaves me in stiches every time.  I laugh so hard that I lose control of my bladder, which is okay since Eve reminds constantly that androgens and human development caused me to have the inferior equipment below the belt
A little rough around the edges, but it's a great start!. I caught the tail end of one of Ron's interviews on TV and just had to buy the book. (Those donuts on the cover look so good - yum). :-P Actually, I've dealt a little bit with this disorder myself, but only late at night. I have read before that there is something like a Nighttime or Evening Eating Disorder but I'm not sure how scientific that is.Anyway, I thought the book was better when he was writing about his childhood as it seemed to feel increasingly rushed and excessive with the bad language as it neared the end. My absolute favorite part was about what happened with the OCS and I laughed my *ss off at that, and then later the metaphor hit me and I wondered how Ron could have overlooked that irony. In fact, I'm still wondering. Maybe it's in the book and it was I who overlooked it.I sure got a shock of nostalgia running into the mention of the Worldwide Church of God. I haven't heard of them since the '70s and I would love to know how they survived their silly doomsday prophecies.I would definitely buy Ron's second book. I think he's a riot and has real potential. Next time just don't try to finish the end of the book in one huge gulp, ok?
From Inspiration to Novel, a complete thought process. Sentence structure, parts of speech, character, scenes, revisions, POV's, design, climax, development, progression, motivation, inspiration, technique, delivery, prologue, epilogue, all the way to last hurrah, Kress uncovers the bare bones of writing with an easy to read style.Definitely not a college-level study piece, B,M,& E will cover what you need to know if you are already in the process of writing and find yourself stuck in a particular ditch.  The layout of the book is favorable to the subject, starting with Beginnings, followed with Middles, and finishing with Endings, though each segment blends well into the lessons of the others.This is an excellent book for non-college level beginners, or those who need to refresh their ancient college studies with some new blood.  This book tends to be helpful no matter what level you are on, making it a must-have in any writer's collection.Well written, non-condescending, helpful for those who already have an inkling of what they are doing, and a particularly good piece if you are stuck on your "middles", I highly recommend buying a copy of Beginnings, Middles, & Ends if you intend to write for any length of time.  Enjoy!
Cute!. This is a cute book with stuff that you can make out of everyday stuff! I highly recommend it
INFORMATIVE. I always enjoy listening to Dr. Kabat-Zinn.  This CD presents a  a very good reason to try mindful meditation.  Kabat-Zinn has a very pleasing voice with easy concepts to relate to.  If you are looking for actual meditations this is not the CD for you, but he definitely gives you a good place to start the practice of meditation with the breath.  Highly recommend
But I digress... Mr. Slezkine has prepared an interesting, but albeit lengthy and sometimes convoluted, but usually engrossing, premise based on: the idea that anyone who is to be prepared for the understanding today's economy and one's place in it must also comprehend the loss of the familiarity of common cause and that in the end all people in this new technological age are interrelated in the way that they never were before. Having only arrived here, meaning the United States, in 1982, prior to the fall of communism; Yuri, is it OK if I call you Yuri or would you prefer Professor or the nomencultura of Academician, being in fact of Russian decent and therefore, perhaps, looking at the use of his first name, without a patronimic, as being too familiar; except that me being an American, he would know that there is a tendancy of us (Americans that is) to consider everyone who you have met (or in this case read) to be on a first name basis; brings a novel (but not in the sense of a fiction book) idea to fruition, in a slightly long exposition (not in the style of Tolstoy or Solzhenitsyn) and in some cases convoluted, but not like a nautilus, on a subject that has hithertofor been ignored in both Judaic (or Jewish) Studies and Economics, to a point where it loses some of it's brillance in the dust of a run on sentance or paragraph.  This is not to say that the book, or is it polemic, is not worth reading; it's just that it would have been a much more effective opus had his editors, and I suspect that there must have been times that they also were overwhelmed, done a better job (not that I have anyway to judge how they do their jobs, which I suspect they are very good at or they would be looking for other work: unless of course they came to editing by way of a failed [...]) at reigning in his tendancy to overstate a fact to the point of "beating a dead horse so thoroughly....    uh, hopefully by now you get my point.Succinctly, good book, interesting idea, waaaay tooo loquacious, garrulous and talkative.
Essential Biography in Understanding a Leader. William Manchester examines the life of General Douglas MacArthur.  AMERICAN CAESAR, DOUGLAS MACARTHUR, 1880-1964 begins with his birth and ends with his death.  For anyone that has an interest in reading about military leaders, or in general, leaders of the twentieth-century, AMERICAN CAESAR and its 793 pages, is an excellent starting point. One thing that comes to mind when one thinks of General Douglas MacArthur is how he has been misunderstood by those who have not spent the time to read or understand who the man really was.  For every leader that has passed through history, one always finds a way to tarnish the image of a leader and to debunk the myth and legend.  Writers and critics have written about MacArthur's downfall as well as his own self-interest and egotism or juicy tidbits of his personal life.  Where would the label of greatness be without those traits?  AMERICAN CAESAR contains all those subjects, but with much respect to the man.However, AMERICAN CAESAR portrays General MacArthur's unique personality as an individual with much emphasis on the man and the compassion and determination he possessed with the people and countries he associated with.  It is these traits, which hold much prestige over the one controversy in Korea that existed near the end of his service.  Manchester carefully paths MacArthur's life , and takes from other scholarships, archival material as well as from MacArthur's memoir, REMINISCENCES, to acquaint readers with the man and the many experiences he encountered during his tenure as one most of the highly decorated generals in US history.  Manchester uses the moniker of "Caesar" and historical references to great leaders throughout the book, such as Napoleon, Lincoln, U.S. Grant in comparing and paralleling MacArthur's life to particular conflicts these leaders overcame or not to his own.  As an avid reader of history, MacArthur thrived on history. Manchester states that MacArthur once told a reporter that his only advisors were Abraham Lincoln and George Washington, and emphasized that "one founded the United States, the other saved it" (479).  This may have been suggesting that he was in good company with men of great acclimation and sought to reach the levels that they had achieved.Manchester does a fine job presenting all aspects of MacArthur's life and the players that brought him up as well as brought him down.  For a man who greatly helped rid the world from imperialistic tyranny by the Japanese during the war in the Pacific, he helped Japan to reconstruct its government and country to what it is today.  Who could predict what may have happened if MacArthur maintained his position in Korea?  For a man that lived in the Pacific and Asian theatre for 14 years, and took more precedence over the study of this region of the world, he may have known more about how the people thought militarily than the men in Washington. Many hypotheses will pop-up while reading this immense book.  Nonetheless, MacArthur was led on a mission to rid the world of war and accomplished it, and later in his life spoke against it.
Good book for learning ASP.NET 2.0 basics. If you are new to ASP.NET or have little to no programming experience this is a good book to start with. It will teach you the basics of ASP.NET 2.0, VB (No C# here) and some basic programming constructs.There are some errors in the book, which is why I did not give it 5 stars. One example of an error is on page 310 dealing with a HyperLinkField and the DataNavigateURLFormatString; this is something that apparently changed from the beta version the book was written with and the final release. (you need to convert this to template for it to work correctly). The book also touches on web parts but the code did not work, no errors just didn't work.If you know some programming and want to get beyond the dummies I'd recommend ASP.NET 2.0 in 24 Hours by Scott Mitchell, a very good book without the smarminess that comes with the dummies titles
An Extremely Entertaining Read. Julian Rubinstein tells the true story of Attila Ambrus, the Transylvanian-born backup hockey goalie in Budapest who also lived the life of a pelt smuggler and daring bank robber between practices and games.  It was a story the author first heard about in a short news piece in Sports Illustrated in 1999 and on writing the book he's able to set the story in hilarious style against the backdrop of the changing Hungary and Romania of the early 1990s.  At one point Ambrus is described as "a sizable conundrum within a notable contradiction, the best unpaid hockey goalie in a filthy-rich slum town".  The photo section in the middle, the appendices and interview with the author at the end, and the references throughout to world events the west would be familiar with serve to remind us that this is largely a work of non-fiction despite all the absurdity.  A great read especially for those who have visited or have lived in this part of the world in these changing times from Socialism
A Universal Faith in the Global Village. I used this book as one of my primary sources for studying religions in the global village; it was tremendously useful and is a rather fascinating introduction to what is a far more complex issue.  Jenkins writes with a certain level of zeal for the diversification that is currently taking place within Christendom, particularly in the Global South; he also writes sympathetically - and some might even say supportively - of the spreading of the Christian faith.  (My understanding is that Jenkins is an Anglo-Catholic.)Jenkins' proposal, now several years old, is that Christianity is growing fastest in the Global South - Africa, Latin America, and South Asia - in such a way that the strongholds of Christian orthodoxy are likely to be found in the Global South by the middle of the 21st century, rather than in the West.  (Whether or not this means ecclesial power - "power" being a reductive Western idea - is not touched upon.)  While the United States is something of an anomaly for the secularization thesis to try and explain, in Europe it seems to hold true that the more educated a culture becomes, the less religious it becomes.Of course, it is tremendously Eurocentric to assume that the growing religiosity in the Global South is directly related to their sub-Western standards of educational and economic development.  Rather, what Jenkins points to is the perception of demonic forces and the fact that a separation of the "natural" from the "super natural" has not taken place in those regions.  In light of a world that very much believes in spiritual forces of evil, the spiritual forces of good - embodied in Jesus Christ - become a necessity for combatting that evil.  And, more importantly, the fact that exorcism of the demonic seems to work further demonstrates the truth of Christianity.Hence, one of the more interesting features of Christianity in the Global South is that both Pentecostals and Roman Catholics - the two fastest growing groups in the Global South - will believe in the supernatural, which creates a common ground between the two groups in the area of praxis, rather than theoria.  Yet, Jenkins proposes that when it comes to theology (as well as morality), both groups will be more conservative in relation to what constitutes orthodoxy for their particular group.The only major problem with this work - and this is a difference that has only come to be seen in recent months, I think - is that Jenkins paints the Global South with a broad brush.  The Global South appears almost monolithic in terms of morality and theology, yet in light of the recent crisis in the Anglican Communion over gay bishop Gene Robinson, it is worth noting that several of the Primates in Africa were for ending the ban on homosexuals in the priesthood - a total affront to the seeming "conservativism" that is supposed to be so characteristic of the Global South.  While such bishops do not seem to represent any type of majority opinion found there, it does show that a certain level of differance does exist which should be accounted for.Of course, Christianity in the Global South is a topic that people are just beginning to study.  In light of that, it is easy to understand why that which seems to be "other" - or at least "new" - in some way can be painted more simplistically than it really is.  Yet, Jenkins seeks to understand his subject and does not portray Christianity in the Global South as an utterly foreign object (unlike some postcolonialists or liberals in the United States such as John Shelby Spong).  Jenkins' book is an excellent place to start for anyone interested in learning more about crucial developments in Christianity today - especially those that will likely shape the future
Anger Hated This Book, But Read It Anyway. Kenneth Anger deserves a much more serious and scholarly bio, but this will do for now.  He's literally CURSED Landis for this work, and you can see why-- Landis has dug up lots of dirt about the controversial film-maker, and shares much about his early life (including his birth name).  Reservations aside, Anger's lived such a fabulous and improbable life, and created such forward-looking and brilliant films, that the ride is a fast and furious one.  Film students and fans of the counter-culture in the 50s, 60s, and 70s will love this, as I did.Where is Anger's autobiography?  Now THAT would be a trip to read...
i never knew. ok, i'm one of your normal anime lovers. i like dbz, sailor moon, gundam wing, outlaw star, magic knight rayearth, and cardcapture sakura. well, i have seen this in the store before and i wanted to buy it, but the tapes are $24.95. i don't have that kinda of money. so, i passed on getting evangelion. well, i went to the library that day. i am friends with the people in the children's section, so i went to talk w/ them. well, what do i see on the ledge behind the desk? 1-4 in the viz novel series! well, only one was ready to be checked out, so i got it, read it, loved it. i got the next 3 the next day. i loved them too. now i just need the fifth one to come out. i love the series so far. so will you. now evangelion is one my fave list. and here's a message: if you don't have the money to buy the tapes, and you parents won't let you get it here, CHECK OUT YOUR LOCAL LIBRARY!! that's where i first found these
Best Parenting Book on the Market for Half a Century!. As a retired licensed professional counselor, educational psychologist, and educator over a practice spanning 40 years, I have found no other parenting guide as easy to understand and apply as "Children the Challenge."   It allows the reader, be they brand new parent or professional, to make effective use of the common sense techniques which follow the first rule of medicine "Do no harm."   It's fun to read and in each chapter you find yourself saying "Why didn't I think of that?" or "I never thought of it that way before, but it makes perfect sense."   It is well organized, with each chapter heading stating the basic "rules" of positive parenting.   I buy a copy for all new parents on my gift list, including my own children and now grandchildren.
interesting tidbit. this book is actually featured in  the 1976 Stephen King horror flick, Carrie.  Interestingly enough, in the library scene, Carrie opens this book and finds the definition of "telekinesis."  The word is not used in this book at all
Fantastic presentation of a fantastic series. Baron and Rude's Nexus remains one of the best science fiction/superhero series ever done and Dark Horse gives it the treatment it richly deserves in this classy archives format.  To their credit, they've allowed the three black-and-white issues to remain in black-and-white rather than coloring them, allowing the reader to experience the artwork in as close as possible to its original presentation.  The only thing lacking is the classic flexi-disc that was packaged with issue 3, featuring an audio dramatization of that issue's story and with the "unforgettable" Nexus theme song
Fabulous resource and reading!. This book is quickly becoming one of my very favorites. Alinsky has always been a very articulate writer, and he does very well in this book. The points he makes in the book are extremely timely for today's political climate, and I recommend this heartily to anyone who has strong feelings on any subject. Alinsky's goals are to make the political struggles productive ones, rather than tired rhetoric. I definitely recommend this book to "organizers" of all ilks as well as others
Outstanding reader-actor on audio. Highly entertaining. Thoroughly enjoyable, laugh-out-loud funny.  One of Pratchett's best novels. The CD audio version read by Nigel Planer is wonderful!  Nigel Planer does an excellent job of giving zany voices to the zany characters.  The reading is closer to acting
Highly recommended. I loved Blunt's first book and was extremely happy to note that this second one is even better. He paints a brooding, uncomfortable picture of a Canadian town, but contrast the gruesome storyline with very human and at times gentle lead characters.
Maine Bible. The Maine Atlas &amp; Gazetteer by DeLorme should also be known as &quot;The Maine Bible.&quot;  Every Mainer should own one.  All too often I've tried those web sites that are supposed to give you driving directions, and inevitably they give me an error message saying &quot;that location was not found&quot; when I try to get directions to places in rural Maine.  You'll never have to worry about that with the Gazetteer.  Every Maine city, town, village or plantation is listed in this book, no matter how obscure it is
Shades of MY SWEET AUDRINA. I am honored to once again be the first to review a new V.C. Andrews release.  I am honored to occassionally correspond with Mr. Andrew Neiderman, the V. C. Andrews ghostwriter.  I love and respect his all his work - his own books and the beautiful V. C. Andrews books.Now, don't get me wrong, this is not a clone of My Sweet Audrina, in fact, the storyline is nothing like it.  However, I could feel the same stange, haunting, lonely undertones as that long ago V. C. Andrews masterpiece.  A young girl surrounded by some strange and sinister people who finds her muster when she most needs it.April's adventure in this book was a little unexpected.  I thought there would be more of Brenda, but her absence (until the end of the book) is not noticed.  Instead April turns out to be rock of strength of Brenda always hoped she would be and encouraged her to be.  In fact, we are left questioning.  What is April's sexuality?  Does it really matter?  I was glad to see Mr. Neiderman was braver in this book and didn't hesitate to use the terms gay and lesbian.  It made the book so much real!If you read any of my other V. C. Andrews reviews you will see that I never detail the book chapter by chapter.  I just give my general feelings, and they are always good feelings.  I am a fan for life.  The excitement here is to pick up GIRL IN THE SHADOWS for yourself and find the good stuff for yourself!My hat is off to Mr. Neiderman again.  The sneak peek of BROKEN FLOWER is exhilirating.  I cannot wait to the read it when it comes out.  My only fear is that the days of V. C. series has come to an end.A last note... the series RAIN is being made into a movie and the DVD will have the prequel packaged with it, at least that is my understanding.  Can't wait!  Bravo, Mr. Neiderman, Bravo
head and heart. F. Paul Wilson has done it again, showing the amazing range of his talents in this compelling novel about a dying physician's struggle to save what is left of his life by opening his mind to possibilities he has always scorned.  The main body of the novel takes place in a mesoamerica vividly rendered, lush and exotic.  The characters are wonderful and engaging, the plot relentlessly gripping and the ending a deeply satisfying resolution of the age old yearning of us all to bring our hearts and minds into harmony. I thoroughly recommend this wonderful tale by a master novelist
Banville's, er, Black's style. Since Benjamin Black's identity is revealed on the dust cover, it is no secret that he is really John Banville.  Although this book is more accessable than Banville's earlier works, it is no less intriguing.  The real genius behind his writing is his ability, like a minimalist painter, to create an entire character with the briefest of strokes.  His characterizations, even of the smallest characters, are so acute, that the richness of his books fills out to the furthest corner.  He does not sacrifice his literary talent even when writing a thriller like CHRISTINE FALLS.  Here's hoping that "Black" had as much fun writing this book as the reader has reading it and that there will be many more instllments featuring Quirke
Incredibly rich family tale. You don't have to be Catholic (I am not) for this book to blow you away.  It is full of truth, the characters are real and rich, and the story is beautifully written.  I finished it in tears, and cannot recommend it highly enough
A Landmark Design Book. This must be the first full book-length study of the increasingly popular subject of outdoor kitchens and cooking. The author's style is precise and easy, allowing the reader to understand the history of cooking outdoors, which, after all, is how cooking got started. The book is beautifully produced, with a profusion of color illustrations and drawings which illustrate the text's in-depth approach to all aspects of the subject. From simple outdoor grilling to the design and construction of a custom, high-end outdoor kitchen and dining area, the reader can develop a better feel for the glorious benefits of cooking by fire. A useful index of resources for products is included at the end.Not to be ignored are the many sidebars in the book, many of which provide essential information, such as those relating to choosing grills, the estimation of food servings for groups, cleaning a grill and food safety when outdoors. Major chefs and designers who specialize in outdoor cooking and grilling are interviewed, including 'Barbeque Bible' maestro Steven Raichlen, Dwayne Ridgaway, Food Network star Paula Deen, Richard Sandoval (author of Modern Mexican Flavors) and Dinosaur Bar-B-Que owner John Stage.We can't all afford to spend a fortune on a full-blown outdoor kitchen, but Amanda Lecky's book is a great resource for outdoor large and small, and is worth more than its weight in (gold or otherwise) briquettes. Outdoor cooking has never been so fully analyzed and featured and this book makes you want to run out on the patio, fight the fall chill and grill a great meal
Totam tibi subdo me. It is not there simply for appearing part here, but rather to appear part there. They do not jump the categories and they get where we go. The dislocated paradigm appeared as if nobody had not taken a reading. Thus it is difficult to get our rolamentos. So who thinks about the foundation of parents, unless it is not excellent to its situation? Illumination beckons, but it is not definitive...and the infinitive certainly is not duplicated. They try to adapt pieces in new matrices, the not old ones. To the arrest of the woman demonstrates they had had matrices at least once in their lives. My matrices are grumosos. Grumoso was the friend of Wally. Wally was an astronaut. It's so easy to rhyme the name of extremity with hourra. Hourra for Captain Spaulding. Elephant, pyjamas, etc. The "I" is moved away. "Correcto," she said as she put old pieces in new matrices. "Don't mention the arrest of the woman or her sibling," she cried. (She sees them in the spaces for new features.) But that is old wisdom. They do not put the new wine in old, old wine peels, nor do they put the new wine in "ivrognes," whatever those are. "They" get it perhaps. Do you?Do you think that the last lives are less complex, or just that the matrix has more dimensions and the known pieces are identical? Hmmm. Do not imply more complexity in the experience until you have learned not to remember new pieces. He is like a devil's food cake without the devil. But pull rank in a Fundente tunnel and you quickly see the defect of sonorous reproductions!If you can read this, you are too close to godhead
Science and religion join hands to oppress. Even when Leiber was trying to write something serious he still couldn't help being satirical, as when he describes aerial dogfights between "angels" and "demons." Only they happen to be airplanes disguised as each. The "demons" even have horns. You smile even if you don't want to, and there's really not much to smile at in this tale of a post-nuclear-war world in which the power-hungry use science and religion to enrich themselves at the expense of a povery-striken world. It's a subversive novel, actually, because Leiber is clearly informing us than when when political power over people is involved, it doesn't matter whether people worship God or the Devil, because for all practical purposes, they're the same thing. As almost always with Leiber, there are cats involved, although in this case they are minor characters
This is THE book for your little ones AND their loved ones!. As a board member for a food-allergy support organization, I review books relating to food allergies every month.This is my favorite for young children like my son.  There are others out there that provide too much information or are a little too scary for the pre-school and toddler set.This book is appropriate for even the youngest child, and it lets them know what they can do with their caregivers to stay safe.If you have a young child with a food-allergy, and can only buy one book, pick this one.If you're lucky enough to have a few, this one will be a warm and welcome addition to your collection!
Salute Mr Block - You've done it!. Kudos to Lawrence Block for creating a witty series in the burglar mysteries, and a special kudo for this entry -- the best of the bunch (so far).  The characters are appealing, the dialog is pithy, and the plot is intriguing.  As usual, burglary is mixed in with murder, and our hero must find the killer to clear his own name.  I loved the way Bernie confronts the suspects in the dramatic scene in the apartment.  Such an intellect hasn't seen the pages of fiction since Nero Wolfe.  I highly recommend this well written book.  I suspect Mr Block would make for a most interesting dinner party
What Do Women Want?. If your new consumer product is selling like crazy, you may not feel you need this book. If, however, you feel you are not getting the response you should get, this book may provide some answers to your problem. Its cute title and subtitle "The Eight Truths of Marketing to Women" may mislead some, particularly men, into thinking this is not a serious guide to marketing. But consider Faith Popcorns credentials. She is recognized worldwide for her successful predictions of trends. She anticipated the amazing success of sport-utility vehicles, the sales boom in alternative medicines, and the failure of New Coke. Her consulting firm has many premier clients, among them IBM, BMW, and Nabisco. The fact that her lecture fee is between $30,000 and $40,000 is also a strong indication of that this lady has something worth hearing.Popcorn bases her book on eight key principles and devotes and entire chapter to each one. In Chapter One, she discusses the basic fact that women connect to other women. 70% say they learn the most about new products from other women. Women are 50% of the on-line population. The slick super hype ad of forty years ago no longer sells women on a brand. She cites the convincing power of the Rosie ODonnell and Oprah TV shows and suggests you click into iVillage.com, disgruntledhousewife.com, and wellweb.com to get a feel as to how your brand may fit in.In Chapter Two, she observes an important gender difference, men focus, women multi-task and lead multiple lives. Her firm coined a new word to describe marketing to women at work: Perfessional. This describes the "ultimate blurring of the personal and professional." If you have female employees, this section is a must read. She cites, as an example, the invention of the Baby Jogger which allows a woman to keep her baby with her while she gets some exercise.Chapter three answers the timeless question, What do women want?" The authors cite example after example of how men and women are wired differently. The key point made here is "Anticipating what women want." They recite how Sony, specifically Akio Morita, practiced "anticipatory marketing" with resounding success.Chapter Four states the old in-your-face image advertising is dead as far as women are concerned. Again, women are wired differently and their massive buying power demands you understand the differences. She cites what she terms "a womans Peripheral Vision." She suggests some new and unusual approaches. She gives the example of Carly Fiorina, chief executive of Hewlett-Packard (83,000 workers, $42 billion sales), who is focusing on customers, not products.Chapter Five examines the changes the large increase in women working has brought about and observes: "The idea that woman consumers need your product more than you need them is Neanderthal thinking." The new magic word is: Convenience. The time saving, convenience, and privacy of on line shopping appeals to women. Popcorn calls it the "Go to Her Truth."In Chapter Six, Popcorn says over the years she has not seen one marketing and media plan dealing with the "Next Generation." Yet new generation customers often begin their selecting based on brands their parents favored. Martha Steward is given as an example of how to create instant heirlooms and instant traditions.Chapter Seven introduces the concept of "Co-parenting as the best way to raise a brand." This means inviting suggestions and acting on them. Many companies cannot welcome help or share the credit. She cites why focus groups fail to elicit true opinions. Many examples on how true opinions can be solicited are given.Chapter Eight deals with how to win the trust of women. The authors emphasize "Everything Matters." Successful companies today must have a conscience and their customers must be made aware that they do.Chapter Nine is a case history study of how "Revlon has lost its mooring, lost emotional contact with its customers ..." She reviews the brilliant marketing at the start and suggests how Revlon could recapture their lead.The seven page appendix lists a great many books, magazines, and web sites for further pursuing the subject. A glossary up front provides definitions to the many coined words created since the founding, in l974, of her marketing consulting firm "BrainReserve."Will reading this book help you decide which color box your new widget should be packed in? Probably not. But if your widget falls among the 80% on the consumer products, in the United States, whose purchase is decided by a woman, reading this book will enable you to better understand the factors that determine her decision.
Laymon is a master of horror!!. Before you read this book read the first book in the series "The Cellar", you won't be asking the question "who is this character?" when you read "The Beast House." "The Midnight Tour" is the third book in this Trilogy (paid through the nose for this one but it was worth it if you can find it). I am telling you I am more than impressed with these books, they are well written and fun to read. I did find this book kind of Kinky at times but what the heck! Highly recommend Laymons books, they are one of a kind in the horror arena!
The All-Time Best SELLING Personal Finance Bible!. While many books have been written about personal finance, none have had the initial and lasting impact as has this great classic by the late, great Charles J. Givens.Wealth Without Risk came out in late 1988, early 1989. No one knew these strategies. Nobody knew how to reduce their auto insurance. No one that you could get a lower interest rate on your credit cards just by asking. No one ever thought about using their home equity as an income stream. Only A.L. Williams people where teaching the folly of investing in (w) hole life insurance.Nobody knew how car insurance and automobile dealers were ripping people off. And no one knew how to really use their 401 (k) plans at work or their IRA. Tell someone you opened a self directed IRA and they would say "what the heck is a self-directed IRA?" They thought it was like a missile that was aimed at you!Nobody knew that you could make 20% in mutual funds and invest without paying commissions. And only a handful of us knew about tax liens certificates and discounted mortgages.There were a few other financial authors out there like Venita Van Caspel and Robert Allen. Only Allen came close to offering the results Givens offered and Allen was limited to real estate investing (I highly recommend Robert Allen as well)Although I would recommend the newer More Wealth Without Risk over this older version, the original Wealth Without Risk is also packed with information that can positively impact your bottom line.Don't be surprised if you find resistance with certain financial people. Even though this book came out over 17 years ago, little in the financial world has changed. When people have their hands in your pockets, guess what their primary interest is? HINT: It's not in your best interest that is for sure.Givens may be gone but he has left a legacy that has lived on. Like other great books, Wealth Without Risk will continue to sell for decades to come.RIP Chuck and thank you!
This Cat Has Nine Lives. I didn't know what I was getting into when I picked up this book. The title, "Caught Stealing," at first suggested a crime story; however, it was immediately clear that the subject of baseball is the string that gets the main character, Hank, through what is an extremely rough ten days in late September, 2000. And yes, there is crime involved. A lot of crime.This story is VERY well written. The writing is straightforward, conversational and quick. Even without the use of quotation marks or dialog attributions, I had no trouble following it. The writing is what got me to sit through seemingly endless gratuitous violence and the prolific use of the "f-word," (which actually doesn't bother me). I believed this is indeed how each of the characters, Hank, his shaky neighbor, the rotten cop, all the thugs, and Hank's co-horts at the bar where he worked until the first beating got the best of him, spoke this way. In other words, the use of voice is dead-on. Audible. Further, it made me glad I don't hang around in such circles. I don't think Hank ever expected to find himself in this situation either, which makes him all the more likable. We sympathize with him from the start because of his lost dream of being a major league baseball player and then, because of the death of his friend, who died in a car accident when Hank was behind the wheel. It also doesn't hurt that he continually checks in with his parents. In spite of the reeking, bleeding, killing character he becomes, Charlie Huston has the reader rooting for him until the end.The baseball theme--and a fan's addiction to `his' team--is a clever ploy. (It ties in nicely with Hank's addiction to alcohol.) Bottom line: I simply had to keep turning pages to find out Hank's next move and whether or not his "adopted" cat, Bud, would make it through the ordeal as well. Ultimately, it seems the cat gets the most respect.From the author of "I'm Living Your Dream Life," and "The Things I Wish I'd Said," McKenna Publishing Group
From the Author of  "My Truths, Accepting Higher Knowledge". A countinual source of inspiration, so I appreciate the book for that fact.  While there was much useful information provided within this book, there were several life situations discussed that I had little interest in
Oates at Her Best. Joyce Carol Oates is a marvelous writer, who does very well exploring the dark, seamy underside of life, and in Faithless, she remains faithful to her style.  The characters in these stories have all been betrayed in one way or the other and deal with their betrayal in different, and sometimes really warped, ways.  These stories are all strong, all engrossing and will please those just discovering Oates and those who have admired her all along
A desert thriller. I loved the descriptions of the west Texas terrain, and the tough character of Anna Pidgeon in this unusual mystery.  Anna, a park ranger who escaped NYC after the death of her husband, discovers &quot;accidents&quot; are happening a little too frequently at Guadeloupe Mountains National Park.  The descriptions of her and her fellow NPS employees is fascinating.  I also loved the relationship she has with her psychiatrist sister, whom she frequently calls back in NYC.  The end scene is terrific, as the killer is unveiled and Anna struggles to save her own life in the middle of nowhere.  And I loved the way Anna serves justice in the end
Very cute, rhyming book. My 3-year-old son loves this book. It has catchy rhymes that are silly and a lot of animal pictures.  It is one of his favorite books and one I love to read as I can put a lot of feeling into it.  This is one of Karma Wilson's funniest books and the illustrations are great
Review by Happy. The Silver Chair was an excellent read filled with action, adventure, and peril. The tale starts out with two Adolescents named Jill Pole and Eustice Scrubb. They are about to get whisked away to the magical land of Narnia. A secret mission is given to them by the ruler of the land, Aslan the great lion. Their job is to rescue the prince Rilian of Narnia, who is said to have been killed on a hunting trip, years and years ago. With the help of their new friend Puddleglum the Marsh Wiggle, Pole and Scrubb will go through a series of challenges which will test their friendship and their faith in Aslan, the most essential part of their mission (for reasons I can't spoil for you all). From fighting through blizzards, to fording ice cold rivers, to escaping from the flooding of an underground fortress, this is a great book from start to finish.Right from the beginning, I could tell that this would be a great book. C.S. Lewis has done a phenomenal job with this book. I would never have thought that he could surpass the other books in the series, but he did. Pole and Scrubb go everywhere. There's a big "Lord of the rings" type journey thorough the mountains, a "Jack and the bean stock" style of escaping a castle, they even go underground into the heart of Narnia, a little C.S. Lewis "Original twist".There is absolutely no way to guess where prince Rilian is until the answer is upon you. All hope is lost until BAM! The children find the missing piece to the puzzle, they solve the riddles, and they find that they were closer to the answer then ever before. I personally thought that they were going to die. They get trapped underground by a powerful witch. There's about 100,000 earth men that are against them as well, I didn't see hope. I can't say what happens but I'll say this, it turns out good.In Conclusion, The Silver chair was a great and epic tale. I recommend reading the other Chronicles of Narnia first. Seeing as this book is the sixth installment to the series, it's very hard to understand without the background information. If you like the Lord of the Rings, you've got to read this
Insightful!. Vivek Ranadive's book says technology has changed the way business is conducted. Having seemingly stated the obvious, though, he tells you what this means. This technology has spawned "the event-driven revolution," a transforming shift in how corporations act. The book begins with the early transformation of the financial services industry to an event-driven business. It goes on to discuss enterprise business applications, and then the Internet. Throughout, the author addresses the differences between contemporary and event-driven business models, with great emphasis on the event-driven model. This book is densely written, yet surprisingly easy to read. Ranadive provides a good background for students and Internet entrepreneurs (all those who think the event-driven business world started with Jim Clark and Netscape are in for a shock). We [...] recommend this book to leaders thinking of shifting to an event-driven business mode. You'll also like it if you want enough background to join the conversation about how event-driven organizations function
An Invitation to Mention God More Often. Professor Thomas Long is well known as a major representative of Christian faith.  He has served on the faculty of Princeton Theological Seminary and is currently the Bandy Professor of Preaching at Candler School of Theology, Emery University.  Ever since the first time I heard him speak in 1987, his witness has blessed me.  So too in this book, in which Dr. Long addresses the importance of talking about what we believe about God, Jesus, the Holy Spirit and the Church.He starts the book with a wry observation made by a New Yorker, "At fashionable dinner parties in this town you can talk about anything...  But if you mention God more than once, you probably won't be invited back."  (Page 3). I have been to parties like that and perhaps you have as well.  Where, when people find out that you are a follower of Jesus, they glaze over, say something like "How nice for you..." and then drift away.Now, aside from the fact that we might want to avoid such fashionable dinner parties in madcap Manhattan, what Dr. Long is also saying to us: "Christians of the world, speak up and be heard!"  And then he goes on to say how and why and what we might want to be talking about, in matters of faith, in everyday conversation.  I like that.  Saying what we believe is a gift, even an art-the well chosen word can attract, peek the interest, engage, encourage and convince the listener.  You have that ability as you go about your day to day routine.  Your faith can lead others to Christ and help them along life's narrow way.  But only if you will speak up.Dr. Long's book (one of the top ten best selling religious books of 2004) is not a book about personal witness or evangelism so much as it is on telling the truth about who God is, for us.  He says that how God has engaged our life is a story that just has to be told: to our children, in the midst of meetings, when a friend has a bad medical diagnosis, when people are disagreeing about school policies, our the fence I the yard and yes, even at a dinner party.  He also address the difference between a time to speak and a time to keep silence-as we honor both God and the person God has put us with, in the situation in which God has placed us.My personal favorite portion of this book is on page 46, when he says this, "It has been said that if we really knew how to see with the eyes of our souls, we would see angels going before every person we meet, saying, `Make way for the image of God!  Make way for the image of God!'"  We know from John 3:16 that God loves us that much...  would that we would love one another as God loves us all.  So we could equally look at each person we meet and reminder ourselves, "Jesus died for him.  Jesus died for her."Dr. Long ends the book with a story that is the point of the entire book.  Contained in it is the vital question: If someone were to hear you speaking, could they tell who you are?  Could they tell that you are a child of God and a follower of Jesus?If you find this review helpful you might want to read some of my other reviews, including those on subjects ranging from biography to architecture, as well as religion and fiction.
First-rate. Like a lot of folks I have a fascination with the '60's and the title essay from this collection, a look at the hippie 'scene' in the Haight-Ashbury section of San Francisco, is one of the classic contemporary reports on the counter-culture. Ironically the title, picked from Yeats' poem, 'The Second Coming', was intended to suggest that hippiedom was the coming paradigm; in reality Didion completed her essay shortly before the 'death of the hippie'. Slouching Towards Bethlehem is the best book of essays I have ever, by the grace of God, been fortunate enough to own and read. In essay after essay, I found myself saying,&quot;Go on, Joan. You said it, Joan. We are the same, you and I, Joan, etc.&quot; That is the type of book Slouching Towards Bethlehem is. Reading it, slowly, meticulously, I felt such a close kinship, a bond, not with the writer but with her words -- so carefully chosen and wonderfully articulated. If youre looking for another great book to read, try The Bark of the Dogwood with its jaw-dropping scenes, hilarity, and darkness all woven together. It takes place in the 60s, 70s, 80s, and well into the 90s, showing a variety of culture and class. Not to be missed, this one
Another good on Stone Masonry. Another good book on traditional stone masonry. I wish there was some some colour photos in it. It does have some information that is not found in other stone mason books. Add it to your Stone Masonry library
Mercy Watson to the Rescue. Mercy Watson to the Rescue, by Kate DiCamillo, is a wonderful chapter book for beginning readers.   Mercy Watson, a lovable family member, who happens to be a pig, embarks on many adventures throughout the night and into the morning.  The adventure begins when Mercy realizes she is afraid of the dark, and she makes her way into her parent's bed where she feels warm and safe.  As they sleep dreaming, they are awakened by a loud boom followed by a crack in the floor that leaves their bed hanging out of the ceiling.  As Mercy jumps off the bed and runs out of the room, Mr. and Mrs. Watson believe she is going for help, when in reality she is in search of her favorite meal, hot buttered toast.  Unable to find the toast, Mercy wonders where she can get a snack.  She remembers her neighbor, Baby Lincoln, likes sugar cookies and shares.  Upon remembering this, Mercy ventures over to her neighbors house and pecks on her bedroom window.  Thinking Mercy is a monster, Baby Lincoln screams, and awakens her sister, Eugenia Lincoln, who calls the fire department.  As the evening continues, the adventures do as well.  What will Mercy do?  Will she get help for her parents?  Will Mr. and Mrs. Watson be saved?  What about the Lincoln sisters?I enjoyed reading this story, and found it hard to put down once I started reading it.  The story, along with the wonderful picture illustrations, kept my attention and interest.  I wanted to know what was going to happen next.  I believe young children will enjoy reading what happens to Mercy Watson in this book, as well as, in her upcoming adventures.
One of the best Oprah picks!. I haven't read many Oprah picks, but I am so glad I read this one. It's a murder-mysery intertwined with related events, past and present. As another reviewer said, this book has marvelous pacing and I totally agree with that. You get deeper and deeper into the story as it goes along and I could never second-guess this book, either! All I can say is Wow! So glad I read it!! Along with this one, I also recommend "Any Man".
Appealing to all of the senses. In luscious pictures (by Robert Freson), recipes and anecdotes, "Patricia Wells At Home In Provence" contributes enthusiastically to America's love affair with the place. Seasonal freshness is paramount and Wells prefers her meats and fish whole and unboned. Organized by course, Recipes include tips for storage, techniques, accompaniments and wines.Many recipes are simple - a "caviar" made with black olives and butter, Goat Cheese Gratin ("pizza without the crust"), raw Grated Beet Salad, Quick Chicken Lemon Soup, Potatoes Roasted in Sea Salt, Lemon-Thyme Lamb Chops.Others require a bit more time - Beef and White Wine Daube From Arles with Anchovies and Capers, Chanteduc Rabbit with Garlic and Preserved Lemons, Sea Bass in Parchment with Warm Pistou.One of the nicest aspects of Wells style is her penchant for describing techniques and the reasoning behind them - from the action of citrus in a seviche to filleting a fish to blanching olives or cutting up a rabbit.A delightful treat for sensuous cooks
A Story Through The Eyes  Of An Innocent  9 Year Old Child Amidst Unspeakable Horror. My Number One Reading Consultant John from Matilda's book store in Mount Waverley recommended this book to me without giving any hint of what the story was about  which I am grateful for since the book speaks for itself. It is about a 9 year old German boy named Bruno who has to move from Berlin to the countryside because his Father has a new position . Brunos sees a fence and buildings and a lot of people wearing what he calls "striped pyjamas" but he does not realize that he is caught in the middle of the Holocaust of Word War Two  at the Auschwitz Concentration Camp and the one friend that he makes is of the Jewish Race.This book has a lot of significance for me because my Mother grew up in  Germany at the time when this book is set and she has told me that like Bruno a large percentage of grown up German people were unaware of the horrors that Jews in  Wartime Germany had to endure. This book is told with the Innocence of Youth and  yet is dark and compelling at the same time. This book was so rivetting that I finished it in one afternoon sitting. Thanks again John for yet another great book
Another Great Read, Better than Last Few. First, I am a fan of Ann Rule.  I feel she handles her genre expertly.  With the past few crime files books, however, I found myself becoming a little disappointed although I still enjoyed her books.  I felt that too much time was spent on the detectives (yes, I am sure that her police background makes her partial) and I found that old cases were being written about without any new information added.  Along came this book and I purchased it expecting to be entertained but not expecting the book to be up to Ms. Rule's usual standard.  Well, this book surprised me.  I thoroughly enjoyed the five stories in this volume and I will now look at the next in the crime files a bit differently and without skepticism.  I feel like this is a worthy book and not one that the publisher was in a hurry to get "out there" in order to make a buck.  Whether you are new to Ann's book or someone who has read everything she has written, you will enjoy this book.
Every parent should read it!. An excellent book. Every parent should read it
A Classic Reissued. J.B. Bury wrote his &quot;History of Greece&quot;  before World War I, but it was such a good overview of classical Greek history that the third edition was still being used as a college textbook in the late 1960's.  Although only selected portions of the text were assigned reading, I read the book cover to cover and have kept it to this day.  Bury writes in a lucid, easily understood style that entertains as it educates.  Although Bury recounts campaigns and battles in stirring fashion, he does not neglect the Greek contributions to politics, the arts, and sciences.  Except for his obvious dislike of the Spartan King Agesilaus, I found Bury to be fair and even-handed in his  evaluation of the peoples and events that shaped Greek history
I loved this book. Krauss's loveable characters break your heart and they journey they take heals it in a strange esoteric way.  This is what reading is all about
A Classic. Well, let us think about this a little bit...You want to learn Category theory, whether for some course or just for the fun of it, and now where do you turn in order to learn the necessary concepts.  If you are a mathematician and have some experience, then you turn to the masters, the originators of the given subject and read their work.  Sure, being the founder of a given subject does not imply that you are a good expositor and hence are capable of revealing the necessary concepts for the beginner-allow me to inform that Mac Lane is indeed as good as an expositor as he was a mathematician.  For any doubters, I point you to the only other text you should read on Category theory, namely, &quot;Category Theory&quot; by Horst Herrlich and compare this text with Mac Lane's.  Aside from that, and with respect to the text, for most beginners or interested readers I would suggest the following outline: Read 1.1-6; 2.1-3 &amp; 8 possibly 2.4; all of 3; as for 4 skip section 3; 5.1-5; all of 8.  Then, dependent upon your desires and or focus as well as your mathematical ability, it should become obvious which of the remaining topics should be read.  Finally, the only other source I would recommend for learning Category theory can be found on-line using the keyword 'Awodey'.  Anyways, Enjoy and good luck
Great information... This book has great information about all types of minerals and vitamins.  I had a hard time putting the book down.  I learned so much more about the minerals and vitamins and what doses you should be using.  Now I know how much my body needs of certain vitamins
Happy Customer. Wonderful prompt service.  Couldn't be happier. Book was in wonderful condition
Terrifically Funny!. Wendy McClure entertains and charms her audience with a collection of witty, beautiful, and funny tales regarding her personal weight loss battle in "I'm not the New Me." McClure begins by telling her audience that every fat girl has a fat story about the trauma that caused the fat, but that she will spare us that recollection. Instead, McClure treats us to a bevy of hysterical anecdotes about her personal weight struggles, love life challenges, and family dysfunction.I found "I'm not the new me" to be delightful. McClure's writing is very reminiscent of Laurie Notaro, of whom I am a huge fan. I thought this book was engaging and personal, while being funny and vulnerable. I do hope that McClure writes additional works, because I am really in love with her humor and writing style.I highly recommend this book
Best self-help book, highly recommended. I knew that 1 day I was gonna have this. This book is very incredible and very good. It tells it all what u need to deal on time management. I was first introduced to this book by my Dad who was reading it 1 time and it didn't impress me much at first, but I knew it'll be good someday. Nowadays I still got it and still is a Must-Read. B. Eugene Greissman (the author of the book) did a good job on this book and try to observe, relay and process information behind it. He 'specially talks about keeping up w/ time, not talking too much, how to communicate and motivate with others, how to manage your speed reading, your speed talking or speaking a bit, how to save time and money, how to memorize everything by using mnemonics, how to set your goals, what u plan and what's aside so forth. Also I accept Napoleon Hill, Stephen Covey, Warren Bennis, Patrick Morley, etc. which I read right now with the positive and self-help meaning process and discussion off they works. It's such interesting stuff! This is a Must if u're interested w/o a doubt it's still worth the bargain price.P.S. I recommend THINK AND GROW RICH by Napoeleon Hill, HOW TO TAKE CONTROL OF YOUR TIME AND YOUR LIFE by Alan Lakein, LIFE STRAEGIES by Phillip McGraw aka Dr. Phil, The Bible,  The Holy Koran, HOW TO WIN FRIENDS AND INFLUENCE PEOPLE by Dale Carnegie, LEADERS and ON BECOMING A LEADER all by Warren Bennis, plus ANYTHING by Pat Morley, Stephen Covey, J. Randy Taraborelli, David Ritz, Marc Eliot, etc
essential for first year nursing. This flipbook is perfect for first year nurses because it presents valuable information in a easy to flip, erasable pad. The book has everything from lab values, CPR techniques, assessment data, insulin regimens, tables of meds that counteract each other, and I/O figures for measurement. I used this book a lot for labs during nursing school and liked flipping through to remember basics that would slip my mind. Its a great present for any nursing student or first year graduate. The book includes all ages from babies to the elderly, and presents infomation for all types of nursing. Its a great book also because pen marks wipe away by rubbing it off with alcohol (which is in every RN's pocket). The Rnotes also have other makes that are more specific but this is great because it encompasses a wide range of topics.
Rationality could not explain the essence of religion. In this book, Schleiermacher wanted to revitalize the idea that human feeling is absolutely dependent on God. One who reads history in his era will find that something had disappeared from religious life because of subjective rationalism. I assume this is exactly the reason for Romantic movement. In the view of Friedrich Schleiermacher, romanticism was a movement of the rediscovery of feeling as the essence of religion. Feeling is the key idea of how someone internalizes the values, morality, and even the idea of God within himself.For Schleiermacher, science and knowledge which is based on rationality could not explain the essence of religion. Religion has nothing to do with the knowledge of nature. The knowledge of God, on the contrary, could not be understood in the frame of `cause and effect.' Religion always related to the infinite thing, and in order to understand it, one must use immediate feeling. Schleiermacher said, "to seek and to find this infinite and eternal factor in all that lives and moves...and to know life itself only in immediate feeling-that is religion." Schleiermacher denied science because it could not bring out the contemplation of the infinite. Science or knowledge of religion is not religion itself, and it obviously, cannot be, possibly on the same level with feeling or the contemplation of religion.It is very clear in his book that Schleiermacher wanted to put science and morality underneath religion. One could not understand any thing without religion. As a result, morality and all ethical systems have no meaning without religion. Briefly, it is impossible for a person to be moral or scientific without religion.After subjugating science, morality and even art, Schleiermacher redefined religion and its relation to the universe. He defined religion based on human feeling, even though it doesn't mean subjectivism. We feel all particular action, our being and life, only through the consciousness of God. The consciousness of God is a kind of "external circumstance" that makes all people have the same feeling. Thousands of people could feel the same religiosity aroused in the same manner because of that external circumstance.I found a unique idea in this book when he said: "Every particular religious organization has limited horizons. None, therefore, is able to embrace all; nor, accordingly, is any able to believe that nothing is to be seen beyond its own horizons." From this argument, Schleiermacher wanted to convince readers that difference of feeling is inevitable. Everyone, then, must be ready to see that there may be different views and experiences. Again, this can happen because "the quality of feeling" may be different. Schleiermacher stated: "Religion, however, doesn't for a moment desire to encapsulate all who have faith and feeling within a single faith or feeling. Its task is to develop sensitivity for the eternal unity of life's originating source among people whose capacity for religious experience is still immature." Therefore, within the condition of `immature,' one must be ready to have openness. Each person must be open to the fact that perceptions and feelings belong to other forms of religion for which he may well lack any sensitivity at all. From this point, Schleiermacher imagined a clear conception of inter-subjectivity in religion. He said, "this is precisely the real source of the art and love we are looking for."In relation to morality, Schleiermacher made a distinct separation between religion and conduct. He used an example: one who acts badly may have no morality at all, but one who has morality may not be pious as well. So, the relation between religion and morality is not implicative. Religion, in itself, doesn't urge people to action at all. One can act well or badly depending on one's feelings. Therefore, conduct as a whole should be regarded as a reaction of feeling. If someone puts a good character into his feeling, his conduct will be good as well. The more we can attribute the character of piety to a feeling, the more strongly it tends to retreat within it.
Remarque nailed it early on... There seems to be a plethora of both novels and non-fiction books now about the ravages of war and its aftermath, describing both the physical and emotional scars, now that the world has gone through World War II, Vietnam, and scores of other wars.  However, when Remarque was writing, there was very little literature of this sort.  He nailed it early on, when the Allies were still celebrating their triumphs after the War to End All Wars, and no one outside Germany really cared what happened there.  In the West, even today, we have been conditioned to think of Germany during the World Wars as an army of emotionless automatons who blindly followed orders and suffered no moral apprehension.  This novel, and others by Remarque, show this to be untrue.  The Germans died, cried, loved, lost, and suffered, both physically and emotionally, as much as any soldier of any army.  This is the fitting sequel to "All Quiet on the Western Front" (Paul Baumer even gets a passing mention as the protagonists remember lost comrades), and while it lacks the grit and guts of Remarque's wartime novel, it shows the sense of loss, grief, and hopelessness felt by many on both sides after the Great War, and other wars as well
A great follow-up to Undaunted Courage. His theme is that Lewis &amp; Clark accomplished what all the other explorers could not -- determining whether there was an easy water-based passage across North America.  Like Stephen Ambrose, De Voto was a huge fan of L&amp;C.  The whole Course of Empire leads up to the L&amp;C expedition. It really helps to put the expedition in historical perspective.  More than that, it puts the early history of North America in persective, no small task.  Because De Voto cares about the explorers he describes, it's full of great stories.  (Writing in the early 1950s, he did not have to worry about being politically correct.  But the facts speak for themselves.)  A big book and worth the effort.  No problem for readers of Undaunted Courage.  I was sorry to reach the last page
It's Time We Grow Up. Now we need to get folks to pay attention to our Humanity, at least to try to understand. This Book is a darn good start
Stop the presses. Call William Boot the Forrest Gump of the 1930s: oblivious to the process he is a part of, he continually finds himself in the right place at the right time, blindly stumbling onto the Big Story that made him a reluctant hero.In Scoop, Evelyn Waugh -- one of the most famous curmudgeons of English literature -- produces an enjoyable and easy-to-read satire that will recall the novels of P.G. Wodehouse and Graham Greene's lighter efforts. In the book, Mr. Waugh points his razor wit toward the media, royalty, politics, warfare, and travel, all in the context of a fictional and fanciful war in the made-up Republic of Ishmaelia that is based on Italy's ill-fated war in Abyssinia (now Ethiopia), which Mr. Waugh himself covered as a young reporter.His sharpest barbs are saved for his one-time profession, which he paints as being populated by lazy and back-stabbing prima donnas incapable of independent thought and more interested in style -- or at least the appearance of style -- than in substance. The bland Boot, the story's protagonist who is a decent enough fellow but a hopeless journalist, manages to get far closer to the truth than any of his colleagues but does so only by chance.Though the attitudes, language, and practices described in Scoop are more than a little dated, there is an element of truth in the picture Mr. Waugh paints of the Fourth Estate (as sad cases like the contemporary one involving one-time New York Times rising star Jayson Blair remind us). The descriptions are, however, greatly exaggerated: it is impossible to imagine a time when writers were sent into the field so poorly prepared, with unlimited expense accounts, and rewarded for sending in cryptic messages that are somehow turned into massive front-page reports. There is a slight element of sour grapes in Mr. Waugh's description of the newsgathering field he failed to excel in, something most obvious from the names he chooses for the fictional newspapers in the story (The Daily Beast, The Daily Brute, etc.).More importantly, like most popular satires, Scoop is really less about its subject matter than about comforting those who don't move in the same circles as the rich and powerful the book dismantles between its covers -- remember that these are the same people who were expected to buy this book when it was published in 1938. Even critics at that time recognized this in an as-a-matter-of-fact way, referring to Scoop as a comedy of errors Mr. Waugh dashed off to pay the bills between more weighty projects.But the most serious flaw of the book concerns the way the main character, Boot, evolves ... or fails to evolve. Characters are the cornerstone of any great story and even with a farce like Scoop (compare Boot to the bumbling Wormold in Mr. Greene's Our Man in Havana, another satire produced by a serious writer on a lark) the story is dramatically improved by illustrating the evolution of characters over the length of the narrative. But in Scoop, Boot returns home just the same as when he left. All of the characters, in fact, fail to change at all during the course of the story, with the possible exception of the compelling and shadowy Russian/Hungarian/Pole cum German love interest, Ktchen -- not the best possible work from an author known for producing noteworthy personalities in his more noteworthy novels like Decline and Fall and Brideshead Revisited
Jabbo speaks -- and speaks, and speaks and speaks!. Foolish enough to have dropped a dollar into the cup of a blind man? Don't feel too bad -- over a million other benighted souls did the same thing! Listening to a million dollars rattle sounds a lot like a diamondback on his last lurch forward. Great ideas have never come at such a discount and this book tells you why
Gotta love them fur kids!. As both a dog and cat owner, and a would-be everything-else owner, too, I love this book!  I have several "Chicken Soup" books, plan to add several more to my collection, but this one is probably my favorite so far.  It keeps you between tears and laughter from beginning to end.  All pet lovers will see themselves and their furry, feathered or finned friends somewhere in here, I'm sure
good stuff. i can track my collectible item from this catalogue.this book help me a lotthanksar
Open - Unsolved. Absolutely outstanding.  A bit slower in pace than some of the earlier Harry Bosch novels but much more realistic and interesting.  Character development is superb and the reading by Len Cariou makes the audio version very entertaining.The maturity of Harry's approach to homicide investigation is refreshing though he still retains his abrasive manner with police administration personnel.Looking forward to the next novel in the series
modern overview of ldap. I've read some of the other LDAP books out there and have always complained that they are a bit dated. This book covers modern features of LDAP, reinforces the standards, and is easy to read.This book covers more recent RFC's that are typically not even mentioned in other references. It also encompasses both commercial and open source solutions to problems of scaling, standards, and interoperability.Multiple solutions to problems are given for your benefit. Multiple programming languages are covered to make this a complete reference.
A good place to start. I had the chance to work under Dr. Michael Charney for 5 years before his death.  Dr. Charney focused heavily on education and teaching people.  That is what this book does.  When this book came out he gave me a hard time for buying a copy because it was a &quot;kid's book&quot;.  All of that aside, the book gives a basic introduction to forensic anthropology on a level that explains it to the reader.  It covers the case from start to finish as well as touching on the other aspects of forensic investigation such as forensic entomology and facial reconstruction.  So if you have a child that is wanting to learn more about the field or you are looking for a good place to start learning, this is the book to get
Great Book. This is a great book. Easy to read and very insightful on the subject of being welcoming to guests in the church. I highly recommend it for anyone in the hospitality ministry
Encouraging. I've always been a fan of Saul Williams...eversince Slam.This book continues in his quest to paint pictures with his words, but on a "love" level.I loved it.Also recommended: "I"m Bored with Christianity" by Derrick Engo
Superb reading by Jeremy Irons. Jeremy Irons does an excellent reading of Evelyn Waugh's classic novel.  He very poignantly captures much of the depth and emotion of each of the characters.  I highly recommend this audio version
a great christmas story of faith. this book has been an annual christmas favorite with my 11 children. It teaches a strong message of patient waiting for prayers to be answered.The young boy is unable to speak but through his father learns how to love others as the Savior would. The story of the Nativity is acted out through a young couple in need on Christmas Eve . Because of faith and the Fathers concern for others two Christmas miracles happen in the valley that year. A great book to teach others to remember Him at Christmas time
One of My Favorite Top 10 Books. The title says it all. I often compare this book to The Alchemist but Life of Pi has far more humor to it
The rare preludes are here--thank YOU!. I had to search high and low for Zizzo's edition of the rarer preludes. Here, you have all of the Gershwin keyboard works, including the short preludes I, II and III, as well as those rare preludes &quot;Novelette in Fourths&quot; and &quot;Sleepless Nights.&quot; The &quot;I've Got Rhythm&quot; variations are virtuoso--so beware, this book ranges from the playable to the shockingly difficult. But I can't tell you what a pleasure it is to have it all in one book finally. Thank you, Ms. Zizzo. Even if I can't play all of these, it's &quot;S'wonderful&quot; to be able to read the scores
Good. If you're a history fan and want to find out all about the background of a certain record label or you are interested in how the industry evolved then this is the book for you. Colorful insights into the world of record labels, producers and DJ's are present here along with detailed information concerning every aspect of a record label's evolution. From the small ones to the blockbusters, from the ones owned by stars to the one owned by huge companies this guide has it all
Short stories... This is a wonderful book of short stories that are funny and witty.  He wrote them so they are not obviously funny, but in their own way, a secret beauty.  For example, take the story about the astrologer where there is all this extra info and it does not seem to go anywhere, but then when you read through it you thoroughly enjoy the story. I do not in any way mean to imply that the extraneous details are boring.  When he leads up to the climax, it still is interesting. All I mean is that it may get oh so very slightly confusing.  Take another one of his stories; a story about a dog who is trained to be a watchdog. The whole story is ironical, for when a burglar enters the house, the dog only licks him and goes along with the robber away from the owner.  His stories are all slightly similar, but yet vastly different.  Almost anyone can enjoy this book.   Cheers!!!!!!!!!!   :                )  (An 11-year old reader
The snowmen are snow men. Homicide detectives Leo Magozzi and Gina Rolseth take the lead in this wintertime murder investigation set in Minneapoilis.  A major snowfall has come to provide the material for a snowman-building content.  But a couple snowmen are different from the others in that they contain the bodies of murdered men, and policemen at that.  Another snow-man, found on an iced over lake outside Minneapolis, turns out to be a missing parole officer.  It is discovered that the link between the three men is a paroled convict who has been asking after his ex-wife, whom he had nearly beat to death.The mother and daughter team who make up PJ Tracy certainly know how to write a page-turning book.  Of their alternating protagonists, I actually prefer the detectives, but that's a personal choice.  I appreciate the humor in their writing, offsetting the very serious subject of abuse with the completely inexperienced new Sheriff in Dundas County.  The writing is tight, dialogue crisp, and characters engaging.  The stories are fast-paced and make you want the next book as soon as you've finished the one.  If you looking for an enjoyable Sunday afternoon read, this is it.
well reserched. I would recomend this book to anyone who wants to learn about Ho.  This book was not biased as many other books written by american war veterans.  This author was unbiased which I belive is important in writing a biography.  The only thing I disagreed with the author on is at the end he equates capitalisum with progress which is not always true, some of the poorist countries on earth have been capitalist for generations.  This books demonstrates why Ho is one of the great revolutionaries of the 20th century, along with Che Gruvara and Nelson Mandella.  Like these great men, Ho's family life suffered bc he was so deticated to his cause.  He traveled around the world like these men and his country became a great military power, shatering the inviciblity of the so called honest, heroic american fighting man.  Many american GI's still are unable to come to terms with this fact.  This book also shows how truely moderate Ho was, unlike those leaders who came after him.  If he was still alive the war with communist China may not have taken place.  And he cared for the people who had nothing and always lead a modest, meager life, unlike these so called great american presidents like Bush and the Bush clone, John Kerr
Great for High School Teachers. This book is EXCELLENT as a source for explaining concepts.  There are LOTS of tutorial books for teaching HTML and specific software programs to generate the code, but THEY don't guarantee because a website 'works' logistically on a server, it WORKS for the intended audience
one of my favorites. This was my first Koontz book (since then I've read many) and I think it's still my favorite.  One reviewer said it "will likely let you down, unless your favorite theme in Koontz's books is the transcendence of horror by uplifting spirituality".  Well, yes!  That's the whole reason I read Koontz books - otherwise I don't think I'd be able to sleep at night!  I love the redemption twist he writes into many of his stories (The Face, anyone?).  Anyone can write straight horror without hope, but Koontz acknowledges a bigger picture, and I hope he keeps it up
Ahhh..... It has been said many times that Wallace Stevens is one of the five best and most influential American poets.  After reading this collection of poems it is impossible to disagree.  It is a marvelous experience to pick up this book and read a few poems
Another Wonderful Read!. Judi McCoy doesn't disappoint in her latest novel.  She's hit another fresh area, weaving a new romance with a fascinating twist!  I love the plots to all her books and can't wait for another to hit the shelves
I-should-but-I-can't-put-it-down-book. What a fascinating book. Perhaps autistic people have it more often than not right.  They deserve more credit.Furthermore, what a great detective.  I didn't quite feel the unraveling of the mystery in this book coming as it did.Christopher, the main character in this book, would say:This book is great for anyone:- who likes to get a better understanding of other people, especially autistic ones;- who likes a good old fashioned detective book
Straightforward and Well Reasoned. David Mills has written an excellent and quick-reading guide to atheism for the practical.  There is no lengthy exegesis a la George Smith here, and Thomist arguments make the brief appearance they deserve in a book about clear thinking.  The rest of it is pure gold, written with a debater's needs--how "intelligent" design is illogical and a bit pitiful; how evolution is a fact, not something christians can "debate".Atheist Universe starts off with an interview starring Mr. Mills while he is asked questions by a friendly radio host-sort of person.  This is the essence of the book--the rest of it is fleshing out of the ideas presented here.  A large chunk of the book's midsection is intro to evolutionary biology and cosmology.  Some readers will welcome his non-science background as he explains in lay terms how science has shown no need for a god in the evolution of the universe and life on Earth.I was really baffled about his tirade about pornography; he devotes a chapter to this seemingly unrelated topic.  It really didn't seem to fit anything except a deep need of Mr. Mills to say there's nothing wrong with pornography.  Many readers will agree that it may not lead to violent crime, but many will find his accepting attitude abrasive to appropriate feminist sensibilities.I really enjoyed his quotes from famous atheists/nontheists peppered throughout the book.  It helps the new skeptic understand that many are atheists, but only few can "come out of the closet" due to their fame and prestige.  Give this book a read--some of it may be redundant if you're well read in atheist literature and/or science; but if this is one of your first books, it will change your life for the better!
She's done it again. Ms. Lindskold continues to write literate, well thought out fantasy.  This continuation of the "Firekeeper and Blind Seer" saga proves to be the best yet.  Ms. Lindskold refuses to be predictable.  Besides the Wolf series she has written enough unrelated books such as "Child of a Rainless Year", to prove the extent of her imagination.  An imagination that does not need to construct unbelievable scenarios and long descriptive passages to carry you into her world.  The story alone carrys you with it.  We are lucky indeed to have such a writer
A Wonderful Book. Purse Masterpieces is a wonderful addition to the literature on antique and vintage purses. Many examples pictured in this book have never been seen before, some of them dating to the 18th century. Seven other individual collectors contributed to this book. The sections on beaded, mesh and dance purses has some lovely examples, which any collector would be proud to add to her collection. Another section on frames shows some beautiful jeweled pieces that have not been seen in the exisitng literature. In her first chapter, Ms. Schwartz discusses the relationship of purse designs with the more traditional art form of painting, archeology (Egyptian) and literature. She makes a connection that has not been made in the past in other books on purses, which adds to the literature and makes for a very interesting read. Her value guide is just that, a guide. As all purse collectors know, prices vary from one end of the country to the other, from venue to venue, and year to year. I highly recommend this book to all antique and vintage purse collectors
For Every Kid, Parent, and Grandparent You Know. I've given this book to just about every kid, parent, and grandparent in my life, all to rave reviews.  My niece hoards it from her brother.  One friend's son cooks dinner for the family once a week from this book.  Another friend asks her grand-daughter to choose a recipe or two from the book and they spend a Saturday afternoon centering a cooking lesson around the skills learned therein.  The book strikes just the right tone:  friendly without being cutesy, snappy without being silly.  It's a marvelous idea beautifully executed, and a great gift. Abigail Johnson Dodge hit a home run with this one.
Excellent book for those who already know programming. One of the main reasons I liked this book is it didn't dumb things down too much. I already know how to do basic stuff like program in C and operate a compiler, so it was refreshing to find a game programming book that didn't waste a third of its pages on amateur content. Still, if you know nothing about game programming specifically but have a strong foundation in computers and know C (or can pick it up quickly), this is a great book. The evolution of the examples is well done, leading you from simple 2D vectors (a la Pong) all the way up to platform scrollers with sprites and sound effects.Some would find it silly to have a game programming book these days that covers absolutely no 3D programming, but this book is still very relevant. I think the topics covered are crucial for anyone learning game development, and specifically if you're interested in working on mobile, handheld, or internet games where 2D is still the norm, this book is excellent for that.There were also very few errors in the text, remarkable for a book of its size with so many code listings
mental and physical fitness. imagine the combo keep your brain alive and total fitness in 30 minutes a wee
Should be recommended reading. for everyone interested in this subject.  Patrick Heron has done an excellent job explaining the Nephilim.  This book has answered all my questions.
Great Midnight Help. This is a good, well written, and well organized book. There is a whole section on diarreha, including how much Pepto-Bismal to give a dog and other home care. This was invaluable when my dog got into something she shouldn't have eaten.
Very good book!. I loved reading this book. I am only interested in reading stories like this one and this one was great! I recommend you get this book asap!
Not For The Timid. Whether you are a man in a position of power/authority, or a woman who routinely encounters men in power and authority, this book should be required reading.  Men using their positions of power and authority to  victimize women is a problem of huge proportions.  Some men are predators,  some men are culpably ignorant of their own individual weaknesses.  Dr  Rutter attacks this issue of sexual tensions in relationships between men  and the women who should be able to trust these men.    His true stories  are very clear and chilling.  They are chilling because if you are honest,  you can see yourself in those situations.  Dr. Rutter has expressed the  subtle emotional undercurrents that go on within a man-woman  work/professional relationship better than any other book I have ever read.      He does not mince words or try to nicely talk around blunt, painful and  destructive sexual encounters within the &quot;Forbidden Zone.&quot;  If  you want to bury your head in the sand and pretend that these interpersonal  sexual dynamics are not there, then stay away from this book.  If you want  to deal with reality, try to understand yourself and safeguard your  professional relationships, then read this book
The standard reference - deservedly. Discursive and authoritative, the one failing is the lack of convenient  text search. When available on CD-ROM with that capability, it will be an  ideal reference
Simplified irrigation design. This resource is excellent. Extreme detail, great illustrations, and information that is not provided by other typical irrigation books you'll find at Home Depot. I'm a landscape designer and highly recommend this resource
I Kill With My Heart. I do not aim with my hand.He who aims with his hand has forgotten the face of his father.I aim with my Eye.I do not shoot with my hand.He who shoots with his hand has forgotten the face of his father.I shoot with my Mind.I do not kill with my hand.He who kills with his hand has forgotten the face of his father.I kill with my Heart.---------The major thing I don't understand is why in every version of the cover art, Blane is depicted as an old-west style train, when he's a ultramodern monorail in the book?  Five star writing quality, but I have to take something off for the incongruity of the artwork
PUBLISHER'S GROTESQUE ACADEMIC IRRESPONSIBILITY  CUTTING FOOTNOTES. This great biography was written by an academic historian who gathers and compares several sources, yet the publisher to cut costs cuts the footnotes, which are of essential and greatest interest. In our era of intellectual property and knowledge as commodity, the publisher did not wish to provide the reader with specific indications for further study through the footnotes. With the collapse of the Internet we may never know what amplifications and insights the author may have included in these footnotes, which were no doubt as exhaustive as the work itself. How could the once great St. Martin's have been so academically irresponsible for commercial purposes? It is as inexplicable as our once great nation's journey from the intelligent JFK to the solipsistic W.
A House Divided. "The Shame of the Nation: The Restoration of Apartheid Schooling in America" will challenge any illusion the reader holds that America has left her divided and racist history far behind. Truly a heart rending account of apartheid schooling that bridges the larger social implications of racial and economic disparity with the daily life and dreams of our children.
This is how real-time development should be done. The ROOM methodology is specifically tailored for the practical development and maintenance of real-time systems.  Have you ever tried to use CASE tools but found that something is always lost between design and  implementation?  Have you ever had to fix code where there was no design  documentation at all?   Use the techniques in this book, and those days are  gone.  The key point from this book is that the ROOM models are executable.   The model IS the system.  The mapping from your model to the code is  unambiguous.  Your implementation NEVER deviates from the design - that is  how the methodology works.  Your design is a living document.  If you are  doing serious real-time work read this book and check out [...] - you won't regret it
The Notebooks of Leonardo da Vinci - Volume One. Leonardo's notebooks are a staggering monument to the human intellect and Jean Paul Richter has done a remarkable job of editing and compiling Leonardo's various writings on so many subjects into a readable and unified  whole.  In all, Mr. Richter has done a marvelous job.  His efforts have  helped to bring the genius of Leonardo to an even wider readership
We have found that this book is a MUST for any avid griller!. Out of many of my cookbooks or recipes I keep coming back to this one.  I have received more raves about my cooking when I use something from this book.  The recipes are easy to read.  The grilling tips are right on.  I  have found that I can try anything and it comes out great!
The best of the D200 books, I think. Superb. I recommend this to anyone with a D200. I of course own the manual, I also bought Thom Hogans CD book (which was pretty good), but this one is the best. Really.Through expatiations of the entire camera and all the many settings. I don't think you'll be disappointed with this one.Good job on writing this one! Thank
The BEST book i've EVER read in my life... Harriet the spy iis my favorite book EVER. It has been since i was 6, and i still love it. Its so hard to explain it in words..you just might have to read it yoursel
A. Excellent.  The "Pirate Coast" clearly reveals the meaning of "A million dollars for defense, but not a cent for tribute.
Fascinating but not profound. I found this book to be highly readable and to stand as an important example of immigrant and post-immigrant fiction. The Chinese-American experience is different from the Jewish-American experience or the Irish-American experience, but they also have a great deal in common. Tan successfully portrays the younger generation's desire to conform to American ideals and the older generation's often stubborn resistance to acculturation. Somewhere in between lies a happy medium that is often not attained until a third or fourth generation.My only gripe is not with the book itself but with the notion that this is a profound work of literature that needs to be taught in high school or even college classes. I see it as excellent popular fiction, which is a major achievement, but not as a book for the ages
High-Toned Son of a Writer. I'm not a King reader, but I do know of his former pseudonym Richard Bachman, and it's partly this knowledge that makes The Dark Half go down so deliciously.  This book is, of course, the result of King's now exposed alter ego: In his non-fictional On Writing, King imagines Bachman to be a rather unpleasant man, with his own history and back story.  A fiction suit, if you will.The plot of TDH is similar.  Thad Beaumont is a writer whose pseudonym, George Stark, takes on a life of his own after Beaumont decides to expose his actual identity.  Stark then goes on a killing spree in an attempt to reach Thad and maintain his existence in 'the real world'.  And, like Bachman, Stark is not a nice man.This last element is the triumph of TDH.  Stark is nasty, ruthless, clever, and great with kids.  And wonderfully so.  The things he does are intolerable, obviously, but he is written with a dark wit and even some sympathy that makes him more than a razor-wielding serial killer.  We know what kind of car he drives, what his bumper sticker reads, what kind of pencils he likes to write with.  We even get to spend some time inside his head.  King also adds excerpts from the 'books' that Stark writes (or, the books that Thad pretending to be Stark writes, before he came alive and started killing people).  He's not faceless, but as a murderer, he remains tantalizingly just out of our reach; and his search for creative autonomy from his creator is an intriguing sub-plot that many artists will be able to empathize with.  His relationship with the meeker Thad is carried out excellently, though sometimes I found myself wishing King would stop being so subtle and just let Stark and Thad duke it out in their own private hell.The supernatural elements are both beneficial and detrimental to the plot.  If, as the cop character suggests, Stark was merely some psycho who was upset that Beaumont stopped writing Stark novels, this would have been a much less relevant read.  The fact that Stark is, in fact, a product of Thad's overworked imagination and is even part of his personality, puts TDH in a good position to explore the nature of the subconscious, alter egos, and what happens when fantasy is taken too far.However, there are some parts that slow the story down.  There is simply too much justification and exposition given to Stark's existence.  The enigma of the sparrows is fascinating while unsolved, but the book would have been cleaner without the mythos and psychic connections, and much of the build-up ends up leading to disappointing deus ex machina devices.  King takes things too far and too messily, when I would have been content to just suspend my disbelief and take it as granted that Stark could pull himself out of Thad's internal netherworld.Another thing that bugged me was the cop character, Alan.  The POV switches around, letting us catch glimpses of the plot from the eyes of different characters.  This got cumbersome after I had to continually wait for Alan to catch on to what I and everyone else already knew.  The pacing started to drag near the end and, worst of all, Stark's POV is left unattended for the last third or so; this was not only inconsistent, but reduced the character to just slightly above the level of your everyday supernatural maniac.  This is rectified just in time, but though the ending is great fun to read, it simply didn't fit in with whatever messages King had been leading up to with Stark and his not entirely unsympathetic goals.  It seemed like a triumph of style over substance, if you catch my drift.Despite the minor cop-outs, the POV meanderings, the clumsy supernatural explanations and the drag just before the climactic finale, The Dark Half is a juicy tale with some excellent characters.  Fans of the explorations first undertaken in Misery might appreciate this supernatural dark half.
As a Man Thinketh changed my entire life.... 1. Discuss the main ideas that you found most important in this book and discuss why they were important to you.`As A Man Thinketh' by James Allen encompasses the idea that "All that a man achieves and all that he fails to achieve is the direct result of his own thoughts." James Allen eloquently explains how our thoughts create our reality and that "In a justly ordered universe, where loss of equipoise would mean total destruction, individual responsibility must be absolute. A man's weakness and strength, purity and impurity, are his own and not another man's." Before reading the book I was unsure to what extent our thoughts played in the creation of our experience. I have always believed we can do whatever we put our minds to, though I was unsure of what extent we could exercise control in the creation of our experience and by what means does one actively create? After reading this book I felt my questions were answered and life suddenly took on a whole new perspective. I felt as though I had uncovered another piece of the jigsaw puzzle of life, slotting into place a new perspective that not only helped uncover and concretize a new understanding of life but also shone light across the rest of the picture. A world of possibilities became apparent with the realization that through an effort in right thinking and observation of circumstance I could begin to experiment to see just what exactly I can create. This same observation would bring clarity to how my negative thinking affects reality and what role it has in my learning and progress.Circumstance does not make the man; it reveals him to himself.As each day passes the message this book puts forward becomes ever increasingly apparent. "Good thoughts and actions can never produce bad results; bad thoughts and actions can never produce good results." Mentally reviewing past experiences I can see and understand the correlation between thoughts I had chosen to entertain and my circumstances. Looking at my present situation I can see how my thoughts are synchronous with the reality I see before me. At an ever increasing pace I am now seeing how quickly my thoughts change and effect my present, my future and my past. The more I practice looking at life as a reflection and part of myself the more it seems like a game where we have to remain aware and look for clues as to how to best attune ourselves to the thoughts that will allow us to interact with our situation in the most harmonious way.Until thought is linked with purpose there is no intelligent accomplishment. With the majority the bark of thought is allowed to "drift" upon the ocean of life. Aimlessness is a vice, and such drifting must not continue for him who would steer clear of catastrophe and destruction.Reading this book helped me to understand that there is no such thing as chance and that we can all take responsibility for every occurrence in our lives. Through the acceptance of responsibility we can use our current experience to design a way forward which best serves everybody. If there is nobody else to blame except ourselves then we should be thankful to all those involved in revealing what we ourselves have created.2. Can you relate the ideas or concepts in this book to your personal circumstances in life such as your relationships, your beliefs, your goals, your values, etc? Explain.Since reading As A Man Thinketh one of my goals now is to help as many of the people around me, as I can, to think about and use the ideas put forth in the book to construct their own viewpoint from which they can then draw conclusions. Embracing the gift of responsibility for a power which grants us control over our circumstances would change the fundamentals of society. I believe this would push us all in a more positive direction. I can vividly imagine a world where people were encouraged to think outside the construct of the societal framework, frames which less binds us together as it does section us off from the world outside of the box. If our circumstances our brought about by our thinking then it would equate that global circumstances are a reflection of our collective global thinking. If we were to fundamentally change the way we think about reality, and even learn to positively influence reality, then the world will outwardly reflect this change in thinking. My goal in life is to attune my thoughts to ones that will help turn the vision I see of a world that works for everybody into a reality.Reading `As a Man Thinketh' helped move me to one of the most exciting standpoints yet, which is that there is no such thing as chance. Looking from one angle it would not appear to me that everything is predestined. I do, however, think we co-create every situation in our lives through our thinking. Our thoughts assist in the creation of our reality and when we don't pay attention to our thoughts and feelings then the situations our subconscious mind creates might seem random and we may use the `chance' concept as a valid excuse and reason for not taking responsibility for the unwanted experience. Realizing I have no excuses for anything has been a huge turning point in my life. The idea to me makes life in my mind fair. At least for the experiences I can vouch for.When I read the book much of what was said was immediately apparent and I had already come to a similar conclusion about some of my past experiences. About three years ago, just before I left England, I fell out with my best friend Huw who I had been friends with for ten years. One weekend in the summer of '02 after I had just come back from a holiday with Huw and some of our other friends. In the evening a group of us came together to meet and some rather unexpected events took place. The crux of the story is that Huw decided to take somebody else's word over mine with regards to a then recent situation. The information Huw had chosen to believe suddenly left our friendship of ten years in a less than an existent state of being. At first the situation seemed like a chance happening and I was perplexed by how such a situation could have come about, having arisen from decisions based on what I knew to be a fabrication. I felt powerless suddenly and life seemed arbitrary. I really didn't understand how such a situation could have come about. Could it be that sometimes life was unfair? For days I was caught up in a circular mess of thoughts, searching for the cause of the situation. I started with thinking that the person who had lied to Huw was to blame and that Huw had had issues anyway. I came to various conclusions, however they all included the idea that sometimes things happen that we have no control over. This stirred more confusion in me as it was something I did not wish to believe. After really stepping out of the picture, leaving the country for Cambodia, which for me really put a new and helpful perspective on life, and then thinking about my relationship with Huw retrospectively I came to see that just as 'Circumstance does not make the man; it reveals him to himself.' life was revealing to me what unfortunate circumstances could come about as the result of a build up and accumulation of unaddressed problems throughout our relationship. I asked myself how a friend of ten years would believe this person over me and with this in mind the actual truth of the situation is in my opinion irrelevant. If I had been a good enough friend to Huw then trust would have gone without question. I had lost the trust and faith of a friend. The deterioration of my relationship with Huw had gotten out of control and manifested a situation where I was forced to pay attention. The situation had happened in such a way that it forced me to pay attention to what was important. It wasn't anything to do with one situation. I had created my own fate way before that from all the things over the years which had built up and built up and probably already given me countless clues I should have paid attention to, until finally it was right in my face and I had to pay attention.A man does not come to the alms-house or the jail by the tyranny of fate or circumstance, but by the pathway of groveling thoughts and base desires. Nor does a pure-minded man fall suddenly into crime by stress of any mere external force. The criminal thought had long been secretly fostered in the heart, and the hour of opportunity revealed its gathered power. Circumstance does not make the man; it reveals him to himself. No such conditions can exist as descending into vice and its attendant sufferings apart from vicious inclinations, or ascending into virtue and its pure happiness without the continued cultivation of virtuous aspirations; and man, therefore, as the lord and master of thought, is the maker of himself and the shaper of and author of environment. Even at birth the soul comes of its own and through every step of its earthly pilgrimage it attracts those combinations of conditions which reveal itself, which are the reflections of its own purity and impurity, its strength and weakness.3. What are the most important new ideas or concepts you learned from this book? Please Explain.One of the most important new ideas this book helped me grasp was the idea that there is no such thing as chance and that we are solely responsible for our personal circumstances.After reading As a Man Thinketh it felt strongly apparent that this world of ours works in just the way it's supposed to, indeed quite perfectly, and it would seem to me that it is us who are playing the game of life some how unaware of the rules. James Allen has given a wonderful example and explanation of how life works in perfectly fair way.If there is no chance and our situation is brought about by our thoughts then how does that relate to a situation in life such as being diagnosed with cancer? My understanding follows that smoking does not directly cause cancer, it creates the ideal environment where a cancer could grow. It is my feeling that our thoughts and actions are intrinsically related and our mind, body and spirit are intrinsically connected and reflect one another. I believe we all have what I can at best describe as a magical force inside us. Ever seen starwars? I feel the outcome of our life depends on whether we control the force, or whether it controls us. Where does cancer come from? I think we create it. I think through our thoughts and actions and choice of lifestyle and things we choose to expose ourselves to... and through our neglect of certain areas of our life, that we cause such a thing as cancer, and indeed everything else, to manifest.We all have the power to create some really powerful things whether it is consciously and for the greater good, or unconsciously and perhaps for the worse. I think this also works on a global level reflecting our world wide collective consciousness. I think every single one of us is responsible for the state of the world - all the conflicts of the world, or the cancers of the world, so to speak. Take for example the conflict in Iraq or the Israeli situation, the problems in South Asia... I believe it's all a reflection of our collective state of mind and the conflicts that go on inside of us. We are in control... you, me... everybody. And we all have blood on our hands.Paul Sartre once said that all human anguish comes from our individual responsibility for what each of us do and become. There is no fixed human nature, no predestination, no God that determines our course. And we suffer because we cannot handle this burden.The power to think, feel, express, believe, will, do and progress is, from the start, all within our hands. This is an extremely dangerous distribution of power, and on some level we all know it. As a result, most of us sacrifice our liberties to tradition and majority in an effort to off-load that responsibility.And we do it because we have a lot invested in our communal uniformity. Life in orthodoxy is comfortable, familiar and requires nothing of us to perpetuate it other than our silent complacency. We sell our freedom for some semblance of safety and the diaphanous concept of an establishment.The world around us is an extension of the world inside of us. When we do wrong, we are only doing it to ourselves. I think our whole world has got cancer... and it could even look as thought it's dying, although I hope its getting better. If you look at satellite shots of the world and look at our major cities and the pollution cloud that engulfs them, our poor world even looks like it has cancers growing on it.Thinking about thinking and the thoughts we choose to entertain is something we all need to do carefully. Ever since reading As A Man Thinketh I've been realizing more and more how our thoughts create our reality. I think As a Man Thinketh should be compulsory reading for the whole human race. The more I think about it the more it makes sense.4. Has this book challenged or changed your thinking in any way? If so, explain how?This book has entirely changed my thinking and now I look at life from a totally different standpoint, one where I can see how I am in complete control of my circumstances. Now when I look at seemingly problematic situations I ask myself why and how I have created the situation and I ask what can be learned from the situation. Reading this book has helped me to see that when planned situations do not come together as intended, I think we should remember that the perfect thing has happened at the perfect time to teach us exactly what we need to know for the greater good of everybody. Why was the outcome the most ideal thing that could have happened? If we create our circumstances then we obviously create them for a reason and by looking for that reason we can see how our circumstances serve to benefit us, no matter what they are.I now realize how important it is to be selective with the thoughts I allow myself to entertain. Oftentimes I am quite unsure of where the thoughts in my head come from, but now when I find myself thinking something less than constructive I stop and reword my inner dialog to shape a more positive feeling.He who cherishes a beautiful vision, a lofty ideal in his heart, will one day realize it
heartwarming stories... Even if you aren't a big reader of the "Chicken Soup" series, you will still like this book.  The stories are great and you can just pick the book up anytime and pretty much read a section at random.  Fun to keep on the coffee table, or as a gift book for animal lovers.
Those thousand miles become the reader's. It doesn't take long for the reader to get broken in along Fletcher's trail of adventure from the Mexican border of eastern California to the Oregon border. The author takes us along the Colorado trail following the river for a number of days until we spring for the Mohave desert. Fletcher had placed, before his hike, a number of strategic caches of water along his desert route. We are as anxious as he to get to the next cache, particularly as we approach Death Valley in early spring before the overwhelming heat sets in. His descriptions of desert flowers and rolling mounds of sand stretching to dark and spiney ridges rising from the valley floor compel us to make plans to visit Death Valley in the near future. We are relieved when we hop out of Death Valley into the Panamints and scrub forests of the lower Sierra. When we climb high into snow country, our eyes hurt in the glaring snow. But the chill of fourteen thousand feet is more than welcome after the hot Mohave sands. We walk along with Fletcher in the high Sierra to push our toe across the border and touch Oregon soil. We experience the heat, the rattlers, the desert poppies, the cool downsloping breezes from the high Sierra, and the icy waters of alpine streams by reading THE THOUSAND MILE SUMMER. Such a book is a rare treat for those of us seemingly locked into a time-pressure capsule of corporate wor
A superb &quot;theatre of the mind&quot; experience. Family Classic Audio Books is a series of outstanding &quot;theater of the mind&quot; audiobook productions featuring a full cast performance. One of their latest offerings for young listeners (and their families) are Hans  Christian Andersen's classic fairytale The Snow Queen adapted and with  lyrics by Adrian Mitchell set to music by Richard Peaslee and wonderfully  narrated by Jonathan Pryce. The Snow Queen follows young Gerda's quest  (with help from some magical characters she meets en route) to rescue her  friend Kai from the icy clutches of the Snow Queen
The Cabinet Maker and Uphollsterer's Guide. Excellent service and excellent prodoct. Would order from them again
Coauthor and Kendra did a great job. Pretty entertaining book, and in about the 9th chapter they cut right to the chase and describe the exact process the coatuhor did to start his real estate investing.
An argument for "noblesse obliege". Dr. Zakaria's _The Future of Freedom_ is both brilliant and disturbing.  There is much that I agree with in his analysis of democracy - that a strong and vibrant middle class is necessary in order for a genuine democracy to exist and flourish and  that a free-market economy is instrumental in supporting democratic institutions (and vice-versa).  However, I was disturbed by the larger argument Zakaria makes - that democratic institutions need un-democratic safeguards to protect it from the fickle will of the people.Using examples of failed democracies around the world and across time (Nazi Germany immeadiately comes to mind), Zakaria claims that the elite: the well-educated and wealthy should rule, the better to prevent the more purlient elements of society (and the elected officials chosen by them) from undermining democracy.  The disintegration of democracies in east Europe and Latin America are held up as examples of what happens without the "enlighted rule" of the elite.This argument is not new (as Zakaria admits) - in the United States, it dates back to the founding of the nation as Adams and Jefferson fought over competing visions of who should rule.  Zakaria provides new material and brilliant analysis to support his position. While I do not agree with his conclusions, it is still a worthwhile read, especially in light of our nation-building abroad and the democratic debate at home.  Recommended
4 stars. An urgent call punctuated by gunfire from her long missing father prompts Maddie Springer to break her vow to not call or think about Ramirez, who was last seen weeks ago and called away at a very inconvenient moment. When the handsome cop isn't overly helpful, Maddie takes matters into her own hands and packs up her two best friends for a road trip to Vegas to save Dad. Of course, things begin to go downhill fairly quickly, starting with finding out what her absent father's gotten up to; namely cross-dressing for fun and profit. Plus, there's the mob to worry about, a nosy reporter, and a murder charge. Maddie is up to her ears in alligators, and we aren't talking Prada shoes made of their skin!**** With a breezy, fun style reminescent of Janet Evanovich, Ms. Halliday brings a grin to your face. If you love screwball comedy with a little bit of mystery thrown in, then you've found your book. ****Reviewed by Amanda Killgore, Freelance Reviewer
An excellent primer. Esposito, certainly one of the foremost scholars today who deals knowledgeably with the interrelationship of Islam and Christianity, has produced this short but extremely readable and relevant book detailing in succint form what he believes to be the issues that are the basis for the struggle between radical Islam and America.  I highly recommend this book for people who come to the issue with little prior knowledge about the issues shaping the problem, or anyone who wants to have a better understanding of the topic, regardless of the amount of knowledge they bring to the table.  This book just may whet your appetite for more reading on the subject
info on what men want but not enough on what women want. After reading this book I am supprised that the title says what women want but I in my view the studies in this book mainly concentrate on what men want.  The book is well written and you can tell there is a lot of research  behind it, but the book is not boring.  I totally agree the points made  through out the book with my own studies and observations of both sexes.  I  have compiled that into a list and distributed that to my friends
Eye opener. This was such a well written book, that you would think an adult wrote. To know that a young lady wrote this was truly an inspiration for all those young people with writing dreams such as Anne's. Anne and her family went through such a hard two years and still remained hopeful and positive. This book really gives a great picture of what the Jewish community went through, all the unjust moves against them. It made me gain more respect for ALL religions and races. This book makes you wish that more help was sent to these people. We can never understand all the hardships The Franks went through, but we can help those going through similar persecution.
On the origins of the Enlightenment. I'm going to break with the consensus and state upfront that I was not overly impressed with Rousseau's Discourse on the Origin of Inequality. There are a number of problems with the work, and taken at its face value it does not present much to the enlightened reader.Firstly, I'll start with the one issue for which Rousseau cannot be faulted, and that is age. Rousseau was an enlightenment thinker, but that doesn't mean he had many correct facts at hand. In this respect, I would highly recommend the Discourse as a historical document. What it says about inequality is rather marginal, but what it says about the state of philosophy in mid Eighteenth Century France is invaluable. But the facts are still wrong. Rousseua spends most of his time talking about mankind living in a state of nature. This means living as the primitive societies of Rousseau's time did (at least in his mind). He presents what is essentially the noble savage model of prehistory, and what a noble savage he presents, too. To modern eyes, of course, some of his assumptions about life in a state of nature are downright humorous. It goes without saying that modern readers have an enormous benefit in this regard. This is actually a good look at what educated people thought about in those days. If Rousseau wasn't well read, then we could say that no one was. He does periodically cite contemporary scientists of his day on the zoological arts, and this can be enlightening for us as well as for the author.Where Rousseau gets into trouble is in his transition from the state of nature to the state of civilization. His thesis is that inequality is a result of civilization. But he transitions into this in a rather awkward manner. Basically, he makes a few speculations based on his state of nature ideas about what early man must have done at moments as we gained use of speech and agriculture and such basic things. I didn't think he ever really made a connection. In part this is because his premise is so badly flawed. Though it is not the author's fault, it does tend to contaminate his entire argument that follows. But even more than that, he could be completely correct about the state of nature but still blunder into his conclusions. I will do Rousseau credit by taking his argument at face value. I don't think that as an Enlightenment philosopher he would be offended if his facts were later shown to be faulty. Nor does the author ever give the idea that he considers this the final set-in-stone word on the matter. But the argument is still weak.As I said, the primary value today for a reader of the Discourse is historical. Rousseau is reasonably clear about what he means, and the work is short, so novice readers should not be put off by reading this particular primary source from that era. It shows that the Enlightenment movement was willing to make bold new statements and work with what they had to find out what they could do. As a piece in the long story of intellectual discovery, the Discourse stands on its own.
complete herbal. This is the best book I could find and read concerning the herbal concoctions on the market today,but, make sure you get this book, not one of the many so named "green" books, there are many books out on this subject and some are very very similarily named.This book has almost all of the herbs listed and uses for them.I highly recommend it to herbal health persons
Loved it!. Very enjoyable.  It was nice taking a travel through history in a period of time not so frequently written about. The up and down see saw of Merewyn's and Ruman's star crossed love was heartbreaking at times. I don't want to say more to give out the end.It isn't Katherine by a long shot, but still a good read, and I would recommend to any lover of historical fiction
Loose Ballads. At first, I didn't find much to rejoice about in this collection of poems.  The expectation Berryman sets up with his title is deceptive.  I found little evidence of "dream."  What I mean is that I found this writing highly literal, straight-forward and self-conscious, i.e. the antithesis of dreamy.  Secondly, "songs" troubled me.  One of the thing that distinguishes poetry from prose is poetry's musicality.  And having "songs" in the title of a collection hints that there may be lyricism within.  However, I found the diction flabby, the tone impotent and therefore lacking any semblance of lyricism.  Perhaps what Berryman meant by "songs" is this:  Perhaps these poems are loose ballads (without the envoi and without the predicable rhyming scheme).  Ballades address an important person (Henry, in this case) and sums up the point of the poems.It's terrible to sum-up a collection of poems (or is The Dream Songs considered one poem in parts?), but here goes:  Basically, in each section we have the protagonist, Henry, in various situations, or in mere contemplation.  The forward for this book is interesting in that, along the lines of Pound and Eliot, Berryman has made a concerted effort to inform his readership that this is, indeed, a persona poem, and therefore, not to be confused with a biographical poem.  Perhaps what Berryman has produced here is an eclogue.  An eclogue is a poem "written in the form of a monologue or dialogue in which the speaker tells us what he feels about a particular theme (and why) and why others ought to feel that same way (from Handbook of Poetic Forms)."  When I approach these poems as bucolics (or, eclogues), Berryman's craft and the poems' meanings open up for me.  Otherwise, these seem banally idea-driven and terribly discursive in that they're sometimes laden with private references.  For example, the opening few lines:  "Huffy Henry hid the day,/ unappeasable Henry sulked./ I see his point,-- a trying to put things over."The best way to enter these poems, then, is to embrace Berryman's eclogues as a means to engaging with the main character, Henry.  Because these poems are character-driven, the language is conversational, idiosyncratic, and at times, pedestrian (like how most of us are just plain boring in our impromptu conversations).  In this sense, these poems have an immediacy to them; the reader can almost hear Henry's diatribes straight from his mouth. However, Henry is not without pithy insight.  In part #28 Henry displays his humor and resign: "If I had to do the whole thing over again/ I wouldn't."  At times these sections begin with such intrigue, they reel-in the reader.  Part #44 begins: "Tell it to the forest fire, tell it to the moon."  And at times, the readers are reminded of the fact that Henry's merely a character in Berryman's head.  These last two lines of part #74, "Henry mastered, Henry/ tasting all the secret bits of life."  And that's just what we get from these Dream Songs, bits of a Berryman character in all his intricacies, both commonplace and celebratory.
Natural remedies and speedy recovery. Larry Dossey, M.D.'s THE EXTRA-ORDINARY HEALING POWER OF ORDINARY THINGS: FOURTEEN NATURAL STEPS OF HEALTH AND HAPPINESS  comes from a physician long hailed as one of the discoverers of the idea of 'mind-body medicine'. Here Dr. Dossey discusses sources of natural healing and speedy recovery, exploring the medical research that acknowledges and supports natural remedies. From the return of leeches as useful medical tools to religion as a risk-reduction tool, THE EXTRA-ORDINARY HEALING POWERS OF ORDINARY THINGS surveys both physical and psychological rituals and healing methods.
excellent. enjoyed reading the book.  Couldn't put it down.  Very intense.  I am now reading Wizard and Glass which is almost finished
good read. Gingrich and Fortschen have written an excellent conclusion to their alternative history of the Civil War.  AS I stated in my review of the first book, those of us who grew up in the south have lived with the "what if?" Questions our whole life.  The first volume of this series posits a Confederate victory in the Gettysburg campaign.  But even with that victory could the Confederacy have pushed the campaign to victory and what would have been required to acheive that victory.The authors have done an excellent job of taking into account the difficulty of capturing Washington and the overwhelming superiority of men and material the Federal forces had.  To win this war, it would have required a quick knockout after July 4, 1663.  this book shows why this would have been difficult.   The difficulties in controlling a captive population, sabotage, internal weakness of the confederate government all are taken into account in this book.   I think the embrace of "colored" troops and the army of workers is probably a stretch.The book involves a short period around on final conclusive battle in Maryland, not far from the site of the Battle of Sharpsburg.  The carnage is overwhelming, but in comparison to Cold Harbor, it seems feasible.  The authors show an excellent knowledge of the area the battle is fought on.I enjoyed the trilogy.  It was fun fiction, but it also helps the reader to address the 'what if's"  Recommend
Among The Finest Histories of the Nazi Era. The "Order of the Death's Head" first published in 1965, was written while the dust had not yet settled on world war two and at 40 years of age Hoehne's work is a historical classic of the Nazi Period.  As with Albert Speer's "Inside the Third Reich" and Shirer's "The Rise and Fall of the Third Reich", this is one of those quintessential works of the period. Focusing on the rise and actions of the German SS, this book certainly does not glorify the SS or the Nazi party while providing a near exhaustive record.   The work, while still very useful is still quite flawed in its organization and is by no means complete.  The majority of the work focuses on the origins of the SS and the early Nazi party as well as later actions as a political entity and finally discusses the SS involvement with concentration camps. While discussed, the combat actions of the Waffen SS are but an aside to the greater focus of the work and many significant happenings within Nazi Germany are discussed quickly while others that may seem less significant are given substance.  This book is an excellent though incomplete resource that is well written and receives both benefit and disadvantage from the period in which it was written.Building up the scene Hoehne discusses at great details the ideal and actions of the early Nazi Party and the formation of the Schutzstaffel (SS).  Filled with interesting detail and anecdote this is perhaps the richest portion of the work.  As the work progresses Hoehne discusses the interaction of the SS with the other part organizations including the SA the party itself and later the Wehrmacht, SD and Gestapo.  Here we see a central theme of Hoehne's work: The Power of the Nazi Party rested solely in Hitler and all of the party organizations were dependent on Hitler and a few of his staff.  Thus, the SS as pervasive as it had been, was always just one organization in an interdependent and often redundant network that comprised the political structure of Nazi Germany.  The work goes on with continuing sporadic detail to discuss the "night of the Long Knives" the Gestapo, Kristallnacht, The Early War/occupation of Eastern Europe and the Concentration Camps.  This last subject the author provides lucid descriptions and many grim and overwhelmingly bizarre instances.This work is certainly among the most influential and resourceful works on the Third Reich.  Along with the other two books mentioned above, the average person can get a pretty good understanding of a most bizarre era of history. No one of these books is complete and certainly there are many things completely ignored in all three of these books.  The fact remains that "Order of the Death's Head" is still one of the finest and most complete books written about the SS.  It makes a great point of departure for studying the SS and will be a work that the historian will reference often. The book is also well researched and has a great bibliography.  Overall, I would recommend this book to college students and above and may want to be prefaced by a little basic 20th century German history if needed.  Otherwise this book is a good record however, casual readers be warned, the book may be confusing do to its lack of chronological ordering.  Considering that this book was written before the dust settled on the era and an historical consensus was just beginning to form on the Nazi Period, this is a very worth work that all interested parties ought to read.-- Ted Murena
My Football Book. I think the book will be wonderful for my grandson. I'm giving it to him for Easter
Seeing is a big part of photography. There has been a need for a book on seeing creatively, especially one that is comprehensible by new photographers.  This one covers all the aspects of composing good images, from designing the frame, through the effects of color.  Peterson's books all do a good job of presenting the basics in a clear way, and this is one of his best
One of the best Movie Guides. I don't think anyone could find a more economically price guide for movies, with such good coverage of: Directors, Actors, a synopsis of the storyline, and star rating system.  I don't rent a movie without first checking out what Leonard Maltin has written about it.  Highly recommend
The Navajo Landscape. Tony Hillerman once again takes us into the world of the Navajo with Jim Chee and the legendary Joe Leaphorn of the Navajo Tribal Police. I read this for the first time some years ago, and this entry in the long-running series is very exciting. It has a lot of atmosphere and Leaphorn and Chee are fleshed out more than usual in this terrific read.Both Chee and Leaphorn are dealing with personal issues as this one begins. Chee hasn't quite figured out how he feels about Mary leaving him because he could not leave his Navajo way of life behind and move to the city with her. He is smitten with a pretty Navajo attorney named Janet but she's with someone else. Leaphorn meanwhile, is on terminal leave and retiring after the unexpected death of his beloved wife Emma. Niether he or Chee can explain his obsession with finding a missing pot hunter named Eleanor Friedman-Bernal. No Navajo would be involved, as stealing pots like this would make one a "Thief of Time" according to Navajo tradition.Chee's letting a rather large backhoe get stolen right from under his nose will have ties to Leaphorn's investigation, and once more Chee will be helping Leaphorn all across the Navajo territory. This one will stretch all the way into Utah and down the San Juan River. Leaphorn will be reminded of a young boy's death by drowning before this one wraps up, and it will have unexpected ties to his search for Eleanor.It seems Eleanor was looking for pots made by the Anasazi, a tribe that simply vanished from the face of the earth. Pictographs and petroglyphs of Kokopelli, the "Watersprinkler," will play a vital part in this mystery. But Eleanor's interest is also anthropological, and someone thinks what she's discovered is worth killing for.Leaphorn and Chee will be hundreds of miles apart when they reach the same conclusion in this complex mystery. One will have to race to the other as things turn ugly, and two very different men will find commom ground when Leaphorn asks the unexpected of young Chee.Hillerman's descriptions of the thousand foot cliffs along the San Juan River at night, under a sky filled with Navajo mystery, will enthrall you. This is a good mystery and quite possibly the best in the series. You don't want to miss this one
How We All Can Turn Tragedy to Triumph. The final book in Dave Pelzer's memoir series, A Man Named Dave, brings his story to a final close.  Many questions that I know I, as a reader, found myself asking, and I'm sure you as well, were finally answered, or at least, understood on some level.  This book reads much more fluid, detailed, and full of energy than his first two books, which was very fitting in creating the sense and feel of a boy who had grown into a man.  I thoroughly enjoyed reading Dave's stories and felt very inspired myself after having watched Dave himself come through all of his struggles shinning at the end.  A wonderful series of books, a must read for everyone.Again, a big thanks to Dave for sharing this with us.  He's an inspiration to us all
Powerful Information!. This book is small in size but very SOLID in its IMPACT. It FEELS GOOD and it's got a GREAT LOOK through out . . . however, it sometimes makes a terribly distracting SOUND!The previous sentence seems a little strange to me, but . . . this book claims that if you were in a positive Kinesthetic frame of mind when you started to read it, that I was probably able to lead you through to a positive Visual. Then on into a negative Auditory and in the process I may have induced a very mild Hypnotic state, literally speaking directly to your "Unconscious System" and it made sense to you on a very basic level. Leaving you feeling vaguely uneasy about this book. That is, if there is such a thing as HypnosisI don't know if the theory holds water or not. I do know that I'm a parent and foster parent and I was having some trouble communicating with my kids until I read this book and applied Dr. Heller's and Terry Steele's techniques. In each and every case, within an astoundingly few minutes, I was able to Break their Shell, show them the Shining Light and have them making Beautiful Music as they travel the road to being emotionally healthy human beings!Another reviewer pointed out that they didn't really like the invariable misspelling of one of the quoted sources names. I must be using a visual mode much more than s/he because I found the constant Politicaly Correct use of s/he and him/her to be very cumbersome. Pick a gender already! . I was distracted by the frequent misspellings of the word "will" "misspelled as wil" too. There were a few other words, especially towards the end of the book that were misspelled also. However, once I got through "Monsters and Magical Sticks" and tried what I had learned that really didn't seem to matter so much!When I started reading this book I wasn't sure whether I believed in Hypnosis or not. Turns out I do, just not in the same way most people do and I know now that it's a very useful tool for helping others too! Look deeply into my eyes. Your eyelids are feeling very heavy . . . you MUST get this book and READ IT! NOW
very clear and thorough. It was very clear and thorough.  It is a pretty guide review for the Clep exam, but you will need to study Principles of Accounting II also for the Principles of Accounting CLEP.
A Timeless Classic. I absolutely love Kate Seredy.  It was such a treat to check in with the adult Kate and Janci.  They complemented one another perfectly.  Kate, the  delightfully irrepressible moppet who brought many smiles to many faces in  &quot;The Good Master&quot; does not fail to deliver in this book as well.  Janci has grown into a thoughtful gentleman and the Hungarian backdrop is a  very effective way of describing Eastern European culture. This is an  excellent book and I certainly hope you will read it.  It's great
more a series of newspaper columns than a book. I enjoyed this book quite a bit, but it only really works in the context of other reading on contemporary Israel.  He focuses on the Americanization of Israel, a fascinating topic, but this is a book of essays not of scholarship.  Furthermore, Segev assumes a fair amount of knowledge of Jewish and Israeli history.  He's a good writer, and this is a fun read for someone who is familiar with trends in Israeli life.  He doesn't, however, really set out to prove his thesis.  Also, it would probably not be terribly interesting to someone with little or no background in the subjec
Offbeat & Original. "Tabloid Dreams" is like the sit-com version of the works of Edgar Allen Poe.  There are so many dead bodies by the time we get to the end of the collection that we marvel at all the different ways they've died.  In "Titanic Victim Speaks Through Waterbed," we see an Englishman who falls in love if only for a moment on the deck of the Titanic and urges the lady to get into a lifeboat and live.  He dies and has numerous observations on life as he wafts around in a ghostly existence.  The collection concludes perfectly as with bookends with the same incident told through the eyes of the woman in "Titanic Survivors Found in Bermuda Triangle."  After having gotten into the lifeboat and mysteriously slept decades before rescue, she decides life really isn't worth living and offs herself in a bathtub.  We see a widow who enters a cookie baking contest and sets her apron on fire, a parrot who is the reincarnation of his wife's dead husband fly into a window, a nymphomaniac put a meteor through a guy's brain who is busy kissing her feet, a nine-year old hit man who leaves a trail of bodies, a woman with a death kiss whose lovers drown, get baseballs smashing their brain or die in auto crashes, JFK who wasn't killed at an auction of Jackie's belongings who did die, and the whole planet gets blown up when struck by a meteor.  2 stories do not have dead bodies like the boy with the tatoo of Elvis and the court reporter with a glass eye who puts it in a glass of water to spy on her husband having an affair; but they probably would have liked to kill someone!  Butler does a great job of making us look at the world from a different perspective.  This collection is delightfully offbeat and original.  Enjoy
Just right. This is an extremely thorough, well-written book that covers web services from the ground up.  Not tied to any one company's philosophy or implementation of web services standards, this book approaches the subject at a high level yet full of detail.  Unlike most technical books, this books reads like a novel.  I give it my highest recommendation for those of you that want to understand the underlying web services standards and framework
Brilliant Multi-Layered Storytelling. My first Gore Vidal novel, and absolutely NOT my last.I rarely have time to read as much as I like, but over the last week and a half I have carved time out at all hours of the day to get back to this book.  I am a fan of history and historical fiction, and this is the good stuff without doubt.Other reviews will give you the book report summary of plot and device, but I am here to tell you that the layers of commentary in this book were breathtaking. Vidal's personality seeps up through every page so subtly that on many occassions I found myself doing, in essence, double-takes: turning back a page or two and thinking, "Hang on... did he just?" and inevitably, the commentary, the literary slight of hand, the double meaning, and the three and four layer references I suspected were all there.  I can only guess how many I may have missed.As you know by now, this book is about the death of a king. The life and times of a leader who was dedicated to rejuvinating a divided country.  A man whose mission required the unification of a nation divided along religious and political lines.  It is the story of a leader who was assasinated after holding power for just three short years.Vidal ends his novel with this:April 1959 - 6 January 1964, RomeThis is a reference, I am sure, to the period during which he wrote it.  It is also a reference to the dating of Julian's journal entries.  But I believe this date range, specifically its terminus, serves another, typically subtle, purpose.  It is a reference to another historical leader; one who strove to reinvigorate a faded empire, one who inspired similar division in his country, and one who met a similar, tragic end.  I believe that this book is a farewell of sorts to John F. Kennedy.Read it.  It's amazing
Carlip's 2+1 dimensional Quantum Gravity. This is the outstanding reference and survey book for quantum gravity in 2 spatial and 1 time dimensions, and also has a number of Carlip's own recent contributions.  When quantum gravity (QG for short) is restricted to 2  spatial dimensions, it simplifies analysis enormously, both physically and  mathematically.  I have cited Carlip's book both in papers delivered at  conferences and in publications.  Here is the opportunity to understand  different schools of quantum gravity, including the Hawking-Hartle school  and its comparison with the closely related Lortentian metric (v.s.  Euclidean metric) school, the Ashtekar-Smolin loop school, the  Wheeler-Dewitt equation school, the lattice school, the Feymann path  integral school, the black hole entropy schools (to which both Carlip and  Hawking/Penrose have contributed), various algebraic and topological  schools, the incredibly rich moduli space and modular transformation  results, and so on.  Unlike most books, Carlip's is open minded regarding  different schools, and gives comparisons and criticisms which are  invaluable.  The non-expert in quantum gravity would be well advised to  start learning from this book and a few very clear mathematics and physics  books (or to hire a consultant or even a tutor to explain prerequisites and  some of the mathematical concepts in the book), because the average quantum  gravity book is almost totally incomprehensible for non-experts compared  with Carlip.  I consider Carlip's clarity and comparisons between different  schools to be far superior to even Hawking's, although of course Hawking is  almost unrivaled as a physicist.  The nearest you will come to Carlip's  presentation is by reading hundreds of journal articles and books, which is  impractical for most people
Good for adult Sunday School!. As a Christian for 10 years, I realized this year how little I knew about Christmas traditions.  When I found this book, I thought it was good enough to use as the basis for an adult (as opposed to children) Sunday School class.  Feedback has been very enthusiastic!  The book is well written, and an easy and interesting read.  Each chapter covers a different Christmas tradition.  Chapters are typically 5-7 pages.  I highly recommend this book
Gorgeous!. This book is full of wonderful photos!  An excellent resource book for anyone who is interested in studying the visual richness of this medium.
Great for all ages!. Men who are loooking to give their spouces fullfilment in all aspects need to read this. It has helped us in our mariage
Ed Lee Rocks!. Edward Lee is a sick, sick man.  A very talented sick man who writes crazy good horror. If you've never been corrupted by an Edward Lee novel, well, lucky you, because you can start right here, right now. THE BACKWOODS is classic Edward Lee--murder, torture, dismemberment, perverse and violent sex, gore, sex, mayhem, terror, more sex.  And a damn good story to boot.  Washington DC attorney Patricia White takes a leave of absence from her practice to return to her boondocks Chesapeake Bay hometown to comfort her sister, Judy, whose rednecky ape of a husband, Dwayne, has been viciously murdered. Patricia's arrival is greeted by more grisly deaths in which the townsfolk are murdered horribly: strung up and butchered like hogs, or buried alive, or gleefully hacked up for sport.  The town itself is peopled by strangely secretive people who are not particularly forthcoming about the weird happenings.  In the midst of all the horror, Patricia, who has left her loving husband at home, finds herself experiencing intense sexual fantasies about her past.  If you like your horror served raw and on the bone, you will enjoy gnawing on this fast and furious novel by the author of one of my all-time favorite novels, THE BIGHEAD.  Rock on, Edward Lee!
A Great Book for Beginning Gardeners. This book tells the novice gardener all they need to know about selecting and planting Perennsials for Sun. Look for the &quot;Top Choices&quot; section that educates the new gardener as to other varieties per species
A social commentary. Bernard Goldberg is an Emmy Award-winning correspondent and author. In this book he identifies celebrities, journalists, radicals, and intellectuals whom he criticizes for denigrating the United States. He also examines the erosion of American culture that occurs when selfishness, cynicism, and vulgarity replace old-fashioned civility, respect, and decency. Mr. Goldberg seems right on the mark and he makes his case with quite candor. The book also does a good job of showing the cultural divide that exists at present in the U.S.A. This book does contain some strong language
Amazing, spiritually uplifting. This book is amazing.  I started reading this book out of curiosity; to find answers to common questions about "the other side."  After a few pages, this book satisfied more than just my curiosity, it was a spiritual enrichment I was looking for. I was unable to put it down.  I've bought this book for several people, and everyone who read it is amazed.  Plus, this book contains the 12-year prayers that St. Brigitte of Sweden received, which contain so many graces.
great book, great story. a must read biography of one of the most important artists of the country.  A book about a Black Woman Fine Artist telling her story is a rare find and unsurprisingly interesting, poignant, insightful, triumphant
Matches Cameo Coat Pocket NT. There are many features to commend the KJV Large Print Bible, but I personally appreciate the fact that its pagination matches that of the Cameo Coat Pocket New Testament.  Thus, you do not have to become separately familiar with one Bible in your personal study and another New Testament to carry with you and use for memory work.
Recommend to couples going to be married. This book was for my daughter, 26, and her fiancee, 28, who are going to be married this Sept.  It was recommended by the pastor who taught their 9-week premarital class at their church, Mars Hill, in Seattle.  I have heard this was a good book before this time anyway.  It is concise, well-written, easy to read, and I highly recommend it to young (and old) couples.  My daughter is pretty innocent and this book makes it clear but not unappealing.  Has parts on birth control as well.  If you want a book that both presents sex well and from the Christian perspective (within marriage), this is the book for you.  I also liked it that it did not have pictures, which I think make a book a little less appealing and prurient.
Can't Be Beat For The Price!. I realize that there are books that are better and more complete about life in Victorian England (and Regency), but, for the novice or one who just wants the basics, this book can't be beat.  I felt it was well written and very understandable. I guess what I really like best about it is that it gives me a whole lot of information about the lower middle class and the poorer classes, especially country folk, which helps tremendously in piecing together the way my ancestors may have lived.   I use this book (and the others in this series) quite often in my research
Not your typical King. Stephen King steps off into the woods and gives us Trisha McFarland. She's out for a day of hiking with her mom and brother (who don't get along) when after a quick step off the trail, she becomes lost in the wilderness. This book does not have the same supernatural theme that King normally uses, but this story is uneasy nonetheless. Getting lost in the wilderness is much more real than vampires and werewolves, and King does an excellent job giving us real insight into Trisha's thoughts. This book is one of my favorite Stephen King books.
I've read this book 3 times!. I'm not a baseball fan.  Hockey is the game of my heart.  Baseball?  No way.  But, I loved this book.  The only other baseball book that I've ever read that comes close to this high-water mark is Ball Four by Jim Bouton.  Funny and interesting in its own right.  A real joy to read.Great characters and insight to management.  A wonderful story about tearing down a culture from the inside.  And who can argue with the Oakland A's success?  Here it is September 2006 and they're once again leading their division, 5 games up on the Angels ... and this is the inside track on how they've done it with one of the worst payrolls in baseball.
BEST ALICE MOVIE PAST & PRESENT. I LOVED THIS AS A CHILD. IT USED TO BE ON TV A LOT AND I REMEMBER BEGGING MY MOTHER TO TAPE IT ON VHS. WE RECORDED IT ONE DAY AND I WATCHED IT SO MUCH THE VHS BROKE. I AM NOW 20 AND MY BOYFRIEND RECENTLY PURCHASED THIS DVD PLUS THROUGH THE LOOKING GLASS FROM SOME IDIOT ON HERE AND HIS COPIES WERE WORSE THAN MINE. HE CLAIMED THEY WERE NEW BUT WE GOT THEM AND THEY WERE OPENED MASS PRODUCED COPIES. WE COULD TELL BECAUSE THE VHS'S WERE BLANK AND THE COVERS WERE NOT ORIGINAL. PLEASE RELEASE THESE MOVIES ON DVD!
4 1/2  A Bassist's Data Base. Tab versus StandardThis mostly excellent compilation of over 4 decades of mostly rock songs shows the bassist's part in both standard and tab notation. (Standard requires reading notes; Tab actually shows the four bass strings and numbers what fret to play next).Who's in the BookWhile certain schools of funk and soul are slightly underrepresented for my tastes (where's James Brown or Sly Stone--were there copyrite issues?), the book includes some Muddy Waters, Howlin' Wolf, Marvin Gaye, Smokey Robinson, Martha and the Vandellas ("Dancing in the Street"), and The Four Tops. Mostly, though, this is a collection of what is now deemed "classic" rock (e.g., Cream, Beatles, Santana, Stones, The Who, Led Zep, Hendrix, David Bowie, the Byrds); metal bands (including  Black Sabbath, Foo Fighters, Van Halen, Kiss,  Metallica,  GNR, Ozzy Osbourne); 1950s-1960's oldies (Fats Domino, Elvis, The Crests ["16 candles"], Ricky Nelson, , Carl Perkins, Buddy Holly and the Crickets, Jerry Lee Lewis), and a smattering of relatively recent (last 20 years) bands (the Black Crows, Goo Goo Dolls, Stone TEmple Pilots, Rage Against the Machine, Sheryl Crow, Slipknot, System of a Down).  There are also some bands that are inexplicably included (why are there two songs from "power ballad" band, "Cinderella"), but, hey, to each his or her own.Only A Few Songs per GroupEach group is represented by one to seven songs (only Stevie Ray Vaughn has that many), and most range from one to three.  Therefore, if you're a big fan of a particular genre or band, you might look for a more specialized book.  However, there aren't that many books with bass tab!What I Like About This BookStrengths of the book include the variety mentioned above, a one-page decoding of tab symbols, the excellent price, and song transcripts that generally show the treble clef, chord accompaniment, and lyrics.  Sometimes you're only shown the 2 or 3 bass sections only, and the first few words/notes that accompany the riff without the rest of the song.Who Will Benefit From this Book?Moderate to advanced players will get the most from the "White Pages," and here's why:  Even with the beginner-friendly tab, it is still very helpful to know how to read music.  While tab indicates many of the techniques, it doesn't show you the all-important left hand finger placement that allows bassists to move smoothly over the neck, nor does it easily convey rhythm and the more complex moves.  Unfortunately for the novice, many of the songs are at a fast pace and will be too difficult to play.  Ideally, you'd have the bucks to get a -device that will play back slowed-down notes from a song without losing their pitch ($200 and up). Ideally, in fact, you'd have a guitar teacher!  But for those without the time, money, or inclination to go this route, this book can get you playing pieces of some real songs, a rewarding activity that you won't get from too many beginner bass books.RecommendationFor this reason alone (and, again, I'm speaking to newcomers), the White Pages can be a useful, fun resource, particularly when paired with a really excellent instruction book such as "Bass Guitar for Dummies."  You might want to supplement this with bass transcriptions from the internet, sometimes from bass interest groups. (One problem with that, however, is that tab notations are not always the same.) The bottom line is that fairly competent bass players will enjoy a lot of transcriptions at a cheap price, while novices will have fewer songs they can play all the way through.  The publisher might have thought to publish 2 or 3 books like this, but differentiated by the difficulty (speed, complexity, etc.) of the bass line
The Pen as Complement to the Brush. "Ye mountains, woods, rocks, and impetuous streamsYe mantling heav'ns -- Speak -- speak for me!"Arguably, one of America's most important artists, and the founder of the Hudson River School of landscape painting, Thomas Cole also had a literary side.  Largely unknown, his compositions with the pen encompass more than 100 poems and a healthy smattering of prose.   A few were published, but most were left behind in a rough assemblage of his journals and notebooks.  In 1972, as part of a doctoral dissertation,  Marshall Tymn compiled and edited these to produce this tidy volume of 105 poems.As with his prolific paintings, Cole's poems reflect an awe of nature.  A romantic through and through, Cole waxes lyrically about the rugged beauty of mountains, lakes and valleys of a newly found rural America.  Tymn points out Thomas Cole's love for mountains; they fill his large ornate canvases dwarfing any small human figures that may appear.  A devotee of the Catskill and Adirondack regions of upstate New York, Cole embraced the outdoors with religious ferver -- he praises it unabashedly:"The Hudson lies below, a mirror'd Heaven"   and"No!  Tis Niagara shouts from the abyss" and"Before thee lies the Holy Lake outspread"  [Lake George]   and"Hail Monarch of a thousand giant hills!"  [Mt. Washington]Tymn, in his introduction, points out that Cole's poetry is not the burnished work of Wordsworth or other romantic poets.  Cole never intended as much, and many of the pieces do read more like inspired entries in a diary than "higher style" verse.   And where Cole left his works unpolished in journal form, Tymn has resurrected the rough stuff, footnoted with explanatory notes, and excellent documentation.   The poems are presented in chronological order: towards the end more verses are penned as letters to friends or to mark the occasion of a death.  The collection also includes four black and white photographs of Cole's work, among them "Landscape Scene for the The Last of the Mohicans" and "The Clove, Catskills" both painted in 1827 at the height of Cole's fascination with the romantic landscape.Cole's allegorical lines about the bold American landscape are an interesting complement to his paintings.  Anyone with an interest in the Hudson River School will appreciate this volume.
The Fifth Beatle. George Martin was the producer of the greatest pop group in history. His contributions to shaping the sound of the Beatles can not be minimalized. A breezy and interesting book by a person who was with them during their entire recording career. I would recommend this book to any Beatle fan
Another Satisfying Entry In The Series. I collect this series hungrily. There are always at least 10 stories that excite and amaze me, and I do feel they can honestly be called "the best" of each year. I also buy stacks of other genre anthologies, none of which demonstrate such consistent quality. How there came to be a gap on my shelf where this volume ought to be I'm not sure, but I did find out while shopping for its replacement what others have discovered: it is frustratingly difficult to get an accurate report of the contents of each of these volumes. Of the several well-written and helpful reader reviews, one refers to the 11th edition, another, while begging Amazon to represent it faithfully, nevertheless is clearly misfiled, describing the contents of the 14th. To be sure, even as I snarl and curse my way through the tangle of confusion I salute each reviewer's insights; I only wish their efforts could be properly represented. To help other benighted seekers, I'm suggesting a visit to this site, an extremely valuable and meticulously maintained resource.locusmag.com/index/2002
Sartre's last major philosophical work. Seeking to give Marxism what Michael McGee called "a more rigorous intellectual defense," Sartre wrote volume one of Critique of Dialectical Reason (CDR) between 1957 & 1960; it was published in France in 1960. The first English edition appeared in 1976. A second, unfinished volume appeared posthumously in 1982.CDR was a massive attempt to describe the dynamic of various levels of human interaction & what characterizes these levels, from a mere chance collection of people to the social entity we call an institution. The ultimate objective was to show why Marx's categorization of "class" as some kind of hyperorganism was wrong. Its thesis statement can be drawn from its thematic antecedent, Search for a Method: cultural order is irreducible to natural order.In CDR, life was endless occasions of totalizations, detotalizations, & retotalizatons on a field of scarcity. These various totalizations were instances of human groupness, whether people waiting @the bus stop, a soccer team, or the "mob" storming the Bastille. We called the temporalization of events "history."First half of the volume, or Book I, is devoted mainly to ennui-provoking explanation of the dialectical investigation: hidden there in a footnote was Sartre's curt dismissal of Darwinism. However, he got wound up in Book II & showed how task assignments, division of labor, & the institution came about.I know of no other original study, treatise, or even novel that uses the themes & concepts of CDR. A CDR-oriented examination of, say, American domestic relations court proceedings (with its forced as opposed to mediated reciprocity) might be a worthy endeavor
Great for the office and beyond. The practical concepts offered in this book simply make sense. On a business level, these real-life action items provide great ideas to truly motivate my employees. I have to believe that if company leaders would truly embrace these principles they would not only enjoy more passionate employees but they'd also enjoy the bottom line impact. On the personal side, I also appreciate the hints that translate into being a better husband and dad
Good reading. Written by people who have done it. Easy reading. Good information.  I see our executives are set our direction from some of Microsoft's methods
easily the best. Easily one of the best and most influential science fiction stories ever written
Terrific resource, and not just for anime fans. My kids were adolescents back in the `80s, when Japanese animation began to be seen on American TV, and for a long time -- even though I'd been interested in modern Japanese literature since college -- I unconsciously equated "anime" with Speed Racer. Then I learned better and became a semi-fan, enough to rent several of the best-reviewed series from Blockbuster. But I had never sat down to learn the milieu of the art form until I came across this author's two books on the subject. He covers a very wide range of Japanese cultural "stuff," from names of historical periods and the different types of bells you find in temples, to major writers whose work has been adapted in anime and the reason for the big-eye-pink-hair thing. You'll no longer wonder why guys in Japan get nosebleeds from looking at girls, what the sound of cicadas in the background are intended to imply, and why you shouldn't be upset that some anime meant for kids includes mild nudity. For that matter, he goes into the sexual psychology of various other Japanese folkways, too, with no embarrassment or leering, which supplies the cultural context you really need if you're going to understand this stuff. Actually, this book would be useful not only to would-be otaku but to any westerner puzzled by various aspects of Japanese society. There's a new, thicker edition coming out soon and I'm definitely going to have to acquire it
a great book for all types of readers!. "Sticks and stones may break my bones, but names will break our spirit". The Misfits is an astonishing novel and great for helping kids cope through the tough times in middle school!Bobby, Joe, Addie, and Skeezie are known as the "misfits" in school and are sick of being called names because of how they look! Bobby is too fat and gets called names like "Fluff", "Fatso", or "Roly-Poly". Joe is too gay and kids never get tired of calling him "Gay", "Fairy", or "Sissy". Addie is too tall and smart and kids like to call her "Beanpole", "Godzilla", and "Nerdette". Also since Skeezie never looks like he showers and acts like a rebel many call him "Grease ball", or "Ree-tard".When the school elections come around, the students at Paintbrush Falls Middle School have to pick Democratic or Republican, but the "Gang Five" have a better idea. They want to come up with their own party, and they call it the "Freedom Party", which later gets changed to the "No-Name Party". Once they figure out their new party they find out that they are not alone after all. Many kids do get teased just like them but don't have the guts to speak up and fight for their rights, so the Gang Five is taking over and no man will be left behind!To find out more about the book you simply must break the binding!  This book will touch your heart and even the most hardened old man will feel the power of it. It will bring warmth and spirit to you and just may even show you the way to a brighter tomorrow.
Hmmmf!. Well, I read it. It's interesting material and Watson is a good writer. Now back to whatever it was that I was doing
The best information available about how to live to be 100!. Forget all the modern diet approaches to health.  This is the best information available about how to improve and maintain your health and live to infinity!  The research is rock solid and there are examples of the  diet Dr. Walker followed throughout his life
Excellent.  A must for all on chemo and/or radiation therapy. I found this book very informative, and it makes the idea of going into this type of therapy less frightening and &quot;unknown&quot;.  I am purchasing several more for people I know who are receiving chemotherapy  too, so they can have access to this same knowledge.  Special thanks to  those who took the time to make this book available
Overwelmed! Could not put it down........ Your knowlege of the Civil war will never be complete without reading this book. This book takes you there.......
Fantasy thriller. "White Night", JIm Butcher's ninth installment of the Dresden Files unfortunately was my introduction to this series.  With no prior background it was somewhat difficult to decipher the order of things and nuances of protagonist Harry Dresden's supernatural world.Dresden, you see, is a Chicago based private investigator but also a wizard imbued with mystical powers and toting both a .44 magnum handgun and staff capable of dispensing lethal Hellfire.  Dresden who holds the exalted status of warden in the White Council of wizards, often works with Sgt. Murphy of Chicago P.D.'s Special Investigation unit on matters outside the realm of normalcy.  They presently were collaborating on a case involving the serial murders of a number of Chicago women in possesion of magical powers.  The crime scenes contained clues that could only be discerned by someone with Dresden's mystical ability.Evidence seems to point to Dresden's brother Thomas, a vampire, as the culprit in the killings.  As the plot thickens we learn that the White Council is at odds with both the White and Red Courts of vampires.  The killings of the local women is following a similar pattern seen in other large cities and that some nefarious plot is being hatched.  Dresden recruits his long ago first love, the magically endowed Elaine Mallory with Chicago's pre-eminent crime lord John Marcone and West coast based warden Carlos Ramirez, and his apprentice the unrefined but powerful Molly to fight against the forces of darkness in a final battle which will decide the fate of the supernatural order of things.Butcher's imaginative fable was quite well conceived but made me realize that I needed background information to appreciate it more fully.
The tomatoes are ripe right now!. I enjoyed this book's title, first of all -- it was why I picked it up in the first place.  It held my attention throughout, entertained me, taught me, surprised me, and gave me a good laugh.  There were some typos in the book, but other than that, was just a good and easy read.
Challenges Many Liberal Myths. Theologically liberal Protestants and theologically liberal Catholics have distorted the New Testament witness by pushing a false opposition between the Kingdom of God and the Church. They have also ignored the New Testament evidence for the primacy of Peter as first bishop of Rome and for the priesthood of the New Covenant. Fortunately, Cardinal Ratzinger sets the record straight by showing that there is no opposition between the kingdom preached by Jesus and the Church founded by the same Jesus, by documenting the New Testament evidence for the Petrine primacy, and by pointing to the theology of the New Covenant's own priesthood present in the New Testament. All of this is done concisely, precisely, and clearly. This book should be read by any Christian interested in the Church and especially by Catholics. It is a primer on ecclesiology
Riveting Book. You  won't regret reading htis book. It adds to the human experience and you come away from it enriched by both the writing and the content. It explores areas of morality worth thinking about without telling you how to think.  It's hard to read at times because the author so aptly describes the human experience that it can be painful.....but that is life afterall.  I recommend it as a book that promotes growth.  It is strictly a secular book in that God is never invoked, and that is where I would have changed it a bit... I believe that all of life is providentially designed, and an acknowledgement of that would have given some hope beyond human endeavors. But then, I am not the author and do not possess the gift of being a wonderful writer like Jodi does!  From start to finish, it is a wonderful, wonderful book that I highly recommend.  If you ever read these reviews, Jodi, let me thank-you for enriching my life. Sincerely, Arden Detweile
On becoming a gardener. I am reviewing this book because I read it and it's one of my all time favorites. I'm a fairly successful gardener. People stop on my street and admire my flowers. Many friends and acquaintances ask for advice. I wish I  had written this book, it says what I want to say.  Learning to garden is a  process of bringing forth what already exists inside you. One learns to  garden through trial and error, and what works in one garden may not work  in another. Cookie cutter directions simply don't work, and when one  follows them and fails, one feels like a failure. Nollman writes about  gardening in his part of the world, which is not like your part of the  world or my part of the world, but the thoughts he shares transcend these  differences. There are two major approaches to gardening: one  organic--spiritual and esthetic; the other nonorganic and ugly. To be  content, Nollman says, all you need is love and an organic garden. Nothing  works if you work against nature (probably the reason our forebears were  thrown out of Eden). WHY WE GARDEN helped me maintain the link between the  inner gardener I was born to be and Gaia
Struggling with birth control, then read this!. Many have followed what the culture teaches about children. They believe there's nothing wrong with practicing birth control, especially since the Bible says nothing regarding it. Before you continue with that line of reasoning, I want to encourage you to read "Be Fruitful and Multiply." I think you will be surprised by what you read
Far superior to any "Legendary Pirates" book. Pay attention to the subtitle: Pirate Tactics and Techniques.Little writes a wonderful book about pirates, here. He avoids sinking into the typical "history of this, that, and the other pirate" sort of cliche that other authors have followed (how many different times can you recount the exploits of Edward Teach and Henry Morgan, anyway?). Rather, his book is a study of HOW the pirates conducted their business. There are chapters on how they recruited, how they acquired their ships and sailed, on what they would have been interested in retrieving from their prey (no buried treasure or chests of Aztec gold here), what weapons they used and how they were used, ship types and descriptions, sailing and chasing techniques, flags, routines ashore, etc.This is much more informative and interesting than the actual biographical books. Little is certainly fully qualified to write this book, as he spent 8 years on the Teams (although he went as an officer, which is something like joining the Dark Side), and afterwards was an analyst for NSW Strategy and Tactics Group. He did a ton of research (demonstrated by his 29 pages of footnotes and 8 pages of references), and presents the subject matter in straightfoward and easily understood manner.The one thing that somewhat disappoints me is the total lack of any information on pirates in areas besides the Caribbean. A simple addition of "Caribbean" somewhere in the title would have been nice. He completely skips over the notorious Barbary corsairs (who were less well known for their seamanship, but better known for their bloody boarding actions) or the pirate lords of the Far East, such as Ching Yih, who nearly ruled a nation. For a little more information on these, check out Angus Konstam's History of Pirates.I heartily recommend this book to anybody who is interested in actual pirate practices in the Caribbean
An Excellent Addtiion to the Bullying Prevention Literature. This book is what's been missing for eductors in the field of bullying prevention. It is a practical, well thought out and clearly explained, research based, guide to implementing bullying prevention and intervention in any school. Every teacher and administrator should read this book
Sociology and Language. Bourdieu's point is not to explore linguistics but rather to explore the larger impact that language has on shaping symbols, meaning and power in the social context.  Symbolic interactionists and conflict theorists would probally find this book to be a great read
A Portmanteau of Literary Accomplishment. Matthew Goulish invites the reader to share in his extraordinary life experience in 39 Microlectures.  A melding of personal commentary, from dreams as a child, to his own struggle through cancer, Matthew's writing sparkles with insight and understanding.  He succeeds in winding the reader's thoughts through narrow passageways- a trip through his own collection and love for architecture, film, theatre and literature.  He shares with us his interpretation on the works of Italo Calvino, Eugene Ionesco, John Cage, Rem Koolhaas and countless others.  A wealth of knowledge secured in a concise book, bringing the essence of so many important artistic figures together in one edition.  Through the inspired writing of Matthew Goulish, interest is sparked and easily developed upon, using the source notes provided within the book.  An invaluable reference to a library acquired over a lifetime.  I highly recommend 39 Microlectures to any reader searching for an intellectual snowfall
I loved it. The Inferno, written by Dante Alighieri around 1309, is about a man who has somewhat lost his way (morally) on earth so he is granted a tour through Hell.  I loved this book because I found the many circles and subdivisions of hell that Dante created to be very fascinating and I also very much enjoyed reading about the gravity of certain sins through the eyes of such an old-school Catholic such as Dante.  John Ciardi's translations were wonderful because he made Dantes' analytical and sometimes difficult speech into a form that was more modern and easier to understand without losing the feelings and the flavor behind the original.  This book was very entertaining and I cant wait to read The Purgatorio
Dover Thrift Edition of "Center of the Earth" ISBN:0-486-44088-5. This Dover Thrift edition (1995) of "Journey to the Centre of the Earth" published by Routledge in 1876 is one of the three translations which are faithful to the Verne original. The usual translation refers to "Prof. von Hardwigg" and adds and changes much material. This translation refers to "Prof. Lidenbrodk", thus retaining Verne's original nomenclature. Although an anonymous translation, it may have been made by Henry Frith who translated other Verne books for Routledge. A note of caution: Amazon lumps all versions of this title together in reviews, so be aware that this review applies only to the Dover Thrift Edition, ISBN:-0-486-44088-5, 1995.
Huge Fun. An amazing tale of the fantastic cover and deception schemes devised by the Allies (primarily Brits) to deceive the Germans about the Normandy invasion plans.  Wonderfully clever and often downright amusing in conception and delivery, many of these fanciful schemes had phonominal success in disorienting the Germans, providing a total surprise for the Allies on D Day, saving perhaps tens of thousands of Allied soldiers' lives, and very likely determing the outcome of the war itself. Anthony Cave Brown tells the story with conviction, gusto and humor.  Why  didn't his book get on my list 25 years ago
We love I want to be an Astronaut. As a former elementary school teacher, I'm very familiar with the work of Byron Barton and his appeal toward young children.  When my own son became interested in space, I knew he'd love this book. The illustrations are detailed but large-perfect for the young eye and provide plenty to talk about to extend the book.  This book even makes me want to be an astronaut
Wonderful Book. This was a very easy to read book that I found comforting during my 17 month struggle of TTC.  I enjoyed her take on relaxing the body and mind and felt that I benefited from the book.  It was a fairly quick read for me.  I am only giving it 4 stars because even though I had been TTC for almost 2 years, the last part of the book was a little scary to me, discussing the failure rates of procedures like IUI and IVF, and talking about how the odds are stacked against you.  It also talked about making the decision to be childless, which although realistic, put me into a panic.  Overall it is a wonderful book and after 17 months of trying, 1 week after I finished the book I found out I was pregnant.  Of course we are very excited.... and I appreciated the irony of reading such a book and feeling very worried, and then finally being pregnant.  It did help me to relax and try to put things into perspective
Fierce!!!  Ten Stars!!!. Anyone who has sat in class and was just bored stiff with the disjointed , disconnected way of  western teaching  and rote memorization will love this one.  This is truly the Missing Link&#8230; For those of us who have seen  and read historical, allegorical and sci-fi epics such as Anthony and Cleopatra, Ben Hur, Sparticus, Julius Caesar,  Lawrence of Arabia, The Ten Commandments, the Matrix, Samson and Delilah, all of the Greek Mythology programs (Jason and the Argonauts, Hercules, Troy)  etc., etc., know that there was something missing from these shows, and that if the avoided ingredients were placed correctly into the storylines these movies/programs would have been great, because they would have been  correct&#8230;. Even today if one was to look at the new Sci-fi shows ( Star Wars, Star Trek, Deep Space Nine) and  other programs one would see ancient  architecture, names , languages and places that is not new at all but the ancient future that has been rehashed.!!!Of special interest see page 171 and view the ancient  buildings prevalent in many of the above listed shows, the links of the ancient population with the current population in chapter VII, the ancient languages that is still used today by the descendants of the kemetic tribes, the same population found indigenous in every corner of the world.The author is one of the great thinking persons of his time and this influential text should be part of everyone&#8217;s library&#8230;.
Pippi Longstocking. I think Pippi Longstocking is a very creative character. Pippi longstocking has a good imagination. Astrid Lindgren is a good writer, I think some of the author's just write to impress people but I think you actually care about what people think about your books. Your books are the best books I have ever read. I think your books are easy to read. My favorite book you have is Pippi Longstocking.With that funky house name. Think you for being a great writer
My most treasured book. This book of collected poems is the most treasured book that I own.  My copy is absolutely falling apart - I have to keep it in its own special box
Nice Primer. I wish I had bought this book initially.I was pretty new to digital video. I had lots of questions about transferring, capturing analog, audio, and so far this book has answered them. It would have saved time to buy it first.I'm using the digital video for a vidcast.
About time. I've read the "The Magic Mountain" (or, going by its original name, "Der Zauberberg") at least three times. Yet, there are many parts in it that have still remained inaccessible to me - it is just too big a tome. Perhaps it has to do with the fact that Thomas Mann tried here to tackle three major areas: the nature of time, the philosophy of The Enlightenment versus dogmatic faith in religious and political doctrines, and of course the big one, love.Each of these themes would have easily deserved a novel in itself, but Mann never seems to have shrunk from a literary challenge. In fact, similar to one of the book's protagonists, Ludovico Settembrini, Mann seems always ready to show off his vast knowledge of philosophy, natural sciences, and historical events (to me, the only shortcoming of this work). But it's also evident that Mann perceived those issues as being of most importance in a world bent on crossing swords at least over some of these issues - in a man-made violent cataclysm known as World War I.The main idea I've tucked away from this book concerns the ever-changing nature and concept of time. We know that our being is ephemeral; to paraphrase one of the most entertaining characters "Hofrat Behrens" (second only to the elephantine, yet tragic, character of "Mynheer Peeperkorn"), "we come from darkness and we go into darkness". And there's the time between our coming and going that, somehow, demands to be filled out. With elegance and a good dose of occasional irony, Mann shows how we as humans strive (or, occasionally, not strive) and/or struggle to do this, letting the characters develop in this setting at (literally) the top of the world.Hans Castorp, whose life at Berghof we mainly observe, seems to be a creature of comfort, enjoying the many amenities and the ordered life in this institution. But with time he also aspires to something higher. He seeks out Settembrini's company to learn. He also begins to study anatomy (having been cued by the physical features of one "Clawdia Chauchat"), takes magnanimous care for the terminal cases among the fellow patients, and he faithfully (and perhaps fatefully) carries a torch for his one true love, "Clawdia".However, with plenty of spare, and somewhat empty, time at ones disposal, time itself becomes a strange beast - interminably long in the present when filled with monotony and boredom, yet short and unyielding when later recalled from memory. What's more, time becomes stale, a burden, even threatening to the mind, breeding unrest and the zest for cheap and undignified entertainment. This book truly gets to the core of the question as to what defines our humanity, whether or how we one day might become less encumbered in this world. A world in which conflicts seem sometimes to spring out of the breeding ground of complacency and indolence. Mann doesn't provide answers to this. Rather, he poses a beautiful question at the very end - a question never fully to be answered, yet powerful in its allusion, seeking to probe the motivations behind our wishes and desires in and from this world
Aside from the humor . . . If one is willing to look aside from the dry substandard humor of the author, they will find one of the best written textbooks around in any subject.  Taken as a given that some of this material is mathematically and analytically intensive, I cannot say that this entire book is easy reading.  However, you will find that the authors due an excellent job explaining and demonstrating difficult concepts.  They also provide a variety of real life examples to supplement their explanations, that help to provide context for some of the seemingly abstract concepts.  Moreover, they extensively make use of Microsoft Excel is demonstrating how to perform some complicated aspects of security analysis in a way that is easily reproducible to the reader
My first graphic novel!. i was given this by a friend of mine, and this what got me really interested in graphic novels. The story is beautiful so dreaming the characters are awesome and most of all though the artwork is SO simple yet it is so full of expression. Bryan gave life to those characters with just black lines, magnificent
To age gracefully. I found this to be a wonderful book.  It's refreshing to hear someone express how age is beautiful and how we should embrace it rather than hide from it. I was dreading age before I read this book. Now, I look forward to the knowledge life has to offer me.  I want the wisdom that comes from experience.  I want to be able to have wrinkles from laughing as an emblem from when I enjoyed so many moments. What I like most about this book is just Veronique's unique perspective.  It's looking more at the good in life, rather than focusing on the bad. She found  exquisiteness in age
Unlocking Mysteries. This is an excellent book explaining Buddhism's view of life and death.  The subject is deep, but the presentation is down to earth and easy to understand.  This book should be essential reading for anyone interested in Buddhism.  For those who are not, reading it may expand your horizons and open up new ways of thinking about life
125 Brain Games for Baby. This is a great book.  It has many easy educational activities for newborns.  I haven't found any other book of this type that is for the 0 to 6 month crowd
Wordsworth: Poet of Anxiety. I entirely disagree with the prevailing reviews on The Prelude.  We have no other secular poem about the futile search for meaning in a meaningless world so fine as the Prelude:  it is the Paradise Lost of those who search  or long for a fleeting significance.  What is significant about the poem is  not that we believe what Wordsworth claims about the power of nature and  the mind, but that he tried so hard to search out some sense of meaning and  order-  Wordsworth is the first Modernist writer before there was a name  for his anxiety.  This edition is wonderful in the way that it presents the  1805 and 1850 versions on opposite pages-  it also contains the 1799  version- a real tour de force.  Read The Prelude, read it carefully and  take it too heart-  there is no Song of Myself without Wordsworth's humane  yet Promethean quest for significance
A great book for group work, and intermediate witches. I wouldn't recommend this book as a manual for absolute beginners - that's what her other book, The Spiral Dance, was for.  However, if you are somewhat well-versed in the practice of the Craft, and are looking for ideas for group work, this is a fabulous book.  Written by a master of coven work, Truth or Dare takes bold, assertive steps in showing the reader how to form consciousness-raising groups, lead meditations, and organize spiritual groups, and is full of feminist poetry (with a beautiful retelling of the descent of Innana), trance work, stories of spiritual/political activism, and plenty of inspiration for your own work.  Again, to get the most out of this book, it's best to be at least at the intermediate level.  And, if you're looking to start a group, but don't quite know how, this is a great book to start with
Excellent Book on Cultivating Your Intuition. This is one of several books on intuition that I've read to date, and it's by far one of my favorites!Lynn Robinson helps the reader to cultivate their intution with wonderful exercises & tips.  She also includes some beautiful quotes (I am a quote fanatic, so I love when they are included along with relevant text).After reading this book, I actually contacted Lynn and requested an intuitive reading from her.  All I can say is that she's truly amazing - I have never experienced a reading where EVERYTHING she said was right on, and her future predictions have all come true.I would highly recommend this book to anyone interested in learning how to hear their "still small voice within" - this is one of the best books out there to date
A balanced, practical book. As a physician who is aware of many of the nutritional issues of interest to vegetarianism/veganism, I congratulate the authors for this readable book.  The authors have done a good job at being evidence-based and providing practical advice in non-technical jargon.No "fads" here but sensible advice and an honest review of literature.I look forward to the next edition of this year book (current book is year 2000 edition).If you're interested in nutritional asepcts of veganism, you can't go wrong with this book
Very instructive. The truth is that women can have a threesome much easier than a man.  A woman needs to convince one woman; a man has to convince two.  This book has chapters for single men but most chapters address bi women and couples with a bi woman.  However, men without partners can learn much about gently introducing their next partner to the concept of bi love.For single men, this book is worth the price just for the chapters on seduction.  Lori tells you how bi women think and operate and (more important) how all women want to be seduced.  If men approached women as seductively as bi women do, every man would be Casanov
a writer with a genius-level i.q. and capable-almost-everything writing!!. every one of mr. flynn's so-called 'political' thrillers is so plausible and so realistic. every one of the his novels, the plot and the storyline are simply breathtaking! readers with high blood  pressure are not recommended to read his novels.this 'memorial day' is another nightmare that could and might happen to america any day coming. again, a must-included training textbook for all national security authorities' training camps. politicians should also read (if they ever read?) to avoid all the possible mistakes they might commit anyday elsewhere in america. just wish all the future presidents of america would be like president heyes (the present one is hopelessly excluded). in regard to the vice president as mr. flynn describe in his several novels, it's lucky this wimp never really got anything that could affect the fate of america compares to the real one we got. there's nothing we could do, but at least we could and should do one thing quick. by walking thru the customs on the border of mexico and u.s.a., we have to face a smiling face of the potus (this one is okay), but that photo of the vice president with a crook smiling sneer face should be taken off the wall and changed right away. that photo is absolutely disgusting and inappropriate. a sneering face with a crook smile? no wonder he's so unpopular right now. the person who chose to hang that picture should be fired right away.i never thought to torture the captured terrorists is wrong doing and illegal. if they bring terror to us and deprive us of a peaceful future, we should stop them anyway we could long before it happens. on the other hand, victimize the innocent people by using the 'national security' excuse is neither acceptable, no matter what. we are blessed to have such great completely political-right writer with such in-sight depth. keep it coming, mr. flynn. i'm ready whenever your works publishing dates are ready!
Digestible philosophy. When I received this book, I was expecting a more comprehensive survey of Greek thought, but I was nonetheless pleasantly surprised. This very slim book (109 pp) is actually a series of lectures delivered by Cornford on the  development of Greek philosophy from Ionian science to Socrates, his pupil  Plato, and his pupil Aristotle (with nods to others such as Pythagoras and  Democritus along the way). Cornford delivers in very plain language what he  considers to be the essential differences between these thinkers. I found  this to be a very enjoyable introduction to Greek (and Western) philosophy  that can be read within an hour or two. If only more philosophers would  deign to present their theories to the laity as clearly as Professor  Cornford
This BATMAN is no JOKER. The Art of BATMAN BEGINS is a wonderful look into the making of the film.  It has extensive storyboards and costume designs, as well as, concept art in full color.  Any fan of the Dark Knight should add this edition to your bookshelf.  Only a joker would pass this up
FANTASTIC. I HIGHLEY RECOMMEND THIS BOOK. IT HAS GREAT EXPLANATION OF A LOT OF THINGS. THIS IS A GREAT BOOK, IT HELPED ME WITH WORK AND ALSO ABOUT FAMILY.THE BOOK IS EASY TO UNDERSTAND AND IT WILL MAKE YOU A MUCH BETTER PERSON AFTER READING IT
Basquiat: We hardly Knew Ye. This book runs the gamut between gossip, stories of 80's excesses, and art history.  The book is not so much a biography of Basquiat, rather a peek into the insipid world of the 1980's New York art scene.  It has the usual "hangers-on" bottom-feeding on the talents of others, the "know nothing" art buyers driving prices up on marginal works, and the merciless art dealers who appear oddly enough to be the victims in this book.  Basquiat does not deserve glorification, after all he was a drug-soaked addict and mooch, and this book provides none.  It is a lively read that brings to the forefront the artists that drove the scene, the dealers that made them famous, and the host of actors that shaped the movement
The Morality of  Liberalism. John Rawls is indisputably the most honorable spokesman of political liberalism of the past twenty-five years. His theoretical committment to and devlopment of liberalism is an inspiring attempt to reconcile the  difficulties inherent in a heterogenous society in which different  conceptions of the good life and varied value systems, beliefs, and  principles can coexist and yet affirm the political conception of a  constitutional regime. How can a nation entreat its inhabitants to carve  out their conception of the good life and their own value systems and yet  achieve agreement on a set of principles that all citizens may abide by? It  is the answer to this question that Rawls's works have sought to answer.  The Law of Peoples is no less concerned with this question. Rawls's  attempts to extend a social contractarian approach to human existence on  the international level is thorough and nuanced. Liberal peoples, he  argues, have three basic features. They possess a reasonably just  constitutional democractic government that serves their fundamental  interests; they are united by common sympathies; and above all, they have a  morally mature nature. Critics who claim that Rawls's brand of liberalism  invites a form of moral agnosticism had better think twice. Moral maturity  and its genetic antecedent--human moral nature, are the preconditions that  underly the moral basis of liberalism in general: deep respect for human  beings and the necessity of treating them as ends in themselves.  Rawls's  development of a Just War Doctrine should force us to re-think traditional  concepts of sovereignty and undermines the claims to legitimacy that outlaw  states seek to impose on moral communities in the name of cultural  authenticity. In this respect Rawls' work is indispensible to young liberal  scholar's such as myself. In fact I have depended on his theoretical  approach to ground much of my highly controversial and hotly contested  book, &quot;Becoming a Cosmopolitan: What It Means To be a Human Being in  the New Millennium.&quot; I argue, however, for a more pugnacious form of  liberalism by rejecting outright, as conceptions of the good, all forms of  tribal (racial/ethnic and national)identities and argue for the  obliteration of all cultural practices that undermine human rights. For  those who believe that moral progress is possible and who wish to further  advance the idea that liberal democracies represent a superior and more  evolved form of social and political living, The Law of Peoples is a  detailed and rigorous application of this idea
nice and useful. This is a very useful text and reference book for electrical engineers and others who are interested. Its definitely meant for the graduate students and trained engineers and not for the beginners. I used this book as a graduate text and am immensely benefitted as I often require to revise many issues regarding my research. Provides many useful comparisons and references.
Americans work too much!. Americans work too much--especially working mothers! I just bought Permission to Play for all of my working mother friends for Christmas. I included an offer to baby sit for them, too--from their husbands! Now, instead of guy's night out, it is our night out to play tennis, go down to the driving range or go to the potter's wheel to paint--whatever sport or creative endeavor fits the season or our mood. I hope this author continues on her streak of writing inspirational books to motivate us women to do what we truly need to do. After a year of practing what Ms. Long suggested in her first book, Permission to Nap, I realize it might take my group a year to fit play in regularly, but we will have fun trying
These just keep getting better and better!. I absolutely love the Amelia Peabody series, and I'm finding that the books just keep getting better and better.  This particular book is quite spectacular!  I'm sure that it's the characters that keep me coming back each time, but I'm never disappointed with the stories either.  Ms. Peters is a real grand-master in the writing field, and I hope she keeps this remarkable family going for a long time to come.  The setting in this book is in around Luxor and in the Valley of the Kings.  The Emersons come into possession of a very valuable statue that appears to have a curse on it.  Emerson and Peabody are committed to finding where the statue came from, and while they continue their search there are numerous undesirable people after it and the Emersons themselves.  Just another rollicking good time
What the Clintons have been up to since they left the White House. R. Emmett Tyrell Jr. is not only the founder of The American Spectator, but according to Hillary Clinton he is one of those at the center of the Vast Right Wing Conspiracy.  This amuses Tyrell to no end (even though the Clinton attacks have cost him plenty) and he explains why in this book.  Yes, there is no love lost between the author and the Clintons.  He loves to talk about what goes on behind the carefully crafted public faade and they like to rail at him for distortions and rehashing material that is old news.  This book does go over some of the old stuff in passing, but most of it focuses on what Bill and Hillary have been doing since their co-Presidency ended in 2000.If you are a Clinton supporter or at least one who accepts the public image of him as a wouldabeengreat President if not for the Republican attacks, you should avoid this book unless you enjoy getting riled up.  If you are a true believer in the Vast Right Wing Conspiracy and do not want to hear or accept evidence to he contrary, again, avoid this book.If you enjoy reading about more Clinton activities and what they usually imply, well, you will certainly enjoy this book.  Especially if you enjoy hearing Bill called things like, "the most low-grade lout ever elected president" or "the white-haired and shrunken Clinton is a forlorn figure, irritable, melancholy, and anxious to be remembered well" this book will be just what you want.  It isn't exactly vicious or full of bile, but it isn't dispassionate either.For me, the portions of the book worth the price are the appendices.  The first lists all of the speaking gigs and the fees received by Bill from Feb 2001 through the end of 2005.  Millions upon millions earned in speaking fees from all over the world and from some folks who really aren't friends of the United States.  Does anyone recall the apoplexy of the Democrats when Reagan made money from speaking in Japan?  The second appendix lists the pardons and commutations that Clinton gave.  It reads quite strangely.  I found myself wondering why rolling back an odometer was something that deserves the attention and pardon of the President of the United States of America.I think most of the people who read this book will have their minds made up before they turn to the first page, but it is worth reading through just to catch up on what the Clintons are doing.  It is hard to get that from TV and the newspapers because most of them are completely focused on either helping getting Hillary nominated and elected or undermining her.  They never get into the level detail that is covered here
Edge of Your Seat Thriller. There is no disputing that Capote is a God.  All of Truman's work is excellent, but this book takes the cake.  A page turner that will have you questioning the security of your own home.  Warning: If you live in a rural community and decide to read this book you may find it difficult to sleep!
Balzac at his best. I love Balzac.  At his best he soars above the rest of French literature and here he is definitely at his finest. Easy to see why Proust thought him the best, at his best. Vautrin/Collyn is at his most sinister and attractive.  If you haven't read Balzac before, this is the best to start with
A Great Story Well Told. I've read quite a few of the current slew of books attempting to popularise science in the wake of Dava Sobel's Longitude, but I think this is the best. Not only is it a gripping drama with a wonderful parade of characters, and tragedies and triumphs galore, but more importantly it covers the most dramatic change in our perception of ourselves and the world. Consider: at the start of the book in the early nineteenth century religion still reigned supreme, the Bible was the literal truth, and the study of what came to be known as geology and biology was the province of enthusiastic amateurs. But then, from the cliffs of Lyme Regis and from the quarries used to provide the stones for the growth of the new industrial towns and cities came these extraordinary fossils, these remains of the most incredible animals, plus clear evidence for those who could see of the unimagineable lengths of time involved in the formation of the various strata of rocks in which these remains were embedded. The resulting debate was surely one of the most momentous in scientific history, culminating in the publication of Darwin's Origin of Species in 1859. I think Cadbury tells the story superbly. I particularly enjoyed the way the story starts in Jane Austen territory - Lyme Regis, early years of the century, keen young doctors and clergymen collecting plants and fossils - and then as it centres more on London gets darker, entering the familiar world of Dickens, with child deaths, disfigurements, and the crushing of hope beneath the merciless wheels of ruthless ambitions etc. etc.. Great stuf
A Remarkable Guide To Mental Health. We all behave in ways that mystify us.  There are those times when we find ourselves hypercritical and judgmental, or profoundly nurturing, or consumed with anger far out of proportion to the provocation, or able to  reason with insight and dispassion.  From whence come these vastly  different responses to the triggers of life?Born To Win provides a vivid  and compelling journey through the emotional (ego) states that are invoked  by life events.  The authors conceptualize these emotional (ego) states  through the hypothetical construct suggested by Eric Berne, M.D. (Games  People Play).  In the "Parent" state, we are judgmental or  nurturing; in the "Adult" state, rational and analytical; in the  "Child" state, impulsive and playful or angry and hurt.  The  authors demonstrate how our emotional responses to life events arise out of  these three ego states.Each ego state has an appropriate time and place.   Often, however, our inappropriate or self-defeating emotional responses  occur because we have been overprogrammed by aversive early life events to  respond from one ego state when another would be far more adaptive.   Recognizing the inappropriate ego state and making the transition to the  more proper ego state vastly improves the quality of one's life (e.g.,  responding to constructive criticism as a rational Adult instead of as a  petulant Child).We are all "born to win" and can do so when we  learn to respond to life events from the proper ego state.  Born To Win is an invaluable contribution to the cause of mental health
This is the one book you MUST have. Since it was published, I have used this book as the text in my graduate course in networking and telecommuncications management. This book is the perfect combination of high-level concepts, sufficient explanatory detail and access to an online site rich with additional resources, including current updates keyed to the chapters. Students from a wide variety of backgrounds, computer science, management and engineering  have found this book understandable, current and easy to understand. Over the years, I have used many different texts, some very detailed, some very verbose, and most extremely expensive. None them provide me with what, in this book, I feel is the most comprehensive and forward-looking treatment of networking and telecommunications yet accomplished in a single volumeAnother significant feature of the book is that its author is an internationally acclaimed author and presenter and the creator of the eLearning series. This is a magnificient multimedia course covering all of the topics in the book. The visuals are stunning and the coordination between the audio, visual and textual presentation is flawless.The book, web site and multimedia series is very highly recommende
Unfortunately, it's true. I used to weigh 130-35 and was in great shape. That was after I got out of basic training in the military. Unfortunately, I have Polycystic Ovarian Syndrome, which makes it all to easy to put on weight due to a hormone imbalance. When I came down with CFIDS in addition, I gained about 70 lbs. I am now trying to lose it. I am not a small female to begin with - I am 5'6" with a large frame, so the smallest I can get into is about a 12.I have been bashed frequently for being "large" in terms of both weight and size - I have an explanation for the men who do it (usually ugly, angry, couldn't get laid on Sunset, small weenie complex, and need a target) - generally the type that go for Asian women.Some females also pull this garbage (generally same problems as above) - but the heat taken by large women from the thin mall chick types, who look by their own standards pretty good, mystifies me. Are they really happy as they are, or miserable because of their low cal diets that turn them into "lollipops" (heads out of proportion to bodies)? Why are they so mean if all it takes is good clothes and thinness to be happy and to fit in?Monique doesn't really explain this but does a good job of pointing it out. There really are such people in the environment, they ARE evil, and I blame it mostly on 2 dimensionality and low IQ. After all, who has nothing better to do than diss people for what they look like, while spending most of their time on their appearance? Otherwise, I would have to assume that, as Monique insists, that men are attracted to women with some meat on their bones. And the skinny evil ones are worried.Monique, you look great no matter what size - as for me, I'd look better with a little less. Thanks for writing the book. Here's another one: You're so skinny you look like a Pez dispenser with a b*tch head.
A great survey of the Army that defeated Fascism... The point of this book is that the United States, after watching the first few years of the war, became, itself, a massive war-power of nearly unparalleled strength.The book describes how these "citizen soliders" came to be soldiers, and what they did once they were.It is full of valuable historical information.  (For instance, the number of American men classified as 4F, or unfit for military service, is astoundingly large.  Primarily this is attributed to poor nutrition due to the depression.)Like most WWII Ambrose books, there's some overlap with his other titles.However, this is a great, encyclopedic volume that details the war in europe and how Americans were critical to that victory
Boss B*tch. There's a new Queen of New York and her name is Zya Miller.  After being left destitute when her boyfriend, Jules, is locked up, Zya does the only thing she knows - hustling.  A gram here and a gram there quickly turns into an empire, an empire to rival that of the late Anari/Tony, the former Queen.  Mo' money, mo' problems.  As Zya is doing big things and making major moves, she garners some unwanted attention.  Will Zya crack under pressure or reign supreme?Authors Ashley & JaQuavis undertook the challenge of incorporating some plot elements from their previous works into this new plot.  It paid off.  I did have a few nagging questions, but not enough to distract from the story at hand.  Ashley & JaQuavis present characters grappling with loyalty, trust, revenge and life in the game.  The biggest struggles, though, occur not between the opposite sides of the law, but instead within each character.  To trust or not to trust?  To kill or not to kill?  To love or not to love?The evidence proves it...Ashley & JaQuavis are a talented and formidable team with fresh ideas.  Supreme Clientele is packed with drama, twists, deceit, and gun-play (not to mention some attention grabbing sex scenes) that will captivate its audience.  This is definitely a worthwhile read.Reviewed by: Toni4.5 stars
Wow!. I could not put this book down. Its greatest power is Maria Laurino's honesty.  She gives both the &quot;Italian&quot; and &quot;American&quot; part of &quot;Italian-Americans&quot; equal weight, and deals with issues ranging from the more general, such as the role of dialects, faith and work in Italy and America, to the more specific, such as how in some cases Italian-Americans cling to traditions from their ancestors that are outdated even in Italy itself.  While Laurino spends much time discussing the differences between the north and south of Italy, she doesn't pit one against the other, but rather looks compassionately at both sides.  Clearly not all of her personal experiences will resonate with every Italian-American; yet while she does not assume to know all the answers, she does not shy away from the complexities and problems she confronts either.  In her passion to explore her own identity, she brings up many important issues not only for Italian-Americans, but for other ethnicities in America as well.  There are so many thought-provoking things about this book--the type of narrative that when you read the last word you remain in a sort of daze and can't stop thinking about it.  It is difficult to review because I fear I will not do it justice.  I cannot recommend it enough
Could see this one on the big screen!!. Very well written, fast-moving, intelligent dialogue among the main characters.  Very likable heroine (at times, though, I could have wrung her neck for not seeing what she had in Joe fast enough -- but that's just me); a totally "fall-in-love instantly" type of hero!!  If this were made into a movie, I could easily see Simon Baker as "Joe."  He has dreamy eyes and a drop dead gorgeous smile -- just like Joe.  Good book, fast read.  I only gave it 4 stars though because I would have liked to have read more on their "happily ever after..."  Didn't want it to end!! :-
Great. My mother told me to read this book about ten years ago when I was the same age as Carrie.  I rarely listened to her, (I do now, always listen to your mother!)  so she read me the first few lines, and I had to pick it up: something about a girl of eighteen and how she might fare alone in nineteenth century Chicago intrigued me. There was a hint that she might go bad!  So of course I had to pick it up.  Besides, I'll read almost anything, which you can see from my various reviews.  I found I couldn't put it down.This is a great melodrama about a harsh and sprawling metropolis at the turn of the century, and like Dreiser's other work, it's also a story of the viciousness Darwinian nature of capitalism.  In this case, he looks at the story through the eyes of a pretty young woman who comes to the city by herself-young Carrie, called "sister Carrie" in homey fashion by her rural family, to show the sweet origins of what ultimately becomes a not-so-respectable woman.Carrie, trying to become an "actress", relies on sexuality to survive.  It's suggested that she doesn't have much of a choice, and that everyone is for sale in the city.  Preyed on by more sophisticated men, she ultimately becomes successful in her own right.  This leaves us with a sort of confusion-we've grown to symapthize with Carrie and understand her behavior is a survival mechanism, but she is also callous and begins to change from victim to conniver.  At the end, we aren't sure whether to cheer her triumph, or feel bad for those she's left in her wake.Another entertaning, great Dreiser story that will teach you about American urban history, not to mention keep you turning the pages in great suspense as to what will become of lovely young Carrie.  Thanks, Mom
Good for wannabe animators as well. This book does not really go into "serious" figure drawing, nothing photo-realistic. And to many, that's a GOOD thing! Finally a book that tries to instil a realistic view on why figure drawing is FUN and sometimes painful. Figure drawing is like masochistic sex in a way. A significant protion of this book is devotes to the "figure in motion," which is so much more interesting that the still figure. This book makes you want to have your drawing pencil "dance" on the dreaded blank paper
Fantastic book. As a police officer we spend many hours in various forms of training.  Some of this training is dedicated to the rules surrounding the use of our department issued firearms.  Some of this training is dedicated to the physical skill of firing this weapon.  None of the training is dedicated to what you go through after having actualy used this weapon against another human being in self defense.  The extent of my departments response was...absolutely no critical incident debriefing and my appointment with the department phycologist occured 9 days after the shooting.  The evaluation by the physcologist last 23 minutes total.  At that point I knew that my well being was up to me to provide for.  After some research I located this series of books by Dave Grossman.  Purchasing these books was the best thing I could have done for myself.  The information within these pages helped me understand all the stages of emotion that I was, and still am, going through.  I would recommend these books to anyone in the military or in lawenforcement (or any family memeber there-of).  They may very well have saved my sanity
Mary Did IT Again. As with all of Mary Emmerling's books, this one is done beautifully.  The photography is wonderful, and the text is perfect.  I always enjoy her books
Funny, Witty Book. This book has been one of my daughter's favorites for a year.  We first got it from the library when she was 6. She loved it so much she wanted her own copy and got one for her birthday. Now she reads it to me!  My daughter loves the smart, polite, yet mischievous Matilda.  She laughs out loud at the funny passages in the story.Be prepared; this is a typical Roald Dahl book, and the humor is a little quirky.  Matilda is the exceptionally gifted daughter of parents who think she is a "twit" and a "scab."  They either ignore her or verbally abuse her.  Matilda gets back at them by playing tricks to "punish" them.  My daughter says that I should warn you that your child might learn some tricks from this book.  These punishments are things that you would not want your child trying at home!Matilda finds a heroine in her teacher at school, though Matilda becomes a heroine to her teacher, rescuing her from her own problems.  We won't give away any more of the story, but good triumphs over evil in the end
Dark Magick. Lets start and say right away that this grimoire does not match the power and force in some of the older grimoires. That said, then why do I like it? Konstantinos finds a subtle element in the night, in the power of darkness, which I personally have been attracted to since a child. Perhaps the key to this grimoire is not whether a particular rite or spell "works", but rather whether the author can weave his love of the night into one's mind, which he does. Magick is a very subtle force, and sometimes such weaving, can have as powerful affect as full blast magick from an older grimoire
Great book!. Amy Timberlake's Dirty Cowboy is now my favorite picture book.  I have started using this as a read aloud for my students at school and they love the illustrations!The Cowboy goes to take his yearly bath at the creek only to find that once he is super clean his "Dawg" no longer recognizes him.  It is a humorous tale as the Cowboy and Dawg fight for the clothing
One of the best adult comics ever!. The second installement of the 9 volume Preacher series, Garth Ennis (Hellblazer, Punisher)  and Steve Dillon (Punisher, Supreme Power:Nighthawk) has out done themselves again in this book. It's even better than the first vol., Gone to Texas.This TPB is seperated into two story arcs, the first, "All in the Family" tells us of Jesse Custer's troubled past in Annville and why he left Tulip five years ago, and he also meets some familiar, but unwanted faces. This story arc introduces Jody and T.C., hitmen that work for Jesse Custer's dredded grandmother, who can be summarized as an evil, ugly, old hag. The second story arc is about Cassidy being taken by a powerful organization called Grail, and introduces Herr Starr, Hoover, and Featherspoon. Alot of sex and bizzare moments in this story arc. Anyways, the main plot of the whole series is about Jesse Custer looking for God, literally, that's because according to this book, God left his job and quits, and Jesse isn't just gonna just let God leave, he's gonna give him a peice of his mind. As if that's not enough, this book also say that maybe Jesus faked his death and ressurection, this book is bound to offend a lot of people, especially Catholics and Christians, but then again, I'm a Christian and I feel fine with it, but that's just me. Lots of violence as usual, the jokes are over the top, a lot of sex, and arguably the best adult comic out there today. Garth Ennis, basically an insane but genious Irish writer, is one of the best comic writers out there, and he continues to surprise his faithful readers with his trademark bizzareness and dark humor. He does some of the best work here in "Until the End of the World."Let's not forget the art by Steve Dillon, Ennis's partner in crime. His work in the tade paperback is superb. Great details, especially in depicting faces and expression, and insane art when drawing the trademark gruesome violence of Ennis and Dillon, he doesn't hold back.It's unbelievable how great these two gentlemen are, but they've definitely out done themselves this time. But if you can be offended by excessive violence, nudity and sexual themes, profanity, or just plain bizzareness, then don't even think about getting this book. But if you are not, my friends, then you better go get a copy now and be ready to be disturbed and entertained
a dramatic first hand account!. I loved it.  Galileo was a very opinionated man and he really shines through.  I felt like I was looking through his telescope and seeing Jupiter, the sun, moon and Saturn for the first time
one of the best. This is one of the best books i've read.  The story is captivating, emotionally charged and fast-paced.  The reflections the author includes about the meaning of his experiences make the book even more enjoyable.
A must have reference. Keelan Parham shows beginners and experienced artists an excellent approach to the art of drawing caricatures.  You'll find this book to be a comprehensive, entertaining, exciting and easy to follow tutorial filled with start-to-finish examples.  Keelan explains the value of line quality, simplicity, accessorizing and much, much more.  This book is written for anyone who draws or is interested in drawing caricatures, and best of all:  it's FUN.  I highly recommend it
A Scholarly Look at Ecclesiastes. This is not a book of light reading, but I was drawn to the title as a possible source of insight in one of the most problematic books of the Bible- Ecclesiastes or Qohelet as it is known to Jewish scholars.  In fact Fox intended "A Time to Tear Down and a Time to Build Up: A Rereading of Ecclesiastes" for Jewish scholars.  I am not Jewish or a scholar of biblical texts, but a curious biological scientist, so be warned.Qohelet is not precisely equal to Ecclesiastes, as Fox points out, but the two books are essentially just different versions of the same writing.  How old it is is debatable- possibly 3rd Century BCE- but we do not know for sure.  It is unlikely to have been written by Solomon, even though "Qohelet" identifies himself as a king in Jerusalem and a son of David. The book starts with the statement "Utterly absurd, said Qohelet, utterly absurd.  All is absurd" or in Ecclesiastes "Vanity of vanities, all is vanity."  This starting point sets the tone of a very strange statement of faith. The world is sometimes unfair, even though in a just world the wicked would be punished and the good would live long happy lives. Still one should enjoy the pleasures one has and fear God.  That is the message of Qohelet and if it seems to resemble some Egyptian or Greek philosophy one should not be surprised for the author almost was certainly aware of these ideas.  Qohelet is struck with the absurdity of life and the fact that God's actions sometimes (if not often) seem absurd.  Yet there is some sort of system- "A time to for every matter under heaven: a time to be born, and a time to die....." as the well-known verses go. Yet "the race does not belong to the swift, nor war to the mighty...for a time of mishap befalls them all".Qohelet was under some suspicion by early scholars and was almost removed from scripture. The book seems to question God and says that we know nothing of what may or may not lay beyond the grave. However the loss of this book would have been a great tragedy as it would have robbed us of some of the most beautiful quotes in the Bible. In my opinion, for what it is worth, Qohelet states the obvious, but often conveniently overlooked, fact that life is often hard and unfair. Ignoring that fact does not, in my opinion, lead to solid faith.  I can state this from experience because the assurance that God would always make things right in spite of obvious pain eventually helped make me an agnostic. Still I cannot discount the possibility of God's existence- I just do not know.  Thus Qohelet's observations ring true to me and it comes down to a more complex reality. Indeed, this is a major bone that I have to pick with much of modern religiosity in that it tends to simplify and express itself in sound bites, not with the deeper understanding of man's inability to really know the nature of whatever is meant by "God."Again, this is not an easy book, but it is well worth the exploration. Those who will take the time will find a deeper understanding of Ecclesiastes in what Christians call the Old Testament
The foreword to this book. There are two ways to learn more about your country: you can study it directly by travelling around in it, or you can study it indirectly by leaving it. The first method yields facts and insights directly in-context, and the second by contrast.Our tradition in computer engineering has been to seldom leave our neighborhood. If you want to learn about operating systems, you read an OS book; for multiprocessor systems, you get a book that maps out the MP space.The book you are holding in your hands can serve admirably in that direct sense. If the technology you are working on is associated with VLIWs or "embedded computing", then clearly it is imperative that you read this book.But what pleasantly surprised me was how useful this book is, even if one's work is not VLIW-related or has no obvious relationship to embedded computing. I had long felt it was time for Josh Fisher to write his magnum opus on VLIWs, so when I first heard he and his co-authors were working on a book with VLIw in the title, I naturally and enthusiastically assumed this was it. Then I heard the words "embedded computing" were also in the title, and felt considerable uncertainty, having spent most of my professional career in the general-purpose computing arena. I thought embedded computing was interesting, but mostly in the same sense that studying cosmology was interesting: intellectually challenging, but what does it have to do with me?I should have known better. I don't think Josh Fisher can write boring text. He doesn't know how. (I still consider his "Very Long Instruction Word Architectures and the ELI-512" paper from ISCA-10 to be the finest conference publication I have ever read.) And he seems to have either found like-minded co-authors in Faraboschi and Young, or he taught them well, because Embedded Computing: A VLIW Approach is enthralling in its clarity and exhilarating in its scope. If you are involved in computer system design or programming, you must still read this book, because it will take you to places where the views are spectacular, including those looking over to where you usually live. You don't necessarily have to agree with every point the authors make, but you WILL understand what they are trying to say, and they WILL make you think.One of the best legacies of the classic Hennessy and Patterson computer architecture textbooks is that the success of their format and style has encouraged more books like theirs. In Embedded Computing: A VLIW Approach, you will find the Pitfalls, Controversies, and occasional Opinion sidebars that made H&P such a joy to read. This kind of technical exposition is like vulcanology done while standing on an active volcano. Look over there, and see molten lava running under a new fissure in the rocks. Feel the heat; it commands your full attention. It's immersive, it's interesting, and it's immediate. If your Vibram soles start melting, it's still worth it. You probably needed new shoes anyway.I first met Josh when I was a grad student at Carnegie-Mellon in 1982. He spent an hour earnestly describing to me how a sufficiently talented compiler could, in principle, find enough parallelism via a technique he called Trace Scheduling, to keep a really wild looking hardware engine busy. The compiler would speculatively move code all over the place, and then invent more code to fix up what it got wrong. I thought to myself "so THIS is what a lunatic looks like up close. I hope he's not dangerous." Two years later I joined him at Multiflow and learned more in the next five years than I ever have, before or since.It was an honor to review an early draft of this book, and I was thrilled to be asked to contribute this foreword. As the book makes clear, general-purpose computing has traditionally gotten the glory, while embedded computing quietly keeps our infrastructure running. This is probably just a sign of the immaturity of the general-purpose computing environment (even though we non-embedded types don't like to admit that). With general-purpose computers, people "use the computer" to do something. But with embedded computers, people accomplish some task, blithely and happily unaware that there's a computer involved. Indeed, if they had to be conscious of the computer, their embedded computers would have already failed: antilock brakes and engine controllers, for instance. General-purpose CPUs have a few microarchitecture performance tricks to show their embedded brethren, but the embedded space has much more to teach the general computing folks about the bigger picture: total cost of ownership, who lives in the adjacent neighborhoods, and what they need for all to live harmoniously. This book is a wonderful contribution towards that evolution
Fantastic Read. Alain is a great writer and this is a must read for anyone who has ever questioned " Do architects really care "Erudite / Wonderful / Superb.I use several books to explain GOOD system design to clients( Don Normans The Design of Everyday Things, called the coffee pot book  )( Alan Coopers The Inmates Are Running the Asylum: Why High Tech Products Drive Us Crazy and How to Restore the Sanity - the jail book  ) and now this classic.Good design leads to happiness.De Botton makes a great case and his history checks on this theory are very goodI especially liked the instance with Le Corbusier's first major client screaming at him that her house is leaking like a sieve and her son in in hospital as a result, with pneumonia,  and he responds " But MADAM the design was so well received in the architectural press " I nearly fell of my seat laughing.Thank you Alain for a great contribution to man and his understanding of how things SHOULD work.I have now ordered ALL of his other works
Masterfully written. I have read few books that are so well written.  This book is enjoyable for the story line and the characters, but almost more enjoyable for McCall Smith's masterful writing.  I savor every sentence for its humor and whimsy.  He also has great insight into human nature and paints our idiosyncrasies in a kinder light that makes the reader feel more inclined to give everyone the benefit of the doubt.
Dated but some things never change. Hollywood is a cesspool of the worst of humanity.  Ego, greed, narcissim, hedonism, all of it strains into Hollywood the way lint ends up in the lint trap of a dryer.  People have a notion that society today is more corrupt than it was in days gone by but that is a myth. People were simply better at keeping it hidden in times past. Hollywood Babylon was a sensation when it came out for just that reason.  It drug out into the light of day what society had known all along - that Hollywood is society's septic tank.  And it's so damn fun to read about it.Even though this book is extremely dated and hashes out stories long ago brought out to the light of day, it still can be enjoyed from an almost historical perspective.  It will also put into perspective the notion that the society of today is more celebrity obsesses than it ever has been.  Even in its earliest days, Hollywood inspired fascination for the world.  There were plenty of gossip and scandal rags willing to dish the dirt in those days and there was plenty for them to dish.This book is a great guilty pleasure. It's fun to read of decadance, murder, sexual picadellos, greed and wretched excess. Hollywood dines on its own young and this book bears that out in spades.
Warm-hearted, witty, and reminiscent of the Paper-bag princess. I Loved this book, and so did my two pre-schoolers. It is a great retelling of Cinderella with a modern slant. Cinder Edna and Cinderella are neighbours. While Cinderella pines away and sleeps in the Cinders to keep warm, Edna finds it too dirty and so after she does the work for HER wicked step-mother and step sisters she goes out and cleans bird cages and mows lawns.Cinder Edna is a spunky, fun character - while Cinderella can't get to the ball without her fairy god-mother's help Cinder Edna has organised a dress on Layaway and catches the bus and while there have been discussions I see on here about feminist overtones and environmental issues (all of which are here) the thing I liked most about this is that people really need to earn what they get. We end up rewarded for what we put in. So Cinder Edna and Cinderella really end up with exactly what they put in. I like the concept of consequences and planning.Anyway, this book makes me laugh. some of the lines are priceless - and my kids adore the story so it works well on both adult and child levelThe illustrations are quite neat - I think they much be pastel, and they have a wonderful 50's kitsch feel about them - the step-mother and step-sisters are extraodinary!I would really recommend this book, it left me with the same feeling the PaperBag Princess did - A real spunky heroine who can look after herself.There are some utterly classic lines in this boo
Great selection!. I received this book as a gift and at first I thought 100,000 names would be too many to look through, but the lists really helped me narrow things down. Plus, my husband and I had a lot of fun flipping to random pages and seeing what we'd find!
Karl Marx, the Sepoy Revolt and 4 dried out chapatis!. The Emory University web site (http://www.english.emory.edu/Bahri/Mutiny.html) provides the first link when you Google "Sepoy Revolt Krishnapur". Not only is Karl Marx quoted from his newspaper articles of 1857 but this marvelous conclusion is provided:"Though the Sepoy War has been dismissed as a chaotic, disorganized peasant uprising, several facts go undisputed that offer a counter-argument. The "unorganized peasants" of India fought one of the most powerful empires in the world to near defeat with limited resources and even more limited training. Nevertheless, the lesson of the Sepoy War is not one of victory or justice, but failure. Though the exact cause of the Sepoy War has yet to be agreed upon, and it is likely that there were many complex causes rather than one, it is clear that British interference governments and the oppression of the Indian people, religious and economic, created a bloody revolution. If there is a lesson to be learned from any of this, it is that a people, once pushed into a corner, will fight for nothing more than the freedom to fight, and live, if not for religion then for their basic right to live in freedom. Furthermore, in the desperate vengeance of a people reduced to pure indignity, lives a coldness that rivals that of their oppressors."James Gordon Farrell makes it ever more clear in The Siege of Krishnapur, published in 1973, as the second of the "Empire Trilogy". This trilogy should be read in its entirety, but each novel stands on its own. The theme of all three is the time before a major change in the British Empire. Troubles focuses on Ireland, Krishnapur on India and Singapore the British Pacific Empire at the beginning of World War II.  J. G. Farrell was born on 23 January 1935 and died on either 11 or 12 August 1979. He was both an Irish and British writer of historical novels. These are his most famous novels with The Siege of Krishnapur winning the 1973 Booker Prize. Farrell died while fishing when a freak wave, the result of the same storm which killed 17 people in the 1979 Fastnet race disaster (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1979_Fastnet_race), washed him out to sea.Having traveled in India and worked in Bangalore developing high tech software development companies in the early 1990's I've seen many of the places mentioned in this book. They are more than true to Farrell's exceptional descriptions. If you have studies the British Empire, world history, Asian history or military history and have not read this book you have a gap in your understanding. Farrell describes the cultural biases of the British class systems as it crashed head long into the Indian caste system. Both of the systems' weaknesses overcame any of their strengths. It was their weaknesses that allowed Krishnapur to survive - although barely.Having read many of the Booker winners - I'm trying to read them all - this is truly one of the best. Get this book and read it. You will NOT be disappointed
A wonderful collection. I love this book and enjoy reading it to my daughter.  She loves it, because she has a sense of reading, having memorized many of the verses.  It is a wonderful collection of children's rhymes and verses.  I feel a  real continuity between my own childhood and my daughter's by sharing these  with her, as my own mother and grandmother shared these same rhymes with  me.  A treasure to keep
Comprehensive study. This is a well written,easy to understand book. Senneff goes to great length to detail information on the subject of peripheral neuropathy.  This book is very helpful for anyone looking to understand and seeking relief for this problem
Usefulness of the Handbook. This handbook is a great asset for any college student that requires a great reference on all types of writing formats in an English course. The Handbook does clearify alot of misconceptions with writing formats such as MLA, APA, Chicago Manual, and many others. It also provides you examples on how the papers using such writing formats should appear on a paper.I was able to even use for my research papers in History class even though i got it originally for my English course ENC1102
Katie's Thoughts on A Western Hero. I bought Gene Autry's book after seeing him on the TV show Hee-Ha, way back in the early 80's. He was being interviewed by Roy Clark, I believe and during this interview Mr. Autry stated that he recently had published his auto-biography ( Back In The Saddle Again ) with the help of Mikey Herkowitz. I was living in West Plains, Mo. at the time and I didn't have any Idea of how to purchase his book, so I wrote to Gene, in care of the California Angels Baseball Team, in Anaheim, California to ask him were I might find a copy of his book. About 6 weeks had past when I received a letter from Mr. Autry and he had enclosed an autographed Bookplate, an 8x10 Black and White picture of some of the Angels baseball players, some Angels Decals and a very nice letter from him on his Golden West Letterhead paper. He was very nice and happy to know that he still had Fans that were still interested in his career and will being. I found out were I could order his book and did so and I read it immediately upon receiving it and of course put his autographed bookplate in it and I will charish it forever. About his book, it was very interesting, informative and very humorous. I enjoyed reading it very much, so much so that my husband got very ercked with me because I didn't want to put it down. I personally will miss Gene Autry very much. His songs, His acting and his personna on and off the Wide Screen will never be equaled by another. The fact that he took the time out of his busy schedule to write to me and included an autographed Bookplate, which said, personally autographed for Catherine LeBarron &quot; Back In The Saddle Again&quot; is the story of my life. I hope you enjoy reading it. Of course I did leave some parts out. With very best wishes, Gene Autr
WHAT THEY FOUGHT FOR discussed on internet newsgroup. James M. McPherson's book, WHAT THEY FOUGHT FOR was thesubject of a two week discussion with the author on theinternet newsgroup soc.history.war.us-civil-war in Augustof 1996.To see a transcript of this discussion go to the web pagehttp://www.agoron.com/~furlanm/McPherson.htm
Those thousand miles become the reader's. It doesn't take long for the reader to get broken in along Fletcher's trail of adventure from the Mexican border of eastern California to the Oregon border. The author takes us along the Colorado trail following the river for a number of days until we spring for the Mohave desert. Fletcher had placed, before his hike, a number of strategic caches of water along his desert route. We are as anxious as he to get to the next cache, particularly as we approach Death Valley in early spring before the overwhelming heat sets in. His descriptions of desert flowers and rolling mounds of sand stretching to dark and spiney ridges rising from the valley floor compel us to make plans to visit Death Valley in the near future. We are relieved when we hop out of Death Valley into the Panamints and scrub forests of the lower Sierra. When we climb high into snow country, our eyes hurt in the glaring snow. But the chill of fourteen thousand feet is more than welcome after the hot Mohave sands. We walk along with Fletcher in the high Sierra to push our toe across the border and touch Oregon soil. We experience the heat, the rattlers, the desert poppies, the cool downsloping breezes from the high Sierra, and the icy waters of alpine streams by reading THE THOUSAND MILE SUMMER. Such a book is a rare treat for those of us seemingly locked into a time-pressure capsule of corporate wor
The Most Complete Paralegal Job Search  &quot;How-to&quot; Available. Andrea Wagner tells you everything you need to know to get your first paralegal job. Everything. This honest and to-the-point book offers examples of everything you'll need for your job search and detailed  information about how to use each piece of paper and each opportunity. The  practical advice on where to look for jobs, who to talk to when you find  them and how to dress for the big day are critical. The list of probable  interview questions along with potential responses to difficult or  inappropriate questions will give you confidence, and the advice on how to  negotiate better compensation will enable you to get what you're worth.  Wagner also provides an impressive list of legal buzzwords that will help  you sound like an old-timer once you are on the job. If you're serious  about getting your first paralegal job, do yourself a favor. Buy this book
Rodale was way ahead of his time with this one. I bought this book on a whim when I took a Master Composter class, and it's a fascinating read. Rodale is largely credited with bringing organic practises to the United States, and he wrote this book apparently shortly after returning from Europe, where he'd been doing his research. His observations always are tied into his reasoning, and at the time there was very little science to back up what he saw regarding health (human, animal & plant) and organic food. Now the science is starting to prove his thoughts were right.The jist of this is that using compost transfers nutrients into plants, and that these nutrients are not simple. We are only just beginning to understand this, maybe we are only beginning to understand that we understand very little. Mr. Rodale grasps this concept, examines the science of his time, as well as organic practises from all over the planet, and comes up with some remarkable suggestions for the home gardner and the farmer alike. His writing is a lot of fun, too
EASY/FUN READ. I found this book to be an easy / fun book to read.  The main character wanted to change her life - was not quite sure how to accomplish that- but set out in unchartered waters to accomplish her goal.  Highly recommend this book.
Autobiography Written by a Great American!. Benjamin Franklin, no matter which way you look at him, was a great American.  I love the stories and folktales about him, his life and his wonderful words and sayings.  This autobiography of his life was written by Ben Franklin when he was sixty-five.  It was written in letter format to his son, and it he reminiscences about his eventfull early life.  Throughout we see Benjamin's powerful literary style and his great humour.  This autobiography is well worth a visit if only to get a first-hand look at a very colourful historical American
&quot;Of Men &amp; Numbers by Jane Muir  -  A review. This is an ENJOYABLE book.  I am not a mathematician, but came across this book by chance while looking for some specific explanations.  The book was so interesting and well written that I stopped my research and read it through.  I would characterize it roughly as a chronological explanation of the lives of the world's great mathematicians.  It relates their lives and contributions to knowledge to those who lived before and after them.  The author strikes a very nice balance between explanation of their environment and their contribution to knowledge (and its acceptance, rejection, or being ignored).  Its all nicely woven together.  The book gave me the feeling of getting just the right amount of detail and explanation with plenty of references for those who wish to study deeper on many subjects covered in the book.  Try it.  You'll like it.  End of revie
awesome map. looks like a really good quality map that will be very useful for our in-canyon backpacking trip
Great SF even if you're not a War hammer40k fan. A highly skilled team working for the Imperial Inquisition roots out illegal dug smugglers. Sound overdone except the drugs are tainted with an evil supernaturall power and it's Dan Abnett writing the story.Truly one of the most underrated SF authors around. If you like military Sf,read this book. If you like adventures of Richard Sharpe, read this book. If you like Star Wars, read this book.Heck, if you like SF read Ravenor, then do yourself a favor and read the Eisenhorn trilogy. Forget the cheesy covers and find the hidden treasure of an adventure inside.
accepting the grief after a tsunami. I read this book many years ago, and have been waiting for the right moment to read it to my child. This week, while we are absorbing the 12/26/2004 tsunami in South Asia, I deemed the moment right.The story is set in Japan at some time in the past, when the farmers and fishermen in the community are following the paths their fathers and grandfathers set. We see the story through the eyes of Kino who lives on a mountain farm, and learns about the sea through his friendship with Jiya, who lives "in the last house in the row of houses toward the ocean, and [whose] house [does] not have a window toward the sea" because, as Jiya tells Kino, "the sea is our enemy." Kino is relieved that he does not live near the sea, but his father reminds him of the great volcano, twenty miles away, and tells him that they "must learn to live with danger."The storyline is simple, almost inevitable. A volcano erupts under the sea and causes a tsunami, which sweeps away the fishing village by the sea. Many lives are lost. As the survivors slowly recover, and Kino's friend Jiya starts to accept life again, Kino asks his father all the questions that children need to ask after a natural disaster. His father's answers each question with patience and wisdom, in a manner open-ended enough so that the reader (or reader and parent) can pause and talk about their own beliefs and feelings. Or the reader can turn the page and stay absorbed in this well-crafted story.My only disappointment with my paperback edition (HarperCollins, 1986, ISBN 0-06-440171-5) is that it left out the famous woodblock prints by the 19th century Japanese artists Hokusai and Hiroshige. I pored over these illustrations as a child and immediately recognized them when I saw them in my library copy. Pearl Buck selected each individual print to allow her readers to see the beauty of Japan, and they form an integral part of the story. I would recommend you buy the Library Binding version by HarperCollins (1999, ISBN 0-38-199923-8) or check out a book with illustrations from your library
Classic Tale of Moral Centre Lost and Found. Lord Jim has always been on my reading list since I was young. I had read "Heart of Darkness" three times, "Typhoon" and "The Nigger and the Narcissus." I found the tales and Conrad's abstract way of relating the exploits and thinking processes of simple people (many or whom I could readily identify with) resonating and profound.For me the central tenet of this novel is about moral centre, what it is to a man, society, where action springs from, and how a person can loose such a thing and how ones gets it back. Jim's fall from grace could match any person from any walk of life who finds themselves in precarious circumstances where fate collides with free-will and choice -- in such a case how much does one control and how much does fate decide? If we believe Jim's case, it is not so clear cut at times... sometimes people are forced, despite their best intentions, by events on a course of action that leaves the person reeling, confused and depressed that they may have abandoned their moral wellspring. Even when sure they have not, mane may be haunted by society thinking or judging harshly a person who has been judged as not living up to a certain presumed moral order. (It is easy to see that there were probably some lesser minions in the Enron scandal, some accountants who should have possibly known better, but did not act. There are actions of soldiers in combat, who try to aim for the good, but circumstances may force horrible decisions upon them). Dramatic examples are not really so necessary, because part of the beauty of the book is that it forces common people such as myself to ask continually -- "what would I do in such circumstances?"Jim, haunted by his loss, retreats to the wilds of Sumatra and establishes a new legacy in a part of the world that does not know his past, but defines him in terms of his acts after he arrives. It is a world of noble savage offerred redemption, it is the comfort or loneliness and the profound strength in the personal knowledge that one has done right. There is no confusing societal filter or ambiguous circumstance. Jim does not make a mistake twice. He proves to society -- and most importantly, to himself -- that he has recovered his moral centre for action.--------------------One honest note for all readers. I would not classify myself as an intellectual, but I do have an abiding interest in just about everything dealing with the love of knowledge. I do not read much contemporary fiction -- narratives and philosophy and science are more my thing -- so there is no reason why the abstruse style of Conrad's writing should be off-putting at times -- but it is! And his switch between direct narration (things he saw or said) to indirect narration (things other people told him and that he now relates) can be a little hard to follow -- you often loose track of the narrative subject... is he talking about Jim? another story teller? Relax for a second and you can at times loose the narrative completely (and I defy any honest teacher of English Literature to edeny this). That is something that stops this "yarn" from being known to wider audiences. But it must be admitted. Some of the reason is the tenor of the time, it was written in 1900, but I have a lot of literature from the same age and none of it matches Conrad's narrative style for beauty and abstruse description. That is both the strength and the challenge of Conrad's writing.Also if you are not familiar or interested in the lore of the sea, or British Maritime Technology and history (I am a fanatic), then you may have a problem with this book. This edition can be very helpful for you because there is a glossary and you can look up terms such as "davit" and "belay pin" and know the difference between a "cutter" and a "barque."In addition, there are significant historical documents in the back of the book relating to the actual historical events surrounding this story (yeah!), and literary reviews (not so hot).One should make an effort to master this text. Like most things in life worth doing, it takes effort, but yields rich results.
This book is my new bible. This book is a must read for anyone who has lived through being a high performer at work and been shafted at raise time for not being a "team player".  Any HR manager, anyone in management and anyone in general in the workplace needs to read this book.  Lots of new content and food for thought here, but also very cathartic for those dogged by corporate American "process" for "process sake".John puts into very simple and powerful concepts, even corporate common sense, things that I have found myself muttering under my breath for years.  John's concepts would engender a competitive and productive American workforce and a truly "free job market" where talent and skill are rewarded and the "pencil pushers" and "clock watchers" and bad managers are moved on.  I long for the day.Killer book, must read....buy it now
Detailed and well researched. I would like to congratulate th author for his in-depth research on Al-Qaeda and the entire plot against the World Trade center. The book is well written and it uncovered many unknown by me details and an entire new perspective. Recommended
Inspirational!. I found this book to be a wonderful source of ideas for design and technique. The mini quilts were very well photographed and I found the write-ups to be helpful and informative. As a fiber artist, I no longer want patterns or "projects", I just want inspiration. Perfect
Some Fascinating Material. David Lazar is some kind of Renaissance man all his own--his other books include CONVERSATIONS WITH MFK FISHER.  Fisher is a talent of such a different sort than Michael Powell's that all we can say about David Lazar's taste is the word, "eclectic."Lazar reprints (and in some cases prints for the first time) some great interviews of Powell, who's always sparkling and seems to be on in the great tradition of Peter ustinov (i.e., a born interviewee).  The brilliant film director Oliver Assayas asks perhaps the most probing questions, whereas Martin Scorcese, who is a special guest star in one of the interviews, doesn't really seem like much of an intellectual, does he--he lobs off all the questions and continually defers to Powell as the one with the brains.The only trouble with these 13 interviews is the amount of repetition, from questions that Powell has answered many times.  It's interesting to find out that John Sweet, the American serviceman who plays basically himself in A CANTERBURY TALE, never made another film but went back to his home town in the states, entered the business world, and years later showed up at a tribute to Pressburger and Powell with his family in tow, a happy man.  But then when you hear much the same story again, you lose interest fast.  Ditto with the repetitions of the same answers about knowing Hitchcock, Winston Churchill, etc.And what about the condescending way he refers to CHINATOWN as a studio movie unworthy of the genius of Polanski?  Clearly he hated CHINATOWN and he certainly minces no words about NEW YORK, NEW YORK ("horrible film with Liza")
Ever wondered How to Word the Question ?. Karen Lee Thorp has written a very comprehensive guide that is invaluable in understanding techniques for writing Small Group questions. Included are Top Ten principles for Asking Great Questions. Karen helps the reader understand the difference between questions that build relationships between people and questions that analyze a passage from the Bible. I particularly like the examples of each style of questions that are given. She provides a good base to work from when having to write your own questions. This is an excellant training tool for coaches. Useful in Small Group leading, teaching a Sunday School class, any interactive learning environment or chairing a group or committee that makes decisions. The table of contents is particularly well set out so it is very clear when you want to investigate the topic you are looking for.  I use this book every week as a reference when writing quetions and I use it regularly in training and teaching others. It is the most useful tool I have in my Small Group resources. Karen has given me understanding of how to draw out opinions, feelings and assumptions. Helping people come into a time of discovery for themselves rather than being told by others. I highly reccommend this book
A Lovely Book. The Mayor of MacDougal Street is a lovely book, full of wit and full of heart.  It is probably partly due to my having lived and worked during the folk and blues revival of the sixties and seventies, and having known some of the people in Cambridge and the Village that van Ronk writes so tenderly about, that I enjoyed the book as much as I did.  The reader who is unacquainted with that scene and that time might find it less compelling.  My fondness for this great musician and voluptuary has been heightened by this memoir and its companion CD of the same title
8 Steps to success. Neff and Citrin's eight-point plan to great performance in the first 100 days of a new job makes a lot of sense. The steps won't come as a surprise to anyone who has gone through this process but their logical progression adds up to a big push in the right direction. The real surprise in this book is how readable it is, thanks to the many well-known CEOs who candidly confess their ups and downs during their own first 100 days.
Perfect for the Undecided. This book gives a great overall view of Children's Ministry.  It helps the reader realize that Children's Ministry isn't just sticking children in a classroom and teaching them stuff.  There is more to it than that.  Great book
A Story That Will Stay With You For A Long Time!. Henry is a man that suffers from Chrono-Displacement Disorder where he finds himself thrown to different times in his life as if the gravity pulls him to the past then the future with no apparent reason.The time traveling experience centers on Henry and Clare's relationship. You see their struggle to live a normal life and their unending love for each other. It is a heartwarming story of remembrance.Be prepared to laugh and cry when you read this touching love story.
Hey, I liked it!. I don't know what everyone is complaining about, I enjoyed the book.  True, I haven't read "Capital Crimes" yet, so I didn't have Teddy Faye's back history, but I was still able to come into the story and enjoy his character.  The plotting was a bit slower than usual, but I enjoyed the paranoid atmosphere at the Farm while Holly was training with the CIA.  I actually got rather a kick out of all the "bumping into each other" that Holly and Teddy did without Holly ever realizing it, or realizing it too late, and I was absolutely delighted with the ending . . . because deep down inside, that's just the kind of person I am.  I sped through this book in no time - it's an easy read and a fun book - great for lying in the sun and spending a lazy afternoon.  Not every book has to be bang-bang shoot-em-up every second - sometimes it is nice to read something fun like this.  Keep 'em coming, Mr. Woods
THE BEST I HAVE READ ON THIS SUBJECT BY FAR. This work is comprehensive, well researched and just as importantly, well written.  Not only is the music addressed, but the problems this music encountered in the early years, something that is now often forgotten, is throughly examined.  The social impact of this music, one of the most important aspects in my way of feeling, is examined in great detail.  Of less personal interest to me was the business end, but that is just me, but I feel that many would find this fascinating as well as the rest.  This work goes along way in helping understand R&R, our society in general and our culture in particular.  I found this to be a well organized, easy read and one that I do recommend for your library.
A view into the history of reason. This book was wonderful.  It shouldn't be read as a history but more as a philosophy.  Even there, it is a bit short of the greats.  Why then do I call it wonderful?  It is a view into the past intelligentsia.  His history is antiquated; from a modern perspective some of it is wrong.  However, it is great to see the history of views about history and the philosophy of them.  I am not a pursuer of the P.C., and understand that the context of civilization, at his time, is the molder of his views.  Old books such as this are windows into time and are treasures to be cherished.  As far as his philosophy I intend to read more of his work in the future to get a better perspective, but I found it interesting.  I am on board with Hegel in that we should pursue our Ideal of the Greek Golden Era to maintain a lofty goal for civilization.  Which can be summed up by Thucydides in his description of  Athenian life; &quot;We love the beautiful, but without ostentation or extravagance; we philosophize without being seduced thereby into effeminacy and inactivity (for when men give themselves up to Thought, they get further and further from the Practical--from activity for the public, for the common weal). We are bold and daring; but this courageous energy in action does not prevent us from giving ourselves an account of what we undertake (we have a clear consciousness respecting it); among other nations, on the contrary, martial daring has its basis in deficiency of culture: we know best how to distinguish between the agreeable and the irksome; notwithstanding which, we do not shrink from perils.&quot
Some good stories, a few misses. Russert has distilled a large number of readers' letters into a very readable book.  There are a number of truly inspiring stories in this collection.  There are, however, a few that were disappointing.  I also found a few admittedly minor items rather annoying: the commentary by Russert at the start of each story doesn't really add much; and the chapter on baseball should have been named "The Yankees", as Russert manages to ignore just about every other team in the sport in favor of the pinstripes.  Still, it's enjoyable to read some of the many ways that fathers influence their children's lives
Great book on the power of long term friendship. A great book on the power of lifetime friendships.  While the focus of the book was Williams, it was great learn more about Dom Dimaggio, who lived in the shadow of his brother and Williams.
A book for smart people!. I.F. Stone, a great reporter, told the truth to power without giving it a second thought.  Would that the current crop of investigative reporters had done the same.  This book, beautifully written by former reporter Myra MacPherson, through ten years of interviews and research, puts Stone in context to his times, and will make you wish there was such a person watching Washington today.  Buy this book now
1/2 Bridget Jones, 1/2 Devil Wears Prada, ALL GOOD!. The Second Assistant was not what I expected - it was far better!At first I thought it would be a low-grade version of Bridget Jones' Diary or The Devil Wears Prada, and while Second Assistant definitely showed similarities to both novels, it proved itself as a story all it's own.I loved Lizzie and all the odd Hollywood friends that she made as she learned the ropes of "The Industry". I was delighted by the outlandish stories of L.A., many of which I have heard to be true. I loved that while this book was classified at "chick-lit", it didn't feel fluffy - maybe zany and crazy at times, but never unintelligent. I was especially enamored with the fact that the romantic element of the story did not really come into play until the second act of the book, and that it did not overshadow the other enticing plot lines. I was also intrigued by the abrupt yet conclusive ending, and look forward to reading the follow-up novel, "The First Assistant".I read this novel primarily while on vacation visiting a friend who recently moved to Hollywood, and found it to not only be a great source of entertainment, but also, an accurate source on where to go, as it is chocked full of references to popular L.A. landmarks!Naylor & Hare did a great job, and I highly recommend The Second Assistant to others!
Battersea is the pinnacle of literary perfection. This book in the Wolves/Dido series is probably amoung the best. It would be because of A.outstanding characterization B.amusing dialogue C.beautiful British humour. While The Wolves of Willoughby Chase and Nightbirds on Nantucket are both worthy of accolades, Blackhearts in Battersea is the funniest. As most Scottish readers would know, in real history Bonnie Prince Charlie tried to wrest the throne from the Georgians. Aiken's use of twisted history is superbly amusing. Also, the large pair of trousers cracks me up. My only complaint is that Sophie was too perfect and not enough human
A very useful approach for those who want to sleep easy. I find Professor Siegel's research to be very valuable and, while I probably will not follow the tenets of his strategy exactly, have certainly gleaned many important lessons from this book which have already served me well.  Siegel's previous book Stocks for the Long Run made the case for long-term investing in stocks-over any 20 year period no asset class has outperformed them.  Not bonds, not real estate-nothing.  In this book Siegel expands on that research, presenting a methodology for choosing stocks (which will be held over the long run) to take advantage of the wealth accumulation the stock market can provide.Siegel's approach is very value oriented and quite conservative.  He advocates choosing stocks with high yields (dividends) in sectors that have consistently performed well, and in companies where management has a "tried and true" approach that has not changed.  These firms must also have low P/E ratios, which indicates that Wall Street's expectations of them are somewhat low.  Over time, he argues, these quality companies will continue to beat Wall Street's expectations and, with dividends reinvested, compound the wealth of anyone who follows this approach.For someone who would like relative piece of mind in the stock market and who doesn't want to be constantly shifting his or her portfolio, this book is invaluable.  It helps someone choose stocks that have performed for generations, and will lead investors to a lot of "sleep easy" type stocks (like Hershey foods, for example).  On the other hand there will be some volatility in the mix-Siegel's top performer is the cigarette manufacturer Altria (the old Phillip Morris), whose future as a company never quite seems completely certain.  The benefit of this, Siegel argues, is that as problems arise (such as lawsuits) the dividend remains constant, which means that, at dividend time, more shares are bought than would be under normal circumstances, which creates tremendous value for the long term investor (in the form of more shares).Detractors of Siegel's method cite taxation of capital gains as a primary concern, and indeed this is an issue.  Siegel does treat this issue (albeit briefly) and suggests that a financial planner can assist someone in choosing the most tax beneficial investment account.  The argument can also be made that followers of Siegel's methods would have missed out on the biggest names of the last 50 years (Wal-Mart, Microsoft, Home Depot, etc), but his argument is that, while great new firms like these do, at times, come along, most of the time people pay way too much for "the next best thing," and thus the long term value he seeks is not there.Siegel's theory of the new Global Economy is also fascinating, and he makes a good case why all the outsourcing occurring in the United States today may not be such a bad thing.  The one (minor) flaw I found with Siegel's work is that it is sometimes fairly laborious reading, but in thoroughly covering a subject as complex as this one I believe that's to be expected.  Overall, Siegel's work leaves the impression of no stone left unturned.  Calling his research data selective to me makes no sense-he's not touting Altria or any other stock, but rather showing why, over the last 50 or so years, such companies have done as well as they have.  He's not even really selling a method per se-the "buy the Dogs of the Dow" approach has been around for a long time, and telling investors to seek the best S & P companies according to certain criteria is also nothing new.  Were he recommending specific stocks moving forward I'd give the data mining argument some thought, but as he's not I'd have to say that, all in all, his research is fair and objective.
Creative ideas for camping. This really is a cool book, with all sorts of ideas for cooking in the outdoors, many that I had never thought of, (like cooking eggs and bacon in a bag stuck on a stick over the fire). The first part of the book talks about outdoor cooking at home, and has some neat frugal ideas for outdoor parties, then the book delves into camping for a chapter or so.  (Dian has some really good organizational ideas for large and small groups.)  The last 3/4 of the book is devoted to camp cooking.  The ideas for cooking over the fire are really cool, and for someone who has done only a bit of camping and car camping at that, really unusual. However, if you like your food fresh and not from a can or packet, the recipes are pretty useless.  Here are your cakes made from cake mix and canned fruit, casseroles with cream of whatever soup and all sorts of seasoning packets.  If this sort of thing does'nt bother you, then the book should be perfect, if you're a health nut like me, it will
Words of Biblical Wisdom: The Marvels of  the Monastic Garden. Monastic Origins:Nothing is more likely than Alexandrian Christianity gained adherents among the Therapeutae, and that their institutions were adapted to the new religion. Eusebius was so much struck by the likeness of the Therapeutae to the Christian monks of his own day as to claim that they were Christians converted by the preaching of St Mark, which is most likely."The semi anchoritic character of the Therapeutae community, the renunciation of property , the solitude during the six days of the week and the gathering together on Saturday for the common prayer and the common meal, the severe fasting , the keeping alive of the memory of God, the continuous prayer , the meditation and study of Holy Scripture were also practices of the Christian anchorites of the Alexandrian desert." (Prof. C. Scouteris)The Desert, a City:In the fourth century, the deserts of Egypt became the center of a resurgent Therapeutae movement, we now call monasticism. Groups of Christians, illiterate peasants as well as learned intellectuals moved out to the deserts beyond the Nile Valley and, in the famous words of Saint Athanasius, made the desert a city. They perfected the techniques of discipleship and spiritual direction, of prayer and asceticism, that have remained central to monasticism ever since. Seeking to guide the soul's long journey into God, plotting out the subtle ills of the human heart, they practiced wisdom sayings, and maintained oral tradition of the Fathers teachings. These Desert monks were also brilliant storytellers, some of Christianity's finest, inspiring the Eastern monastic communities, and translated to became classics of Western spirituality.The Word in the Desert:The growing scholarly attention in recent years to the religious world of late antiquity has focused new attention on the quest for holiness by the strange, compelling, often obscure early Christian monks known as the desert fathers. Yet until now, little attention has been given to one of the most vital dimensions of their spirituality: their astute, penetrating interpretation of Scripture. Rooted in solitude, cultivated in an atmosphere of silence, oriented toward the practical appropriation of the sacred texts, the desert fathers' hermeneutic profoundly shaped every aspect of their lives and became a significant part of their legacy. This unique book explores the setting of which the early monastic movement emerged, the elders interpretive methods as a catalyst of the desert fathers' quest for holiness, and the spiritual meaning lived through their words.Words only as response:The Word of Biblical wisdom, centered on sayings and teachings of Jesus Christ, were taken seriously by the Desert Fathers, as a personal guide for their lives. Later on, through careful analysis of their sayings: The Apophthegmata Partum, called by Coptic monks and laity; "The monastic Garden" were recorded and used as early as the Pachomian later koinonia, and read to this moment in the refractory during meals to the congregating Coptic monks. Starting with their hermeneutic, and how scripture was their fountain for holiness. D. Burton-Christie offers a fascinating tour in their ever living thought, that reveals secrets of the continuity of Coptic Monastic Traditions: from its origin and through its growth, within the setting in Sketes.The monastic tradition of silence limits advise to a question, as St. Macarius, instructing us in response to Evagrius Ponticus request: "Do not speak, unless when asked to" i.e. in response to a question. Wisdom words in response to a question was the basic way of teaching in Alexandria Catechetical school, in Q&A., an effective Neoplatonic tradition.Epilogue:D. B-C came to few conclusions of his in depth analytical study of the Desert fathers, stressing the vital role at which scripture 'permeated' their experience, and shaped their capacity to make sense and live the word, and inspired their quest for holiness, and shaped their spirituality. He rightly concluded that scripture may have played a central role in this process, and that certain key biblical texts may have influenced the development of early monasticism.He claims that it is utterly clear that the texts were proclaimed, recited, memorized (especially the Psalms), ruminated upon, and discussed.Most Cited Scripture:The author gave an index of Biblical citations and their frequency in the 'Sayings,' the most complete count is from Mortari's translation. Biblical citations from the OT, Psalms is the most frequent, then Genesis, Isaiah, and quotations of Matthew are the most frequent from the NT, followed by Luke and John, Hebrews and James reflect the Alexandrine tradition, from Revelation only 1.This confirms that in spite of the differences in the sources of the sayings, the Greek translation, albeit some obvious glosses, is generally representative.For a Coptologist, it is clear that a story as the identity of Melchizedek (p 170) is a Byzantine addition, since this monks bragging is contrary to the tradition
Captivating!. &quot;Six Characters in Search of an Author&quot; is truly a unique play.  For some readers, characters on paper are actual human beings, but once we see them portrayed by genuine living people on the stage and big/small screen, we abandon our imagination about the person the character began as.  Luigi Pirandello took this idea and wrote an ingenious play.  Is reality in fact reality, or is it only what we perceive it to be?  This play opens up a world of uncertainty.  The concept of the play challenges the mind.  I recommend
Buddhist Cultural Studies--Fabulous!. This is not one of your usual run-of-the-mill, watered-down, quacky American dharma books.Mishra does a brilliant job of examining Buddhism in its contemporaneous historical and cultural context, comparing and contrasting Buddhist philosophy with foundational western philosophers from the pre-Socratics on, inquiring into the contemporary practices of Buddhism in America and elsewhere, all the while making obvious his own subjectivity.I wish there were more books like this out there. Very smart, informative, provocative and personal.
Heartfelt look into slave life...... I recently picked up an old copy of Dessa Rose and began to read. Although I found it slow in the very beginning, it became one of the few books I can truely say I couldn't put down. Anyone that is interested in slavery should read this book. It is an eye opener for sure
Interesting concept. Overall definitely worth reading.  I thought there was a little &quot;thesaurus action&quot; here, i.e. using larger words for the impact of the size rather than the story.  The concepts of species diversity are fresh and interesting, although as a science guy I would've like some more exploration into that process and how it happened
Great. A great translation of a great man.  I would definitly recommend this book for someone getting into Nietzsche.  It has his great works (The Antichrist being my favorite), as well as excerpts from other's.  Best if followed by Kaufmann's Nietzsche - Philosopher, Psychologist, Antichrist
Brilliant story!!. Michener is a wonderful story teller. His writing style is very detailed with lively characters and settings spanning generations. This book kept me captivated from cover to cover. Thoroughly recommend reading for all historical fiction fans. I personally cant wait to read his other books
EXCELLENT RESOURCE ON HEAVEN. This is one of the best books I've ever read on heaven.  I would highly recommend it
Nearly thirty pieces tackling issues from literature to religion and politics. Theodore Dalrymple's Our Culture, What's Left Of It: The Mandarins And The Masses provides a new essay collection examining the human condition: nearly thirty pieces tackling issues from literature to religion and politics. Years of medical practice in a variety of setting contributes to a discussion of human experience and limits of culture and perception, examining cultural and social oddities alike.
A Great Imaginative Book. Olive and her cast of friends prove to be very imaginative in their quest of returning a lost heart.  My daughter loves this book and it has become a regular nighttime read for us
Good Barry, some recycled material. Excellent book, definitely recommended. Only one complaint: there is some recycled material in the book. By recycled material I mean text that was taken out of columns written on the subject at hand and inserted into the book with, at most, only minor modifications. This is minimal, though, and the book is almost completely new material
The American Pageant Guidebook. The workbook was in perfect condition and arrived in a short period of time.  Thanks!
Covers Everything!. This book covers everything, and it covers it thoroughly and well!  I'd definitely recommend this book to any new mother.
An &quot;amazing&quot; book!. This is an excellent children's book.  I use it every year in my classroom because my students can identify so well with Grace.  There are so many language arts activities that can be used with it.  Grace is an unforgettable character.  She knows what she wants and is undaunted by  would-be obstacles in her path.  With the help of loving family members she  can do anything she sets her mind to
Good and not so good. I read this book about 20 years ago, but when I picked it up again, I didn't remember a thing about it except that back then I didn't like it. I liked it this time, but found the writing pretentious. Why should I read entire paragraphs without understanding them when I have read, understood and enjoyed other "difficult" books from Tolstoy to Bellow to Atwood? Maybe the problem is that this is British from an unfamiliar era. Oh, well. I didn't really like any of the characters. Caro was cold, Grace a whimp, Christian self-involved, Ted a martyr, Paul egocentric. The protraits of minor characters such as Caro's fellow office workers were the best part of the book. The plot was nothing much and the end...well, did they live happily ever after or not? I couldn't figure it out.But it did keep my attention and entertain me for a week. Not all that bad
A Wonderful Classic. This is a wonderful version of the classic story of the "Three Little Kittens".  The artwork in this book is very colorful and detailed and exactly right for young children.  My son (just turned 3) loves this book and must request it (we just got it) 6 times a day.  The only other thing that he shows this much enthusiasm for is Thomas the Tank Engine.His older sister (5) and I like it too, principally because of the funny details in the background and because of the amusing expressions on mama cat's face.Some of Paul Galdone's best work.
Pensbybruno. I ordered this book used from a private seller.  Not only was the book in the condition promised but it arrived well before the time when I expected it to.
Extraordinary. The story of one man who almost single-handedly had an enormous impact on leprosy and diabetes treatment. It revolutionised my ideas about pain and I think it will yours. A rare book and one that will stay in consciousness as  a very important contributio
Fabulous book. I bought this book for my 15-year-old nephew, who wants to be an architect.  He really loved this book.  I thought he might think the pop-up aspect was too juvenile, but he didn't.  He found it entertaining, educational, very interesting and fun.  I want one for myself now
ENJOYABLE!. This last book of the Love Comes Softly series is one of the best ones. The surprise is so unexpected that you go back to read it again and make sure that you read it correctly. The entire book is suspensful and makes  you read it until you are finished. I hope you enjoy it as much as I did
My Jesus. How sad to see so many people accusing Jesus of witchcraft, of course this is not unexpected, the scribes and Pharisees did that kind of thing. They accused Him of casting out demons by the prince of demons.I suppose because those involved in witchcraft were known to practice casting out demons, then it followed in their eyes that Jesus must be doing the same thing.I find nothing in the book that is not biblical in its meaning.I actually cannot find the word levitation mentioned in the Bible. Yes I know it is associated with witches, but it also is applied in medicine in the treatment of burns, where people are supported on a cushion of air to aid quicker healing.Satan mimics the miracles and ministry of Jesus, it is not the other way round. Satan does them for his own ends. Jesus does them as The Son of God. Satan does them for evil, and Jesus for good.So I would not want to many of you risking speaking out the way you are against the Jesus that the Scriptures really reveal.Satanists pray, so should we.Satanists offer human sacrifice. Jesus offered Himself as a human sacrifice as The Son of God.Jesus walked on the water, in so doing He defied the rules of science, just as is depicted in levitation re witches. He did an even greater things, He arose from the dead leaving the grave clothes exactly as they were when they were bound around Him.After that He ascended to Heaven, having first descended into Hell (Hell has many meanings, and is depicted with different names). Essentially Hell is used to relate to all the things associated around it in our modern day English. We need to communicate in the language of the people to get the message over.Satanists seek to raise the dead and mimic Jesus.I have no problems seeing my Jesus (the one the Bible declares) as doing the things that are depicted in the book re Choo Thomas. He is greater than Satan, and does greater things than he can do. He does them out of love, not out of hate like Satan does.I do not see Choo presenting works unto salvation. I see that we are saved unto good works, and by our deeds we will be judged as to what rewards we recieve. For only those works that come through the test of fire will remain, the rest will be burnt up.So if we are not producing pure works then there will be nothing left but the the grace of God (praise God for that), and yes we will have lowly positions.Somehow we seem to forget that Jesus said "You call me Lord and Master" and asked why we do not do what He asks us to do.We are being called into obedience to Christ, to obey Him. Too many of us are more interested in doing what we want to do, and then in troubled times asking Jesus to help us.The book clearly depicts the difference between those that are obedient and those that or not.Many of you felt unclean or afraid when you read the book, your proper response was repentance and faith towards God. You then would have been doubly blessed, rather than depending on some past commitment you made.Wake up people
Brilliantly Skewers "left-wing cant, fawning references, grandiose quotations, and outright nonsense". Fashionable Nonsense is the funniest book that I have ever read. Sokal's account of post-modern abuses of Godel's Theorem launched me into fits of laughter that even now threaten my ability to type this review. Sokal's ability to emulate the post-modern way of writing will amuse and astound you, as when he writes in his hoax paper, "the pi of Euclid and the G of Einstein...are now perceived in their ineluctable historicity." Brilliant!This book is the Cyrano de Bergerac of post-modern philosophy, quipping sensibly about nonsense while skewering the heart of post-modern thought. Having died a silly death at Sokal's hands, let us hope post-modernism never returns to pester us
What a great book!!. I am an adult taking college algebra, but I haven't been in a math class in a LOT of years.  This book has made a subject that used to frighten me a lot more managable.  I actually know what I'm doing now!I would recommend this book for anyone who is starting out in algebra wether they are 12 or 52!!
A Feminine Take on the Martial Arts. As a Karate ShoDan, I'm responsible for instructing a diverse student body.  I work with quite a few women and girls at the dojo, so I was looking for a book with insights into what makes them tick as martial artists.  I ran across "Women in the Martial Arts," and it was helpful.  Of course, I don't claim to have achieved a profound level of insight into the female condition.  But I'd like to think I'm less ignorant now than I was before reading it.This book is a collection of essays by high-ranking women from various styles.  Some of them document their personal journey though the martial arts.  It was disturbing that a few had experienced physical and emotional damage from abuse and other acts of violence.  As a result, they were looking for a path to empowerment, and thus discovered Tai Chi, Aikido, or another fighting style.  Just showing up to class was an act of courage for a couple of them.  And even those women without a lot of baggage had to overcome a particular hang-up, such as body acceptance or dealing with men in a physical manner.  But despite some struggles, they were able to heal and grow while gaining mastery in their particular art.  I found these autobiographical segments to be inspirational.Other writers focused on general aspects of the martial arts.  For example, one instructor wrote about developing the senses in order to avoid surprise attack.  Others expounded on the dynamics of women teaching women, the meaning of the black belt, and even martial arts for the disabled (written by a woman who practices and teaches Karate and Aikido out of a wheelchair).  Regardless of their slant, I was fascinated by how they came to terms with a feminine perspective towards the martial arts.  Some of the women had to overcome what they felt was a female predisposition towards passivity, especially when dealing with male students.  Others believed that the only way to succeed was by imitating male rigidity and aggressiveness.  Either way, once they discovered their power, they often became the terrors of their dojo!  At that point, they had to abandon their preconceptions and achieve a uniquely feminine balance of flexibility and ferocity, both internally and externally.Some readers, especially male ones, may struggle with the feminist vibe of "Women in the Martial Arts."  Indeed, many of the authors began practicing martial arts as part of their participation in the Women's Movement during the 1970s (the book was published in 1992).  So there's a definite "female power" thread throughout these essays.  This made me wonder if the younger women in my class had different reasons for joining, along with post feminist attitudes towards their practice.  Still, there are good insights within this book for any martial artist, regardless of gender
A desert thriller. I loved the descriptions of the west Texas terrain, and the tough character of Anna Pidgeon in this unusual mystery.  Anna, a park ranger who escaped NYC after the death of her husband, discovers &quot;accidents&quot; are happening a little too frequently at Guadeloupe Mountains National Park.  The descriptions of her and her fellow NPS employees is fascinating.  I also loved the relationship she has with her psychiatrist sister, whom she frequently calls back in NYC.  The end scene is terrific, as the killer is unveiled and Anna struggles to save her own life in the middle of nowhere.  And I loved the way Anna serves justice in the end
It would be foolish to try and top this. E.B. White's reading of his story, "The Trumpet of the Swan," is one of my favorite tapes to listen to while driving long distances in the car. The story is beautiful and White has a terrific New England lilting accent which is endearing. My kids love it. A definite classic
A great book for up and coming chefs. I am currently in school for my bachelors in culinary and this book is a must have for all students i believe i have only started to read it but so far it is grea
Very Well Written But...A little Romance,Please?. I think this book was absolutely fantastic. I read this book first and then I read the others though I still have to read a couple more. A flaw in all the books I have so far read about Anne is that the author has created no romance between Anne and Gilbert . I mean a little kissing wouldn't hurt at all and it would make the books so much more romantic and sweet . I don't mean to say that the author has to be totally Danielle Steel but it would have been nice if she had made her books romantic. The worst thing in this whole book was the incessant gossiping of the old ladies at the sewing party. I skipped it because it was so boring. Nevertheless I really like these books and I think the author has described the natural beauty very NICELY. You would feel as if you were there.I find Anne's children very adorable. And I would like to inform the other readers out there that Anne has six children:Jem, Walter, Di, Nan, Shirley and Rilla. I recommend this book to all as it is full of laughter and fun
I also want to churn some butter. I know this book is packed with theory and is intended to give the readers some insight to the Montessori-style Education Theory. Nevertheless, in spite of the aforementioned this is a great read and if some theory is delivered by the way then this is only an extra bonus.Elizabeth Ann, who spends her first years with her ever worried aunt Frances is suddenly forced to move to the Putney family she always feared of living on the farm. This is a story of a personal growth, covering all aspects of a child's life - the growth is both mental and physical and is as enjoyable as the "Little House in the Prairie" books or other books of the kind (I mention the "Little House" books as for me that's the ultimate compliment).For me the pleasure and enjoyment have to do with the portrayal of the homey life and surroundings (a good example would be the description of the main room that at first seems ugly to Betsy and then becomes the most wonderful room in the world) and especially the account of food... personally I feel this is the first thing that gives the homey feeling. Which foods are served, the way the butter is churned and how Betsy learns to sweeten the apple sauce... this is what I love.  Another major matter of enjoyment is the fast process of change in Betsy's thoughts, abilities and appearance to which the reader is a witness. Similar change happens in "The Secret Garden" where the fresh air outside coupled with hard work makes wonders.My only problem comes when I did try to return to theory and to try and adopt some of it to my life with my children. Off course anyone I know wants this natural, closer to nature life. How are you going to achieve it in our modern urban life is a different question. I know that the book talks more about the way and the process then about actually churning butter but I would like to churn a little myself...There is no doubt that life in the outdoor with a lot of physical activity does wonders to your body and soul, especially when small children are concerned.
A Return to Form. My book club read The Full Cupboard of Life for our meeting last month, and (as I have long been a fan of this series), I felt the need to read the next book in the series!  I like to wait for the softcover version, so I was thrilled to get it for the nicer softcover price.  After the last book, which I enjoyed greatly but found to sometimes stretch the boundaries of believability, I felt that McCall Smith returned to his usual good form in this book.  The introduction of two major new characters (a new employee for the garage/detective agency, and a new beau for the somewhat challenging Mma Makutsi, or as everyone else seems to call her, Mma 97%) breathes fresh life into the series.  Both are very lovely and likable characters who are perfect extensions to the family that Mma Ramotswe likes to surround herself with.  The detective stories seem to be taking an increasing back seat, which isn't really a problem as they've never been the focus of the series anyway.  The mysteries to be solved are usually resolved by someone simply flapping their gums and telling a secret - though, strangely, the mystery that opens the book is never solved (perhaps it will be revisited in the sequel).  One thing that I really enjoyed was the author's increasing exploration of the occasionally moderately contentious relationship between Mma Ramotswe & Mma Makutsi...as Makutsi has come into her own more and more, she has begun to chafe a bit under Mma Ramotswe's direction, and the two occasionally get on each other's nerves.  This is a lovely breath of realism in a series noted for its idealism.  All in all, recommended, though newbies should probably start with the earier books in the series.  Also recommended: Thus Was Adonis Murdered, by Sarah Caudwell; Who Gets the Apartment?, by Steven Rigolosi
The best business book out there!!!. This is one of the most fascinating business books I have read.  It covers the idea of EBay as a perfect market which economically is an interesting idea.  The book goes through the history and business growth and has excellent analysis. Overall it is just fascinating to see how this company grew up and delivered profit quarter after quarter. I really wish there would be an update as it is a little dated. Highly recommend as the number one business book.
An excellent guide for enhancing your strategic exploration!. This is actually the paperback version of "Future Edge: Discovering the New Paradigms of Success," by the same author. In fact, both books are sort of brief updates of the author's earlier book, entitled "Discovering the Business of Paradigms," written in the mid-80s.Drawing essentially from the pioneering work of Thomas Kuhn, who wrote the classic, The Theory of Scientific Revolutions, in the 70's, this author has very artfully expounded the concept of paradigm shifting in the world of business, in contrast to the world of science. From a strategic exploration viewpoint, this is an excellent guide book.Understanding - and mastering - your paradigms is one important thing for making progress in life and in business, but I personaly feel that the real essence of this book is succinctly captured by the author in the five strategic exploration tools outlined in the book. The five tools are intended to help you to enhance your anticipation skills. They are the real gems of the book. [Bear in mind that the author is a process futurist, unlike most other futurists who write books & who are primarily content futurists. The five specific tools mentioned in the book are the exact process tools to aid & enhance your strategic exploration. Do not get carried away by the content part of the book pertaining to some perceived trends illustrated by the author.]In addition, the author defines the concept of paradigm very well & also elaborates at length on its key characteristics & effects, with illuminating examples.He highlights the importance of paradigm shift & anticipation. I particularly enjoyed exploring the two specific thought-provoking questions posed by the author:(1) What do I believe is impossible to do in my field, but, if it could be done, would fundamentally change my business?(2) Who, outside my field, might be interested in my unsolved problems?By thinking about & answering these two questions on your own, & against your own background, you will begin to understand the essence of the author's proposition. This will be the beginning of your own paradigm shift, as it has happened in my own life design for the second half.I would recommend readers to buy and read this book jointly with Wayne Burkan's Wide-Angle Vision. Wayne Burkan has been a collaborator of Joel Barker, and he introduces some more new and practical ideas to the paradigm phenomenon.Better still, view also and learn more from the videos (in which both authors are the lead facilitators), The Paradigm Prism and The Implications Wheel, which bring the whole paradigm concept to life and which showcase some more real-world business examples.If you want to explore your future, read this book! As the author puts it, before you can create your future, you must first explore it. You must create and shape your future, otherwise some one else will!This is one of the very few books that have impacted my life design in the second half
The title says it all. Claudia Bloom is a vibrant, imperfect, funny, and unpredictable woman who lands in a strange world and tries desperately to fit in, all while coping with turning 30, and what that means when you call yourself a Tart. I cheered and cried and could not put it down. Don't let the fact it is published by a romance imprint dissuade you from buying this book. Jody Gehrman is an excellent writer with a knack for bringing the details of a moment into cinematic clarity. Her characters are strong and memorable. Highly recommended
Katha is definitely correct Pollittically. Since I subscribe to The Nation, I'd read almost all of these before.  But they are especially good in book format where one gets her consistent voice as she isn't merged - and sometimes lost - in the mental jumble of all the reports and comments in a given Nation issue.For potential purchasers/readers, let me offer a couple of wonderful samples to tempt you.Some states, California among them, have "conscience laws" permnitting anti-choice healthworkers to refuse to be involved in abortions. And some pharmacists refuse to provide the morning-after pill.  But imagine if a Jehovah's Witness nurse refused to assist with a blood transusion or a Muslim bank loan officer refused to charge interest or a Southern Baptist psychotherapist told Jewish patients they were going to hell."The Family Research Council says that every frozen embryo should 'have an opportunity to be born'....  So, concerned Women of America, give a frozen embryo the gift of gestation.  Mona Charen, Ann Coulter, it isn't enough to write columns comparing stem-cell research to tearing transplantable organs out of freshly killed prisoners - you could be leading the way.... Frozen embryo rescue would [also] be an interesting project for the Sisters of Life, the anti-choice order founded by the late John Cardinal O'Connor.  Sort of a virgin birth kind of thing."
A fresh, original translation. Byrom's translation of the Ashtavakra Gita, a classic Hindu text considered to be written by an enlightened master, is amazing reading.  One gets the feeling that the words themselves do not exist, but that a direct transmission from a master is occurring.  An absolute must-read for anyone  on the non-dual spiritual path, Hindu, Buddhist or whomever, but especially  recommended to Western followers of the path of Advaita Vedanta (nondual  Hinduism)
Who needs a professor?. As a busy professional going back to school to earn that overpriced piece of paper we call a B.S., I had no time to BS with the "generals" we all learned (if we were paying attention) in Jr. High.To eliminate the Math requirement, I picked up this book, as well as "The Best Review for the CLEP General Exams".  I spent two evenings-about an hour per night-reviewing Algebra and Geometry.  Then I spent another two nights-an hour a piece-with this book studying Statistics.Of course I didn't read the entire book in two hours, but I had studied enough to pass the math requirement and saved myself 6-12 months of agony and several thousand dollars.I highly recommend this book for anyone (like me) who wasn't listening much in 8th, 9th, 10, 11th or 12th grade math.  To those who ARE taking their 8th grade classes seriously:  Don't study too hard, or you'll have nothing new to learn at University.  ;
1st Edition Doesn't Even Mention The Internet. This book has some useful information on finding, buying and selling used books. Be sure to purchase an updated edition of this book. The 1st edition doesn't even mention the internet and is, of course, out-of-date. Naturally, the internet is now a key and major component in buying and selling books. If you love books, as I do, you will find that finding used books can be a wonderful adventure
Best thing I ever read!. If you really want to work on your personal and spiritual growth, you will read this book. The author makes it so easy to understand and implement these agreements into your life
Roald Dahl - A surprise within a surprise. Ever since I read his "Taste" I seem not to get enough of Dahl's stories. Incredible imagination, wit and culture. All throughout "My Uncle Oswald", which I'm about to finish, I not only get amazed by the story itself but I also get much amused by its parallel inputs such as which wines go well with determined foods..I don't even know if such descriptions actually exist, but I sure can taste them! Well, besides that, I think it great literature as well - he is a good writer, I mean was, unfortunately!
The best. Having used Elizabeth Zimmermann's Knitting Workshop in knitting classes I have taught, I now bought one for my granddaughter who is trying her hand at teaching knitting.  The book answers so many practical questions that come up when knitting, and along with Elizabeth's wit, it is a must on any knitter's bookshelf
Speaking as fellow Platinum Blonde this book was.... Awesome!  I loved every page, I read with a desire! This book had so much information on Marilyn Monroe it was scary. It gives the 411 on all her stories and how she came to be-and die- one of the most glamourus women in  Amercan Culture ever!  The devine Ms. M's fairy tale started out by chance,  and gives light on how Marilyn really was and how she came to be.  I would  recomend this book to everyone
amazing!. It's unbelievable how Sidney Sheldon draws his characters, I could almost see them and hear them talking. I have read many other novels for Sheldon, this is still my favourite. If u don't have it, u miss A LO
Master Bardon.....Thanks !!!. Without any doubt, the mental training exercises found inside this great book are the best....period ! This is a must to anyone who aspire to harness the real power behind its own mind.Buy it...you'll be grateful you di
Very interesting, but requires some skimming. The thesis of this book is that warfare has always been an aspect of the human condition, and that it was as frequent and as deadly in Pre-historic times as in recorded history.  The book relies on two types of evidence: archeological, and ethnographic.  Archeological evidence can attest to the existence of warfare, not  the frequency, but the distinction is lost.  Another distinction not properly made is between peoples who fight defensive wars and aggressive wars.  Keeley devotes entirely too much time to arguing with early 20th century scholars, and the tendency of  more recent scholars to ignore evidence in order to maintain that war was primarily a function of civilization.  Ironically, Keeley  frequently cites a study of Yanomomo Indians, discredited by Kenneth Good's wonderful book ("Into the Heart ...."): Good did not find the aggression his mentor had declared existed.  Having said all this, if the reader is willing to skim at times, this is a very interesting book  It provides insight into how war was waged, the causes of war, psychology of the peoples involved, and what warfare implies as regards the human animal.  It  adds to the discussion on wars between primitives and Europeans found in Jared Diamond's Pulitzer prize winning book ("Guns, Germs and Steel").   Keeley makes a fascinating contrast between Indian/White conflicts in the US west vs. the Canadian west, and  the causes of this difference
Great read. Dr McGraw's book is great reading and I would recommend along with Mr Mark Middleton's book; Personal Success and the Bottom Line
solving life's problems -. After reading this book, I wanted to buy a copy for everyone at Christmas - because it has advice that will help everyone on my list! My father suffered from prostate problems; this book has great advice to help him  control and eliminate and prevent such problems! My cousin is in the middle  of premenopause; again, diet tips, exercise suggestions and advice for  getting through this phase of life. I read the book because I was having  problems dealing with stress. After following the easy 7 day meal plan, I  am feeling so much better! Now I have energy to shop and emotional control  to enjoy the chore! In fact, I'm having fun! Do the same..read this book  and change your life! forever young
GOOD BOOK!. Newton Arvin provides an involving overview of Herman Melville's personal life and literary career in this biography, which won the National Book Award in 1950. In contrast to many current biographies, Arvin clearly wrote this book and did not simply edit his lectures. This counts with me, since many biographies nowadays have the pace and style of lectures, not the elegance and precision of great written prose. The result, in this case, is that HERMAN MELVILLE is its own literary experience, not simply informed dictation transferred to the page.Certainly, Herman Melville wrote what Arvin calls "one very great book." And Arvin does a wonderful job describing what he believes is great about MOBY DICK in his excellent chapter "The Whale". But he does an even better job addressing this question: Why didn't Melville write more great books after hitting his stride in MOBY DICK? The short answers to this question are burnout and Melville's failure, after MOBY DICK, to find a form to match his gifts. As Arvin explains, Melville chose, after his great book "...to write in a form that was as inexpressive to him as a foreign tongue." In a sense, this makes Melville's decline a lesson to all writers, as they grope for the form and structure that celebrates their content.Although published in 1950, HERMAN MELVILLE holds up very well. By current mores, this biography probably underplays Melville's sexual issues and overplays its occasional Freudian insights. But the book is NOT dated.
Great help in preparing law school apps. This is a great general overview, preparation, and reference for working on law school applications.  The book provides overview and advice on interviews, how to choose a law school, and discusses briefly the numbers (lsat, gpa), but I found the candid advice and examples regarding the resume, personal statement, and recommendations the most valuable.  It's easy to read and much less intimidating than some of the other popular and much lengthier books and covered most of the questions and concerns I had.  If you're considering law school or beginning work on law school apps, this is a good place to start
A lot of excellent detail. This is a very good book for learning the details of implementing the Finite Volume method in Computational Fluid Dynamics.  I view it as very complimentary to S. V. Patankar's book, which is more general in nature.   Both books are geared toward people who want to write computer programs to  solve fluid transport problems (heat transfer, Navier-Stokes, etc.)  Both  tend to focus on numerical issues (as opposed to the physics of transport  phenomena).  But while Pantankar's book provides a very easy, approachable  introduction that is thin on the details, Ferziger &amp; Peric have written  a book rich in details.  For instance, they devote an entire chapter to  solving linear systems of equations.  They compare all of the commonly used  methods and contrast their rates of convergence for various test cases.   This level of detail is great if you already understand the big picture.  I  think it may be somewhat difficult for someone new to CFD to really  understand the finite volume method from this book alone.  I would  recommend Patankar's book for a good intro and this book for the  implementation details
A brilliant book!. Shuman's book is path-breaking. . . leading the reader, step by step, far into what is possible for local economics.  It places power firmly in each of our hands, and it points the way forward through wise and well-researched strategies that promise to truly make a significant difference.  It is a living example of how to be an effective change agent--showing how to embark on these efforts in such friendly spiritedness that folks can hardly but be drawn in.  One can barely get to the end without wanting to leap into action.  Vibrant community, healthy societies, and restored ecosystems await if we heed his urgent and wise prescriptions.
Great Attitude, Great Information. I wanted to give this a 5 star rating, but it's not one of my few bibles I always refer to. It definitely is a 4-1/2 star in my opinion. This is a well written detailed book that goes through virtually everything in  buying, refitting and maintaning a used boat. The aspect I like best is the  encouraging style that yes you can do it. In each section he recommends  starting off with this or that simple project to build up confidence and  expierence before starting on the really hard projects. Like paint the  inside of lockers before painting the exterior hull. Casey also makes good  recommendations on materials, procedures, preparation, execution etc. All  geared to the none-pro. ME. Well written, informative, easy to understand,  written to the regular guy. OK I guess I give this 4-3/4 star. Buy it.  Would I buy again. Definitely
A Room with a View is a delightful novel. A Room with a View is a delightful novel by E.M. Forster.  Is is a bit of a romance and was probably realistic fiction in the time period in which it was written.  The main character is a young lady named Lucy.  Lucy and her cousin Charlotte have traveled to Italy, and they meet a lot of interesting characters in their hotel.  The Emersons are a middle-class father and son who offer to give up their rooms to the ladies because the rooms have wonderful views.  Lucy learns a lot in Italy about herself and upon returning home becomes engaged to Cecil Vyse.  The Emersons and Cecil have dramatic effects upon Lucy's life after she returns home.  She discovers conflicting love within her life, and she learns that home is a lot less perfect than she had always pictured it to be.  Lucy observes that ". . . even their church had lost its charm; and the thing one never talked about-religion-was fading like all other things."  Lucy struggles to find out who she is, what she wants, and if the rules of society are to be followed in all aspects of her own life.  Lucy finally discovers her beliefs and decides whether or not to follow the trends and manners of society.I would rate this book relatively highly.  It is only two hundred and thirty pages long, but the language is difficult.  It is a good book because the reader can relate to the characters and because it is a romance, which most girls like to read.  However, there is quite a bit of philosophy, which makes it hard to understand and it is written in the language style of the nineteenth century.  I had to read some of the paragraphs multiple times to grasp their meaning.  Wrestling with the language is a good vocabulary and thinking exercise, however.  A Room with a View is a good novel to read, but the language makes it a lengthy and difficult book to understand
The Things They Carried. a memoir but also like a series of short stories which flow together seamlessly into almost a dreamlike tale.  It is a great read even for those of us who have no real conscept of what war is really like.  Many hidden jewels inside.  Well worth the read
Bountiful Pots. This book is a manual for vegetable gardening from containers.  Smith, an experienced vegetable gardener, noted that many would-be gardeners lack access to garden plots, or find tending such plots difficult because of physical challenges.  Gardening in containers would make it possible for these people to grow some of their own food, but yields have been notoriously low for container-grown vegetables.  Smith and his wife Silvia embarked on a project several years ago to see if they could develop improved growing methods that would produce produce of acceptable quality and quantity in containers.  What they found through their experimentation is that virtually all garden vegetables can be grown very successfully in containers, and that some actually do better in containers than in traditional earth gardens.  In this book, they describe in detail how to grow vegetables and herbs in containers, noting which crops and varieties are the best choices for container growing.  The book is a joy to browse through, with its numerous high-quality color photographs, many of which were taken by Silvia Smith.Smith notes that the key to good vegetable yields is an ample and continuous supply of water.  In traditional pots, this is hard to achieve, since the pots must be checked and watered several times a day during peak seasons.  A further problem is that many of the nutrients are washed out of the soil each time the pot is watered.  This led Smith to the new generation of "self-watering pots," which consist of a container for holding soil and roots, suspended over a large water reservoir, with a significant air gap in between, as well as a means for water to be wicked into the soil from the reservoir.  Smith found that when vegetables are grown in such self-watering pots, they can go for days, or even a week without watering, yet the soil never goes dry, nor loses nutrients through watering.  He found that many garden vegetables thrive in such pots (although he notes that a few herbs do better in traditional pots).In addition to describing types of pots for bountiful vegetable gardening, Smith provides very useful information about soil mixtures to use in the pots.  He enumerates garden pests that may be encountered and ways to overcome them.  Throughout the book, he stresses organic methods and sustainable garden practices.  A very useful section of the book is the alphabetical guide to garden vegetables, in which he takes up each common garden vegetable in turn and provides specific tips for growing the vegetable in a container, noting any varieties that are better for container-growing than others.I first heard about Smith's container garden efforts when I saw his container-grown artichoke with a giant blue Judges' Choice ribbon at the Tunbridge Fair.  That incredible display got me intrigued with the idea of trying to grow some vegetables in pots myself.  As Smith notes in the book, certain heat-loving vegetables such as eggplants and artichokes are practically impossible to bring to maturity here in northern Vermont, but they can actually produce significant yields when grown in self-watering containers.  Although I do most of my gardening in a large earth garden, I'm looking forward to using Smith's methods to grow eggplants in containers this summer.  With some luck, I may finally be able to enjoy some homegrown eggplants, despite our cool Vermont climate
I liked the book. I am 11 years old.  It was fun to send away for stuff in the book.  Some stuff costs money, some is free.  Nice links to free stuff on Internet too.
"A Superb Overview of our Oriental Roots". Will Durant's "Our Oriental Heritage" is the first of eleven volumes, which make for his superb macro-history the Story of Civilization.  He begins with an analysis of the origins of civilization, and then moves on with a survey of Near Eastern civilizations (Sumeria, Egypt, Babylonia, Assyria, Judea, and Persia).  Durant focuses on all the Mesopotamian civilizations from their rise and fall, and deals with Egypt from the earliest kings to the death of Alexander.  Then he moves into the Far East, where he handles Indian, Chinese, and Japanese civilization to the contemporary world of Will Durant.  This excellent overview of Oriental culture will broaden any Occidental mans' perspective on just how his culture and civilization arose.  It will allow him to question many western ideals and values and compel him to further understand these remarkable civilizations to which we are so highly indebted.  Durant's work will, in a sense, place the eastern mind in the western man while reading through these pages, even if it is only for a moment.  This work sets the tone for the rest, so get to reading and enjoy the ride from here to the Age of Napoleon
Wonderful. A wonderful little gem of a story.  Intelligent and fun to read.  I recommend it for any historical fiction fan.
Two-part harmony.   A useful critical book. I am the author. I am unwilling to rate the book, but thought less than 5 stars would show a lack of self-confidence. The book is out as of 13 June, 1999  from Georgetown University Press
Moral Issues Abound. EXIT WOUNDS is J.A. Jance's tenth book in the Joanna Brady series and it seems as if she keeps getting better as she racks up the bestsellers.Cochise County Sheriff, Joanna Brady, is called to the scene of a gruesome murder.  Out in the desert, secluded from everyone, Carol Mossman enjoyed her seventeen dogs as her only companions.  She had lived a troubled life and didn't trust many people.  Someone was bent on killing Carol and it was Joanna Brady's job to find out who and why.The basic story line is enjoyable, but the subplots are what make the book interesting.  Seems Joanna Brady has just learned that she's pregnant and is battling morning sickness.  Added to this is the budget cuts which leaves the animal control department answering to the county sheriff - when the seventeen dogs perish along with their owner, animal rights activists begin protesting and voicing their outrage.  And we're given a glimpse as to the focus on the next book in the series:  it's reelection time and Brady is beginning her campaign against a former deputy.Character development is one of Jance's strong suits.  Lively individuals abound in this tale.  We have Carol's grandmother who is feisty and determined to help Joanna Brady find her granddaughter's killer.  Carol's two sisters are both unique and interesting.  And we have reoccurring roles from Tica Romero (the dispatcher), Gregovitch and Spike (the K-9 team), Frank Montoya (Joanna's right had man), and detectives Carbajal, Carpenter among others.  Of course Butch, Joanna's husband, has a major role but at times he came off surly.  I'm not sure that was Jance's intention, but non-the-less it was apparent that Butch is getting a bit tired of his wife's hectic schedule.  It should be interesting to see what he thinks as Joanna's pregnancy continues and her schedule doesn't slow down.Underlying moral issues abound in EXIT WOUNDS.  Carol Mossman was a hoarder - someone who takes in abandoned, abused, or unwanted dogs.  We find out that many hoarders have been the victims of abuse and this book focuses on the long-term affects of that abuse.  Without Jance's skill it could have been a depressing book dealing with so many issues that are hard to digest in large doses.  Instead we are given a story that will make one stop and take stock of the situation and realize that judging someone is not a good thing, but getting help for those that have these issues is a necessity.  Too many times, people as well as society turn their backs and just point fingers saying, "She has too many dogs."Another moral issue lightly touched upon is bigamists and the cults who exist to promote this behavior.  Jance doesn't delve into this topic but opens eyes to the fact that it does exist.Also, we're given a glimpse at the illegal immigration problems encountered in many southwestern states.  Coyotes smuggling undocumented aliens are often headline news when their vehicles crash, or they dump the UDA's in the desert and expect them to walk in the heat with no water.  Jance gives a personal touch to these stories that will make her fans take heart when they again hear one of these stories on the news.Overall the mystery portion is not rocket science and is easily understood, especially when the puzzle pieces start falling into place.  The moral issues will make you think long after the book is finished.  And the characters are like old friends, whom we can't wait to see again soon!  It's another winner for Jance.
Another Hit from Stross. As in his other books - ACCELERANDO, IRON SUNRISE and SINGULARITY SKY, this is a novel of post- Singularity, after the non-biological entity has become conscious and evolved with a terrifying speed into the Eschaton which is beyond human comprehension.In this tongue in cheek horror tale, Alan Turing completed his last theorem and a Turing machine was born.  Unfortunately this opened the gateway to a universe of awful creatures.  Battling this is our intrepid hero, Bob, and his sidekicks of computer geeks.  Indeed it reads like a funny MI6/noire/horror/sci-fi jack of all trades as the nerds save the world from certain doom.
Compelling and disturbing by turns. Despite the book's setting in the Middle East and the death of the victim by a terrorist bombing, the author has kept politics out of the story. In a sense this adds to the sense of horror, because all the reader is left with is how the characters struggle to find ways to overcome red tape to find a final resting place for a humble cleaning woman, a foreigner, who wasn't even Jewish. Characterizations are first-rate, and the succinct structure and brevity make palatable what might otherwise be an ordeal. Yehoshua is already winner of numerous awards in his own country, and it wouldn't surprise me if he is nominated for a Nobel someday.
Heirloom Ribbonwork is a WOW !!. Since I already had Helen's first book I eagerly awaited her new publication. When it arrived I looked through it page by page...not reading , just looking. Then I read the bold type and looked at projects...then read it from cover to cover. What a beautiful book ! Even if you don't know the first thing about fashioning ribbon flowers you will love to just browse through . The instructions are very clearly written and demonstrated. Thank you Helen for all your hard work in bring this book to all of us who love the beauty around us
Fast Shipper. I got the book within a week of order. The book arrived in great condition. It was a good experience, stress free
Does just what it promises -- 100 films, each worth renting. Top notch writing, excellent film selection (though, weirdly, no Costa Gavras or Kurasowa). Still, this book deserves a prominent place next to your Zagat's and on every video store's check-out counter. How come it's not there already
Last one first. I found this book on a supermarket book rack, read it and loved it.  It was the first J.P. Beaumont book I'd read, and as a result I'm now devouring the others, beginning with 'Until Proven Guilty'.  I'm now getting all of the background on Beau and Ron Peters and other characters.  When I've read them all, I'll reread 'Long Time Gone'. This is a great series of stories and I look forward to more J.P. Beaumont.Jance's style is fast paced and easy to read; I have no problem keeping the details straight.
Good, But... This is an excellent book which shows how young Christians of all stripes are returning to their theologically conservative roots.  I felt that the anecdotal comments from these "new faithful" were very enlightening, especially when they explain why they hold the theological views that they do.  My only disappointment, however, is that, while Carroll includes young persons from many points in the broader catholic tradition (be they Roman, Orthodox, or Anglican), she totally ignores Lutherans, even when introducing individuals who are Pentecostal and Baptist.  Are there none of these "new faithful" among the Lutherans?  Was she unable to find them?  Or has she given up on the Lutheran Church?  In any case, such a serious omission of a major Catholic communion is certainly lamentable, and results in a much lower rating than would have otherwise been deserved
Very Helpful Guide to Publishable Non-Fiction Writing. I really enjoyed this book and recommend it every chance I get. I took a non-fiction/memoir writing course a few years ago and went looking for a guide that bridges the content of such books with the process of publishing them. Look no further, this is it! The authors use their professional experience to effectively inform the reader how editors think about writing and proposals to publish  works of non-fiction. With this information in hand, it is truly possible to write one's book and create a project that has already progressed down the road to publication! I won't go on and on and try to describe the details, but suffice it to say that this book is definitely worth reading
Fantastic study of women's humor. I read this book after seeing the author speak at a local college. She was wonderful! This book totally met my expectations. It's not a collection of jokes, but it is uplifting. Regina Barreca also makes excellent points about the dynamics of power between men and women, in addition to how humor can either confirm or alter these dynamics. I would recommend this to anyone interested in feminism and/or humor
TRUTHFUL, HONEST &amp; TEARFUL. I, too, am adopted, so I read this book with great interest.  Green's story is similar to mine so I was very engrossed in finding out what happened in his search.  I welled-up with tears in many sections of the  book reliving my thoughts, reunions and fears.  Very personal story, but  very personably written.  A must for all who are adopted! You will  understand, and have compassion for, many of Green's emotions
A Filial Memoir. From what I've read about Chinese culture, the ties that bind a family together are one of its strongest and most enforced traditions.  "Bound Feet and Western Dress" is an interesting memoir for the fact that it does not read like a memoir at all.  It is the story of a great-aunt told to her great-niece, who mixes in her own observations about her aunt's life and her experience as a Chinese-American among her narrative."Bound Feet and Western Dress" tells the story of the author's great-aunt, Chang Yu-i.  Born in 1900, Yu-i was the first woman in her family to refuse to have her feet bound.  Despite being modern in this aspect, she is stunted and traditional in her upbringing, her education, and the way she acts in her first marriage.  She is famous for having perhaps the first "modern" divorce in China and is determined to make it on her own from that point on.  No one in her family truly knows her story until her great-niece asks her to tell it.What passes between the two of them may not be a ground-breaking, fascinating story but is rather a quiet reflection on growing up in a changing time.  Yu-i struggles through a great majority of her life to be both modern and traditional, to do what is 'right and expected' and to do what she wanted to do.  She is an inspiration to her great-niece, a first generation Chinese-American who feels at home with neither nationality.  The intersections of the author's remembrances of past encumbrances fit nicely with Yu-i's struggle to bridge the past with the new.  "Bound Feet and Western Dress" offers a poignant look at the role that women have played in China and how they are defining themselves today
Delicious meals. This book is great! It gives a shopping guide with specific brand names to choose while shopping and pages of recipes. I've tried alot of the meals and they are all delicious.
Complex and involving. This is one of a series of books which features Dr.Alex Delaware, a young, handsome and wealthy psychologist. At a rather ritzy party, he meets Sharon, an incredibly beautiful young psychologist with whom he had a brief fling some years previously. Drawn to her despite many misgivings, he is caught up in a web of lies, deceit and intrigue which culminate in several gruesome murders. The plot involves a now deceased but sinister mega millionaire who is a direct copy of Howard Hughes, complete with matted beard, long, filthy fingernails and all of his unattractive anal retention habits. The story becomes more and more involved, using identical triplet sisters, mentally retarded carers and a Svengali like therapist who controls Sharon. At times I was muttering"hurry up and get on with it" but, in all, an entertaining read
Incredible series. This comic series is a brillant, fun, mind-bending, though-provoking series unlike anything I've ever seen or read before in any medium. The visual story telling of the comic medium is absolutely perfect for this story. The multiple story arcs are fascinating.If you're not reading this series already, run, don't walk to the store or the Amazon checkout page to start this series. You WILL NOT be disappointed. I've read the books cover to cover twice since getting them a month ago, and have already read the comics (that I pick up every month like clockwork) start to finish no less than 5 times.Great great stuff
A MUST HAVE!. Our organization gives this book out in one of our classes that teaches newly promoted or new to the company supervisors how we lead teams.  We have a corporate culture where recognition is one of the key principles.  This book definitely adds value and insight
Learn, Display and Teach Conflict Resolution. As a future teacher, I really found this book to be very useful.  The book is very practical, not only will I be able to apply it when I begin teaching, but I am already using it in my own life.  Children, especially  must be taught to resolve conflict.  When I begin teaching I want not only  be able to teach my students conflict resolution, but I want to example it  in my own life.  This book gave me many great ideas, lessons, and tools on  how to incorporate and encourage conflict resolution on a continual basis
The spy business is a rotten apple. To write a long trilogy on the very last months of the DDR from the point of view of the British Secret Services in 1994 is  nearly  anachronic. So the author chose a completely different approach than a simple spy story. It is a real novel with real and thick characters who do have a social existence and a cultural density. The  action  is slower of course. And the object of the novel is not to show us one more of those unbeatable James Bond. The object of the novel is to explore the human and unhuman, definitely unhumane, functioning of London Central. Incredible conflicts between field-agents and bureaucrats, the severe hierarchization of these bureaucrats in the number of square meters of office space they get, with or without a window, with carpet or linoleum on the floor, etc. This constant inside strife is the main characteristic of London Central. The plot of the book will peter out because field agents have no say, and bureaucrats forget essential elements. The bureaucrats dream theories that bite the dust when implemented, at times with casualties, and yet they will survive with essentially two methods. 1- They will put the blame on their underlings (and there is condescendence in this attitude) ; 2- They will cover up the failure with a false explanation that will make a KGB or Stasi agent become a sniper in London and use an American weapon and all the night equipment necessary. They will of course try to cover up the nature of the weapon. For that reason the book is interesting. We are under the surveillance and control - constant control - of secret services who are the most conflictual pot of spiders in the world. We don't know them. We have to trust them. And we may find ourselves under crossfire. Bad luck and that has not changed since the end of the Cold War, far from it. The advantage of this system was that it more or less shortcircuited terrorism. Nowadays we still have the conflictual antagonistic secret services plus the various terrorist organizations that provide some discontents with the possibility to express their anger at, or their ambition in, their society and world that are the cause of their discontentment.Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, Universit Paris Dauphine, Universit Paris I Panthon Sorbonne
Church:Why Bother?. I thought it was well written and thought provoking. Attending church and Bible Study have become an important part of my daily life. I really enjoy Philip Yancy's writing style and think he has a good sense of what are the important issues that are facing Christians today in our society.
Bridge to the Sun. This is the touching true story of an American woman who gets deported with her Japanese husband and their daughter to Japan after the attack on Pearl Harbor. I enjoyed this story because it gave a very human account of  the tragic time in which the story is set and the very good and kind people  on both sides of the Pacific during those terrible years.  It is also the  story of two people's love and devotion to eachother which overcomes the  difference in culture and race. I recommend it. I saw the movie which was  loosely based on this story many years ago but have been unable to find a  copy
Intelligent examination of the overlooked role of violence. Though this book does not have the same power over me as On Revolution had, On Violence is still a very well written, witty and insightful look at the power structures most prevalent in the early 1970's. Arendt makes the  intelligent claim that those with power that are losing that power will hit  a point where they only see violence as a means to maintain the current  power distribution, but that violence will actually cause a loss of power.  The book can be read in a day (and should), but this book needs to be read  3 or 4 times to catch all of the subtle points Arendt throws in  unannounced. The main criticism I have of this book is its failure at  points to demonstrate the relavence of her arguments, which I find she does  incredibly well in her other books. Not a must buy, but if you have the  option, take it
Reviews by Nan Kilar and Bobby Miller. The prince of fire is back in this intriguing story from Daniel Silva. Gabriel Allon is living in Venice, doing his art restoration work, and planning to marry the beautiful Chiara. His old friend and mentor from the Israeli secret service, Ari Shamron, recruits him once again to do a job for the Office--investigate the bombing of the Israeli embassy in Rome. Gabriel reluctantly agrees to return to Israel and be re-employed by the Office. Gabriel and his team soon learn the guy behind the bombing is the son and grandson of two notorious Arab terrorists. Khaled was allegedly taken in by Yassir Arafat when his father was murdered and is now believed to be carrying on the family's tradition of terror. Gabriel sets out to find Khaled and, of course, runs into major troubles.The story is involved and I won't go into any great details here or spoil it for you. It's a somewhat sad, somewhat happy time for Gabriel and we may read more about him in the future. Suffice it to say, this is a great story and good history lesson (much of it is based on fact). Don't miss this one! Especially if you've read the previous Allon stories
So, so, so FUNNY underdog humor-mean and loving at once-how DOES he do it. There is much love in his writing.  Even when his characters are disdaining others, there is love.  It's refreshing that a writer who has such a sharp merciless eye could also be so loving towards his subjects.  It's quite a feat.  Most people do one or the other but not both at the same time
Resource for building environmentally safe. The book is a timely release as more and more building professionals are revaluating their approach to building for a safer environment. The life cycle costs are becoming a part of the planning process and the savings of our energy resources is a plus. The book reinforces the issues and gives ideas on how to sell the concept to clients. Agencies looking to adopt new standards could benefit from this book
Cross-cultural Herbal Guide. Indian Herbalogy of North America by Alma R. Hutchens is a helpful reference book for those desiring a greater understanding of cross-cultural applications of herbs.  The title is somewhat misleading because though there is an emphasis on Native American herbalism there is also a great deal of information regarding Russian herbology and folklore
Left behind series picks up again after a lull. Courtesy of CK2S Kwips and KritiquesNicolae Carpathia continues his reign of terror over the world, destroying any who dare to oppose him. Followers of Carpathianism suffer one indignity after another with their water supply being turned to blood and their bodies breaking out in hideous boils and sores.Angels of God appear to believers all over the world to encourage them and keep their faith strong. The tribulation Force continues to resist Carpathia as they prepare for what is expected to come... the ultimate desecration of the Church by the false god.This story started to pick up again after the two previous books failed to keep this reviewer's interest, who was glad to discover that continued determination to read the whole series was worth it. There are more examples in this installment of what attracted millions to the Left Behind series.Characters continue along the lines drawn for them by their personalities, with readers taking pleasure in experiencing the continued adventures along with the Trib Force and Tsion Ben Judah. However, be forewarned, the culmination of certain characters' individual stories will make readers sit up and shout "What the heck was that?" or "THAT is what happens to them?"The story continues with plenty of adventure for the players and the natural progression of their faith... or lack thereof. Desecration will captivate readers enough to make them hold on to find out what will happen next.? Kelley A. Hartsell, January 2006. All rights reserved
Charming audio, but probably better in text. I recently heard the audio book for this title. The story was pleasant enough, even Charming, if you will. You can see the publishing information on the story itself.My biggest complaint about the audio book was that the voice actress didn't make the characters seem very appealing. She was a good actress to be sure, but Taylor came off as a quivering ninny, and Lucas, though admitedly a mountain man character, came off sounding like a stupid hick. I applaud the actress's deft handling of the accents, but it made the characters seem very annoying.Not a bad piece, but it could have been better
Good Intentions. Bullard, et al. have good intentions in that they want to correct environmental injustice and racism.  However, sometimes they are too quick to call racism or get bogged down in statistics.  My favorite chapter was the one on the Vieques people of Puerto Rico.  If anything, I learned a lot about world politics
An excellent tale of clashing cultures. John Donohue's Deshi is an excellent tale of clashing cultures, an exquisitely flavored and nuanced mystery featuring college professor/martial arts expert Connor Burke, a character whose background mirrors the author's own.As in Donohue's first book, Sensei, Burke is asked by the New York City police to help them investigate a difficult case. This time it's the murder of a Japanese-American whose death seems to have something to do with a missing inka, a traditional Japanese scroll indicating accomplishment or enlightenment.At the behest of his sensei (teacher), Burke also becomes involved with a lama who has fled oppression in his native Tibet but is still in danger. Is it possible that the two cases are related?Although the publisher of Deshi (Japanese for student) bills the novel as a "martial arts thriller," it is much more than that. True, it has its share of action and suspense, but Donohue's story is also one of insight and reflection, written by an author who understands the dichotomy between East and West and uses that knowledge to flavor his already compelling prose
Fitness over Fifty:An Exercise Guide from the National Institute on Aging. The information and exercises displayed in the book are very practical and easy to follow.  They are safe for beginners and the photographs help to motivate the individual.  However, a 51 year old person may be put off by the book as most of the people in the pictures look 70 or more years old.  There are young 50 years olds out here...the book would be more appealing if a few younger faces were included.   Thank
Spare the Rod!. It's been said 'Spare the Rod, Spoil the child' these days with the new Gen kids! Sorry, not very true but no Spanking! Playing pranks and making mischief as a child is really tons of fun but every kid needs a code of conduct - a Discipline to adopt behavior patterns and possess self control. Children need to be taught to pause and think of the consequences that may result from their various behaviors. It is critical for educators to model self discipline. Younger children tend to throw tantrums, be rigid, stubborn, have sibling rivalry, be possessive, etc and these are the trial times for the parent to tackle firm where situations demand disciplinary action. In this book, instead of spanking,the authors effectively provide measures to cope up in situations when its hard to draw the line with their loving kids. The flash card approach is a plus point. Verbal spanking is an option to spank the kid. Words said in loving way, clear and firm voice would have its effect than abusing word war. The book says all about practical suggestions to adopt and check those flaws in kids for their own good without spanking the child. By controlling own words and actions, parents demonstrate to their kids, a healthy way to react to stress. A good pick for young parents, should say
Face the Fire. Nora Roberts once more hits 10 stars with this trilogy.  If you love Roberts, this is one of her finest
Perfect, really, only one suggestion for someone out there!. Perfect, only it would be great to see more of these kind of calendars so that one could find, for instance, a Catholic Family Organizer Calendar:  One that would list the Saints for the Day.  This calendar is needed by us, in order to put the activities of various members of our home, and, my mother is an oil painter.  It works very well, for my parents who are in their late 80's.  We have the 2005 calendar, and I intend on purchasing the 2006.  My parents can use a magic marker for their appointments, and they never miss these appointments.  We hang it in a convenient place, near the phone and their morning activity in the kitchen.  (BTW, Our Parish bulletin is nearby ... on the refrigerator.
Well Written. Extremely well researched and written "Triangle" is the story of the 1911 fire at the Triangle Shirtwaist Factor that killed 146 workers, most of them young women. David von Drehle not only writes about the fire, but the events leading up to the fire, including a prolonged strike by garment workers in 1909. The conditions the workers had to deal with are also described as well as the incredibly long work week (100 hours) for low wages which the owners tried to make even lower whenever they could. Von Drehle describes in great detail the fire, the workers attempts to escape the fire and the efforts of people both inside and outside the factory that struggled to save the victims. He also describes the aftermath of the fire and covers the owner's trial and whether or not they were convicted on any charges. Finally, he includes the first complete list of the fire victims and how they died.I've wanted to learn more about the Triangle factory fire since I saw a TV movie about it in the late `70's. This book was very informative. The history parts were interesting and helped set the picture of what life was like at the time of the fire. The parts about the fire were hard to read at times not only because of the depictions of the victims dying but the memories it arose of September 11th as some victims were forced to jump from the ninth floor windows to escape the flames. The aftermath of the fire was also interesting, including what happened at the trial of the two owners of the Triangle. The list of the names of most of the victims (six were never identified) was compelling and makes readers realize the victims were mostly young women with the rest of their lives ahead of them. The list of victims is a perfect example of how well researched the entire book is - their names (and the various names misreported in the papers), ages, how they died, and who identified the bodies is listed.Because of the subject matter, "Triangle" is at times a difficult read, but well worth it.
A Great Read!. This book is informative, amusing and easy to read. I enjoyed it very much
Such An Important Work. As someone who does grassroots community work, I found this book to be amazingly helpful and absolutely invaluable.  The book articulates so much of that which I see every day, but was unable to articulate.  Although much of Freire's work involved working with illiterate adults, the principles outlined here are applicable to anyone and everyone who is or who is concerned with ending oppression.  I think any educator, social worker, organizer...well, really almost anyone who is interested in ending injustice should read this
A Favorite for Pre-Schoolers: In the "Jamberry" tradition. Engaging art work, rhythmic sounds, and a strong beat make this a winner in the pre-schooler crowd.  The style is comparable to "Jamberry" or perhaps even "Chicka Chicka Boom Boom", a chance for your child to delve into interesting sounds and rhythms as they become aware of the richness of their language.  Yes, it's kind of silly
Our Daughter is living proof this works. This book is great and the technique really works. I saw this book on a talk show and decided to try it with my 8 month old. She caught on very quickly and soon we were both coming up with new signs. We also would teach our Daycare provider the new signe we learned and soon all the babie in the nursery were modeling her. One day one of the parents of another child asked the daycare provider if she knew what thier daughter was doing when she pointed to the middle of her palm, the classic sign for more. When they realized she had picked this up from my daughter everyone was amazed.I believe 2 things happened by using Baby Signs. 1. My baby/toddler was happier becuase we could acurately determine what her needs were as well as communicate about the world around her. 2. she was far advanced verbally to children her own age. When she started talking it was almost in complete sentances. This is discussed in the book as a byproduct of the technique. I give this book to every expectant Mother I know along with "What to expect when you're expecting"
Particle Physisists Made Accessible. As someone who barely made it through high school physics, I approached this book with some trepidation, but much like Sagan, Gleick gives understandable insight into the issues during the development of particle physics.  Feynman's genius shows itself for a much longer period of his life than most physicists whose major contributions occur early in their careers.  Feynman's passion for real solutions to real problems is made clear in dozens of anecdotes in the book.  Three cheers and five stars for Gleick and Feynman.  One marvels at both while reading this book.  Insightful and incredible
Excllent resource. This book is a must if you are an ambituos DYI'r installing a hyrdronic heating system in your home.  The book is a text book used for educating HVAC people and engineers.  It covers everything that you could possibly need to know about this type of heating.I definitly would not have attempted to install the system without understanding all the variables in designing an efficient and balanced hydronic system.  The free information on the web doesn't cut it in my opinion.
A wonderful eggy book!. Animals that lay eggs: a simple subject but a vital biology lesson for young and old alike. Beautiful illustrations drive the point clearly and allows a great deal of discussion to flow from each page. Go learn...this is a wonderful way to approach science
Great Book. This book is helping me and my son to conquer the obstacles that are set in his way. This book is helping him to follow his dreams and have fun playing the sports that he loves.  It is helping me with my role as a parent of an athletic child. I am so glad for the publication of this book. I could have used it 5 years ago.  At times things can get very difficult; that is why we need this book to help us through our problems. The book should be mandatory for every person involved in the development of an athletic child.
The only &quot;addition&quot; that is actually healthy!. And that would be reading as many &quot;Star Trek&quot; related books as possible as well as other sci-fi works! Even though I grew up with the Original Series Star Trek, I also came to love TNG as well and, later, VOYAGER and ENTERPRISE. Being an avid fan of sci-fi in general, however, it would be an injustice on my part not to mention the many other old and new sci-fi works that both led me to Star Trek and which have forever forged my love for all sci-fi works: &quot;Stranger in a Strange Land&quot;, &quot;Puppet Masters&quot;, &quot;Foundation&quot;, &quot;2001&quot;, &quot;2010&quot;, &quot;Rendezvous with Rama&quot;, &quot;Ringworld&quot;, all the &quot;Star Trek&quot; and &quot;Star Wars&quot; books, as well as books as new to the genre as &quot;Advent of the Corps&quot; and others
The title says it all. The numerous apoplectic comments posted for this book have successfully proven the author's point:George W. Bush has indeed driven the liberals insane
Authentic Brazilian Healers. I read this book in 1977 during a trip to the US. As I see the book here and I read some superficial opinions coming from Randi's admirers(!), I feel compelled to comment. Arigo was a well known healer in Brazil, his healing work through surgery, allways free of charge, went on for many years, hundreds of people a day, till he died in a car accident in 1971. John Fuller's book, writen after his visit to Brazil with Dr. Andrija Puharich to meet, talk to Arigo and see personally what was happening around that healer work is  a very good piece of research, well documented. Anyone who is interested in phenomena that shows facts that science is far from explaining, will get a precious source of information from John Fuller's book. Even though skepticism comes about when we face cases like Arigo, there is an unending source of documentation about his life and the authenticity of his work. Scientists, politicians, wealthy people as well hundreds of thousands of simple people were operated by him. Superficial opinions from anyone who hasn't a clue about what they are talking will not invalidate cases so extensively proven true like Arigo. John G. Fuller's book is more than worth reading. Healers like Arigo exist, spread all over Brazil, anyone with time, will and interest can do what Mr. Fuller did so well, research and write about them
Rocket Mom. Carolina Fernandez has a passion - to get you jump-started as a Rocket Mom. &quot;Rocket Mom&quot; is filled with creative ideas for raising well-rounded children and organizing your life from A to Z.  Carolina tells you how her seven strategies have worked in her family life.  She shares her passion with you and shows you how to use them in your family so you can 'blast off.'  A fun and informative read.  A good one to pick up while waiting in carpool lines, or one that can be thoroughly enjoyed in a two hour block of time.  Highly recommended!
plenty of information but not for the jargon-shy reader. some facts: dimensions 1.57 x 11.22 x 8.82 inch actually, printed on  acid-free paper and made to last, containing 275 articles averaging to 3  pages per article, typically 1 to 4 pages. Apart from the normal table of  contents there is a.o. a thematic t.o.c. and a glossary with definitions of  600 specialized terms for the benefit of the general reader. Every article  has an extensive reference section to facilitate further reading on the  subject. The articles themselves are rather scientific, if you can hack  this sentence from page 1 ''... both taxa share maxillae with subvertical  ascending rami and cervical vertebrae with hypertrophied epipophyses ...''  then this book is for you. Every 'difficult' word is contained in the  glossary, but that still doesn't make it good bedtime reading, even more so  because I do not find the book heavily illustrated. The illustrations are  mostly b&amp;w drawings, diagrams or photographs, with only a few pages of  full color photographs or art-work, I estimate that more than half of the  pages have no illustration at all
Positive Magic, Marion Weinstein. Marvelous book for anyone interested in the Old Path.  Helps one build a solid foundation in their journey
I would start with another Willis if you have not yet read her. Lincolns Dreams was interesting. I have come to a conclusion about Connie Willis that might not make sense to you if you have not yet come to appreciate books on tape. I have now read pretty much every work that Willis has published. Every book that I have read has been a little dry, a little slow, and the plot just sludge's forwards at a creeping pace. I have found it very difficult to actually enjoy the nuance Willis employs through her characters. The main thing is that I am constantly attempting to hurry through to push the plot along, which is not really what a Willis book is about. More than any other author I have noticed, Willis is the perfect author to read slowly and succinctly in a spoken out loud manner. By treating her this way you will be rewarded with some of the best subtle character interactions around. So if you find yourself frustrated by Willis when your holding one of her books in your hands, before you give up on her you might want to find her on tape first.Sadly, I don't think that Lincoln's Dreams is on tape. Its not her best work anyways. I would totally start with `To Say Nothing of the Dog.' This is an amazing experience. Even if you have read the book before, you will get a lot of new insight into a complicated tale by taking this advice. Her other works on tape are a short story collection and `Doomsday Book.' Try these and you wont be disappointed.To get `To Say Nothing...' on tape, try your library. I bet they wont have a copy, but they can still get it for you at most likely no or a minimal charge through an interlibrary loan program. Ask them at the desk about this and someone will help you out if you haven't done this before. Its easy. And if you enjoy the experience of `To Say Nothing...' half as much as I did, you will be hooked on the medium.Dang, I haven't even really talked about `Lincoln's Dreams' yet. It's sort of confusing, the story line gets a little muddled at the end. I re-read the last couple of chapters to see if I missed something, but I don't think that I did. It kind of reminded me of Murakami's`Wind up Bird Chronicle's' ending, a book that was equally confusing in its conclusion. You will totally see signs of Willis' future genius in this book.
The Song of the Flowers. While The Black Tulip lacks the swashbuckling, derring-do adventures of the other Dumas novels I have read, it is every bit as enjoyable to read.Beginning with the arrest of two brothers, deemed traitors to the throne, Dumas Holland-based story at least begins with as strong a conflict as his other more action-laced novels. But the story, while shifting focus to the Godson of one of the men arrested, concerns his passion and pursuit of the highly coveted black tulip, a strain of Holland's most popular horticultural export. Cornelius van Baerle, a man of comfortable means, is little concerned with his wealth, or with position; or at all suspicious of the papers left in his care by his Godfather prior to his arrest.  M. van Baerle has but one pursuit, one goal, and one dream...to produce a flawless, rare black tulip.Thus his downfall, as an avaricious neighbor,Isaac Boxtel, shares this dream, but for entirely different reasons. While Cornelius van Baerle cares not for the riches and fame associated with growing such a flower, Boxtel covets both and plots to eliminate his competition and abscond with the delicate blossom which will net him one hundred thousand florins, more than enough to live like the King himself.M. van Baerle is, therefore, convicted of treason when Boxtel reveals the existence of the papers of va Baerle's godfather to the authorities, and M. van Baerle finds himself on the wrong side of prison bars.However, the appearance of an unexpected love awakens passions in Cornelius to rival those he feels for the black tulip, and ignites a desire in him to share the possible wealth associated with the flower, simply to assure it's development and care.Thus, the race is on to plant, grow, and deliver the black tulip to the Horticultural Society.Dumas' writing skills are in fine form with this shorter novel, sparing none of the humor, grace, and elegance of other works of his I have indulged in. And while foils are left in scabbards, no plots to overthrow a corrupt Cardinal materialize, and revenge is not sought against the bad-guys...this novel is every bit as exciting.A fine way to experience one of France's most prolific historical authors for the first time, or to further explore his catalogue of works
Some useful info and an easy read. A sense of humor and sarcasm guaranteed to make you cringe, a very limited set of cases (mainly IT), examples and industry references and too many mentions of Bill Gates are the bad points of this book, but all in all I found it useful. A sort of business and entrepreneurship for dummies guide. Highly recommended starting point for those want to become business people but know that their knowledge of business basics is lacking. Perhaps not so useful for people not in this position. Sections on compounding and cashflow stick as two of the more useful
An Important Piece of Literature !. As an educator I highly recommend this book to young and old alike. The main characters Casper and Brendan face incredible odds in their relationship and how they deal with those odds will not cease to amaze the reader. Mr. Roeder has given us a love story that at times is difficult to handle,(I had to put the book down several times and catch my breath), and yet so believable. Gay and straight youth and adults alike would benefit from this story that touches upon some very important issues.This is my first read from this author, I now want to read the other books in this series entitled "Gay Youth Chronicles" and I will. A definite five star read! Thank you Mr. Roeder for your wonderful story, your insight, and your ability to create such heart-warming characters. I look forward to reading all of your past and future work.
An EXCELLENT book all the way !!. Mr. Katz is an AMAZING author.  Wonderfully well written.  A hilarious look at the life and actions of a dog with "issues".  Proof that with an informed, caring owner can help a canine with issues become a wonderful companion. I read this book last fall, then proceeded to purchase a copy for every dog lover on my Christmas list.  I have since purchased every book written by Jon Katz. I look forward to more books by this author.
Great for the "Boomerang Generation". Brosnon looks deep into peeople's personal experiences to find out how and why they chose their particular lines of work.  This book certainly caters to a white-collar crowd.  That, however, does not make it bad.  For all the kids who are currently moving back home after college, this book is a great read to show them that there are many people in their situation and that they are not alone.
Solutions manual. The book is excellent....is there a solutions manual, it would be nice to be able to compare answers
A Leap of Faith. Danielle Steel writes another interesting novel about a young girl named Marie-Ange who grew up in a beautiful Chateau in France. She is wealthy and well loved, but when tragedy strikes her family, she is orphaned and is forced to go to America to be raised by a stingy old great aunt. She is treated poorly and receives little love in her new life. She finds friendship and hope from a local boy named Billy. The two become close, but one day Marie-Ange leaves Billy to go back to France. She is desperate to return to her beloved Chateau de Marmouton. While there she meets a new man named Comte Bernard de Beauchamp. The two fall in love, yet many struggles are ahead. Billy warns her that her life is too good to be true... and maybe it is
Very good book for those who (are about to) start knitting. Maggie Righetti has a chatty way of explaining things which will make even those of us who do not like instruction books very much (I love them, by the way) keep on reading. Her instructions are clear and practical. The drawings look a bit hard to understand ('what am I supposed to do here?'), but the accompanying text explains it all.Her warnings on how to spot weaknesses (and major flaws) in knitted garments by the way the model is posing are good advice (I learned this the hard way).She covers all kinds of problems that most books on knitting won't tell you about.What more can I say? It is an excellent book. Buy it!P.S. For those who have serious difficulties with interpreting 'how-to' drawings and pictures in knitting books: there is a whole series of Vogue books on knitting, available from Amazon.com. I bought the one on 'knitting and felting' and I was simply stunned by the clarity of its drawings. I didn't even need text to understand what was meant. Every small step was drawn very clearly.
HOLLYWOOD. First of all let me state unequivically, I love Architectual Digest, and this book is a dream for those of us who do.  The houses vary, some are opulent, some are modest, most are in between.  You get a feel for the real person behind the star fascade and because Architectural Digest has been in circulation for so long, some of old guard Hollywood is on display here as well as the more current stars.  It's interesting to see the juxisposition of the era's.  Highly recommended to anyone with any interest in this subject
A Refreshing Story!. Companions of the Night by Vivan Vande Velde is a refreshing vampire story from the typical vampire genre today. Although it still is, of course, a romance, and the two protagonists (sort of) end up liking the other one very much, the vampire character Ethan seems much more mysterious than regular vampire characters and you can never really guess who he is and what he's going to do, which only adds to the suspense and excitement.The love interest also isn't typical as well, as you can see strength from her. In the end, she does something very hard but courageous which leaves Ethan quiet, and she honestly deserves enough respect as any other human girl should ever deserve.Also, the storyline is something different. It begins when Kerry, the girl, ends up in the laundry place all tied up with a strange group of men holding a handsome boy hostage. As they escape, she learns he's a vampire but her involvement in his escape leads the group to kidnap her family and put them in danger, and thus, they band up for unknown reasons (until the end) to find her missing father and brother. Throughout the story, motives of Ethan's helpful nature is questionable and Kerry is constantly left in the dark about him and what he really knows about this whole kidnapping issue.This time, though you're honestly confused whose the good guy and whose the bad guy. Should Ethan be trusted? Why does he act this way? Who should our main character side with, the vampire or this other character whose sworn to kill all vampires? Additionally, the paragraph size and simple vocabulary makes this book a breeze to read.Honestly, buy it. You'd be doing yourself a creepily good favor.
Clear and to the Point, Simply Superb!. I wish I would have had Professor Blum for all my law school classes. This hornbook earned me an A in Contracts my second semester -- imagine if I had discovered it earlier. Blum's writing is so clear and so articulate, it's as though he's attuned to your particular learning style.Especially good for the trickier material, such as Parol Evidence, Battle of the Forms, and Remedies!  Just killer stuff really
Good book, used it to help write a graduate paper. I needed a book that had paranthetical references, and this book had quite a few. Would have loved it if there were more though. This is actually a very good book. It teaches practical common sense, mixed with historical overviews of international trade practices, forwarding laws, promotion and marketing plans, advertising strategies. It is a very good book that will provide a breadth of knowledge for the enterprising importer-exporter. I would recommended it for both business and academic purposes, although if you are looking for more academic reference-based books in this area, you should also consult academic publishing companies that focus more on referenced materials. Overall, very informative book
Superb Biography of a Dominant 19th Century Industrialist and Philanthropist. The best biography of a 19th century industrialist I have read since the Titan by Chernow almost 10 years ago.  A multi- dimensional view into his business raltionships with his right hand man Frick and also his personality problems with his men and also john D. Rockefeller.  Krass brings to light Carnegie's love and dislikes and explores his undying love for his birthplace in Scotland.  This biography gives you excellent balance so you will not ask any more questions once you complete it.  Carnegie although the leading Philathropist of the 19th and early 20th century was a demon of a businessman you only cared about his name and not the thousands of factory workers he indirectly killed with overwork and underpay.  Next time if i go to Carnegie Hall I will now look at it in a much poorer light knowing the monies to build it came from the blood of thousands
Superb guide for Southerners who love herbs. This book goes well beyond the typical growing tips of most gardening guides. It fosters an appreciation and joy for herbs: both their growth and their culinary applications. While growing herbs is a rather simple endeavor, there is so much involved in coaxing out their subtle flavors and properties in the garden, especially when dealing with the crusty caliche in South Central Texas. From using herbs as delightful landscape enhancements to their preparation in the kitchen, this book has something for anyone with an interest and a little time
John Carter of Mars - volume 2 - Warlord of Mars & Thuvia, Maid of Mars. Great reprint of this great classic science fiction / fantasy series.  Much appreciated.  Looking forward to purchasing the remainder of the series when they are published
They really are beautiful!. The cover is misleading, but I, for one wasn't disappointed by the contents: paintings and sculpture, mostly, with a smattering of photos.In the case of *this* book, one might read the text out of curiosity, but if you choose to, beware; Ms. Greer, as has been mentioned, likes to 'court controversy'.  It may offend.Politics aside, this is a gorgeous book for anyone who loves to look at boys.  Adorable little boys with rosy cheeks, bigger boys just starting to mature, teenage boys in the gorgeous bloom of youth, and older boys on the verge of manhood.  It is the *images* that are of the greatest value here.  Not a bald head in sight.  This book shows males in all their beauty (yes, beauty) and glory; a rare occurrence, yet a thing that has been done innumerable times in the case of women.  Buy this gem of a collection and let them shine for you!
21 and I still use it. I got this many years ago, and used it a lot. Somewhere in between now and then I lost it. I was going a trip that would require me sitting on an airplane and in the airport for a grand total of 11 hours. I bought this book. It not only kept me, but the 11 other college agepeople I was with entertained. We read each others palms and I was busy on the red-eye and not bothering people, quit the big feat for me. In addition a friend and I went on a week long car trip. We palyed many of the car games, found 42 state liscense plates (and 3 provinces), it kept us from attacking each other after four days in a car. I totally recomend this for anyone going on a trip of any length, regardless of the age
A must for music lovers and VG fans... This screenplay is absolutly wonderful.  The movie is one of the greatest ever made.  The writing is some of the best in film.  It truly helps you get into the movie.  It gives a hint into the creative mind of T.H
Patching solutions for Fedora, Debian and other distributions, covering all kinds of tools and applications. Michael Jang's Linus Patch Management: Keeping Linux Systems Up To Date provides Linux users with complete patches for all kinds of environments: a feature Linux administrators will find essential. Here are patching solutions for Fedora, Debian and other distributions, covering all kinds of tools and applications. Whether you're updating networks and configuring clients or working with apt commands, if you're a Linux administrator, you must have this patch reference on hand.
Lyrical. I really enjoyed Greer's most recent novel, The Confessions of Max Tivoli, so I thought I'd pick this previous collection of writings after the fact.Some of the stories, in my opinion, hit me deep inside. I felt like many of the characters and Greer did a nice job of putting me into the perspective. Other stories, however, were simply confusing and over-worded.Overall, a wonderful read. I truly wish there were more stories. Oh well...on to Path of Minor Planets, I guess...
Lifesaver. This book helps fill in the empty spaces that people, and their families face before, durring, and after treatment.  It is a GOOD book to keep handy for reference.  I found in my own personal recovery this book, the Big Book, and the Twelve and Twelve of Great importance to my sobority
Understanding this book. I read this book in college.  Some previous reader had underlined every appearance of the word &quot;understand&quot; - and for once I was grateful.  I suggest you try that too
The only golf book you will need. I bought 4 highly rated books on the swing from Amazon and after reading the first 3, I could not even hit the ball.  I had so much crap running through my head; too many conflicting ideas and things to remember.  Each book has validity, but nothing was connecting the whole thing for me.  I just quit practicing that day and took a breather.  I took out the 4th book that night and slowly started into it.  I immediately connected with the material and incredible pictures in the book.  I carefully worked on the grip, then my basic stance and posture over the ball.  Next day, I hit most of my  practice balls well and everything feels good.  I am still working my way carefully through the other laws.  I want to really get one down before working too much on the next, but I am confinced that this book is the only book anyone needs to improve at this game.  Everthing this book teaches feels very natural.  Practicing and really honing what I am learning in this book will take some time, but this will be the ONLY book I use from now on
Across the Known Galaxy. To be sold as a slave must be the most humiliating experience that a self-aware being can face, and Thorby is sold on the auction block to a beggar by the name of Baslim.  Baslim has barely purchased Thorby when Thorby attempts to escape.  Fortunately for Thorby, Thorby does not escape.  Being purchased by Baslim turns out to be the best thing that could have happened to Thorby.Baslim is more than he appears to be.  Though Thorby questions little about Baslim, whom he calls Pop, Thorby learns over time that Baslim has deep secrets that he has never revealed to Thorby, secrets that he will take to the grave.Thorby is forced to leave the home Baslim has made for him and journey into the galaxy, chased by people for reasons he does not fully understand.  But Thorby will learn that there are many kinds of families in the galaxy, with varying degrees of sincerity and complexity.  Thorby will ultimately try to claim the heritage that is rightfully his as a citizen of the galaxy.Heinlein was called the Dean of Science Fiction because he mastered the art of telling a story simply and easily, as though he were talking about a trip to the grocery store.  Heinlein created this wonderful masterpiece in 1957, one of a string of books that drew many people into reading science fiction in the 50's and 60's, me included.  Though this novel is slightly dated, it holds up reasonably well.  Some portions may be more conceivable and believable today than when Heinlein first published the novel, as technology has made strides in some of the directions suggested in the novel.This book is a classic that will intrigue fans of hard science fiction that enjoy a solid and interesting story.  The characters are well formed and believable, and Thorby is such a powerful individual that most readers will like him instantly, with all his faults.  This book is a good read time and again, and one that many readers will want for their personal library.Enjoy!
rosa. I really like this book because it is a romance book and i love all romance books. I really like books that are writen in the old ages. I think if a person likes to just read books they should read Romance of the Rose
Lectures. This is a collection of lectures given at the LSE.  So DON'T think it is a history.  Nevertheless, it is a comprehensive journey from aristotle's economica thru the modern era.  Good as a reference.  Not bad as a read -- but be aware you are reading a transcribed lecture and adjust your expectations accordingly
Awesome series!. First in the Emerald O'Brian Chintz n China Mysteries and it grabs you from the beginning.  If you like a little fright with your mystery, you will love this series. This book got me hooked and made me crave more Emerald adventures and a nice hot cup of tea
help for couples needing a guide for married life. Harville Hendricks has written an excellent book that gives couples necessary information that will strengthen their knowledge of themselves and ways to improve their marriage. It's an excellent resource for couples who can use a "shot in the arm" for their marriage as well as those whose marriage is in trouble
Excellent Introduction to &quot;Macumba&quot;. Bramly's book is probably the best account by an outsider of &quot;macumba&quot; -- a generic and often pejorative term for Afro-Brazilian religions such as umbanda and candomble. The only  unfortunate thing about the book is the title! Another great source of  information about &quot;macumba&quot; is the music book &quot;The Brazilian  Sound,&quot; which goes into great detail about the history of candomble in  Brazil and its link to samba and afoxe music
No Race Just Truth. I have heard peopel speak of the author not bing an indian. She is now and she is Native mixed. I know cause I have been a student for many years of hers. If you read the writings youwill see the power in the truth she tells. In bone medicine you will learn the ways of a hollow bone and these ways are sacred. Good work, Great book. I understand the human more
Wasn't what I thought it would be.  My fault. I was thinking this would be a book about places to sell your photography like post cards and bookmarkers or stuff like that.  I guess I just didn't look it over enough.  It is pretty much just basic stuff about how to run a business in photography.  Some I thought were a little simple, like it says you should have a seperate phone for your business.  Also, you should tell family members to not use that phone for anything other than business.  That would be true of any business be it photography or selling comic books.  Some of it is good business practices that many would not think of but I think you could get a book on operating a home business or small business from the library and learn most of this stuff.  It is not an expensive book so I'm not going to complain much.  I would suggest though that a person that is going to do photography work might think of staying with one or two areas and get books on those.  For example, wedding photography and stock photography and learn how to make it in those areas.  Go ahead and buy it, if you don't like it you are not out much.
Good. I saw the film at a young age.  Never forgot it then Oops I wanted to read the book, books are always different than the movie
Emergence disguised. I agree with most of your reviewers--Laughlin's book is not Nobelstuff.  But give a point.  It shows a laid back theorist who hasearned his prize already, and is easing into another perhaps moreimportant area of physics.  In amongst his vignettes of personallife he is pointing ahead in the understanding of our cosmos.All "beyond physics" scientific progress emphasizes emergence.Take for instance the guidance of DNA in evolution.  I would in-clude also the precise definition of the forces of nature. Any-body out there with ideas to help this concept along?
WOW!. I loved the first two books, but this one is the best yet! Virgina has now grown up. At first I was sad that her teen-years adventures were over, but reading about her as an adult has been thrilling. So many things, including an abused child, her own children, a husband, struggles, and her  grandmother, happen to her. Through the whole thing she realizes that her  relationship with Christ is not what it should be. I think that this book  has a great value to it
Problem solving toolkit book. Book info: I read the 2nd edition that was published in 1997.Pre required knowledge or literature: NoneGeneral: The book is easy to read, although quite often there are 3 examples used to make the same point. Because the examples are quite good 1 or 2 examples would have done as well.Book content:The book starts with an introduction part (5%) what is very easy to understand, which handles some real life (problem) examples. Chapter 1 handles some simulated (problem) experiments and statistical feedback of the participants of those experiments (9%). Results of these experiments among others are used in chapter 2-6 (74%). In chapters 2-6 aspects of problem solving are explained, with reasons of why we as human beings have problems with those aspects. (Chapter 2: The demands; Chapter 3:Setting Goals; Chapter 4:Information and models; Chapter 5: Time sequences; Chapter 6: Planning) The final chapter tries to give some help how to approach problems. Basically it comes down to the point that there is not 1 method to use in problem solving, but the book gives you a set of tools which can be used in problem solving situations. The selection of specific tools is what we have to do as human beings based on the kind of problem that we are dealing with.
a wholistic view of healing...thoughtful and original. This is probably the best work on healing I have read so far; I am now on my third reading and it will not be the last as there is so much in this book to chew on. Whitmont, who was born in the early part of the century, is (if he's still alive) an M.D. and psychotherapist, and also well versed in homeopathy, alchemy, chaos theory, the theories of Rupert Sheldrake and David Bohm, and many other topics such as art, literature, and drama. He has a truly broad intellect as well as a highly developed intuitive sense. I would say his ideas are firmly within the humanist tradition, without any New Age leanings. Indeed, he shows that in healing, darkness is just as important as &quot;the Light&quot;--for the darkness is where one goes to mine the gold of the deepest human experiences. He does not approach the causes of illness from the standpoint so prevalent today of &quot;we cause our illnesses by not dealing with our emotional or soul issues.&quot;Rather, he points out that illness, as well as all phenomena, proceeds from a deeper level of reality whose patterns are not readily discernible or understandable when viewed from the three dimensional reality we inhabit. Although I cannot summarize the book well because it contains so much, I would say that his basic stance is that everything of the visible world is rooted in an invisible reality, an &quot;implicate order,&quot; (to quote physicist David Bohm) and that in healing we must take that implicate order into consideration just as much as we do the physical reality of the illness. His way of doing this takes up a good part of the second portion of the book. (The first portion explains his way of looking at man, reality, and the universe, with an interesting first chapter on homeopathy.)I highly recommend this book to any healer, whether you are a nurse, physician, psychotherapist, energy healer, somatics practitioner, whatever.........it's not necessarily an easy read but it will open up many dimensions of the healing process to you
Great Book. This book has a complete idea for the Power Electronics.  Every line has an important meaning in it.  Even though we have to read it very carefully.  It worth for you to know all the bible of Power Electronics.  One said  Power System bible is Stevenson's book, on the other hand, Power  Electronics' bible is Kassakian too.  You can find everything in this book.   You will not be regret if you hit this book
A father's opinion. I bought this book for my daughter and think it's excellent.  There are lots of sample problems ranging from easy to difficult.  Answers contain explanations which is what I really find helpful(although explanations are not always easy to understand).  I haven't seen other books, but I don't feel like I need to look
Great help for my linguistics research!. I found this analytical dictionary very well done and accessible. What is more, it was of great help in my research for my linguistics analysis class, in which we studied Nahuatl in an exercise. I recommend this book to  whoever would like to learn more about this language, and also to  linguists
Excellent Star Wars. Ok, so the book starts out a little slow, but I must say that is because the book is written from the first person stand point, the only starwars book I know of to be written from that perspective. This story follows Corran Horn from Stockpole's Xwing series on his journey to become a jedi knight. Corran's wife Mirax is missing and in order to find her he must come to terms with his heritage. So he changes his name to Keiran Halycon and joins Luke Skywalker's Jedi Academy as one of his first students. The story goes right along with the jedi academy trilogy and then precedes after Exar Kun's defeat to Corran leaving the academy for his own reasons ( he doesnt like how luke runs the academy, it doesnt work for him) to continue his search for his wife. But in order to save her he must make a choice join the dark side or lose her forever. You will have to read the book to find out what happens there. But if you know anything at all about star wars you know everything usually works out in the end
My 2006 Favorite, so far... This is quite possibly my favorite read of the year. It's really eye opening to the ways of Afghanistan before all hell broke loose. Heart wrenching! A beautiful story of a father/son just trying to make it in America, and a story of true friendship & love.
Great Reference. This book is not for the beginner. It is not for someone who doesn't already have a modicum of elementary probability as part of his 'blood and bones.' It is not for those without a functional knowledge of multivariate integration and the transformations involved therein: just as for any "mathematical statistics" textbook,  mathematical competence is critical in deriving utility -- in fact, outside some set theoretic properties, a topic such as this is all about applying methods from linear algebra/multivariable calc. This is not a probability textbook in the vein of Stephen Ross (whose "first course in probability" would be best to consult for certain topics -- this text too requires calculus.) In short, look elsewhere first if you're incompetent.But then return. Return to this wonderfully complete and rigourous txt that offers challenging end of chapter exercises and insures that if you look something up, you will find it. The contents is vast, and each time you open it, you're likely to walk away with something new or something appreciated fully for the first time.Misses the 5th star because of its list of errata, and because newer editions haven't been forthcoming. It could use one more revision
Recommended. This book, You Can Be the Happy Mom of an Empty Nest, is the best I have found on the spiritual aspects of how people &quot;grow up&quot; from worshiping their parents to worshiping the Lord and becoming fully adult as Christians. Understanding this process helps us to grow spiritually ourselves and it helps us to not inadvertently interfere with this growth in our children
Not as expected. I expected this book to offer me assistance in building human forms in clay; that's why I give this book a 4.  Instead of advice, I got a gallery book of less-than-realistic art pieces (histories of ceramicists) by:  Viola Frey, Akio Takamori, and Luo Xiaoping, among others.  I kept the book for what it is.  For a how-to-book, I recommend PORTRAIT SCULPTING, ANATOMY & EXPRESSIONS IN CLAY by Philippe & Charisse Faraut.
A scientific approach to a religious riddle: evil. Anyone interested in grappling with the all the hate in this world (and in their own hearts) should read this book.  Watson breaks down human aggression into something our genes command us to do to keep themselves  alive -- who's really in control here?  Only by understanding our genetic  enslavement, Watson argues,  will we ever be able to rise above it.  The  book is wonderfully free of new age b.s and religious moralizing;  it casts  a bright light on a dark and slimy subject.  The end result for the reader  (at least this one) is a deep understanding of what makes our dark hearts  tick
Fast Paced. This is a great book if you find that you have ADD when it comes to reading. Events happen back to back, and the story moves quickly. Holds your attention, very interesting
Required Reading for every President. This should be on the coffee table, magazine rack, bookshelf, and waiting room of every serious national leader. Conscientious voters should also read this in order to understand what it takes to make political peace in the world. But Stassen is not merely political, he's actually biblical first of all. He exegetes like a biblical scholar while making applications which only a leading Christian ethicist like he could. Just peacemaking shows that &quot;just war theory&quot; can lead to peace while restraining war, and that passifism is an extremely ACTIVE practice. EXCELLENT
Read it!. Does anyone like fiction books, if so this book is for you?The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe are about four kids called Peter, Susan, Edmund, and Lucy who move from London, England because air raids. They were sent to an old professor, which they now live in the heart of the country. It was a rainy day so they played a game and happens to fall upon a wardrobe. They entered it and came to a new world called Narnia. Which they don't know that they are the sons and daughters of Adam and Eve. And they have to defeat the White Witch to restore peace to Narnia.I recommend The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe for children 8 and older. This book has strong felling in this high packed adventure and fiction throughout the book.-Dorian Alexander Eskridg
Insightful!. Say the boss drops dead and suddenly you're the acting boss. Or the company reorganizes, everyone above you is fired and guess who's in charge. Imagine that your career suddenly becomes one of those movies where the plane starts to go down and some poor, benighted sap finds himself in the pilot's chair trying to land a 747 on a stormy night on what is either a landing strip or just a long, broad swath of plankton in the water. Can you land it? What do you do? You're responsible. Suddenly people look at you in a different way. Your friends no longer completely trust you, your enemies are working actively to undercut you and your ability to come to terms with accidental leadership will make or break your career. It is full of little motivational tips, kind words and straight talk covering everything from managing complex and difficult teams to firing people (tip: avoid Christmas Eve). The book is thin, a quick read and a good one
Great insight. It is amazing that two people can read the same book and extract dramatically different concepts.I do not believe that this book was written as a source of doctrine and theology but rather a perspective of an individual, his experience and the wisdom he gained. Not all men may have experienced what he addresses. For those of us who have this book has assisted in bringing us into a closer relationship with God. My primary source of knowledge and help come from His Word, but I am grateful to people like John Eldredge who are able to verbalize and assist those of us not steeped in Doctrinal theology to develop a closer relationship with God.
Swamp Angel. Swamp angel is about a friendly, strong, giant girl; from the South. The conflict of the story is, Tarnation, a giant gorilla is eating up all the food. So, the mayor decides to have a contest to see which man can kill him. Whoever succeeds, will get to keep the pelt of the giant animal. Everyone who dared to try to kill the beast, failed, until one day the Swamp angel stepped in. This book is extremely funny with wonderful illustrations. I believe this book would be suitable for children under the age of eight. I give this book two thumbs up.
A rich part of this bilingual Canadian's heritage. Volume 5: Land of Black Gold (1951), Destination Moon (1953), Explorers on the Moon (1954). This is the fifth instalment of my reviews of each of the seven volumes.Land of Black Gold makes little use of Captain Haddock (it actually took form before The Crab With the Golden Claws) and is, subjectively of course, the weakest of all the Tintin adventures created after Tintin in America.The third of the three double adventures, Destination Moon and Explorers on the Moon show an amazingly detailed lunar effort, 15 years before the real moon landing, using Syldavia vs. its communist-style rival Borduria (see King Ottokar's Sceptre) as the backdrop. We see a side of Calculus that we had not suspected, a great deal of slapstick from Haddock, highly convincing moonscapes, somewhat drab colours however, but an effective layout; the moonscapes are outstanding. Tintin's friendship with Haddock requires a little tough love. Great stories, and yet exceeded by the last two in the preceding volume and the three in Volume 6
Everybody's Normal Till You Get to Know Them. This was one of the best books I have ever read.  It isn't one you can pick up and read from cover to cover in a day.  I read a chapter and then I spent the rest of the day to reflect on how my life is like this and how to improve.  It has really made a difference in my understanding of people and God's love for us
I'm good for about one of these every ten years. I don't know how women can read books like this on a regular basis. I was sobbing like old yeller had been shot for about half the book. It may've been routine for the fairer sex, but for me it plumbed emotional depths and psychological pain I prefer to leave repressed. That said, it was more than just cathartic, it was a hopeful, warm, and even funny look at the simple-complex lives of a family, and at just how quickly life can change.Without giving much away, a teenage boy feels compelled by a guilty conscience to become a guardian/father of some kids. I won't say whose, even though it occurs early in the book. The novel then follows the boy as he very quickly becomes a man, and a man so different from his peers that he quickly takes on almost alien qualities. The day by day payoff of such tragic sacrifice is the overriding strength of the story, and it is a payoff for the reader to watch not only his life, but the lives of his friends and family unfold. I never saw the movie made from the book; I hope it did it justice, because while it looks like about a million weepy romance novels, it reads like a modern classic
So funny you will laugh at loud!. Barbara Park the author of this book and the entire Junie B. series has a writing style like no other. Her way of getting kids wanting to read through the real true to life stories of the kindergartener and first grader Junie B. Jones is fantastic. Barbara Park and her Junie B. books are consistently on the both the New York Times and the USA Today bestseller lists.As of this date their are 26 books in the Junie B. series with the newest being Junie B. Dumb Bunny and this being the second newest. We have this book in the hard cover edition that has a paper cover sleeve and attached red satin ribbon bookmark for easily holding your current page. Santa left this in my then six year old's stocking the Christmas before last. It had just come out that previous month of 2005.Junie B. Jones were the first chapter books that my daughter started reading. She was captivated by them as most kids this age are. They don't tell of a sticky sweet child but rather of the true to life hardships from the kid's view that a determined, opinionated, and sometimes frantic girl. She has some of the funniest moments in this book that my daughter and I burst out laughing at. Junie B. Likes to do things her own way and expects the world to pretty much revolve around her. Of course it doesn't and the trouble starts. In the end Junie B. learns a little bit anyway how to handle things.In this book it Christmas time as the title suggests. The first grade classroom is getting ready for the holiday and the celebrations to come. They are learning and singing holiday songs and wearing elf costumes all of which are extremely exiciting to Junie B. As we have learned through previous books a classmate May is not exactly one of Junie B.'s favorite people. This time May has become a tattletale that is ruining the fun for Junie B. The part that stops Junie B. in her tracts and just may destroy this whole holiday season is that she draws May's name in the Secret Santa exchange that classroom number one is having. Junie B. comes up with a plan to get back May through the gift she plans on giving her. As usual things don't turn out as Junie B. has planned.The books has 118 pages with 11 chapters. Their are usually about two illustrations per chapter. These are done in black and white print. The illustrator, Denise Brunkus perfectly captures the emotions of the fun and frustration of Junie B. But it's the cleverly written words that draw you in and make you feel like you can feel not only Junie B.'s joy but also her pain. She's is not quite the kid that you want your child to emulate but just the same a kid can learn from Junie B.'s problems that they are likely to encounter at some point in there grade school career.Must have!
Don't Brush This Off. Mark Christopher Weber, artist and author, in his "Brushwork Essentials" provides the beginner with generous amount of information and examples related to the use of the brush. He covers:Types of brushes and what they were designed to doChoosing and purchasing a brushChoosing and shaping a brush for useMixing paint with a brushWhat consistency of paint to use with a brush to get the desired effectThe mechanics of using a brush and resultsWet on wet painting and blendingCaring for the brushAnd, putting it all of the essentials together for landscapes, figures, and still life.This is a great step-by-step book for the beginner or for those who need a refresher on the use and care of the brush.
Classic theology - Classic literature. John Calvin's Institutes of the Christian Religion is a monumental work that stands among the greatest works of Christian theology and Western literature.  It ranks with works such as St. Augustine's Confessions and City of God in value, insight and significance.  The Institutes have molded the church's understanding of Christian doctrine for generations and has had untold influence in the development of Western thought in both the religious and civil arenas.Calvin's Institutes represent his life work in teaching theology.  They first appeared in 1536 and went through three significant revisions - each expanding and building upon the previous.  This particular edition represents the final form and of which Calvin was very pleased.Originally written to give basic understanding of Christian doctrine, they became one of the earliest systematic theologies of the Reformed tradition.  Calvin's stated desire is to give the reader the necessary background to read and accurately handle the great doctrines and promises of the Bible.Calvin sent a copy to the King Francis I to encourage him to stop persecuting the Christians who were embracing the gospel as taught by the Reformers.  His basic argument was that if the king understood what these people believed he would stop killing them as heretics but rather see them as faithful adherents of historical Christianity.  Calvin was no lover of novelty and throughout the Institutes copiously sights from the early church fathers and the long history of the Church's understanding of doctrine.This two-volume work is broken down into four books that loosely follow the outline of the Apostle's Creed.  Book 1 concerns knowledge of God.  Book 2 is about Jesus Christ as redeemer.  Book 3 is about the Holy Spirit's role in applying Christ's redeeming graces.  Book 4 is about the church and practice.This particular edition, translated by Battles and edited by McNeil is more expensive than the one produce by Beverage, but it is worth every extra dollar you spend.  While the church is indebted to Beverage for his labor of love in getting many works by Calvin translated into English, his command of both French and Latin were not as strong as Battles.  In fact, Beverage does not even deal with Calvin's Latin version of the Institutes.  They were originally produced in both Latin and French and Battles' work demonstrates his competency in dealing with both languages.  Also, Battles' mastery of Calvin's other writings is reflected in his voluminous footnotes, many of them very helpful to the reader for clarifying, further reading and cross-referencing.  In addition, the indexes in the Battles edition are invaluable not only for searching the Institutes for topics but for gleaming Calvin's understanding of the church fathers.Agree or disagree with Calvin, these are a necessary read for anyone who desires an understanding of the development of Western thought, literature and theology.  They are not only great theology; they represent excellent writing and development of an argument.  They are also highly pastoral and devotional.  They are not like reading a modern systematic theology.  Calvin understood doctrine to be more than theory, but something to mold our understanding of God, ourselves and the world in which we live.  Carefully working through the Institutes is a journey worth taking!Soli Deo Gloria
VERY HELPFUL BOOK!. We just used this book to help us get through the etiquette that it took to plan our wedding.  It was VERY helpful and very easy to understand and follow.  She has some really great and applicable ideas and gives you ideas on how to word almost anything!
Permanence At Rest And Motion. Auntie Mame is proteus but within the whirling kaleidoscope of changes is an essential core.  She is as sophisticated as Paris and as simple as the fields of Nebraska.  She'd be an infuriating goddess to worship because she would laugh at the worship.  Her energy is neither creative or destructive.  It's a matter of the kind of motion that illuminates by charm.  Her love would be disastrous if she was one of Shakespeare's characters but she isn't.  She's an American original, a note of real Americana; a flashing off of the spark of the True America denied and fear by heavy fundamentalists in religion, politics, and art.  She is wit itself because she knows how to retire.  She might have committed enough sins to damn any other human being but she wont ever be damned because of her invincible ignorance - a facet of her compassionate id. Auntie Mame is like Bugs Bunny - that other creature too anarchical to be an anarchist.  Auntie Mame knows no super-ego.  She does not quest for freedom because she already is free.
A soulful work by a wonderful man,. this book invites the reader into the imaginal space opened up by grief.  It is a space we tend to fear and therefore neglect in our mechanized, electronicized, and tremendously busy culture... one reason we have so much  unfinished emotional business.  Dr. Romanyshyn's book reminds us that  melancholy can be a path to greater self-fulfillment--for as Viktor Frankl  pointed out, there are values known only to those with the courage to  suffer well.  Highly recommended. -- Craig Chalquist, designer of the  Thineownself self-exploration site
The Optimal Viral Fighter!!. Material in this book convinced me to try the substance.  Researching a list of manufacturers in the back of the book, I selected Ameriden. They had done a lot of research and subsequently settled on a product that had a  STABLIZED level of Olive Leaf Extract. This means, it didn't &quot;break  down&quot; over a short period of time while in the bottle. One case (12  bottles) later, I seem to be symptom free. Note: I took 1 capsule (500 mg),  four times a day.  A case of 12 bottles lasted about 6 months
A Classic. Black Metropolis is perhaps the founding document of African-American studies, a classic work of sociology that still resonates today. It is a paradigmatic expression of the Chicago School of sociology, however, a  school that today stands in some disrepute, at least in some circles.  Indirectly, it was the target of James Baldwin's famous attack on Richard  Wright in his essay, Everybody's Protest Novel. The claim of the criticism  has been that the Chicago School, due to its insistance upon using a  &quot;scientific approach&quot;, merely reproduces the very terms under  which African-Americans have been oppressed--a claim that has proceeded  under the warrant of European intellectuals such as Theodor Adorno. Still,  Black Metropolis is a landmark study, and, unfortunately, many if not most  of its observations and conclusions remain true today, and in fact it could  be argued that conditions in the Black Belt of Chicago have gotten worse,  not better, since 1945, the year of Black Metropolis' publication--which  lends a certain credence to the criticisms mentioned above, though perhaps  it should be qualified by saying that they are not so much criticisms of  the Chicago School as they are criticisms of American society. Since then,  as we know, we have witnessed a great shift in American public opinion away  from what some consider to be the excesses of those days; so much so, in  fact, that the work of Black Metropolis may again be regarded as a  profoundly useful book. Embodying American liberalism as it does--which  counted as a grave sin thirty years ago--Black Metropolis may possibly be  due for a fresh look
good motivater. I am a beginner in the real estate world and the book has given me great information on my mission.  I would refer this book to anyone starting out in real estate investing.
Great book but... Great book but, wasn't what I anticipated.  None the less, Steven King classic
Great book, great format, inspiring down-to-earth examples. I enjoyed the 12 short stories in this book, each one highlighting a businessperson overcoming amazing challenges to become successful (or, if they were already successful when crisis hit, what they did to remain that way).  The wide range of professionals presented also shows that the determination and vision of one person can truly make all the difference (albeit sometimes painfully) irrespective of service or industry
Beverly Cleary & Henry Don't Disappoint. I read this book to my 6-yr-old daughter.  We loved it.  A great opportunity for her to listen to a story and use her imagination (instead of looking at pictures).  Great way for her to segue from one chapter to another and from book to book with the same characters (we've also read Beezus & Ramona).  Cleary's books reflect our neighborhood atmosphere--kids playing in the streets, moms hollering for their kids to come home for dinner and kids going from house to house playing.  My teacher read me Cleary's books in the 1960's, and they're still fresh and delightful to me now
Six Stars is More Like It!. I've rated this five stars only because you cannot list six.  This is the one and only account of the Flood that you need to read.Even though it is now old enough to be a classic, it is as timely as today's newspaper.  The hubris of the robber barons contrasted with the human anguish is nowhere more poignantly told than in McCullough's meticulously researched account.  (And yes, he is related to people connected with the story, as am I).If you want the story to come alive, then focus on the people...Especially Cyrus Elder, the Cambria Iron executive who was the only Club member whose immediate family members perished in the Flood.  Representing both sides of the story, Cyrus is the center around which the disaster unfolds.Yes, it helps if you know the terrain--go out of your way, if you can, to see the National Flood Memorial and you will be awestruck by the sweep of the broken dam's size.  Far off in the distance, across the long-dry lake bed, you will see the rooftops of the little Pennsylvania town of St Michaels, which grew up around the abandoned cottages of the illustrious members of the defunct Club.  Many of the cottages are still there!  Better yet, you can wander through the original Clubhouse--some of the wallpaper probably dates back to 1889, even now.In the main NFM building, be sure to look at the telegraph handset, the one by which the ignored warning from South Fork was sent down the wire to Johnstown and then relayed on to Robert Pitcairn in Pittsburgh.McCullough tells it best.  Read the book; then go see for yourself.If you find this review helpful you might want to read some of my other reviews, including those on subjects ranging from biography to architecture, as well as religion and fictio
So worth reading!. This has got to be one of the most fascinating reads ever. It's the kind of book that you put down only so you won't finish it too quickly, or to ponder what you have just read. Very satisfying on many levels
As a 38 year old man, I liked it. I listened to the audiobook... I usually become annoyed with books with skip to back story alot. It didn't bother me much here.Although I understand the comparison, I detested Inkheart/Inkspell as being very very boring and drawn out and depressing ...so I am probably am in the minority.The mysteries of this book are more thoughtful and the story moves along. Sometimes i wasn't sure if the mysteries (or confusions) were caused by confusion on my part or the author's... still,  it is this very confusion which makes it interesting to me.I had to fill in the gaps a bit and I got to imagine what it all meant. It had a resonance for me.
Great stuff with wll-blended theory and practical info. I've been itching to properly learn Javascript for a while and had been doing so with the Javascript Bible. That is one heavy book, although a bit out-dated now. I finally came across this book and boy am I glad I did. I've learnt more concepts about javascripting practices than any other book or resources I've referred to.This book, in my opinion, is definitely for the non-scripter/programmer. So if you're 100% new to javascript, this may not be the best choice for your first book. However, if you've touched javascript for a while or have done some sort of programming or even actionscript in Flash, this will be quite an easy read.It's totally opened my eyes to creating sites that are no longer tagged with "Oh, it's one of those javascript-only sites again that try to be oh-so-fancy but break in other browsers".If you want to take on the power of javascript but also be a caring, friendly web designer, this is definitely a book you should check out
Short Inspirational Read. I believe this was a nice, short read.  I wasn't expecting miracles from this tiny book but I do believe it was a nice, heart-warming story with some good life "reminders" in it
Must reading. This is the best book ever written about female serial killers, ever. It's chilling, truly. And what if the person you've been reading was dishonest? Then what? A masterpiece all the way as well as a landmark in mystery fiction. Read it. In fact, just to convince yourself that this brilliant book does work "both ways," before knowing the surprise and after, read it twice. So many such stories fall apart and collapse after the big twist ending (High Tension or Fight Club anyone?), not this one. Agatha knew what she was doing, and the proof is in the pudding, as they say
A masterpiece; the written language at its best!. Why can't you give certain titles 40 stars???  Then again, even that wouldn't be enough.  These are wondeful explorations of the human psyche and spirit.  No two are similar yet they are all a piece of the whole.  The whole: exactly what we humans are, what we do and why.  I recently bought Back In The World and I can not wait to finish it and read it again and again, just as I have with The Night In Question.  M.J. Iuppa, thank you so much for assigning this to us to read for class, it was beautiful and imaginative and I just can't get enough.  Read it, read it, read it!!!  Especially Powder.  It's so innocent yet so daring, so intriguing yet so secretive.  Then again, all of them are, trust me.  It doesn't get much better than this
Hermoso libro!. Lleno de ilustraciones color, y algunas en blanco y negro. Me gusta porque es lo que Tolkien imagin para sus obras... eso es lo que lo hace ms hermoso. Adems demuestra que Tolkien era un alma muy sensible, amante de la naturaleza, y esto se refleja no solo en sus libros sino tambin en sus dibujos. Me gustara que estos dibujos estn incluidos en sus obras, no solo los dibujos de otros artistas. Hermoso, hermoso, para todos los admiradores de Tolkien.
Great book that shows what hypothyroidism can mimic. I have the older version of this book and it is so good I'm sure this one is even better. I was amazed to see how many other diseases hypothyroidsim can mimic
A well-paced and exciting nautical adventure story. The third novel in the series (a fourth is due out soon) is the best one yet. An exciting tale alive with history, battles, political turmoil, courage and cowardice. Captain Biddlecomb has developed into a seaworthy  character who is brave, cunning and much to his discomfort, a patriot. The  regional distrust between northern and southern politicians were most  interesting, since most of the naval vessels were built, crewed and sailed  from northern ports. The first contigent of Marines was a superb touch as  was the first landings on a foreign shore. Much insight into the actual  sailing of ships, positions of shore batteries, fortresses, local  commanders were all presented in a fresh fashion. An excellent read, and am  looking forward to the fourth novel. As I mentioned in my reviews of the  first two books, far too many nautical terms that most landlubbers won't  understand.  But some really terrific sea battles, storms, neferous  characters and dialog. I would like to see more books by Mr. Nelson, who  really knows about sailing ships, perhaps the War of 1812, the Seminole War  or something with the Barbary pirates. Perhaps another nautical series  could develope about the Civil War featuring Biddlecomb's son(s)?  That  would be something to really look forward to
Great Business Person's Book of Networking. Buying this book was the smarted business investment I have ever made. If you are a business person needing to understand your technical team's conversation about your computer network, then this book is for you!It allowed me to be able to understand networking problems and opportunities that affect my business. Before I read this book, I was not able to intelligently make purchase decisions about technical equipment or services that my IT department would recommend.Since reading this book, I can now hide the fact that I am not the sharpest tool in the shed when it comes to technology. ;-
My Son Loved it!. When I first read the book I did not think that my 3 year old son would like it but he has just loved it.  I accidentally purchased the board book so I will have to be more careful in the future
Mike Does It Again!!. This book is another loving tribute to those classic autos that can send shivers up your spine sometimes, they're so cool. I simply cannot see how Mike's photography can be improved upon in any way, shape or form. Buy this; you won't regreat it, promise
Cheese Please. This book will help you to deal with the inevitable changes that come up in life with a much more positive attitude. It enables you to see the forest for the trees, and the cheese from the fondue.  It is one of those rare books that is simple to read yet profound, very universal in its message, and appropriate for many many different situations
Very Helpful. I have worked in retail for over seven years in both corporate and small business settings. I'm now conducting marketing research for a souvenir shop. I've read several book and this was by far one of the most helpful. It's an easy read that doesn't take long to finish but is packed full of useful information. I anticipate referring back to it for quite some time for basic information
Sister. SISTER by A. Manette Ansay was a good book.  It told about a young Catholic girl and he brother growing up on a farm in Wisconsin.  They go through many changes, as the mother takes a part-time job, while the son's battles with the father grow with time until the son disappears without a trace.  In the years to come after her brother's disappearance the girls becomes a distant spectator unable to fill the hole left by her younger brother, and unable to rebuild the bond between her parents, while loosing herself in the process
John Rhodes:  A Time of Civility In Congress. Full Disclure:  I've met J. Brian Smith, author of "John Rhodes, Man of the House", a number of times, both professionally and personally.  He is not aware I'm writing this review nor, alas, has money changed hands to influence my opinion.Why read a book about former Congressman John J. Rhodes (R, Arizona)?  Why write such a book?  For political junkies, this book is an insider's look at the workings of the government at critical moments in the late 20th century.  From Vietnam to Watergate to the opening of relations with China and through the changes in Congress that Senator Orrin Hatch (R. UT) once described as, "This has gotten so vicious that I have to admit it's the worst I've seen in twenty-seven years in the Senate."Rhodes served in the House of Representatives from 1953 to 1983.  On December 7, 1973, when Gerald Ford was named VP to replace Spiro Agnew, Rhodes was unanimously elected House Minority Leader.   Smith was Rhodes's press secretary and a good friend from 1972 until the Congressman's death in 2003 and kept a daily record of what went on during those years.  What emerges is from careful notes, not memories dimmed by time.What makes this book important for all Americans is realize that the bitter, partisan, vituperative, nastiness described by Hatch, above, isn't the way it has to be.  What a difference a generation makes.When Rhodes was minority leader, he often butted heads with House Speaker Thomas "Tip" O'Neill, Jr. (D, MA).  O'Neill remembers, "John and I have had our squabbles along the line, but...I don't think thre are any two people closer even though we're miles apart in our philsophy...he's just a beautiful fella."Smith is a natural story teller.  He didn't try to write the definitive 1200 page biography but rather provides a rare insider's look at defining moments in late 20th century political history as seen from one of the lesser known but more powerful influencials involved.  The section on the challenges Rhodes faced with the Nixon/Watergate scandal is particularly fascinating, revealing again how different were Republican and Democratic Members of Congress just 30 years ago.Two themes dominate the book.  "John J. Rhodes was a rare breed of American politician.  He wasn't flashy.  He was not charismatic...He didn't draw attention to himself through his words, actions, attire, or mannerisms.  He kept his ego in check."  And yet, at the same time, he was a "Man of the House," understanding and using the arcane rules of procedure with skill and fairness.Smith isn't trying to nominate Rhodes for sainthood.  The Congressman's temper, his poor oratorical style, his political maneuverings, and his keen political ability to count votes and manipulate the system to his advantage are given equal time.  But, on balance, Rhodes comes across as a man of honor and integrity.Smith quotes Sam Donaldson, "We in the press liked him because he understood our job.  He didn't always agree with what we wrote or said, but he never held a grudge and the welcome mat was always out for reporters. ...He would have made a great president.  Today there are too few in public life like him."Which introduces the second theme.  Rhodes was in office when "members [of Congress] treated one another with a level of comity rarely seen today.  There were differences, of course; some were based on issues, others on personalities.  In general, however, the atmosphere was civil....Such courtesies were sincere and personal grudge matches rare; today they are the norm."Interestingly, Smith is surprising blunt putting much of the reason for the change onto Newt Gingrich (R, GA), although he doesn't go into great detail.  While he gives Gingrich credit for much of the Republican party's congressional resurrgence, he also writes that his "'didactic', 'combative,' take-no prisoners approach hurt people along the way."  Gingrich's takes the lion's share of the blame for the bitterness, partisanship, and personal antagonism that still characterizes much of Washington.Smith has the knack of making interesting some of the more complex and mind-numbing ways in which the House works.  He has a message to promote and a story to tell, and he's found the right balance and tone to convey both.  A very readable, well-written book, "John Rhodes, Man of the House" is worth the time for those frustrated with the character of so many politicians today and who wonder if it ever was any different.
101 Stories of Courage, Hope and Laughter. Sometimes you fell like life is a total blast, from scoring the winning goal to hanging out with your friends. Yet other times lefi is complicated. Now this book is the place to find the answers in this very story filled book. I have read pet lovers and teenage soul 2 and this one is right up there with them
A "must read"  for parents of daughters!. I absolutely loved this book. I read it little by little over time and discovered that this book, unlike so many others, is the product of real research, painstaking research... so I don't know how anyone can think these authors are politically correct or what. They talk about the sexualization of girls all right, but so much more -- the invisibility of girls in so many sources of media, the way girls are "dissed" (their word) in lyrics, tv shows, movies, the way girls are getting overwhelmed constantly with messages that they should be stereotypically pink and pretty from a very early age.  Anyone looking for a book on sexualization of girls will find plenty of stuff here; but what's more important is that girls are being stereotyped in a whole bunch of ways that narrow their choices for the future not only by being sexualized.  And parents will learn that letting their girls grow up all girl, or in that girly girl stereotype, means they will soon be sexualized by the culture -- the two are connected. You have to read the book to see why. I don't think that the authors are against pink or girly things; they just have a thoughtful response to it and plenty of suggestions and conversational material for parents.
Awesome book!. Mary Carol Garrity has writen a book that deserves a place in every 'home decorator's' library! It's easy reading and pictures a lay person can relate to~inspiring is an understatement!
I've loved this novel for years ... I read it at least once a year.  I love the story, the atmosphere, and the characters--including Andrea, the main character.  Many reviewers here have found her off-putting, and she certainly is at first.  She's selfish, opinionated and abrasive, not to put too fine a point on it.  But she evolves.  The sharp tongue doesn't completely go away, but she softens--love for Martin softens her, and although she doesn't submit to it willingly, it happens all the same.  There's a haunting incident at the end in which she recognizes and repudiates the way she's tried to control Jim (her brother), has tried to clip his wings, metaphorically speaking.  It sickens her, and she draws back from it.  Her personal growth is one of the reasons I like this book so much
A useful contribution on the subject. As a cunnilingus devotee for several years I have bought other books on it both for the pleasure of reading them and any extra information that will help me pleasure my women this way - they have certainly appreciated it! The books have much common information - as you'd expect- but like this one they have different emphasis and different topics.  The investment in buying all the cunnilingus books isn't big - less than $[...]- and is well worthwhile for the spice it will give, both to you as a performer and your woman in the event she is a reluctant receiver.This one has some erotic short stories inserted at the chapter ends which are good as I find reading one aloud to my girlfriend puts her in the mood for extra passionate lovemaking.I'm not giving this book 5 stars, however, because although the information is comprehensive it would have benefited from a good structural editor and an editor should have dealt with comments such as that in the Foreword by the author that she is "uniquely qualified to write this book". Like the "ultimate" in the title this is quite unjustified I think.  The drawings are a little  lacking in finess, the publisher could have found someone better to do them.
A Highly Intriguing Book. First of all, let me declare myself to be a Jim Lehrer fan. His novel White Widow forever carves a place for him in American literature.  Lehrer adds to an impressive list of books with this latest mystery.  As usual, his premise is very intriguing and he manages to deliver an enormous amount of Franklin scholarship in a clear and breezy style. Not only does Lehrer furnish us with a first rate mystery regarding the secret life of Ben Franklin, he also addresses the more profound question: What is historical truth and how can we ever really know it? in an entertaining and deceptively sly book.
Sim Project Review. The Good: The Sim Project is a good tool for people who dont have any project experience whatsoever. It moves the "player" through the process of resourcing a project, what the cost or value of the various resources do to the outcome of the project, and it allows the user see the outcome in the tool that is perhaps most widely used to track projects, MS Project.The Bad:To use the book and the game there must be an instructor involved. You can not purchase this book and expect to use it outside of a class setting.The code that is used to access the site is good for only one simulation, and once the simulation has begun you can not change the initial parameters to see how it would turn out using different decisions.Cost is another factor at $40 for one round of play seems a bit much, but remember that this is an academic text. However the real item you are paying for is the code to access the site.  The book can be downloaded from the site, and should be to get the most recent version.Overall: Good simulation, Good view of the project process, Brings people together to work the process, Gives students an understanding of real life scenarios without a professor having to manufacture the materials.
riveting amateur sleuth. In Las Vegas, anything goes and usually does.  A new reality show is coming to town Teen Idol, a program that involves teens competing in two age groups to become queens of their respective divisions can be picked.  Unknown to Lieutenant Carmen Molina of the Las Vegas Police Department, her daughter Mariah entered the teen competition and made the cut.  Molina reluctantly allows her daughter to go for the two weeks in house event but worries because someone is mutilating the advertising posters and a girl was killed on the site where the audition occurred.Molina asks Temple Barr to go undercover and enter the contest as a teen so she can watch over Mariah; she agrees because Max is nowhere around and hasn't been in quite some time.  Her friend Matt is in Chicago looking for some clue that will lead him to the identity of his biological father.  A serious of mischievous threats culminates in the murder of the contest's dietician.  Temple with the help of her feline companion Midnight Louis investigates to stop the killer from murdering others.Carole Nelson Douglas always keeps her series fresh by taking her characters in different directions and CAT IN A HOT PINK PURSUIT is no exception.  For long time fans, secrets are finally revealed and the heroine makes a life alternating decision.  The story is told in the third person point of view except when Midnight Louis is on stage and he gives his first hand perspective.  This writing technique is deftly handled by Ms. Douglas so that this charming and entertaining mystery is a must read for people who like creative and riveting amateur sleuth tales told mostly by one with a tail.Harriet Klausner
Great book!. This is an excellent book, not only for the beginer, but also for those who have been studying Shaolin for many years! It is very informative about the history, phylosophy, and tecnique of Shaolin kung fu. It's a great book for doing cross-refrence on different training and also has many inspiring stories in it. I'd recomend this book to ANYONE interested in Shaolin
David Sedaris At His Best. This book marked a departure from Sedaris' previous works in that it was mostly a memoir and there was very little fiction in it.  David Sedaris' adventure (and misadventures) in college, hitch hiking, plus candid moments in his family history and as an apple picker/processor is both entertaining and piognant.  Many think of Sedaris as a humorist, but there a many keen observations about life in his writing.  I especially liked his account of his visit to a straight nudist camp
Excellent detail and depth. I found this book to be invaluable for learning physiology.  It was in-depth and has excellent illustrations.  A must-have for the physiology student
Another winner from a fantastic author. Julie and Romeo Get Lucky by Jeanne Ray is the sequel to Julie and Romeo.  Jeanne Ray's writing is so spot-on accurate, sometimes I swear she must be recording people in their home and then simply transcribing it!  But she's so much funnier and sweeter than real life.  Romeo throws out his back carrying Julie up her stairs and ends up an invalid in her bed.  Nora, Julie's oldest daughter, is pregnant and on bed rest, so she moves home too.  Sarah, Julie's granddaughter, is obsessed with Willie Wonka & The Chocolate Factory, and so the story goes from there.  Julie can't grab a spare moment to herself when everything is falling apart. Ray has a unique talent for describing physical comedy that few writers can manage.  I found myself laughing and gasping out loud at poor Romeo.  I wish life was as sweet as it is in Ray's world, and I treasure the moments I get to spend there.  Read her other books as well; they're all winners.
The book was inspirational and easy to read. The author uses the example of Gandi's life and leadership to call us to a higher standard of living and leadership.  Gandhi's life and leadership principles are used to construct a leadership framework which includes the  moral and spiritual dimensions by which the author hopes to guide us to a  higher standard.  We are asked to commit to absolute values, to the  journey, and to training the conscience
Great action in this one. The story line is full of surprises and excellent suspense.  The ending isn't up to Peters' standards, though.  Enjoyable reading none the less
Great Writing, Thin on Research. Easy to read, well written, a page turner.  It also contains a few profound thoughts--namely the four disciplines:1) Build and Maintain a Cohesive Leadership Team2) Create Organizational Clarity3) Over-Communicate Organization Clarity4) Reinforce Organizational Clarity Through Human Systems.The fable does a great job illustrating the meaning and application of these four disciplines.  Unfortunately it stops at that.  There is no appendix referencing facts, studies or collaborative evidence proving that these four obsessions really work as illustrated.  (Other research based material I've read does back it up)  Not including a "hardcore" chapter in this volume definitely lowers the quality of the book.  But, overall I still found it an excellent book, well worth my time
Excellent resource--best guide book of these cities. This Fodor's 6th edition is substantially better than the 5th-- chock full of up to date practical info, and the metro maps have both Russian and an English version for pronunciation, which is so helpful to those who are not fluent in Russian.  Even the quality of the pages themselves has been upgraded--the pages are white instead of gray.  If you want lots of photos, get another guide book, but if you want truly useful info, and the one book you will carry around with you with answers to just about everything--this is it.  This book was invaluable to us on our week-long trip to these cities
Could even be life changing. I had to read this book for a psychology class and ended up loving it.  The book goes through the life cycle and explains the losses we must make at each stage in order to move on to the next one.  If this book does not move you than you are made of stone.
Frog and Toad CD Audio Collection. My 6 yr old grandchild listens to it over and over
For Fans of Pop Minutiae. If you're a fan of the Billboard charts, Joel Whitburn's books are the place to go for research on your favorite artists or those one-hit wonders. This book covers three charts: Bubbling Under the Hot 100 (songs that never got past #101); and two defunct charts, Bubbling Under Albums (LPs that failed to chart higher than #201) and Billboard's old EP chart (this chart was deleted when Billboard decided that the EP format was never going to catch on in the US). The EP section includes a photo of the cover of each EP ever to chart (heavy on Sinatra &amp; Presley). This chart petered out before the arrival of The Beatles. The Beatles, for those who care, charted 3 songs on the Bubbling Under the Hot 100, including &quot;I'm Down&quot;, the B-side to &quot;Help!&quot;, which topped the chart in 1965 at #101. If you want to get beyond the Hot 100, this book will satisfy. As with all of Whitburn's Billboard compilations, the depth of the information is stunning, going beyond simple peak position and weeks-on-the-chart info to include guest artists, info on each artist, and on and on
A beautiful adult fairy tale. I absolutely love this book. Its one of my favorites and I've reread it several times. Deerskin is such a heartbreakingly tragic character that at times I was moved to tears by her pain. McKinley handles the topic of incest and rape in an appropriate manner that isn't too graphic, but nonetheless conveys the point. The romance that develops between Deerskin and prince Ossin is poignant and heartwarming. When Deerskin reveals her true identity and what happened to her, Ossin isn't disgusted. In fact he's outraged and appalled on her behalf. He wants nothing but her love and to love her in turn. My only problem with this book was the ending. It seemed vaguely unfinished to me. I wish Ms. McKinley had provided an epilogue or something that told us what happened to Deerskin and Ossin. Did they marry? Did Lissla Lissar manage to accept and overcome what happened to her and thereby accept Ossin's love? At the end of the story she does stay with Ossin but she stills seems a bit flighty and I can't help but wonder if she doesn't panic and leave him again. But in spite of that minor flaw this book is an incredible story that I highly recommend to anyone. The plot is original as well as heartbreaking in its sadness and joy
Digging to America. I have an adopted Korean daughter, this book brought back memories, laughter, and coping with people's reaction to adopting a child of a different culture. Highly Recommend
best nutrition resource ever. I bought this book when it was first published, many years ago. Since then, I have probably bought 5 copies. It still remains one of the best sources for info and basic guide to what nutrition is all about. All of the writers books are good, but this is my favorite one. It really holds up to the test of time. Easy to understand
Good outweigh the not-so-good. Jeffrey Ford's "The Trentino Kid," starts things off on a slightly creepy note. It's about a guy who has frittered his youth away in what he thought was an easier route. He's regretting the choices he's made when he comes across a ghost that'll force his hand in a (hopefully) new direction. This is a story that'll resonate with anyone who wishes they had taken a different path years earlier. I know it certainly struck a nerve with me!Tanith Lee's "The Ghost In The Clock" is atmospheric as is her usual style and features a tale of a clock with a horrific past, a ghost and a good dose of madness. Descriptive writing, a creeping sense of unease make this one a chill inducing read."The Thing About the Night" just wasn't to my taste. Too scientific, me thinks."The Silence of the Falling Stars about a park ranger whom I didn't care for at all didn't work very well for me either, I'm afraid. I can't pinpoint where it went wrong. I just found it dull overall.Gahan Wilson's "The Dead Ghost" was a short and to the point recounting of an injured man's encounter with an overweight, naked ghost. I enjoyed this one, maybe because it was a nice breather after the previous two stories which I thought were both over long.Oates "Subway" is a haunting but somewhat familiar story of tragedy and a woman's never-ending search for love."The Seven Sisters" is a story about 7 formerly grand homes now falling to ruin. This one didn't resonate with me in any way and I can't really remember much else about it."Doctor Hood" was more accessible the the previous story. It's about a woman returning to her childhood home because she's worried about her increasingly distant father. It's about loss, letting go and features a good dose of ghostbusting. I enjoyed the originality of the end of this one."An Amicable Divorce" is a story rooted in tragedy and is deeply emotional. It's about a man still deeply in love with his ex-wife. Sadly, she isn't at all in a good place to return his love but calls him often and begs for help with a creature that is inhabiting their home late at night. This one gets under your skin and lives up to the promises made by the editor and, despite it's very gloominess, was probably my favorite."Feeling Remains" is about a young boy whose feminist mom seems more interested in everyone but him. After forcing him to care for an aging neighbor who dies, he's haunted by the old lady's treasured book of photos. This story, the neglect of the child, and the over-the-top selfishness of the mother annoyed the heck out of me."The Gallow's Necklace by Sharyn McCrumb" was a "past coming back to haunt you" type of ghost story that was very enjoyable. The idea of the Gallow's Necklace was so utterly chilling it won't be something easily forgotten."Brownie, and M" Charles Grant has always been a difficult read for me. His quiet style of horror didn't work for me when I was younger and more into the likes of Clive Barker & Poppy Z. Brite but this story, about a group of elderly friends who are all experiencing strange haunting phenomena, is disquieting in a way that kept me turning the pages. Or, maybe I'm finally old enough to appreciate him ;)"Velocity by Kathe Koja" Unlike Grant, I adored Kathe Koja's earlier work (Cipher and the lot) even though the style was extremely difficult to get into. She was always one of those love 'em or hate 'em type of writers who I happened to love. I worked my through her books of body modification and love affairs gone sour and always looked forward to more. Somewhere along the way I lost touch with her work and no longer have patience for the fractured writing style when I try to go back and re-read them. This story wasn't nearly as difficult as her longer novels but it didn't move me and isn't one I'll remember come tomorrow."Limbo by Lucius Shepard" is a novella length tale of a former criminal finding love. Or so he thinks. I loved the revenge theme of this one and how it all tied together so nasty-like at the end."The Hortlak by by Kelly Link" is the kind of weirdly quirky short story that I really enjoy. It's sort of a David Lynch-like version of "clerks". The world has been turned upside down, zombie's wander thru convenience stores, a strange clerk revels in bizarre pajamas, and a woman gives homeless dogs one last glimpse of fun and freedom. It's all very strange and doesn't always come together in a cohesive way but I couldn't turn the pages fast enough."Dancing Men by Glenn Hirshberg" is a coming of age/innocence lost type of story where one young boy has to face his grandfather's horrific memories of the Holocaust. This one is a gutwrencher because the horror here isn't of the invented variety.Though the book contains a few small duds, the majority of the stories were genuinely creepy
Essential tool. I work on implementing KM strategy, and always have this book at hand. It is an excellent, practical guide which I couldn't do without. I own many bookson KM and this is by far the most useful one. Well done to the author
Review for "The Four Agreements: A Practical Guide to Personal Freedom (A Toltec Wisdom Book)". I loved this book, so I bought another to give it as a gift to a good friend, and she loves it too!!  It is a very insightful and inspiring book
You too are called to communion. Called to Communion: Understanding the Church Today starts off with three theology lectures for a course on universal vs. particular Churches for bishops in Brazil, followed by an address to the Synod of Bishops on the priesthood, a talk on ecclesial reform to conclude an annual meeting in Rimini, and finally a homily preached at a seminary in Philadelphia which is added to "clarify once more the spiritual orientation of the whole book" (from the Foreword).  All of these events took place in 1990, but the material is as relevant, if not more so, today.The stated goal in the Foreword of offering "a sort of primer of Catholic ecclesiology" to "bring clarity and help in the crisis of ecclesial consciousness" is fulfilled in spades.  The nature of the book and the audiences it was directed toward originally does not allow Cardinal Ratzinger to go into the level of detail I would have like to have seen, but nevertheless he is quite successful at giving the reader a good overview of Catholic ecclesiology, particularly as it relates to the roles of bishops, priests, and the nature of true reform in the Church.In the first chapter he establishes the origin of the Church in Jesus, of course, by using not only Gospel testimony, but also Paul's doctrine of the Church as the Body of Christ, and the beginnings of Church functioning in the Acts of the Apostles.Chapter Two deals with Petrine primacy and the unity of the Church.  The author acknowledges the ecumenical difficulty of this question, but goes on to solidly show the status of Peter as "Rock", as head of the Twelve, and as keeper of the "keys" which he deals with at the greatest length of the three points.  Succession is one of the areas that would have been worth exploring more, but his appeal to early Christian writers Irenaeus and Eusebius is effective, and he hits a home run with this observation: "[I]t is impossible to avoid the idea of succession once the word is transmitted in Scripture is considered to be a sphere open to the future" (p. 67).The next chapter gets to the heart of the theology lectures: the universal and particular Churches and the role of the bishop.  Unsurprisingly, the Eucharist is seen as the heart of ecclesiology - it is the unifying factor.  Orthodox and Protestant views are contrasted with each other and the Catholic approach, and the conclusion is reached that "communio is catholic, or it simply doesn't exist at all" (p. 82).  The bishopric is traced back to Peter, James, and Paul, and then as now, the bishop is called to be a missionary of the whole Church, not just his local Church, and he must be ready to suffer as his Lord did.The essence of the priesthood is the topic of the fourth chapter.  This is a very full chapter.  He bemoans the fact that a new look back tried to justify the priesthood by looking at its biblical roots and deeming it a functional role only.  He provocatively states that this view was reached by Reformation-era arguments and exegesis largely nourished by Reformation presuppositions.  But while Cardinal Ratzinger recognized that the ministries seemed ill-defined in the early Church, he sees the foundation of ministerial office in apostleship: Jesus sent the apostles and gave them everything they had - he conferred the mission and himself as mission.  Apostolic succession is not treated in depth, but he uses solid passages from Acts, Peter, and Corinthians to stress the sacramental nature of bishops and priests.  He closes the chapter with some deeply moving reflections of a more spiritual nature (a must read for all priests).The last chapter deals with renewal of the Church, contrasting futile and authentic reform.  It is the best chapter in the book and one I'd like to get in the hands of every Catholic or anyone who wants to understand the pope's authentic view of reform and renewal.  A democratic Church that so many long for will never work: "A church based on human resolutions becomes a merely human church.  It is reduced to the level of the makeable, of the obvious, of opinion.  Opinions replace faith.  And in fact, in the self-made formulas of faith with which I am acquainted, the meaning of the words `I believe' never signifies anything beyond `we opine'" (pp. 139-140).  True reform is based on a full faith itself in the freedom that the Lord offers which is our true freedom.  Reform begins with each person through personal morality (liberation from sin, not guilt), forgiveness (imaging Jesus), and expiation (purification through pain and suffering in communion with Christ).The epilogue continues the theme of the last chapter, emphasizing the dangers of "factional strife" within the Church, instead calling us to be "coworkers of God" (it is clear where he came up with his episcopal motto "Fellow worker in the truth").This book is relatively short at 165 pages but very rich.  It is worth getting for everyone who wants to understand the authentic mind of the Church as enunciated by the current pontiff.
WEDDING GIFT. I bought this for my daughter, but ended up wanting to read it first.  Well organized and useful tips.  There were alot of helpful suggestions and sometimes you just need the thought and then you can run with an idea.  This book was helpful.  Everything from arrangements to vows
Great stories, good points, decent layout. Becoming a better negotiator is in everyone's best interest so when one of my students recommended Power of Nice, I was pretty excited about ordering it from Amazon and put it in the queue to read. I really enjoyed the stories in this book. Shapiro has been there, done that in some of the biggest and toughest negotiations in the sports world. If you are a baseball fan, it will bring back memories.  And I learned more from the stories than anything else.I have read this book twice, the first time it didn't quite click and I have a theory why. The book's content is pretty good, but the layout is terrible. I just finished reading a book by Addison Wesley press that had at least 4 times the number of facts per page and power of nice and as always the information was laid out professionally; it helps me to absorb the material.  There is another thing that is off putting is how the author keeps saying if you follow the principles in this book you'll get better results and more of what you want and similar.  Hey, I already bought the book, quite selling. It reminded me of Richard with his Refuse to Lose's 9 principles in Little Miss Sunshine.Another small problem and then I will start praising the book again.  They use a lot of initials, for instance, the three Ps.  Everyone who has ever read a business book knows the three Ps are product, price and positioning, but not here.  The three Ps in power of nice are prepare, probe and propose.However, I just came out of a fairly intense negotiation, I had read the entire book once and spent the days before the negotiation preparing.  I let the other side propose first, I probed and I proposed. It all worked.  So the book was certainly worth the $20.00 I paid for it and much, much more.  And I did get better results and more of what I wanted so Shapiro has every write to claim that.  I have not read a better book on negotiation, pick it up and deal with the layout already.
The Magnificiant Story of an Indian Girl!. The Rough Face Girl is a beutiful book.  It had alot of description and many morals hidden in the words of the book.  The young girl was despised by everyone in her village but she always stayed true to herself and others and she ended up with the best person that every girl wanted to marry.  I learned that true beauty comes from inside and if you are honest then good things will happen to you.  I also learned to be yourself because sooner or later people will start to accept who you are.  And I learned to remember that there is always room for improvment.  So in conclusion, I feel that this story can be enjoyed by young and old people
The cowboy life. Cities on the Plain is the final volume in Cormac McCarthy's Border Trilogy, a loosely tied together trio of novels that deal with life along the U.S.-Mexico border.  This novel focuses on the protagonists of each of the first two books - John Grady Cole from All the Pretty Horses and Billy Parham from the Crossing.  Now the two of them are working together on a ranch in New Mexico in the early 1950s.The rather sketchy plot involves Cole who has fallen hard for a Mexican prostitute.  His love for her has more than a little bit of obsession to it, and Cole is willing to risk all to be with her.  It is his eventual intent to bring her to the U.S. and marry her, although her pimp may have other ideas.At times, however, the story is secondary as we follow the other smaller adventures in these characters' lives.  McCarthy's great gifts are with his descriptive ability.  He is not always an easy read, however:  he never uses quotes to set off his dialogue and he uses a lot of Spanish, much of which is left untranslated and (for a non-Spanish speaker) can only be partially gleaned from context.Despite these difficulties, the book is somehow a pleasure to read (although it is probably the weakest in the trilogy).  In some ways it is reminiscent of the movie Brokeback Mountain, if only because it follows the rough life of modern cowboys.  Cole and Parham live tough lives with little hope of any permanence or prosperity, but they are also somewhat content with their choices.McCarthy is probably an overrated writer, with his distinct style providing an illusion of greater ability than he actually has.  But even if he is not great, he is still good and if you have the patience, you may find this an enjoyable book.
Millenium Madness!. One of the coolest books we've read in a good while, Norman Cohn's book talks about 'revolutionary millenarians and mystical anarchists of the middle ages.'That is, nutcases. From the flagellants to naked wandering  preachers to the disaffected masses who would march off to plunder Europe  and the Holy Land in the name of the Cross, this book is chock full of  instructive and highly amusing anecdotes about a staggering cross-section  of millenial lunacy. Not just for fun and games, though -- his bibliography  spans nearly a hundred pages and this is a classic historical work.  [HistoryHouse.com
Wasn't what I expected. The novel was great.  I enjoy all of Berg's work.  I think her characterization is beyond comparison.  I'm not sure what happened in this novel.  The story starts off like usual.  Karon is off leading a fight.  Seri is at home trying to raise their son, Gerik.  Then suddenly, Karon want's to kill Gerik.  Gerik flees to a new world, the Bounded.  Which is a really interesting place.  Nearly 1/2 of the book is spent in this new world, with Gerik trying to solve its problems.  Eventually he leaves the Bounded to solve his family problems as well as the problems of the other two worlds.The only problems I had with this book is that the world of the Bounded and the actual bad guy in the end of the story was never introduced.  I don't understand how these people could just pop up out of no where.Would this stop me from reading any other books from Berg?  Of course not.  Berg is still a very talented writer and will always be on my number one list of reads
quite useful. This is not a textbook and not intended to be one. It is a collection of board-type questions with lenghty explanations. I found it quite useful to test myself 2 months before I took the boards to discover my strenghts and weaknesses. There are many spelling mistakes and some inconsistencies, so it certainly would not hurt if the authors could review their book once more
Awsome. If you love Savage, you will love this one.Nicely done
Great Book. I thoroughly enjoyed this book from beginning to end.  Very "relatable" drama.  The characters felt real and I didn't want the book to end.  Not one wasted page on pointless details.  Loved IT
Best Chest Pathology Book on the Market. Excellent Images of pathologies. Expensive but worth the money.
Another fantastic book by Goodman. This is yet another fantastic book by author Linda Goodman.  I have this one among many others.  I enjoy her style and learning what I can from her writings on one of my favorite subject matters.  You will like this book and not regret the reading of it
Girls, read this now!. I wish I had this book when I was young. I want to give it to every teenage girl growing up in today's twisted world of skinny, shallow celebrity worship--and to every parent of every teen girl, and to every teen boy who blindly believes what he's told about what makes chicks cool and attractive. It's a rare treat to find a book on this subject that is smart without being preachy, informative without being pedantic, and provocative without being alienating. This is what teen magazines should be. This is what parenting guides should be. This is what we all should have been told as we entered puberty
A literary masterpiece. Perhpas I'm a bit behind the curve here, I mean Shogun has been published for quite some time, but given that I was a young lad during its height of popularity, maybe I can be forgiven somewhat?This is the book that launched me on my literary quest to read through Clavell's Asian saga and, arguably, the best of that saga (Tai Pan, King Rat, Noble House, Gai Jin).  I bought a used version of the book on a whim at a yard sale and it sat on my bookshelf for nearly a year before I finally decided to see what it was about.  Once I picked it up, I literally had trouble putting it down.  I took the book with me on vacation and it was here that I found that the version I had purchased was only the first volume of a two volume set!!  I immediately went out and purchased the whole book.Needless to say, I read the saga in chronological history as opposed to published history and found the whole series extremely entertaining.  Additionally, as a student of East Asian history, I found Clavell's historical fiction to be educational as well (much akin to Shaara's "The Killer Angels").  I recognize that it was not meant to be a historical document, but it certainly allows the layman to get a sense of Japanese history and culture.In short, despite being a doorstopping tome (and thank goodness it is, I think I would have gone through withdrawals if it were any shorter), I cannot give enough praise to this book
Great book about design. This book give you a solid base to be a good designer, inside it you can read about theories and principles of design with a lot of real-world pratical solutions.The book covers the principles of scale, balance, repetition and proximity; the elements of shape, line, size, color, texture, imagery and typography. At the end of each chapter you have a real-world project to do and a list of questions about the chapter.At all I can say that this book is a must have and much better than the "Design for non-Designers" book.
Great for horse lovers everywhere!. I loved this book! It had cool stories about girls and their horses. I love horses and this book told me about what other girls do to take care of their horses. I also loved the horse trading cards, hey had many differnt kinds of horses on them. I also learned many things you can do on a horse. I think that if you love horses than this is for sure the perfect book for you!! I also loved all the full colored pictures. I would recommend this book fo everybody! -kriste
Honest and clear reporting - strongly recommended. Gerald Posner is a fine reporter who takes on issues from which others flee.  Because he reports without an agenda, those who have a vested interest in a certain point of view (whether emotional or monetary) attack him in all kinds of ways.  When you examine the criticisms you will see that they all fail.  For example, a New York Times review of this book tries the old canard that most of what is here has been reported before.  Right.  So, the average reader is supposed to look up thousands of news articles and hundreds of books to get a handle on what Mr. Posner provides for us here so concisely and clearly in about 225 pages (including end notes)?That review also admitted that Posner was breaking new ground in his reporting of the Saudi ruling powers' plan for destroying their oil wells if their power is ever challenged.  When you read this book I am sure the chapter on the Petro SE (scorched earth) report will be fascinating and disturbing.  While no one knows if the intelligence intercepted is real or false information the Saudi's wanted believed, it has crucial implications for the world economy if such a loss of oil production capacity were to occur.The bottom line is that unless you are an expert on Saudi politics you do not know what is in this book and it is in your interest to know this stuff.  So, I believe you will want to get a hold of this book and read it.The title refers not to tabloid sensationalism but to the fact that the rulers of Saudi Arabia are extremely closed and operate in secrecy as opaque as their money, power, and influence can provide.  Their public statements and the actions they take are for managing their image and have little to do with what they say and do behind the scenes.The author carefully explains the very recent and somewhat strange origins of the house of Saud with its ties to Wahhabi fundamentalist Islam from its very beginnings.  With the rise of importance of oil in the twentieth century, Saudi Arabia has also had a deep internal conflict.  How to be involved with the Western world - viewed by them as Crusaders, no less - and still remain true to their extreme vision of a pure Islam.On one hand, they want the power and wealth from the oil, but they want to keep the world out.  They need the Western world to help them extract the oil, but they want to spread a primitive vision of Islam around the globe using the power and wealth the oil gives them.  They insist on a program of education for their population that has a deeply racist view of the entire non-Muslim world, but many in the royal family live their lives outside the kingdom in deep hypocrisy (booze, women, gambling, and wasteful spending).  They also depend on the wealth and power of their ties with the West to keep the family of Saud in power, yet their fostering of Islamist fundamentalism also brings unrest and challenge to the Royal Family.  You can see the 6,000 Princes of Saud are a portrait self-opposition.  Posner does a fine job of showing us the subtleties of all these internal contradictions.Americans should also be concerned about what their government keeps from them to protect the House of Saud.  Their investments in the United States are not only not reported by our government (by an agreement reached with our government to be treated as an exception), the Saudi's also invest through complicated and secretive chains of corporate offshore entities.  Posner says that one reasonable estimate of their holdings is around $600 billion.  Of course, what else are they going to do with all the dollars we and others ship them for their oil?  They have to put them somewhere.  Are we better off having them here or elsewhere?  Still, it is disquieting that our government helps keep this information from us.  We have learned by sad experience that secrecy and opaqueness seldom lead to good ends.  Transparency and openness are healthy and in the interests of our citizenry.  We should insist that the Saudi's acquisitions and spending in our economy be accounted for openly so the American Citizens can make proper assessments for themselves on whether they are good for us or if some other course of action should be taken.The extent of the Saudi's support for the other side in our War on Terror is also complex.  Many Saudi's do not recognize their own role in fostering 9/11.  In fact, many still believe and promote the idea that America attacked itself that awful day to support the Zionists.  Sure, it is a crazy notion, however, it is a notion that is believed by powerful people.  We simply dismiss this to our own hurt.In his previous book (also strongly recommended), "Why America Slept", Posner reported on the capture and interrogation of Abu Zubaydah.  He opens this book with a recap of this incident and reports on the amazing coincidental deaths of all those named by Zubaydah as contacts.  They died on the operating table, in plane crashes, and car accidents.  Make of it what you will.  However, it is clear that Islamic charities are not charities in the Western sense and that money flows from Saudi Arabia into channels that are used by those who oppose us.  Not because the Saudi's are hoodwinked, but because ideologically the Saudi's are indeed in opposition to us.  We have to face the fact that while we need their oil and they want our money and much else, we are not aligned in all interests, views, or purposes.  Nevertheless, they have also, at times, taken heat in the Arab world doing things to help the United States, as well.  While they may not be our direct enemy, they are certainly not our unqualified friends.Posner does a superb job in presenting these complex realities.  He does not pull punches, and he demonstrates how all American administrations and both political parties have participated in accommodating the Saudis.  Most disturbing are the names Posner provides of prominent Americans who have profited and continue to profit from supporting Saudi interests in the US.  It is disturbing because the work these paid agents are doing would not be perceived by the average American as being in America's interests.  Maybe they could be persuaded if someone trusted them with the facts, however, it is treated as a public relations problem with massive lobbyist support and complicit efforts to keep the true scope of the Saudi impact on our economy secret.I also urge you to read the footnotes.  There are lists of names of prominent Saudi's donating to terrorist groups and a lot of other great information in these notes.  Posner also provides a very useful bibliography for further reading
Gore's Best Book. I could not put this book down. I heard Gore read a section at the Mamagathering in LA this summer. I bought a signed copy from her at her table and started reading the book that evening. The other reviewers are right that the book is part memoir and part travel story. If you are looking for something different and compelling read this book
Patterson switches up big time. Known for his murder mysteries, Patterson and co-author Andrew Gross decided to try something new and have given us a fun, fast-paced adventure set in war-torn medieval Europe.Hugh De Luc is a happily married innkeeper until he heads off to fight in the Crusades. The gruesome fighting and wanton disregard for life change and sicken him so he deserts and heads home only to find his wife taken captive and his infant son dead.At this point, Patterson is on more familiar ground. Hugh De Luc must find out who did it and try to bring him to justice. Unfortunately, medieval customs and laws interfere with that search. Throw in some religious relics and a menacing group of French knights who believe they are condemned to hell and you have the indgredients for a fine book.Patterson's descriptions of medieval life ring true, although the ending may not have worked out so well in a real medieval scenario. Nevertheless, it was lots of fun and a big improvement over the Women's Murder Club series.I give this one a grade of A
Shiloh. Shiloh                               By: Phyllis Reynolds Naylor Copyright                           Publisher Kirkus Reviews 1991ShilohI think Shiloh is an amazing book because I like to read about dogs. What do you like to read about? Shiloh is the main character, he is a wonderful little beagle. Marty is the boy who finds Shiloh and names him. He is always a curious little critter.Marty found Shiloh because he runs away from his owner Judd, who abused him. Marty takes good care of Shiloh. He gets very attached to Shiloh so he offers Judd some money but he turns it down. So Marty makes a deal with Judd to work for him to get Shiloh. When he finished Judd denied it and said that he was still going to take Shiloh back!If you want to find out what happens next you have to read Shiloh. I recommend this book to people that like to read about animals. I hope that you read Shiloh, because it is a classic story. I like this book because it is very heartwarming, I hope you do too!Samantha Corcoran
O'Rourke Is Masterful. Being an avid reader of O'Rourke's material, I must say this book is one-of-a-kind.  It is written in the style of Oliver Wendell Holmes' "The Autocrat of the Breakfast Table" which was a brilliant collection of essays and observations of life.  As O'Rourke notes, "Holmes pulled this off with so much wit and charm that there was only one way I could pay his idea the compliment it deserved.  I swiped it."P.J.'s own collection of essays features Holmes-like alter-egos ("The Political Nut" browbeating the Democrat neighbors and frustrating O'Rourke's wife makes for some of the best one-liners in the book) and collections of O'Rourke's own superbly-written essays.  From travels through India (beware the customs officials) to the U.N. Millenium Summit ("At the UN they put butter on their bagels.  No wonder these people can't achieve peace in the Middle East."), O'Rourke's own wit and charm somehow makes sense of senseless situations.  But please, don't believe that this book is only for the ivory-tower intellectual clique -- essays are included which feature everything from a Drunken Wine Tasting Test to helpful automotive tips.  ("Use a lighter weight oil in the winter.  Johnson's Baby Oil, for instance.  Rub this all over somebody cute, stay home, and forget about starting the car.")The book's politics will primarily delight Republicans and irritate Democrats, although anyone who can laugh at political absurdity will find this a great read no matter what their personal political leanings.  O'Rourke dissects (and flambes) Hillary Clinton's book "It Takes a Village," he offers his own arbitration of the 2000 Presidential debacle, the topic of Social Security privatization is discussed (an unintentionally relevant topic four years later), and the last chapter of the book is rife with all the sardonic partisanship one would ever need to convulse on the floor with laughter.In short, this book covers a year's worth of topics, and before you realize it you've read the whole book in one sitting.  Quite fitting, from someone who describes the theme of his book as being "One year in the life of a man who said, 'Mind if I put my feet up?  I think I will take this lying down.'
Unbiased book on the subject. The author covers a long period of this one century old conflict. He makes alot of efforst in maintaining an unbiased view of the events, and covers the the important events and incidents of this conflict. This book can be used as a good starting point to learn about the enormous web of people, events, plots, plans, wars that shaped and still shaping this conflict without a forseeable end
The best book available for preparing for surgery. This book contains all the latest information on preparing for surgery and increasing the liklihood of a successful outcome.  It is written in an easy-to-use workbook format.  Recommended for anyone who is facing a  surger
You can't top this one on the subject!. Dr. Morey exposes false views and presents the clear Biblical teaching on Death and the Afterlife. Exceeding that which is writen in the Bible causes much confusion. Anyone wanting to know all that can be known, without exceeding what the Bible teaches, should read this book. Also, a clear description of all opposing points of view is given. Christians will be amazed at the error that is taught, or not taught, on this subject
Small, but full of useful information  :). I visited NYC for the first time a few weeks ago. I took only three books about this city with me:  this guide, the "Lonely planet NYC Guide", and "The Metropolitan Museum of Art Guide". Truth to be told, this guide is probably the only one I couldn't have done without."Top 10 New York" is an extremely useful small guide that doesn't have as much information as the "Lonely planet NYC Guide", but that has the essentials, and excellent fold out maps in color that are more easily understandable than those of other guides. I would like to highlight the fact that even though I am very absent minded, I could easily find my way in NYC thanks to those maps. And if I can, everybody will be able to do that!From my point of view, this guide is ideal for those tourists that don't have a lot of time, and want to see as much as possible during their visit to NYC (specifically Manhattan), if possible without a tourist guide. "Top 10 New York" points out quite a few places you simply must go to in the city, but also tells you about different neighbourhoods, and their history. There are many photos in color that help you to decide what you want to do, and historic data that allows you to learn about this city.Moreover, most visitors will find the insider tips for tourists helpful, and the planned walks and itineraries a good option. Other useful sections in this guide are, for example, "Best shopping districts", "Best hotels for every budget" (I found my hotel through Internet, though), "Best restaurants in each area" and "Most fun places for children". What is more, "Top 10 New York" is almost pocket-sized, so you can carry it with you everywhere, even if your purse is tiny (not my case!), or if you have bought too many things and your handbag is rather heavy (yes, that often happens to me).All in all, I am very happy I bought this guide, and I strongly recommend it to you  :)Belen Alca
Disregard David Foley. David Foley's response is typical of the self-important, know-it-all Westerner.  Tell any amount of lies about Calcutta to these people (as the charity industry does all the time) and they'll believe it.  Some of them will send money to Mother Teresa with tears flowing from their eyes; a few might even pack their bags and go out to save the poor heathens from themselves.  (As Foley seems to have done.)  But say one good thing about Calcutta and the Foleys of the world will condemn you for being 'nationalistic' or worse.  Judge Krishna Dutta's book on its merits, not on the basis of what some self-appointed Western pundit thinks.
Make time!. Phillip Larkin rocks.  When I was a sophmore in college I burned down my dorm room and my copy of High Windows.  It was truly tragic. This slim little volume contains some of Larkin's best work.  It is wry, revealing,  and sardonic in true Larkin fashion.  I particularly like the title poem  and None of the Books Have Time.  Also, there's one in there about the  stubborn stupidity of old folks that is absolutely delightful and hilarious  though the title escapes me at the moment.  Anyway, this small book that  won't take up either much time to read or much space on the shelf is a  delightful and highly recommended piece.  One of my all-time favorites
Adventuresports Institute "Text". I utilize this book as the text for my Winter Adventure Skills course at the Adventuresports Institute of Garrett College.  Very entertaining and full of wonderful winter camping tips.  Not just for backcountry skiing, useful for all aspects of winter backcountry travel
Once in a Life time. This book is a wonderful read.  There are times it is a tad slow but it is a literary read and a great great choice.  I have only been attached to one other book this way
If you can't stand the heat... I appreciate Caroline's honesty in this work.  She does not attempt to placate anyone and is forthcoming with her beliefs.  It is a welcome relief to hear someone speak from an attitude of "give-give-give," rather than worn "take-take-take," of recent best sellers.  We are a self-absorbed people who really do need to stop and reflect on how we can best help others on their journey on this planet; and not just "human" others.  The animals and our planet itself is in dire need of our compassion.Kudos, Caroline.  It is nice to find someone with the courage to tell it like they believe it is and let the chips fall where they may.
Powerful Teaching Resource. Whether you're in elementary or high school, being homeschooled, or run a business, this is the best supplemental text on grammar to have on hand.  I learned so much from it in such a short period of time.  It focused on all the grammatical problems we have when presenting or writing. I own a Ford dealership and have copies of this book all around the showroom and in each of my sales associates' office for use as a quick reference. I want my staff to sound educated and act with class. Speaking poor grammatically isn't the answer. Buy this book.  I don't usually review or recommend books but I'm making an exception in this case
A rational and a voice with clarity. We see a lot of violence on a daily basis (all we need to do is tune in to the news.) Most of this violence is by extremist groups; groups especially associated with religions, followed closely by ethnicity. There is a lot of reconciling that needs to be done between the "official" projection of these religions by our respective (and respectful) governments as 'peaceful' and the apparent violence with which these terrorist acts are inflicted on the general public by these "religious" groups.The solutions to these problems are neither simplistic nor easy, as our governments, in all their simplemindedness, assume. It seems they are clueless at times. Sen, who resides in a land not of his ancestors, must be acutely aware of the role of identity in shaping individuals and their allegiances. And as an economist he knows the 'choices' that people take through out a typical day even while not aware of the constraints in which they are operating. An ideal confluence which benefits the reader's anxiousness for understanding.The proposal that individuals have different identities -- act and shaped by them -- is fairly easy to convince (because in retrospect it seems obvious.  Although a lot of us don't know what we are missing.) It does seem like he belabors this point repeatedly; but that isn't tedious and is excusable.Sen's proposals as to how the governments (specifically, the British) can deal with ethnic and religious 'hot potato issues' are worth taking a look at. (It seems like some govts. are doing the exact opposite of what needs to be done. Hence, inadvertently exacerbating the issues.) We get a revealing sense into how people tick and sometimes are ticked-off. Those lessons can be used in finding solutions to our own problems in which ever part on this earth we are. To me this looks like a global epidemic and rarely do seemingly disparate problems have a common method as solutions.My disappointment with this book is that Sen doesn't go too deeply into some issues he mentions in passing. However, that might be of relief to people only interested in the overarching phenomenon and not, for example, interested too much about British policies
Better than the Left Behind Series. This series is great.  The first book and the second, Europa Conspiracy, is awesome.  It is a religous Indiana Jones and is action packed.  I would highly recommend this book and series
there is no question. I treated myself to this book for its relationship with and inclusion of many subjects of my interest:  photography, folk & bluegrass music, roots culture, beat culture, NYC 60s art culture, & exotic travel.  When I read the description here, I thought, "wow, this sounds like one hell of a great book, tailored to my passions."  Well, it's better than that.  John Cohen is one lucky guy to have witnessed & recorded all that's in this book.  The text is adequately sparse (for a 200-page book), but well-written and provides just enough accompaniment for the fascinating photography reproduced here.  Regardless the title, looking through John Cohen's eyes is an ecstatic experience, taking one away to seemingly faraway times and places, especially for someone who was born in the 1970s (me).  There is a story within each image, and the large scale of the prints makes you want to crawl inside each one and figure out what's going on.  It's an Italian-made book, which explains the high quality; and it's the best ($) I've spent since Dylan was last in town
AGSamantha from Cutchogue by Mary. "The Christmas that never was!" {Says my sister}. All because of Pearl Harbor, this happened. The story starts in April in 1942 and retraces back to December right about the time of the Pearl Harbor disaster.  It gives you a full recount of the disaster.Journal of Ben Uchida: Citizen 13559 Mirror Lake Internment Camp. {By: Barry Denenberg} is a great book for historical fiction fans.  It's also a great book to tell you what life was like in the Internment Camps during the period of time after Pearl Harbor happened.  The author has a superb way of giving details about people, places, and things.  Barry has a way of making you feel your actually there.The theme of this book is: what life was like for a Japanese child in California after Pearl Harbor happened.  Another is that if you were in an internment camp, then you didn't know where you were or where you would go, you were just told to get on a train with the belongings you could carry.  You also had to share an apartment with another family and the apartment wasn't that big.  You had to stand in line for everything like take a shower and get your food.  Is the kind of life you want to live?  I don't think so.So if you like World War 2 books this is a good book for you.  It has mystery, friendship, and adventure. All the things a book in diary form and even any book should require.  It also has some cliffhangers after some diary entries and you are always wondering what is going to happen next. To me it is a very good book.
This book is a very helpful for those who are interested in. This is a very good introduction to steganography and watermarking. The book is well organized. Moreover, many researchers who have been studied in this field contribute to this book. I think this book gives a comprehensive understanding to people who want to study on watermarking
Good Crichton, not his best. Intriguing as always, exciting from the first page, strong for the first 2/3rds and less "editorializing" than usual, but it's just not as good as his higher concept novels. But it's still very enjoyable all the way through, and as always makes you think. It feels a little dated now, but I re-read it last week and enjoyed it just as much as the first time. Sphere should definitely be a part of any Crichton fan's library. Skip the movie, though. Here, the science is less "convincing" than in Jurrassic Park (which is mostly convincing, but stretched) and Prey (which is better writing and fun, but not convincing). But that doesn't matter, because Crichton can write an adventure like few others (as long as character isn't important--character's here take backseat to concept and science). Pace, as always is good. More a rollicking adventure than "something to think about" (typical of later novels) and quite enjoyable on that level. It's the kind of novel you'll tear through in a weekend at most.  And that's a good thing
Excellent, Comprehensive Resource. This work is an excellent overview of Islamic societies.  Also, it is highly readable for a history book.  Of course, it can get dull at times just as all really detailed history books must, but this work remains highly lucid throughout.  The strongest breakthrough of this book concerns its treatment of the Arabization of Middle East and the developement of what we know as the modern Arab identity.  However, to typify in a few sentence as book of this scope is impossible.  Once you read it, you will find yourself going it back to it again and again for reference and for understanding modern events
honestly biased. I just finished reading Terry Eagleton's Literary Theory: an Introduction for the third time in 10 years, and was even more impressed than before. I agree to a large extent with the other reviewers on this thread who called Eagleton to task for his obvious biases. From the beginning of the book, however, Eagleton makes it clear that his is a biased history of modern literary theory. While he eventually slams most of the theories he presents for one reason or another, he also has the admirable ability to present each theory in a favorable light before saying what he thinks is wrong with it. Again and again I found myself won over by a theory only to have it torn apart, after which he would present the next theory and I would say "Ah! Now this is more like it" - at which time he would pull the rug out from under that one.The important thing to keep in mind when studying any account of critical theory, including and especially this one, is to be critical. It would be as much of a mistake to take Eagleton's word as gospel as it would anyone else's. If you read this with what psychologist Charles Tart called an "open mind, discriminating mind," It's a fine overview of a dense and potentially hermetic field of study. Eagleton doesn't provide the final word on any of these theories, but I think this book is an excellent jumping-off point for further inquiry
Nancy Drew for adults. If you enjoyed Nancy, Bess, George and Ned as a child you will find comparable delight with Mariah Stewart's books.  Moderate suspense, minimal gore, unoffensive language, steamless romance and characters who fight for truth and justice without the aid of pyrotechnics.  A nice change-up from the standard twisted fare that has become the norm
The Ugly Duckling. I read the book The Ugly duckling by Jerry Pinkney.The book is about a ugly duckling,everyone is mean to him. One day he got fed up with them  so he ran away to a pond but there was a shoot off . So he immediately ran off. After awhile he came across a old ladies house. Her animals were mean to him so he went to a pond.In the winter he froze and a farmer gets him out.He did not like them either so he ran away. In the spring he finds out he  is a wonderful swan.I enjoyed the book because I never heard the part when he got frozen. The theme is never be down about the way you look because you might  look better when you get older. This book didn't have good word choice and all the words were easy I liked that.The conflict is he is ugly and everyone is mean to  him.The illustrations were very full. the character is the ugly duckling. There are many different version. The intended audience is kids who are not beautiful so they don't feel bad about themselves
Stunning Short Stories from Stephen King... Everything's Eventual,  $7.99 US by Stephen King, should be required reading in all university writing courses. The fourteen stories in this specific anthology are exemplary. In his brief intro, King asserts the short story is a dwindling art form; hundreds of publications (pulps, digests, weeklies) used to feature them -- but few do in 2006. I agree wholeheartedly with King. For each magazine that announces they'll accept short fiction again, I could easily name two that've died. If short story authors aren't rewarded by paying markets, the format might disappear completely. And it's difficult getting an anthology published nowadays -- even if you're Stephen King. Some of these stories appeared first in 999, Blood & Smoke, Legends, Fantasy & Science Fiction, and USA Weekend.Very few authors have the range Mr. King possesses: one tale herein is about a teen assassin and his employment through an Illinois sub-contractor that's relocated him to Ohio for nefarious purposes; one story is set in 1914 and revolves around a young boy that goes to fish for trout in a stream, where he's then menaced by a riverbank encounter with the devil; one chronicle concerns the author of a popular series of books that has hired an attorney to compel a reticent hotel manager to grant him a stay in a haunted room; one story is about a married couple from New York City engaged in a bitter divorce; yet another turns around a man's friendship with John Dillinger and other Depression-era gangsters.Even though I appreciate all fourteen stories, I'm only going to tackle five. I just want to tease you a little. I'll begin with Everything's Eventual, (54 pages) which is the second longest contribution. King offers up this story in twenty parts marked by roman numerals, which works for some reason. Dinky Earnshaw is our protagonist. One night -- while he's home viewing Coogan's Bluff -- Dink gets a phone call from Mr. Sharpton of TransCorp. When they hit it off, Dinky agrees to embark on a career in Ohio, (free car, free groceries, free house) after the corporation hones his extraordinary talent. Turns out Dink has this weird ability to write specialized symbol-laden letters that penetrate your mind, killing you if you read them.Next up is the impressive "The Man in the Black Suit." This more literary story appeared in The New Yorker and later appeared in Year's Best Fantasy & Horror 1995 before being reprinted here. This story won first prize in the O. Henry Best Short Story competition for 1996, but Stephen King thought someone had made a mistake. That's hard for me to believe though, since this pre-World War I story about the innocence of a bygone era is so vividly captured by King. Our protagonist here is an elderly man named Gary that pens a story in his diary about the time he encountered the devil in the woods in 1914, and was scared stiff by the devil's appetite, demeanor, and lies. Spooky stuff!The yarn I'm going to summarize next is "1408." I'll note this in passing, but this is the third story in the anthology that is hotel/motel related. This is significant because King exploits this device to remove his protagonists -- like Mike Enslin -- from the familiar; placing them in transitional spaces like `fish out of water.' If you take the numbers in 1408 and add them together, you'll also notice they total 13. In this story, 1408 is a haunted room on the thirteenth floor of the Hotel Dolphin. Supposedly nobody's rented this NYC room since 1978. Why's that? Many deaths have occurred in this particular room. Highly inventive concept! I understand this will soon be a major motion picture starring John Cusack.Unless you're a divorce lawyer, you'll get a kick out of "Lunch at the Gotham Cafe." This story is the real screamer of the bunch. Like the device used in the hotel stories, King instead removes protagonist Steven Davis from his marriage to Diane Coslaw. In rebellion against imminent divorce, Steven then decides to quit smoking during this highly stressful period in his life. Needless to say, the combination of stress and withdrawal are heightened by the marital discord which almost knocks him off center. When Steven and Diane are scheduled to meet for lunch at the Gotham Cafe in NYC with their respective attorneys -- Steven's attorney John Ring bails at the last minute (family emergency) -- disaster and hilarity soon ensue.And last but not least, I found the pulp-tinged "The Death of Jack Hamilton" to be exquisitely written. Our protagonist in this yarn is one Homer Van Meter, and he'll regale you with remembrances of his "bank robbing days" when he used to run with Babyface Nelson, Dock Barker, John Dillinger, Jack Hamilton, Red Hamilton, Harry Pierpont and a moll named Rabbits. You'll be laughing along with King as he narrates how Homer and Dillinger's crew fled a shootout in Wisconsin. But there's even more -- there's pathos! Homer was a witness to the shooting of Jack Hamilton. He relays how they tried to save his life, but ultimately failed. If you read this, you'll realize even low criminals have a conscience of sorts.Look. If you pick up Everything's Eventual, and find yourself enjoying it, do yourself a favor and place Stephen King's latest book, or a copy of his son Owen's first novella in your shopping cart on Amazon.com! I understand Stephen's publisher granted him a first printing of one million copies, so there are high expectations for this particular novel. It's likely to debut at #1 on the New York Times Bestseller List before month's end. I understand this new novel blends gothic horror, marriage and romance; two of these three topics being fresh territory for King. Since I've read dozens of King's bestsellers, I look forward to anything new he releases that might hint at variation
One of the Best books out on Palmistry. This book is well thought out and explained.  The art of palmistry is often complicated to explain, but this book takes the reader through it step by step.  In being a palmist myself there is little criticism I can find in this excellent book
Biotech Needs "The ImmorTalist Manifesto". Brian Alexander mentions "The ImmorTalist Manifesto" by Elixxir (also on Amazon) in his book.  And rightly calls it a "classic."What is lacking so far for biotech is a new worldview which makes sense of it.  And which explains its benefits, and its potential to help us achieve humankind's oldest dream -- the conquest of Old Age and Death."The ImmorTalist Manifesto" is this new post-Mortalist worldview we've been waiting for.Read for yourself.  This is the book the neo-Luddites, the Vatican, and the Christian Fundamentalist are afraid of.  I find it brilliant and breathtaking and inspiring.  Brian Alexander was right to call "The ImmmorTalist Manifesto"  -- even this early on -- a "classic."  It has the potential to do to the new Biotech age what the "Wealth of Nations" and "The Communist Manifesto" did for the Industrial Age.
Excellent Tips for Conscious Dating. Conscious Dating is filled with excellent tips and advise for consciously choosing a partner. It takes you through the process step by step. I highly recommend this book for anyone who wants to step out of their old dating and relationship patterns and find their life partner
This is a book you'll want to read again and again. You'll feel like you just had a scintillating dinner conversation with some of the top players in the publishing industry. This book is firmly grounded in reality and offers so much more than a pseudo-"sure-fire formula" for hitting bestseller lists-- it offers real insight into the ways success flourishes. This is a book you'll want to read again and again to glean new pieces of wisdom each time.[...
Strange flowers (In Spanish). La experiencia surrealista toma lugar en la ciudad que Aragon la reconstruye estticamente en una potica de la fragmentacin.  La imaginacin de la ciudad no es de ninguna manera simblica sino que responde al sustrato material de la experiencia fragmentada:  "En el centro de este mundo de cosas est el ms soado de sus objetos, la misma ciudad de Pars."  Las imgenes en el surrealismo adquieren un sentido profundamente histrico aun cuando su contexto sea ensoado como naturaleza simblica, como "bosque de smbolos" (Baudelaire) o mitologa moderna, por cuanto la historicidad de las imgenes surrealistas son el contenido latente de una realidad transformada en realidad onrica: "Ningn rostro es surrealista en el grado en que lo es el verdadero rostro de la ciudad." . Las imgenes son las alegoras ensoadas de la ciudad en el cual se proyecta la melancola y el mundo fragmentado de la calle. El Paysan de Paris proveniente del campo a la ciudad no es un simple recurso narrativo: pone en evidencia la diferencia entre ambos contextos de experiencia que servir de fuerte contraste y excelente ejemplo del cambio que sufri la consciencia esttica en el siglo XIX, el tiempo de los passages, esto es, la transicin de una esttica basada en la naturaleza con Kant y el Romanticismo hacia una esttica del artificio que parte con Baudelaire hacia los surrealistas, pasando por Mallarm, Rimbaud, Valry y los simbolistas.Aragon comienza su libro con un prefacio a una nueva mitologa, una mitologa moderna que desprecia toda certeza cartesiana del conocimiento y aboga por una primaca de la imaginacin.  Puesto que la razn descansa, para Aragn, en el error fundamental de que la realidad es la certeza, la evidencia, a partir de aqu el error se define con relacin a esta pretensin de evidencia que es al mismo tiempo pretensin de autonoma subjetiva:"Cette ombre, de laquelle il prtend se passer pour dcrire la lumiere, c'est l'erreur avec ses caracteres inconnus, l'erreur qui, seule, pourrait tmoigner a celui qui l'aurait envisage de la fugitive realit...L'erreur s'accompagne de certitude.  L'erreur s'impose par l'evidence.  Et tout ce qui se dit de la verit, qu'on le dise de l'erreur: on ne se trompera pas davantage. Il n'y aurait pas d'erreur sans le sentiment meme de l'evidence.  Sans lui on ne s'arreterait jamais a l'erreur"Sin embargo la razn est habitada por  flores extraas que corresponden con los errores de los sentidos: Admirables jardins des croyances absurdes, des pressentiments, des obsessions et des dlires donde nacen, para Aragon, dioses desconocidos que, a excepcin de los antiguos son susceptibles al tiempo, pertenecen al mundo profano de la historia humana, donde des mythes nouveaux naissent sous chacun de nos pas.  Este es el reino de la imaginacin donde ella no se ocupa no ms del pensamiento y de la afirmacin de la subjetividad sino de estas transformaciones despreciadas.  La imaginacin surrealista es el origen de la mitologa moderna, pero es una mitologa que es autoconsciente y que va en contra del pretendido desencantamiento de la cultura moderna.  Ah est su actualidad histrica.  La surrealidad consciente es simplemente una respuesta objetiva al reencantamiento del mundo social de la industria que no se piensa como tal, sino que de acuerdo con Max Weber, es pura racionalizacin, Entzauberung.  An ms, precisamente la visin surrealista pone en evidencia el carcter encantado del mundo capitalista, su reactivacin de los poderes mticos.  La mitologa moderna de Aragon es precisamente transformar, mediante su potica de la ensoacin y su concepcin del azar objetivo, l'hasard objectif, el mundo racionalizado en un mundo mtico, de la misma manera que Adorno y Horkheimer hicieron filosficamente en la Dialektik der Aufklrung.   La imaginacin de esta manera trasciende la subjetividad racionalizadora y revela, mediante sus correspondencias con los objetos, realidades y puntos de vista susceptibles de ser utilizados como elementos crticos.   El contexto urbano de la obra surrealista revela, primero, una perspectiva diferente de la imaginacin que no puede ser explicada a partir de trminos simblicoso metafricos; segundo, un contexto de experiencia diferente (el urbano) que no instituye una esttica de la serenidad y del desinters, esto es, una esttica moral (Kant), sino una esttica del shock, poltica, vanguardista y; tercero, una depotenciacin del sujeto potico, autnomo de s mismo que incluye una depotenciacin de la bondad de la naturaleza que ya no dicta de ninguna manera las reglas al genio.   Este contexto urbano afecta la perspectiva de la imaginacin de dos maneras, primero, que la imaginacin al ensoar la ciudad como mitologa precisamente revela lo ms objetivo de la realidad: la fantasmagora de la mercanca que se abstrae de toda relacin social de trabajo, y que, precisamente la racionalidad objetivante de las estructuras sociales modernas se transforman en lo ms subjetivo y arbitrario: el encantamiento que trae consigo el progreso y el consumo.Basado en los escritos de Max Weber, ha sido lugar comn en teora social decir que la esencia de la modernidad es la desmitificacin y el desencantamiento del mundo social. Sin embargo, basado tambin en la visin surrealista, podemos decir que la industrializacin ha trado un reencantamiento del mundo social. La surrealidad, como veremos, es implcitamente objetiva y crtica porque implica un reencantamiento de esta clase de mundo. Es paradjica porque mediante la ensoacin y el mito propio de la experiencia surrealista se pone en evidencia precisamente el carcter encantado y mtico del mundo capitalista. Y esta ambigedad la puede llevar, con todo us  rigor, la imaginacin.  Lo   ms   subjetivo,   la   imaginacin   surrealista,   revela  lo   ms  objetivo,   la   naturaleza   mitolgica  de   la   industria; y lo ms objetivo, la estructura racionalizada de la sociedad de mercado, revela lo  ms  subjetivo y fantasmagrico:   la naturaleza encantada de la mercanca donde se abstrae toda relacin social de mercado, us "objetividad fantasmtica" (Marx).  As, mediante el mismo ensueo ocurre una depotenciacin del sujeto del entendimiento autnomo, mediante el privilegio de la imaginacin que revela, paradjicamente, mejor la objetividad.  Las tres variaciones anteriores: una perspectiva nueva de la imaginacin (1) procedente del contexto especfico de experiencia de la ciudad (2), que implica una esttica del shock que desvaloriza la unidad racional, desinteresada y contemplativa del sujeto (3); podemos unirlas en la tesis, que es a la vez de este ensayo, de que la constitucin de las imgenes en el Surrealismo por  ms, digmoslo as, subjetiva y mtica que sea, es, paradjicamente, muy objetiva e histrica.  Esto de dos maneras: una, en cuanto que la imaginacin es la base para instaurar la fragmentacin del sujeto mediante la ensoacin potica y segundo, que la imaginacin en correspondencia con el objeto revela dimensiones desconocidas de ste y que es por tanto, ms objetiva en cuanto no existe una primaca del sujeto sobre el objeto mediante el concepto.  Ms objetiva la imaginacin que la razn porque sta ltima usa el objeto para tener certeza de s misma.  El objeto es el medio de la autoconocimiento de la razn que, al final se desecha por irrelevante.  De esta manera, la imaginacin llevada a cabo en el contexto ciudadano revela dimensiones fantsticas debido a la esencial extraeza en que el sujeto se pone frente a lo urbano.  Estas dimensiones fantasmagricas, onricas, sirven al mismo tiempo para establecer una visin mtica de la ciudad y la modernidad misma que as, destruyen la visin comn de la modernidad como tiempo de la razn: "La treta de este mundo de cosas consiste de permutar la mirada histrica sobre lo que ya ha sido por la poltica."  La imaginacin tiene, en este sentido, un potencial crtico mayor que la racionalidad.  Este pasaje de los reflejos y representaciones a analogas y correspondencias recuerdan extraamente en los surrealistas una actitud medieval:  "En la Introduction au discours sur le peu de realit sugiere Breton que el realismo filosfico de la Edad Media est a la base de la experiencia potica. Pero ese realismo, su fe, por tanto, en una existencia aparte de los conceptos ya fuera, ya dentro de las cosas, ha encontrado siempre muy rpidamente el trnsito del reino conceptual lgico al reino mgico de las palabras."La progresiva depotenciacin de la naturaleza en la esttica postromntica del siglo XIX coincide con un progresivo desmontaje del sujeto potico en la concepcin artstica. Ya Hegel haba abandonado el canon de la belleza de la naturaleza, propio de la esttica kantiana, para afirmar que la belleza artstica, artificial es una encarnacin superior de la Idea que la belleza natural.  La ltima etapa de la belleza natural en la esttica de lo sublime desemboca en una esttica de lo maravilloso con Baudelaire.  Baudelaire, posteriormente, transforma la enemistad de la naturaleza en una esttica del culto a lo artificial y da con esto en el comienzo de una poesa de la industria.   El concepto negativo de naturaleza en esta poca est ya presupuesto en la determinacin moderna del arte como anti-physis, tanto en Baudelaire como en Marx y Valry, lo que implica una prdida de la obligatoriedad ejemplar de ella que ya solo sirve para la imaginacin de nuevos mundos.   Este giro en la valoracin de la naturaleza lo marca paradigmticamente el giro del campo a la ciudad, a travs de la industrializacin, y por tanto el contexto de experiencia humana cambia cualitativamente.  Por el lado del sujeto potico, ste ya no encuentra su propia autoafirmacin en correspondencia con la natura naturans, en la unidad romntica del yo y  la naturaleza, sino que la nueva esttica est acompaada de nuevos miedos y experiencias de alienacin en el anonimato del mundo industrial por lo cual el poeta tiene que recurrir a su interioridad imaginativa que implica un escape de la objetividad mediante la ensoacin y la ebriedad. El recuerdo se actualiza involuntariamente mediante asociaciones espontneas, fortuitas, como postul por otro lado Proust. As, el sueo y el recuerdo son las memorias involuntarias   De esta manera, la experiencia surrealista del entorno est ubicada afuera de la voluntad o del entendimiento, no es una decisin propia de un sujeto autnomo, sino de la pura imaginacin:  "Tout relve de l'imagination et de l'imagination tout rvle".  La imaginacin subordinada al entendimiento o a la voluntad no existe en el Surrealismo, y de esta manera se vuelve absolutamente autnomo del sujeto pero no del entorno, es la ensoacin del entorno.  Porque no hay imaginacin sin percepcin.  De esta manera, podemos llegar a la afirmacin de que la imaginacin, mejor, que las imgenes son absolutamente objetivas, no dependen de nuestra inteligencia:"-Discours de l'imagination:...Aujourd'hui je vous apporte un stupfiant venu des limites de la conscience, des frontires de l'bime.  Qu'avez-vous cherch jusqu'ici dans les drogues sinon un sentiment de puissance, une mgalomanie menteuse et les libres exercice de vos facults dans le vide? Le produit que j'ai l'honneur de vous prsenter procure tout cela, procure aussi d'inmenses avantages inespers, dpasse vos dsirs, les suscite, vous fait accder a des dsirs nouveaux, inmenss.... Le vice appel Surrealisme est l'emploi drgl et passionel du stupfiant image, ou plutot de la provocation sans controle de l'image pour elle-meme et pour ce qu'elle entraine dans le domaine de la reprsentation de perturbations imprvisibles et de mtamorphoses: car chaque image a chaque coup vous force a rviser tout l'Univers..."La imagen constituye un golpe como de golpes es de dnde ella precede en el contexto de lo urbano, y en este sentido, se diferencia de la serenidad desinteresada propio de lo simblico.  Justamente, proveniendo de la velocidad urbana, la imagen que se manifiesta involuntariamente, es el modo de asociacin con el entorno donde un sujeto autoconsciente no est ms a la base de la percepcin.  Asimismo, la imagen surrealista reclama una transformacin de la praxis vital de los receptores y niega toda actitud desinteresada ante el arte.  La analoga en el plano de la produccin y recepcin artsticas es evidente: mientras que la ciudad, o en el plano esttico, la obra de arte se constituye tambin como shock, estmulo, velocidad; en la recepcin, la imagen tambin es shock, cuestiona toda esfera vital y obliga, "fuerza a revisar todo el Universo".  La imagen surrealista es entonces, negacin de lo real, para constituirse en lo posible fantstico mediante la fantasmagora y la provocacin, y que es coherente con el contexto ciudadano, moderno de donde surge; y al mismo tiempo, obliga a revisar nuestras concepciones fundamentales de la imaginacin y contemplacin estticas, la primera como principio de produccin, la segunda, de recepcin.   A partir de esta categora central de la imagen presente en el Paysan de Paris es la base para toda una revisin de la imaginacin y la intuicin fundamental de toda obra vanguardista.  O de otra manera: el concepto de imagen e imaginacin en el Surrealismo es la categora central para explicar su carcter de obra vanguardista.  Puesto que la obra vanguardista pertenece al concepto especfico de lo urbano.  El contexto de experiencia de la modernidad de dnde surge el arte moderno, y en especial, aqu, el Surrealismo, revela tres caractersticas especficas: la novedad, el azar, el montaje.  Estas tres caractersticas son funden en una cuarta que las engloba en el caso del Surrealismo: la imagen.Siendo la imaginacin una cuestin espontnea como el recuerdo involuntario en Proust, la imagen se revela absolutamente objetiva como objetivos pretendidamente son la novedad, el azar y el montaje en las sociedades modernas.  La imagen es la expresin objetiva de las sociedades modernas: as como ella pretende ser siempre nueva, novedad que se actualiza siempre en el golpe (coup), las sociedades modernas siempre quieren ser nuevas en la moda; as como la imagen pretende ser azarosa, en las mltiples coincidencias que los surrealistas quieren encontrar en la realidad, as el correlato estructural es el funcionamiento de las sociedades modernas se basan en una serie de decisiones individuales, atomizadas que componen una especie de "autoorganizacin disipativa" donde no se puede encontrar un estado inicial de cosas al que se pueda referir como causa sino un desorden inicial "...je vivais au hasard, a la poursuite du hasard... Je m'abandonnais donc.  Les jours coulaient a cette sorte de baccara tournant.". Y finalmente, as como la imagen funciona mediante montaje, es decir, mediante la acumulacin inorgnica de emblema por la falta de un sentido objetivo, as las sociedades funcionan mediante un montaje de instituciones, estructuras y mercancas que, como el montaje, funcionan por el sentido arbitrario que la sociedad les confiere. As, el sueo del paysan es esta arbitrariedad que reviste caracteres mticos por la expresin de la imaginacin pero que, sin embargo, en ella se anuncia una objetividad sorpresiva:  "Il y a dans le monde un dsordre  impensable, et l'extraordinaire est qu'a leur ordinaire aient recherch sous l'apparence du dsordre, un ordre mystrieux... L'esprit de l'homme en supporte pas le dsordre parce qu'il en peut le penser, je veux dire qu'il en peut le penser premierement... La notion de l'ordre n'est point compense par la notion inexpugnable du dsordre..."  De esta manera, el desorden es objetivo, l'hasard objectif, y a la progresiva depotenciacin de la causalidad y racionalidad natural corresponde una actitud subjetiva igualmente azarosa y mltiple, es decir, desubjetivizada, que solo la imaginacin puede cumplir mediante la ensoacin, con el fin de dominar los accidentes:  "Organizar el pesimismo no es otra cosa que transportar fuera de la poltica a la metfora (smbolo) moral y descubrir en el campo de la accin poltica el mbito de las imgenes de pura cepa."  Ya Valry deca que los accidentes pueden ser causados y el azar se erige como una categora central objetiva para corresponder a la imaginacin autnoma del sujeto.  "El descubrimiento de las maravillas de lo cotidiano -escribe Burger- representa, evidentemente, un enriquecimiento de las posibilidades de experiencia del hombre urbano; sin embargo, est ligada a un tipo de conducta que renuncia a las iniciativas en favor de una disposicin universal a la impresin.  Los surrealistas no se dan por satisfechos con ella, y buscan la provocacin de lo excepcional.".  Cmo se constituye este giro tan radical en la concepcin esttica?A principios del siglo XIX, los Romnticos alemanes, protestando contra el racionalismo ilustrado, haban abogado por un renacimiento de la mitologa, en lo que Schelling haba llamado un nuevo, "simbolismo universal", basado en las "cosas de la naturaleza", las cuales "significan y son al mismo tiempo": "Todo simbolismo debe surgir de la naturaleza y volver a ella.  Las cosas de la naturaleza son y significan al mismo tiempo... Solo en la mitologa hay un verdadero material simblico; pero la mitologa misma solo es posible mediante la relacin de sus formas con la naturaleza... El renacimiento de la visin simblica de la naturaleza debera ser el primer paso hacia una restitucin de una nueva mitologa"    En lo simblico de la naturaleza se manifiesta, para los romnticos,  la esencia del fenmeno, la totalidad de lo viviente.  En el siglo XX, viendo la propuesta de la mitologa moderna aragoniana, la "nueva naturaleza" de la industria y lo urbano han generado todo el poder mtico que estos romnticos hubieran deseado.  Ahora, est la imaginacin potica igual de serena y simblica en el contexto de lo moderno?   El Romanticismo haba asumido que el arte podra ser la fuente de toda regeneracin de lo mitolgico: los arquetipos goetheanos, la mstica de Schlegel, el simbolismo de Schelling, todos estos anclados en el ideal del arte.  Sin embargo, la creatividad de la industria que, en ese tiempo era considerada como tcnica y no arte, es la que en realidad construye, en lo moderno,  todo un mundo mtico de fotografas, mercancas, diseos industriales, etc. que reemplazan ese ideal "humanista" de un genio individual que produce todo un mundo mtico a travs del arte (Kant, Wagner, etc..).  Las fuerzas mticas estn presentes en el nuevo mundo de la industria: los romnticos queran fundar una nueva mitologa a travs de un contramundo campesino, preindustrial y tradicional; los Surrealistas tambin hablan de una nueva mitologa y dieron en el punto porque sera nueva en todo sentido, es decir, anclada en el nuevo mundo de la industria.  En vez de ver a la cultura tradicional como fuente de inspiracin, o como en el neoclasicismo, adquiriendo smbolos de mitos antiguos, los surrealistas vieron la naturaleza cambiante del paisaje industrial en s misma, maravillosa y mtica.  El Paysan de Paris vaga, intoxicado a travs del nuevo paisaje de mercancas; as como su  contraparte campesina vagara por un bosque encantado.  La Torre Eiffel le parece al paysan una jirafa, el Sacre Coeur es un ictiosauro, los tanques de gasolina en las bombas brillan con el aura de las divinidades:"Ce sont de grands dieux rouges, de grands dieux jaunes, de grands dieux vertes, fichs sur le bord des pistes spculatives que l'esprit emprunte d'un sentiment a l'autre... Les scuplteurs sans nom quui ont elev ces fantomes metalliques se plier a une tradition aussi vive que celle qui traait les glises en croix.  Ces idoles ont entre elles une parent qui les rend redoutables.  Bariols de mots anglaises et des mots de cration nouvelle, avec un seul bras long et souple, une tete lumineuse sans visage, le pied unique et le ventre a la roue chiffr, les distributeurs d'essence ont parfois l'allure des divinits de l'Egypte ou de celles des peuplades anthropophages qui n'adorent que la guerre.  O Texaco motor oil, Eco, Shell, grandes inscriptions du potentiel humaine! Bientot nous nous signerons devant vos fontaines, et les plus jeunes d'entre nous priront d'avoir considr leur nymphes dans le naphte..."Ms que el humor y la irona surrealistas, el sentimiento de lo moderno en Aragon trivializa y vulgariza aquello que es respetable en la cultura, y de esta manera, lo trivial se vuelve en objeto de respeto. Para el paysan de Aragon, lo milagroso emana de los fenmenos ms mundanos, como de las peluqueras del Passage de l'Opera, Le Theatre Moderne, La Galerie du Barometre, los cafs, etc.  Lejos de escapar, como los romnticos a las formas viejas de la cultura (la vuelta a los griegos de Goethe, la mitologa germana en Wagner), la imaginacin surrealista aprehende directamente la "esencia metafsica" -as la llama Aragon- de las formas modernas, "il y avait des objets usuels qui, a n'en pas douter, participaient pour moi du mystre, me plongaient dans le mystre... il me semblait bien que l'essence de ces plaisirs fut toute metaphysique, il me semblait bien qu'elle impliqut  leur ocassion une sorte de got passion de la rvlation.  Un objet se transfigurait  mes yeux, il en prenait point l'allure allgorique ni le caractre du symbole...".   Lo que distingue a estos nuevos dioses de los anteriores, como dijimos, es que estos son transitorios.  Pertenecen a un mundo absolutamente profano donde sus poderes tambin son transitorios.  La transitoriedad de este nuevo mundo mtico funda un poder y una relacin imaginativa absolutamente nueva.  Ya la imaginacin simblica es incapaz de asociarse con este nuevo mundo donde el devenir es us principio de poder.  Puesto que el smbolo est ms ocupado con captar la eternidad de la Idea esttica, la imagen surrealista es un flash que puede cambiar tan rpido como el mundo, de ah que el conocimiento y la poesa para Aragon sea algo absolutamente concreto: "Descends dans ton ide, habite ton ide, puisatier pendu  ta corde.".  La transitoriedad de estos dioses no son simblicas, son terrenas:"Il m'apparut que l'homme est plein de dieux comme une ponge inmerge en plein ciel.  Ces dieux vivent  l'apoge de leur force, puis meurent, laissant  d'autres dieuxleurs autels parfums.  Ils sont les principes mmes de toute transformation de toute.  Ils sont la necessit du mouvement.  Je me promenai donc avec ivresse au milieu de mille concrtions divines. Je me mis  concevoir une mythologie en marche.  Elle mritait proprement le nom de mythologie moderne. Je l'imaginais sous ce nom."La racionalidad instrumetal, propia del conocimiento y la tcnica, reprime algo que la imaginacin expresa: que el nuevo mundo de la tcnica tambin es mtico.  Lo que cambia por completo la consideracin tradicional de que la imaginacin es la subjetividad y la interioridad propi
Proof That Angels Walk the Earth. Angel or madman?  Hero or heretic?  &quot;In Your Face&quot; is the riveting true-life story of one of the bravest men in America.  As hair-raising as a well-crafted crime novel, this book is so shocking, it's hard to believe it's not fiction.  For the fate of animals in laboratories, we can only wish it were.  Suspenseful, gritty, treacherously honest, and heart-breakingly beautiful, &quot;In Your Face&quot; chronicles one man's fight against pet theft and the heinous crimes and atrocities performed on animals every day in the name of medicine.  Chris single-handedly champions the animals against the indifference of the public and the legal system toward animal cruelty and injustice.  Chris is living proof that one person can change the world.  Read it and join him...but block off some time.  You won't be able to put it down.  There's only one thing wrong with this book.  It wasn't long enough.  By the way, Chris claims to not believe in God because a benevolent God couldn't have created a world where there is so much suffering.  My message to the author:  Cut God some slack, Chris.  You're the reason the world is so screwed up. God ran out of time creating everyone else.  He spent all His time on you
Beautiful!!!. This is a collection of lots of different knitters shawls, it is NOT all Meg Swansen shawls,so for this reazon is a GREAT book, with beautiful and delicate shawls, worth the price!
A good mystery for Victorian lit lovers. I really liked this book. It had a romantic appeal and vivid, memorable characters. The plot was also fantastic. Wilkie wrapped up everything quite nicely at the end--I won't say anymore for those who haven't read it. I didn't feel there were any unbelievable coincidences in the plot. It was a little slow at first, but once I got into it, I couldn't put it down. Some parts were hilarious. This book has it all. I would definitely recommend it.
Intriguing and perplexing in equal measure. I very much enjoyed reading this book. It is a biographical account of one mans experience as he moves from a position of ignorance towards an understanding of Zen. The bewildering spritual "How to" which seems to have a lot more to do with what you don't do than what you do. The confounding realisation that all effort is false, whereas no effort can lead to superhuman feats of accuracy. It's a magical true story about how a mans confusion and understanding become fused into something of an incomprehensible truth: You don't understand it, but it works.What I enjoyed most about the text is that it gives insipration to Zen learners, something to aim for, so to speak.What I didn't like is that it doesn't really offer insight into how one combines an attitude of no presumed effort with the experience of splitting an arrow-shaft lengthwise from the far side of an unlit warehouse. In other words, the book sufficiently illustrates the effects of success with Zen practice but having read the book the cause still remains a mystery: A relaxed attitude alone will do nothing to improve your golfing average, so how does it work
As a new Breeder I loved it!!. As a very new cat breeder I found this an excellent book packed with loads of great, practical info laid out in a very straight forward way.  I am even thinking of grabbing a few extra copies for other breeders I know.[...
Letters of the Century : America, 1900-1999. 'Letters' is an excellent read.  Very insightful, provokes thought and is intellectually stimulating.  The chosen letters are excellent chronicles of time and most are either funny or moving.  If you like history, you'll love  this book
Highly Recommended!. Visit any healthy manufacturing operation and you'll see a buzz of bewildering activity - parts being moved on overhead cranes, raw materials being wheeled in, line operators checking their production schedules before they change the line over to their next product. Those production schedules, as this book suggests, can really be a hindrance. Operators become dependent on them, although the schedules may not accurately reflect customer demand. The solution? Kanban, which is based on having a communication system right on the factory floor that communicates key indications of customer behavior - buying, ordering, canceling - directly to the workers themselves. Production activity, therefore, is actually scheduled based on customer demand rather than on past expectations, with the advantage that you hold less inventory and operate more effectively. This book (which comes with a compact disc of implementation directions) gives clear insight into this powerful scheduling system employed efficiently by Toyota and other world-class companies. We highly recommend it to executives, managers and supervisors of companies that earn their living by making widgets more successfully
Puzzle Book, couldn't put it down!. Holes is just like a puzzle book. You learn more as you read. And you put the pieces together as you learn. When you fill the last hole, puff! The book is finished. I, personally coudn't put it down. One of the best books I've read
Thanks for your Words of Wisdom. I am a working mother of 2 small children and have very little time to read. I was very pleased when I opened the Baby Hearts Book and saw the Quick Reference Quide listed in the Table of Contents!  How great to have a handy reference to find the topics a busy mom like me is looking for. I quickly found the section of the chapter I wanted to read thanks to the guide, which matches the pages with the appropriate age of your child.I know I will eventually read the whole book, but until I do, this handy Guide will work wonders and give me the "Words of Wisdom" I need to help my children grow!
A Need to Read. This is a reveling look into an almost invisible aspect of black society that has been around for ages, and I for one am impressed.  True, there is some unpleasantness in this book regarding the harsh reality of black on black prejudice.  But this occurs at all levels of black society and society in general.What must not be overlooked is the desire and ability achieve and to escape, if at all possible the scars and brutality of being black in a white, racist society.  This is especially true when it comes to ones children, namely the children of successful black Americans who desperately want and need to shield them, not only from the ravages of racism, to which young children are especially sensitive and can be seriously marked and marred, but also from the numerous pathologies that are rampant in the black community and are destroying black children by the millions.  The children of the black upper classes are not only taught that they can be somebody, but that they must be somebody and that failure is not an option.  Thankfully, they can afford not to allow their children's lives to be sabotaged before they reach puberty and have, or did, construct a community in which they could develop into individuals not as adversely affected by entrenched racism and prejudice
Great Book for Introverts. I bought this book after a lifetime of feeling different from everyone because I would rather spend time alone than in social situations. No, I didn't have social anxiety. It's just given a choice, a walk in the woods alone is much more appealing to me than any party. I'm not shy, strange, or a socialphob. I'm an intovert, as are 25% of the world population.Still we are one of the most misunderstood parts of society, and very few books exist to understand introversion. This is one of them, and after purchasing it, I realized that it was worth the purchase price just from the information in the introduction. To hear there are other people who feel the same way I do about things, who make excuses not to attend gatherings because to tell the truth and say you would rather stay home gets shocked, pitying reactions. We're not abnormal. We are NORMAL INTROVERTS.The only reason this book did not get five stars from me is because she seems to overdo her points in places, and harp on things over and over, but it's still a good book and well worth the price.
A Hero Is Born. After watching Daniel Craig's Bond debut, the most compelling action movie I've seen in years, I felt the urge to go back and reread Ian Fleming's "Casino Royale."  I did so with some trepidation that this book, which wowed me as a teenager, would fall flat under my middle-age sensibilities.To my relief, I enjoyed the book nearly as much as the movie, but for quite different reasons.  Fleming's writing style, a mixture of Raymond Chandler's hard boiled cynicism and Hemingway's heroic machismo, forms the image of the real Bond that filmmakers have been struggling for decades to capture.  Fleming's bond is a handsome man (love interest Vesper Lynd compares his looks to the 1950s-era musician Hoagy Carmichael) whose handsomeness is tempered by his cold, calculating demeanor, not to mention a nasty scar on the side of his face.  He's also a complex, philosophical man with sophisticated tastes in food and drink, interesting theories on gambling and luck, and a fierce loyalty to the British Secret Service (which he comes to question in a lively philosophical exchange with Mathis at the end of the book.)The film adaptation takes considerable liberties with the plot, updating this cold war spy novel to suit the threats of today's world:  Le Chiffre becomes indebted to a terrorist organization rather than a Soviet intelligence agency; wireless electronic gadgets take the place of blunt weapons; and Texas Hold `Em displaces Baccarat at the casino's high-stakes table.  The movie also adds a number of action sequences that play much better on the screen than would the many introspective passages of the novel.Daniel Craig, though more muscular looking and acting than I picture Fleming's Bond, channels the cold, calculating manner of this English assassin much better than Brosnan or even Connery.  I'm looking forward to the next installment in this revitalized film franchise and may even continue rereading Fleming's series.
God is not the instigator of trouble in our life, but he does make good on his promise to see us through these trails. I don't normally do book reviews--probably because I'm not very good at them, but the book I just finished touched me in such a way that I want to share it with all of my fellow writers and book enthusiasts.Title: Why the Sky is BlueAuthor: Susan MeissnerGenre:  Christian fiction--primary reader group:  womenClaire Holland is raped on her way home from the mall. If this isn't horrifying enough, she finds out she is pregnant. Claire and her husband, Dan, have two children, a daughter, Katie, twelve, and a son, Spencer, seven. Both children came to the marriage after many miscarriages. That Claire would become pregnant after rape is against all odds. If there is such a thing as a blessing in a situation like this, the fact Claire can't remember the assault is a gift from God.This novel delves into the inner feelings of each of the family members as they decide what to do with the baby. Katie is old enough to understand how the baby came to be, but she doesn't want her parents to give it up. Spencer is too young to realize anything except his mom's belly is growing. Dan decides he can't love this child and because of this, Claire agrees to put the child up for adoption. The word goes out and a childless missionary couple is picked to adopt the baby, now known to be a girl.They come to meet the Holland family. Mixed feelings tear Claire apart. She loves her baby, but she doesn't want her raised in a home without a father who truly loves her. Katie can't understand why they can't keep the baby. But, bravely, she hands the little girl over to Rosemary and Ed the day the baby and Claire are released from the hospital. Years go by. The Holland family doesn't speak of the baby named Lara. They move to another town where Dan, a veterinarian, sinks his teeth into a new practice. Claire opens a bookstore. Katie and Spencer grow up, do all the things kids do, but Claire never forgets her daughter. She prays for her constantly. Unbeknownst to Claire, Katie, now called Kate and married with children of her own, wonders what has become of her sister. One day, while Claire is away at a business conference, a letter comes from Rosemary. Kate doesn't trust her mother to share it with her, so she opens it. Rosemary is dying of cancer. She wants the Holland family to raise Lara, now sixteen.This book is a study in human emotions I found hard to put down. Bottom line taken from the book, Love is not blind--it sees more, not less. But because it sees more, it is willing to see less."I give this book two thumbs up.Janice William
The best book of its type around. This is a superb book.  I am reluctantly parting with a copy on ebay.co.uk now.  This really is a unique work
Worth spending a lot of time with. I had this from the library and now I want a copy, so I can go slowly through the meditative practices described. I particularly liked the "light" meditations.One of the book's best features is the focus on bringing back into everyday life what you have gained by stepping out of everyday life. This is an important perspective often missing from contemplative works.Khan quotes freely, and knowledgeably, from Hindu, Buddhist and Christian ideas as well as giving a good introduction to his Sufi tradition. The only flaw I noted is that his grasp of physics, even for metaphorical purposes, is extremely poor, but you can ignore that and just enjoy the spiritual wisdom
A haunting story about love and full of mystery. This book surprised me in that I enjoyed it so much.  I mean I have always loved King's work but this one resolidified me as a fan and more proof that King knows exactly what he's doing when he writes.The book surrounds Mike Noonan, a writer, who's young wife dies suddenly.  After four years of writer's block and never being able to move on Noonan goes to stay at their summer cabin Sara Laughs in a small (you guessed it) Maine town.  What follows is a story about lost loves, new friendships and love, haunted houses and a secret that the town has had hidden for over 100 years.  For some it might be long (732 pages) but I found its pace to be so good you end up reading it into the wee hours of the night.  This is one of those books I just couldn't put down because I wanted to know the solution to the mysteries.Definetly read this book, in a way it's so unlike King's normal ventures because it has a whodunit feel, that is not common to his novels.
How Haiku SHOULD have been taught in school... This book really helped me as both a reader and writer of poetry.  Through the author I was able to understand the real essence of Haiku; something that I seemed to have missed when I studied it in grade-school!  This book not only shows where the form came from, but how it has evolved over time and through different cultures.  For anyone who wants to understand the form for themselves, either to use it, teach it or just appreciate it, I highly recommend the book. (the sections on lesson planning are both interesting and helpful, whether or not you want to teach a class!
Great resource for the professional on the field!. Firstly I'd like to say hello to Jim, I had the pleasure of attending a personal workshop by the man himself in KL for Exchange 2000...since then I've been a true follower of his books!Ok lets get down to this book...it's been well written from start to end with concise information from the field, I've used a lot of his advice during my design and deployment phases.It also provides great information if you are venturing deeper into the world of Exchange...so I'll say this book is for Intermediate to professional. A must have for Consultants planning on designing, deploying and migrating to Exchange 2003.Overall it's a great book to carry around as a reference. Once again Jim...great book...can't wait for the Exchange 2007 copy!
Keeps You Guessing Til the End. In this involving and complicated story, David Baldacci covers everything from drug dealing, to cults, to the FBI, to pyschoanalyis and hypnotism.  There's also a horse farm and pornography thrown in for good measure!  The main plot deals with the character of Web London, the sole survivor of a botched mission by HRT (Hostage Rescue Team), a part of the FBI; as he and his companions are en route to tackle a drug lord, London suddenly collapses, unable to continue, as if paralyzed.  He then is forced to witness his colleagues' massacre as they are shot by remote control weaponry as they enter an urban courtyard.  London's determination to discover what happened to him and clear his name makes up the bulk of the novel.  In his journey, he is forced to confront childhood abuse, and the possible abuse of his psychiatrist.  Baldacci tells the story from several points of view, and should be credited with creating complex and compelling characters who are both heroic and flawed.  On the good side, this helps when the plot becomes increasingly complicated; on the potentially bad side, the characters are, not surprisingly, unhappy with their lives, and there's not a `happy' ending for most of them.  The pain gets a little much at times, even though the `good' guys win at the end. The end is abrupt, and leaves you wondering if you missed something. Worth reading, just concentrate on the plot, or it will get away from you
Book Review. I love these books about the Professor. I listen to them in my car over and over. The finer points of sausage doge is also very good about the same professor. I would recommend these books on CD for any long car trip. They will keep you laughing
peristaltic reflex or peristaltic cognition?. This has been a challenging book to read, but well worth the effort.  It is a peculiar mix of memoir and introductory textbook on the enteric (gut) system.   I found myself woefully unprepared to consume the text.  Gershon has tried to write for the lay reader, but that lay reader had better be comfortable with organic chemistry. Despite the jargon, Gershon's enthusiasm is infectious.  This would be a great gift for any pre-med student in need of inspiration.The title is somewhat misleading.  'The second brain' is a catchy phrase, but only token effort is made to prove the assertion.  In simple terms, Gershon argues:1. At the cellular level, enteric neurology uses the same building blocks as spinal neurology, so there is no evidence enteric neurology couldn't be a second brain.2. The fundamental process managed by enteric neurology is the peristaltic reflex.3. The peristaltic reflex requires sophisticated neurological controls for managinga)  motion of food through the gutb) control of pH, viscosity, appropriate digestive enzyme, etc.4. Since the gut can function adequately despite cutting the neural connection between spine (brain) and gut, the neural mass in the gut must constitute an independent cognitive center (brain).The first 100 pages address Gershon's efforts to prove enteric neurology uses the same neurotransmitters as the spinal chord.  The second 100 pages offers a tour of the gut, starting at the mouth and walking down the lining to the colon. The final section provides a blow-by-blow description of his lab's trial-and-error experimental approach to enteric developmental neurology, with emphasis on microbiological techniques for examining the neural crest's role.  There is little or no text defining the systemic nature of a 'brain', and then asking if the enteric neural system qualifies for the title 2nd brain.  In short, Gershon avoids the quagmire of differentiating peristaltic reflex from peristaltic cognition.Since one cannot address this question without assimilating most of the material Gershon presents (perhaps without the historonics), and the book is so much fun as it is, who am I to complain?Important subtopics:The academic battles Gershon fought to make enteric neurology an accepted academic field of study.How 17th century European poisons help illuminate enteric neurology.How cholera is perfectly designed to fool enteric defenses (including enteric neural signals).A detailed review of developmental issues producing aganglionic megacolon (Hirschsprung's Disease)Scattered about are surprising literary references:"[the bowel's lining is] very much like the fields of Agincourt after Henry V finished dealing with the French army, a turf littered with the rotting remains of dead soldiers. The soldiers in the bowel, of course, are fallen enteric nerve cells...""Functional bowel disease is what Winston Churchill called the Soviet 'Union in 1939: a riddle wrapped in a mystery inside an enigma."Gershon concludes with a wonderful, and very personal, answer to his recently deceased father's often asked question: 'what practical benefits does your research offer?'
Very Respectable. Dr. Ornish is a very respectable name in the cardiology field.  In my line of work, I look to promote my cardiologists who are based in four major hospitals in the New York City metro area.  Dr. Ornish should always be commended for his books.  Another cardiologist who is also excellent is Dr. Richard Stein at Beth Israel Medical Center in NY.  His new book, "Outliving Heart Disease" is another great read
Something Like A Review. One of the greatest pleasures imaginable is to investigate a body of cinematic work, and then, to learn about its creator from his own persepective on his life and art.There is tremendous satisfaction in seeing the personality of the director reveal itself in the work and to re-view the films with new knowledge of the creator. This may not be a false track, although auteur theory has a bad rap right now. Kurosawa, in the conclusion of his autobiography said, "look for me in my films".Kurosawa was a genius, his films full of life and compassion, and strength. He did not look away from ugly truths in his life or art. (Read the autobiography and understand the significance of this approach!)I recommend this book as the touchstone for a deeper appreciation of the art of Kurosawa, for an understanding of his complex personality, and for the human warmth that comes across in his reminiscences. By the end of the book, you will want more, of course. It will seem to end abruptly and too soon. You will have many questions that you will wish to have answered. But then, we'll take Kuroswa's advice. We'll look for the man in his films.
If you are only going to read one book on conservation and ecology... ...this is it!  If you ever been frustrated by people who love nature but don't understand it, then you will want to join Harriet on her journey of misunderstanding.  Written in the same witty style that we have come to love from Larson, this is a wildely entertaining "children's book" that has me laughing and exclaiming "Amen" at the same time.  The genius of this book is even recognized by Harvard Ecologist E.O. Wilson, author of the forward!I bought a box of these to give out to all of my friends and family.  Simply put, it is my all-time favorite book!
Organization could be tweaked. Don't get me wrong, I still think the book deserves 5 stars for doing a grade-A presentation of material --- topics are presented clearly and without fuss, and even examples are logically (but thoroughly) discussed, without the bludgeoning that typically accompanies code examples in introductory language texts.One minor failing is that occasionally (I came across 3-4 instances) the author makes use of constructs in examples where they have not yet been presented --- it might have been intentional, as it forces the reader to get acquainted with the reference section, but it's a little disconcerting.The macro section left me hungry for more (but that's what "On Lisp" --- available online for free from Paul Graham's website --- is for), and the package discussion was a little sparse (keywords were sort of confusing --- Practical Common Lisp, at http://www.gigamonkeys.com/book/, does a better job), but overall, a great read.I have to agree with the other reviewer that I wish more substantial programming exercises were given.  This won't be a problem for students who are using the book as a text in a Lisp-based course, obviously, but for self-study practitioners it would be icing on the cake
True, Fascinating Story. Every boy dreams about owning their own animal.  Robert Peck's dream comes true when he receives a pig for helping a neighbor, but while growing up in a Shaker household he can't afford to do many things.  By getting Pinky, his pig, he is able to experience things he has never done before.  Amidst all the fun, Robert needs to become a man, and learn what it takes to do so.
~.~I love this book~.~. I love this book to death!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!i've NEVER read a book beter than The Witch of Blackbird Pond! I discovered it in my school library & i used it for my book report!-Haile
The best learning tool ever. I bought this book for my daughter going into kinder. After reading this book together about three times in one sitting she learned how to tie, all by herself. Teacher was impressed how fast she learned.. Saving this great tool for my other two..
Lonesome Traveler is a completely unique experience. On the Road instantly became my favorite book after reading it a short time ago, and of course it prompted me to read more of Kerouac in hopes of attaining that same free spirted prose he is known for.  Lonesome Traveler delivers a much different experience to the reader than does On the Road, but is equally as moving.  The flow of this book can be hard to follow at first, but I found the more I read, the more I began to &quot;be&quot; Kerouac.  Many times I found myself reading a passage over and over again in an attempt to completely and fully understand the feelings and emotions Kerouac is trying to convey.  The end result is a longer read than the number of pages may suggest, but a priceless experience that is rarely found in modern literature
The Stranger. The book was good.  It's a quick read.  Keep in mind this isn't a book that tells you the secrets of magic, but it teaches you a few things and is a great reference book on Blaines life and other great magicans too.  I reccomend it for non-magicians too.  If you're wondering who this mysterious stranger is and where he came from I suggest this book.  $8-10.00 used isn't bad at all.  Give it a sho
Very interesting pictures. I purchased this book for my Art History class. Very interesting pictures along with non-boring texts. I really like the accompanied CD as it has all pictures from this text as well as other version of Gardner's art history books. Pictures are crystal clear. Although I finished that class long ago and sold the book for school's book store with attractive price, I still have a copy of that CD and often reviewed whenever I saw some interesting stories of art history (such as female goddess from Dan Brown's Da Vinci Code). All pictures are under flash cards section. Besides a good text book, it should be kept as a reference
A very informative and enjoyable book, but author makes some irresponsible choices that can be hard to stomach. I am a huge fan of the kind of travel writing that takes you into the lives of other peoples and cultures, and this one was a prime example of everything that is really neat about travel and ethnographic writing. It was engaging, funny, relatable, and I felt like I really got a picture of what it might have been like to live in that situation.I had some mixed feelings about the decisions she made, though. I can't imagine being compelled by infatuation to shack up with someone who I can't communicate with directly. Then, I can't imagine living with them for a long time and having a child with a person with whom you haven't worked out basic cultural agreements with. Why in the world did she have a baby with someone in such a different culture without discussing issues with the father such as "will my baby have an arranged marriage by the time she is two", or "will my little girl be circumcised?".And where did she get all of her money? I am 27 and work hard and don't have anywhere near the resources she had. Was she from a rich family?Questions like this made the book a richer experience in some ways, because those internal struggles made me really think about my culture, my beliefs, and that of the Masai. I am not sure I like Corinne, but there is no doubt that she is a compelling writer and has a very compelling story. This would be a great read for a book club because it does bring up so many issues to discuss.
Lovable Book!. This is a very reassuring book to readers that we all experience different feelings and emotions, and we also experience different perspectives on things happening around us.  While we all attain the attributes of being courageous, childlike, accepting, respectful, kind, unique and beautiful, there is always so much more to who we are deep down inside.  This is a wonderful illustrative book to show how one person can have many different qualities, while also being able to be proud of those qualities and build on them as we grow.
Response to other reviews. Alright, seeing &quot;this book should be on the shelf next to Roger Penrose's 'The Emperor's New Mind' and James Gleick's 'Chaos'&quot;, and another review saying that the book denies Godel's Theorom, confused me for a while.  Then I realized that the latter refered to nueral nets.  Assuming that the nets referred to are analog, there is no contradiction.  Godel's Theorom proved the incompleteness of formal language systems, a.k.a. digital systems, which constitute a smaller information set than analog systems.  Mathematically, analog systems do not meet the neccessary conditions for Godel's Proof to apply.  However, the claim to 'completeness', if it be made, is ungrounded.  Analog systems simply represent a higher information dimension, not an infinite information dimension
A Satisfying Read. This book was a valued companion during my commutes to and from work late this summer,and I enjoyed it immensely.  Meade's Dorothy Parker biography, "What Fresh Hell Is This" is one of my all-time favorites, and while "Bobbed Hair..." is not nearly as indepth (and is not meant to be), it provides a very satisfying taste of each woman's life in the 1920's.  The only flaw, for me, is that I found Edna St. Vincent Millay's behavior tremendously annoying and so did not enjoy sections of the book devoted to her as much as the rest.
Excellent!. This is an outstanding book I would recommend for young readers as well as their parents.  I read it for a grad school language arts education class and cried my eyes out at the end!  The book has many ideas and subjects for later discussions, some "heavier" than others.  Very well written and I liked the diary format and the use of different fonts symbolizing different "stages" Mia was in
Fantastic Reference Book. This book's finest and most invaluable quality is that not only does it explain the many hazards modern living has bestowed but it also gives you a way out.  At the end of every chapter are website addresses, names and contact information for companies that fill the need for whatever it is you're used to living with (household cleaners, make-up, baby products, energy) but minus the unwanted chemicals or environmental side effects.  It provides a solution, not just the problem.
Musings on a broken-spined hardcover. My copy is nearing 25 yrs old and shows the wear and tear of living in backpacks, suitcases, briefcases and brown paper bags.  This compendium of 6 different books of Service's work will take you from his Gold Rush Days of the Yukon, to his escape to the Bohemian Quarter in Paris to become a 'Serious Poet', and to his volunteering to become an ambulance driver for the Red Cross in the First World War.  His ballads are remarkable in how they take you deeply into the the person's life for that brief time as you read.  There is the lighthearted comedy he is known for with &quot;The Cremation of Sam McGee&quot;, as well as the first person accounts of the unimaginable horrors and uplifting glories of battle in the trenches.  Service wrote for the everyday working man, in everything he is utterly approachable and unpretentious.  I will confess, as does he, this is &quot;lowbrow stuff&quot;, but it is mighty satisfying
Helpful Guide to the Big Move to Nevada. This author covers the essential aspects one must deal with in considering and making a move to the Las Vegas area.  I read another book called "Craps Across America" that gave me insight into the daily casino life that one could lead after moving to the "Sin City" area.  But this book gave me the practical knowledge that I needed outside of the gaming world in Las Vegas.  I recommend this book for the practical knowledge it provides
This soldier's favorite book. If you read one murder novel in the rest of your life, read "Crime and Punishment" by Fyodor Dostoyevsky. It's only 500 pages but it speaks volumes.I discovered Dostoyevsky a few months ago while I was deployed to Iraq and my literary world will never been the same.I found a copy of "The Brothers Karamazov" in a pile of miscellenious books that had been dedicated to troops to boost morale and took it to a literary savvy Lt. Col. I knew. When I showed him my find, he insisted I read Crime and Punishment first. I'm certainly glad I decided to take his advice.Crime and Punishment tells the story of a brutal murder in pre- revolutionary Russa and the emotional torment of the eccentric murderer, Raskolnikov. The book is as dark and suspenseful as anything I've ever read, but it also manages to convey things on the opposite end of the emotional spectrum like redemption and love. My favorite passage of the book (a hard pick, for sure) is when Porfiry, a jovial but formitable detective, interrogates Raskolnikov.The deployment is over, but my infatuation with Dostoyevsky's books has just begun. I'm now reading "The Idiot" and enjoying it, though it's too early to see if it matches "Crime and Punishment."Whether you are deployed to the farthest reaches of the world or sitting comfortably at home, "Crime and Punishment" promises to be an exhilerating read.
SNOBS:  AN UTTERLY GOBSMACKING READ!. As soon as I read a review for this book, I knew I would love it and it was immediately added to my Amazon 'Wish list.'  I have always been partial to anything~~films, TV shows, or books that come out of the United Kingdom.  "Great Expectations" was in my 9th grade English Literature book--I stayed up and read the entire book in one sitting.  I think it was then that I became an Anglophile.  And, if you love all things British, I know you will adore this wonderful novel by Julian Fellowes.I remember reading an interview in the book section of our Sunday paper with Julian Fellowes (regarding this book) and his photograph had me absolutely befuddled because his face was so familiar, yet I could not place him.  Once I bought the book, it was on the jacket:  He played Lord Kilwillie in my beloved (the BBC Television series) MONARCH of the GLEN.  I also learned that in 2002, Fellowes won a coveted Oscar for his screenplay for Robert Altman's GOSFORD PARK.  He also wrote the screenplay for VANITY FAIR starring Reese Witherspoon (among many other endeavors).  All four of the above wonderful projects that Fellowes is associated with have the same underlying theme:  the clever and beautifully realized dissection of the English class system.SNOBS is the story told by an actor who is very much like Fellowes.  He develops a friendship with the beautiful Edith Lavery, a beautiful twenty-seven year-old debutante.  The daughter of a wealthy businessman and his social climbing wife, Edith is pragmatic enough to know that she must marry into wealth (hopefully titled) in order to maintain the lifestyle of her dreams.  And, she also didn't want to work!  She snags the wealthy, kind and dull Lord Charles Broughton, who even lives in a castle.  She eventually becomes bored with her new life and escapes with a handsome and charming actor only to discover that there are worse things than being bored.SNOBS is a fantastic book and Fellowes is a brilliant author.  He perfectly describes both the obvious and subtle idiosyncrasies of the British aristocracy.  This is because he is a member of both classes.  Julian Fellowes was the son of a diplomat and had relatives who were titled.  Educated at Cambridge, he spent time with the upper crust and, as an actor~~with the 'hoi poli'.  He is also an exceptional observer of British social classes.  Other reviewers have categorized this as a beach book but I beg to differ.  Although a great fun read, this book, with it's many four and above syllable words (and a few words that I have never heard of but was too lazy to go look it up in the dictionary) does require a modicum of concentration.  But every word is absolutely worth it
A fair and honest look at kookdom. If Ivan Stang's &quot;High Weirdness By Mail&quot; offered a glimpse into the world of kooks, crackpots, and the fringe, then Donna Koosy's &quot;Kooks&quot; is a five-star luxury cruise through the uncharted  fringes of human belief. Miss Kossy takes the best and most outrageous  parts of her &quot;Kooks&quot; zine and puts them together to give us an  in-depth look at people so far out there, you'll have trouble believing  that this stuff really exists at all...except that it's right here, in  front of your own eyes. There are racist publications galore, UFO kooks,  misunderstood pseudo-scientists, and other visionaries -- all of whom are  given a fair, understanding, and honest look by Miss Kossy. Many of the  most famous kooks are given in-depth presentations, including the Raelians,  Wilhelm Reich, the trepanation folks, and lots lots more.  Kossy believes  in letting their words and their deeds speak for themselves, and this gives  her more respect in both the eyes of the kooks, and in the eyes of the  readers; besides, nothing she could ever write could possibly top the  ranting of &quot;Christian Technocracy.&quot;  She's just too *sane.*    Your brain will never be the same after this
A fast fun read with scary insight into the world of LA!. If you like gossip, star or US magazine or anything like that, you need this book. If you have dreams of being an actress in LA you need this book. I was  addicted from the moment I started reading it. Completely shocked by all I learned!  I wish the book was a lot longer though.... and after reading this book I am SO happy I don't live in LA!The writing is great too- I look forward to her next book
A Great Read. I am an avid reader of True Crime and eagerly awaited John Glatt's new book, having read about the Jonathan Nyce case in the New York Times. It is one of the most complex and baffling crime stories ever and I want to congratulate Glatt on a job well done. I was most impressed by his investigative  skills and the high quality of his writing.The book really comes to life during Glatt's coverage of the trial and as a reader he transported me into the courtroom.I would recommend "Never Leave Me" to all fans of True Crime and it is right there at the top of the genre
Naked Kerouac. This book is powerful and honest.  Coming out in the same year as Burroughs' Naked Lunch the two works bear many striking similaruites.  Compared to the other works by Kerouac I've read (On the Road, The Dharma Bums and parts of Maggie Cassidy, Subteranean angels) this book seems strikingly different.  The work that Jack and Ginsberg did on the Heroin infested Burroughs' scriblings to come up with the powerhouse work, Naked Lunch, must have had a tremendous effect on Jack.  This work shares the disragard for the line between fantasy and reality, a compelte self indulgeance of the writer (I can see Jack with his reams of paper, just clacking away, howling with leerie laughter like the Shadow) and a dedication to storytelling and imagination that Naked Lunch displayed.  for a whilrwind read fest, try to digest the two in succession
Great for building your plan. I bought this book, and then purchased the Electronic Worksheets from the publisher!  They are great together, and both really helped get the plan started and crunch those vital startup numbers.  The book is very well written and easy to follow
Another Top Reacher. Lee Child continues to grow the Reacher mythos, and delivers another excellent story
Monkey Business. Diamonds have held man's fascination from antiquity. Though its brilliance and hardness are widely known, its electrical properties are not. Michael Crichton uses a quest for blue diamonds to unleash an action-packed piece.In Crichton's Congo, Earth Resources Technology Services, sends an expedition team to search for elusive diamonds in a war-torn and ape-infested central Africa. This first team ends up dead, and another is sent to reprise the mission.Karen Ross, a computer programmer; Peter Eliott, a primatologist; Amy, a gorilla; and Munro, a mercenary non grata, make the trip into the jungle, hoping to defeat a similar conquest by a rival consortium. When Ross reaches the mysterious Zinj and meets the custodians of this lost city, she realizes that though diamonds are a woman's best friend, with some friend's there are no need for enemies.This is a suspense-filled novel with a tight plot driven by science. Crichton cannot be accused of shoddy research. Congo is replete with technical jargon and scientific explanations, ranging from Primatology and Language Functions to Computer Programming and animal mistreatment. His digression on laboratory animals was enlightening (I was introduced to 'Taxonomic discrimination'); RSPCA and ASPCA closely resemble the modern-day PETA, People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals.In some respect, the science is a bit ambitious and dated, nonetheless, this is a book worth reading with a movie worth watching
The best one-volume history of the war. One-volume histories of World War II are about a dime a dozen.  Most of them seem to have the words "Cambridge" or "Oxford" in their titles, ignore the Pacific war, and are deadly dull.For an American, Miller and Commager's book is the best one-volume history I have found.  I say "for an American" because the focus is on battles in which Americans were the participants.  The brutal Eastern front and the war between Germany and the Soviet Union get short shrift; the spectacular air, land and sea battles of the war between the U.S. and Japan get equal attention with the Western Front battles in Europe. Miller doesn't spend a whole lot of time on the events leading up to the war. On page 19 Germany invades Poland and the same breakneck speed in moving from one major battle to another continues.  The analysis of the strategy and politics behind the war is succinct but adequate to enable the reader to understand the big picture.What makes this history better than others is the reliance of the authors on the words of the participants in the combat.  One half or more of the narrative consists of quotes from eyewitnesses -- mostly soldiers and journalists -- and this gives a worms-eye view of events that seems more valid, and certainly more interesting, that the detached analysis of many writers.  This book gives you a good picture and what life was likein the front lines.  The text is supplemented by many good photos and maps.If you are an American and you can only afford to buy one book on World War II, this is the one you want.Smallchie
monumental, weird, funny, sobering. That the author won the Nobel may suade the reader one way or another. But as this work is what got him the prize, which to me says the Nobel must be worth something. If you don't know Canetti's work, you won't get the impression from the title that the man is incredibly funny. But he is. And yet his brand of humor comes only from surgical-precise observation of the ordinary. Canetti is the Montaigne of our time, of modernity, bearing all the marks and scars of our age. If Canetti's prose has the disarming rambling style that we associate with Montaigne's, it also has the latter's power to draw out the most unexpectedly profound from the ordinary. Sort of like old fencing masters: they never run, never sweat, are never fancy, but they always beat you to the jugular. All the scholarship,all the discipline is hidden, like the hull of a ship that keeps the whole thing afloat. In this book, without torturing language, Canetti tells you more about the nature of power than Foucault, and more about the nature of crowds than a room full of social psychologists. (That such a feat is possible ought to be a sobering lesson in itself!) Canetti's book is a wonderful mix of the potentially tedious (kangaroo behavior) and the...funky. For example, in describing the psychology of mass fear as it relates to its twin, the desire to out-survive others, he cites unexpected examples: burial customs in rural India in which a strenuous attempt is made to appease the spirit of the child if it dies a preventable death; the peculiar madness of Roman emperors; and the Viking warriors' tradition of piling up a mound of stones before going into battle. Each warrior brings a stone and adds to the pile. After battle, each warrior removes one stone, thus leaving a mound of stones that would represent the dead. Contemplating by the fire the remaining mound was immensely satisfying to the survivors, apparently. Canetti's notion of the crowd is never just a bunch of people. Canetti defines crowd as a cumulation of small units into a large ensemble, causing it to become something entirely different from the units that make it up. He sees nature as the teacher that taught man to behave as a crowd, as a liquid. For example, for the Germans, it is the forest with its innumerable trees, standing vertically, that has inspired the German soul since time primordial in its aspiration to become a marching liquid. For the Arabs, it is the sand of the desert. For the Dutch, it is the threatening sea itself. For the Mongols, the wind. Etc. Canetti's prose is muscular, never bloated. Given that he was a man of letters, and not an anthropologist, it may be of some significance that his lifelong project -- it took him some 30 years to write this book -- was shaped by his lifelong preference for a world as envisioned by the ancient Greeks and the ancient Chinese in matters literary, moral, and philosophical. His science is the science of a man confident in his experience and aristocratic power of observation. Canetti never sets out to convince. He has nothing to sell. It is his style to simply put it in front of you, and then leave. Take it or leave it, but this book will never leave you once you begin it
One Hour Orgasm. Despite its sensational title, this is a book about clear communications.  An essential for couples (one book per person, please) it contains exercises to be done first by each individual and then shared.  I recommend it to all of the couples for whom I provide marriage ceremonies and counseling
One of McMillan's best. Marilyn Grimes, a 44-year-old housewife with three grown children, is bored with her life. Although her husband Leon is successful and has given her everything she could want, materially, she no longer feels any passion in their marriage, and dreams about returning to her first husband. Marilyn's also sick of dealing with her crazy widowed mother-in-law Arthurine, who acts like Marilyn's her own personal chauffeur and servant. To her, it seems like everyone's got something better, something new to strive for -- all except Marilyn. On the opposite end of the spectrum, there's Marilyn's younger foster sister Joy, who's screwed up her life so badly that everyone seems to look out for her and she never has to worry about being free to do whatever she wants. It takes a couple of earth-shattering life events for Marilyn to realize that life is what you make it, and that nothing will happen unless she reaches out on her own. Marilyn also begins to understand that everyone has something to teach her, even Joy, and that she needs to reach out and be there for the people around her in ways that aren't necessarily material.
Standard translation of landmark text. Note: this is the edition I'm familiar with, but it's out of print. There are new editions (both with this translation and newer ones) that would be worth checking out. This one has no real guide or preface, but I kind of like that.Norman Kemp Smith's translation seems to be one of the standard English translations of Kant's Critique of Pure Reason. Is it the best? I don't speak German, but it's certainly serviceable.This is a daunting work. It's also a necessary work, inasmuch as any understand of contemporary thought and intellectual history must encounter it. Kant has influenced nearly every major school of thought and cultural trend for the last 200 years. Below, I'll try to sketch his thought in this Critique.This is the story of Immanuel Kant, who found philosophy a mess and sought to fix it. Specifically, he was a former Rationalist who was disconcerted by the critique of British Empiricism (specifically the skeptical philosophy of David Hume). He sought to provide a grounding for the truths of empirical science and mathematics, establish the possibility of religious faith and practice, while at the same time avoid dogmatism in metaphysical reasoning.How did he seek to do this? By establishing a critique of reason whereby he understands the validity of all mental constructs. Kant distinguish between judgments which are a priori (prior to experience) and a posteriori (arising out of experience), and judgments which are "analytic" (trivial, tautological) and "synthetic" (where the predicate adds something that is not contained within the subject). Are synthetic a priori judgments possible? Kant answers yes, and much of this book deals with what follows from that.First Kant deals with how we have sense experience. He claims that space and time are necessary a priori conditions for sense experience -- not physical things in the world. The content of our experience is sense-data: raw sensation that arises outside ourselves or inside ourselves and is "given" in experience. The forms in which we construct that experience are space and time.Sensations, organized within us spatially and temporally yields sense experience (perceptions).Kant then proceeds to our abstract thought. What he terms "Understanding" has pure, a priori concepts according to logical form. He calls these "Categories." These do NOT arise as a mere empirical habit/convention -- they are prior to experience and are necessary forms that allow rational beings to experience the world intelligibly. Thus, we take the raw givens of our Understanding, which are perceptions (which we dealt with under "Transcendental Aesthetic"), and we impose the categories upon these perceptions -- we "schematize" our experience.Perceptions, given intelligible form according to schemata, yield intelligible concepts. We are justified in doing this because the perceptions are not things-in-themselves, but mere appearances (phenomena), and in order for these phenomena to exist in an experience that is coherent and consistent for us, they must have these forms. We are NOT justified in applying these categories to things-in-themselves (noumena).This is where Reason eats itself. It tries to do the same thing the understanding did, but now it does this with respect to the big metaphysical questions. It starts with concepts and attempts to unify all phenomenal experience according to concepts and yield the Ideas of Pure Reason. When it does this, it gets all confuzelled. It tries to deal with 3 Big Problems (Kant uses the term "dialectic"):* Soul - Reason wants to insist that the thinking soul exists, that it is subject (pure substance), that it is simple, and that it is unchangeable through all its activities. These are the Paralogisms of Pure Reason. We need these ideas -- their contraries are unthinkable for us(?), but these are not demonstrable.* The World - Reason wants to answer questions about the series of appearances that constitute the world: Is the World limited or unlimited in space and time? Is the world made up of simples or composites? Does freedom exist in the world? Is there a necessary being connected with the world? These are the Antinomies of Pure Reason. Unlike the Paralogisms, these questions admit of contradictory answers. They, too, cannot be adjudicated by pure reason.* God - Reason wants to demonstrate the existence of God. Kant refers to this as the Ideal of Pure Reason. He claims that all arguments demonstating God's existence in fact, despite outward appearances, depend upon one method, the "ontological" proof of God's existence, which Kant disallows as transempirical.Kant tries to tell us how to employ reason. First, stop arguing speculatively about God, etc.! But he urges us to apply those metaphysical ideas must be employed in practical (moral) contexts. In this, he anticipates the Victorians, who were somewhat skeptical on matters of faith, but stressed the necessity of continuing to act according to traditional morality. The dialectic problems deals with ideas are not verifiable speculatively. They are not constitutive of experience. Rather, they serve a regulative function, specifically in the practical realm of morality.Kant claims that reason is architectonic: it naturally wants to assume the greatest generality. Kant says this is fine for moral thinking, but bad for speculative thinking.Kant says that philosophy answers these questions: "What can I know? What ought I to do? What may I hope for?" The bulk of Critique of Pure Reason answers the first question. The Critique of Practical Reason, Groundwork of the Metaphysic of Morals, Metaphysic of Morals, etc., answer the second question. The third question ties the two together -- this is what Kant deals with at the end of the first Critique.Kant sees the great transendental ideas as being God, Immortality, and Freedom. They are the starting points of theistic religion (e.g. Christianity and Judaism). These can neither be verified nor disproved by speculative reason (since speculative reason must by its nature deal with givens (Latin, data) either from sense-experience or pure intuition (as in mathematics). These ideas, however, are necessary "regulative" ideas for the guidance of practical (moral reason) and are valid in that connection. Thus, the second Critique answers the question "What ought I to do?" by recourse to the transcendal idea of Freedom. The question, "what may I hope for?", is given response through the transcendental ideas of God and immortality, for if God does not exist, nothing can grant us happiness for moral behavior and unhappiness for immoral behavior, and if we're not immortal, God won't have anyone to reward.I probably have made errors and inaccuracies in the above, but I hope I give a flavor for his thought. Kant is sober, earnest, and disciplined. Again, he's not easy, but I think he's worth the effort
An Important Piece of Literature !. As an educator I highly recommend this book to young and old alike. The main characters Casper and Brendan face incredible odds in their relationship and how they deal with those odds will not cease to amaze the reader. Mr. Roeder has given us a love story that at times is difficult to handle,(I had to put the book down several times and catch my breath), and yet so believable. Gay and straight youth and adults alike would benefit from this story that touches upon some very important issues.This is my first read from this author, I now want to read the other books in this series entitled "Gay Youth Chronicles" and I will. A definite five star read! Thank you Mr. Roeder for your wonderful story, your insight, and your ability to create such heart-warming characters. I look forward to reading all of your past and future work.
silent hill4 the easy way. this book is very helpful in completing the game   you don't spend hours running around in circles or opening the wrong doors to lead to an instant death  great maps and documentatio
Perhaps a Personal Bias. Between Planets is yet another suberb Heinlein classic, one that doesn't leave you hanging in the middle as much as some of his works.  The technological ideas are a little outdated, of course, but the storyline itself is masterful.  Heinlein had a perfect grasp as to what motivates humans to make the decisions that they do in times of crisis.A definite recommended read for all Heinlein fans, in my opinion
Anthony Bloom was born to write this book!!. First I would like to say a big THANK YOU to Archbishop Anthony Bloom for writing this book!  It is an EXCELLENT place to begin or even re-begin learning about prayer and praying in general.I'm personally very interested in Christian orthodoxy, but this is a great book for ALL Christians!At just over 100 pages, it makes a quick read but is very deep and insightful.  Definitely recommended
petrisko is an exellent writer. tom petrisko has a unique way of telling what he has heard, the stories of  the visionaries,the apparitions of the people, he captures the heart of  what is going on in these messages!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
The Secret Life of Bees. The era and the setting of the novel was something I could relate to.  Growing up in the 60's and 70's and knew it was a tumultuous time The book was about the innocence of a neglected young white girl caught up in the racism of the time and specifically the South during the civil rights era.  It was wonderfully told and beautifully written.
Surprisingly modern-- politics, greed, and darkness. In his apt introduction, Martin Seymour-Smith opines that Nostromo is the best Latin American novel written in the English language. While these sorts of contentions are always difficult to evaluate in terms of accuracy, it would be safe to say that if one were to make such a ranking then Nostromo would have to be considered.For a reader who has followed the history of European commerce and presence in Latin America, it will be surprising to hear that Nostromo was written in 1904. The complexity of the situation in Costaguana will be all too familiar-- as will the loveliness and resources of that troubled region. The characters in Nostromo cling to the hope of rescue from the more developed countries. At the same time, it is increasingly apparent that the values from the old world have no real place in the new. The frustration and hopelessness of ever sucessfully affecting change put paid to even the best motivations. There is a bitterness here that feels very modern, denying any golden age of European contact.Nostromo is moving and complex. The mix of personal and global stories blend mostly seamlessly. It realizes the promise in less-developed Conrad novels (Victory, for example) and is the fullest of all Conrad reading experiences. It is not, however, a hopeful book and any optimism it exhibits is well-guarded. Readers are advised to spend some patience allowing Conrad to build the picture of Costaguana in the intial part of the book. The patience will pay off later on, and there will be more than enough character driven action later to compensate for the history lesson.In addition to the introduction by Seymour-Smith, the Penguin edition comes with explanatory notes and a handy glossary of terms.
Holy Grail has failed. The computerization and digital signal processing development let improve classical indicators essentially due to application of modern methods of information processing to prices. Indicators began to smooth better and to delay less. However . First, the prices are non stationary, i.e. the characteristics of filters are varied during the time. Second, as different from technical problems, the kind of a signal and noise distributions for the price are unknown, i.e. nobody know what to filter actually. Third, being filtered by means of Fourier and similar methods prices change the previous values to the addition of the new data: we receive ideal trends under a history data but we can only trade them from right hand to left hand.Fourier transformation is based on representation of initial series by the infinite sum of sinusoids with a various phase, amplitude and frequency. Recently wavelet transformations was widely adopted in various areas of data processing in which initial series are represented as the sum of some locally defined functions named wavelets. They are constructed by shifting and vertical and horizontal scaling of certain the prototype function. Wavelet transformation, in essence, is fractal that allows the effective using it in the technical analysis. First, it allows to carry out the multiscale analysis of prices, objectively identify trends on various scales by duration and amplitude, separate traders to various groups: scalpers, day traders, swing traders, position traders and long-term investors. The multiscale analysis can be interpreted as the analysis on various time frames. Second, it allows determine noise as the insufficient for reception of the profit amplitude and frequency movement of the prices that effectively allows filter the price series simply subtracting the lowest scale wavelets from it. Third, the additional filtration of white noise without delay is possible. Fourth, long-term trends are defined objectively. Fifth, wavelets do not contain optimized parameters in construct to standard indicators. Sixth, the used wavelets type is adapted to deal with the time ordered data and does not distorted on the last price values. Seventh, the used wavelet transformation is very effective computationally that allows use it in real time for the large massives of tick data. Eighth, it is effective to use wavelets as input data for neural networks and other methods of forecasting and recognition.
Great for young dino lovers. This series is great! I have a 2-year-old nephew who loves dinosaurs right now. This was an entertaining book for the both of us.
Thank You, Mr. Bassani!. William Weaver's translation of Giorgio Bassani's novel is as faultless as a perfect tennis match played at high noon on a glorious spring day. His  choice of words is colloquial yet not dated, to the point and limpid as the  waters of an utterly still and silent lake: looking through them, you see  the lost world of the Finzi-Contini risen from the ashes, glittering and  new, as if it had never perished. And thank you, Mr. Bassani, for bringing  us back to the impossibly lovely yet gruesomely doomed Italy of your youth.  There is much to think about here: what becomes of the opportunity of love  when not grasped in time; the complex twists and turns of the human heart,  which barely understands itself, let alone another; the tragedy of  irrepeatable human beings when they are destroyed by the invincible  ignorance and rage of politicians possessing kindergarten imaginations and  state-of-the-art weapons of repression. Giorgio Bassani has created a world  which is startlingly real. One has the idea that, should one stroll through  Ferrara today, one could still hear the far-off echo of tennis balls being  whacked beyond a clump of trees on the other side of the Finzi-Continis'  high wall on a deathless day in, say, 1939. Long after the shouts of the  dictators have died down, these people live on through the curious and  graceful immortality which is conferred upon them by this book. Meet them
Wondeful fun!. I read this to my 20 month old almost every night.  He loves the fabulous illustrations and the silly rhymes, and of course we add all the animal noises.  My nieces and nephews are similarly enthralled when they come to visit; after one such visit, my sister-in-law suggested we get this book for my nephew's upcoming birthday, so here I am ordering another copy!  Commotion in the Ocean is delightful in the same way
Good grasp of 3rd world, struggles of natural world. Written in the style of the screenplay, Peter Matthiessen mixes poetry and realism. It is easy to see, although somewhat confusing as to who the speaker is. Enjoyable
Beautiful painted pop-ups -- great fun!. I love the accurate architectural recreations of the great monuments of Washington, D.C. -- especially the main pop-up of the White House itself, rising from a beautifully painted rendition of the grounds, as entered through the main gate. The book is full of informative and fun anecdotal information -- which is icing on the cake of the ingenious pop-ups. Lots of fun -- I am giving multiple copies as Christmas gifts. A great present, for not a lot of money
Another view of JFK. Most of Kennedy's biographers fall into two camps; hagiographers like Goodwin and Schlesinger and dozens of others, or much more honest examinations of the character of the man like Thomas Reeves very good book. The hags have outnumbered the wags by at least ten to one, but this book is a good addition to the latter camp.This way-too-long book has many good examples of how JFK really did not have some burning commitment to civil rights (or much of anything else for that matter) and was really a fairly shallow man with good speech writers who could turn a phrase and have Kennedy deliver it with passion. His willingness to appoint segregationists such as William Cox to the federal bench  and his friendships with Senate bigots such as Al Gore Sr. and Bill Clinton's hero, William Fulbright, shows him to be far less the advocate of civil rights than his hagiographers have made him out to be.Much of this book is focused on the civil rights for blacks movement, but there are some good insights into other issues that were front and center at the time.
Wonderful! Excellent! I can use it in many ways!!. This is the one. Excellent ideas, simple to use, a variety of styles to present stories, and activities . It really works for ages 2, and older ones can enjoy it also.  THANKS!!!
Refreshing Viewpoints in an Old Debate. The debate surrounding Shakespeare's Sonnets has raged on for a long time, and much of the scholarship on them has remained nebulous, repetitive, and overworked. James Schiffer's volume, however, is refreshingly brilliant and  provocative: the essays he includes address an array of topics that are  often overlooked, while many of the arguments are simultaneously  revisionist and visionary, challenging the conventional wisdom that has  guided the criticism on the Sonnets for so long. And what's even better,  the arguments are beautifully and meticulously presented, crafted by some  of the foremost Shakespeareans of our time
A defence of the high culture. The author starts by giving a definition of the concept of culture and states his intention to pursue an "archaeological" method in studying his subject. He then discusses the difference between cult and culture in which he sees religion as the guarantee of social knowledge and asserts that there can be no scientific culture because culture addresses the question of what we feel. Mr Scruton then proceeds by defining the Romantic movement in art and literature and linking it to the decline of Christian faith and the Enlightenment, the aesthetic thus replacing the religious. And so art and literature ceased to be recreation and became studies. Since the aesthetic is the realm of value, the question of taste arises. He underlines the importance of fiction in high culture because it is the product of the imagination. Art being the product of the human spirit, it is higher than nature and apart from it.Mr Scruton then concentrates on Romanticism which had nature, erotic love and the world before Enlightenment as its dominant themes. Works of art also pose the question of the importance of fantasy and imagination. Modernism is also discussed with the example of Baudelaire, then avant-garde and the concept of kitsch in which advertising is important because it creates a fantasy in which value can be purchased so that price and value are one and the same.The author then discusses the issue that the relationship between a painting or a novel and its subject is an intentional one, not a material one as opposed to photography.A further topic is modern music in which it is not the music that is the focus of attention but the singer himself. In the music of youth, the music is at the service of the performer and not the other way round.Finally the author concludes that culture is rooted in religion and that the role of modern high culture is to perpetrate the common culture not as a religion but as art.An interesting study of modern values and of the importance of aesthetic principles which shows that "culture" does not merely denote every kind of collective habit
The Coalwood Way. Awesome!  Homer follows his Rocket Boys book with, as a friend of mine put it, a WONDERFUL Christmas story!  Definitely a great read
An Early Jeffery Deaver Tale That Is Wonderful!. This is a fascinating and intriguing novel with more than one plot twist and surprise! If you are a Deaver fan, I'm sure you'll love this story.Bill Corde is a deputy in a small midwestern town, New Lebanon. When the murder of a college student, Jennie Gebben, is discovered. Detective Corde is placed in charge of the investigation. Sheriff Ribbon and one of his deputies, Slocum are convinced that this is a cult killing, and that it is connected to a previous murder of another college student, Susan Biagotti. However, Bill Corde is not convinced of this, and continues to pursue the case in his own manner.Tied in with the murder are two mysterious teenage boy's who call themselves Jano and and Phathar, characters from a science fiction movie that they are obsessed with. As the story continues, the reader wonders if these teenager's are serial killers, or perhaps just troubled youth's.Detective Corde not only faces the puzzle of Jennie Gebbens murder, and difficulties he faces in the sheriff's department, in his family life he is dealing with a nine year old, learning disabled daughter who is a possible target of the killer, and living in a fantasy world, a teenage son who becomes a suspect in the murder, and a wife who is less than happy with their marriage.This is an intriguing and fascinating mystery. The characters are well stuctured and believable. Everything is wrapped up and explained by the conclusion of the novel. The reason I gave this book 4 stars instead of 5 is because I would have liked to know what happened to several of the characters shortly after the mystery was solved. It's a pet-peeve of mine
A MUST for everyone!. Talk about a wake-up call.  I'm 30 years-old and feel like this book taught me more about relationships (men vs. women mentality) in 1 hour than I've learned in all that time.  While reading it, you will have light-bulb after light-bulb type moments. Heck, you may even smack yourself square in the forehead with a resounding, "D'oh!"  John Gray knows men and he knows women, and the biggest lesson he contiues to teach is that we are NOT the same.  We do NOT think the same.  This book does a fantastic job of not only explaining that, but also giving us advice on how we go about having a successful relationship in spite of our differences.  A must read.  For women...AND men!
A Beautiful and Haunting Tale. This is a beautiful story about an idyllic childhood and the loss of innocence.  The Kite Runner follows the story of Amir, the son of a wealthy businessman in Afghanistan, and Hassan, the son of Amir's father's servant. As children the boys are inseparable until a horrible event changes them and their lives forever.  Amir and his father flee to America during the take over of Afghanistan by the Soviets.  While in America Amir continues to be haunted by the tragic childhood event while he finally grows close to his father.  Events lead him back to Afghanistan and eventually Amir finds a way to redeem himself.This isn't a book about politics nor does it feel like a lecture, instead you are given a glimpse into the tortured soul of a man who wasn't there for his best friend.  A man who spends his life trying to live up to his fathers expectations and always feeling like he has fallen short.  You can't help but identify with the characters in this novel even though they come from a culture vastly different then our American culture.  The timing novel also coincides with current events and makes the people and city of Afghanistan come alive.
Part 1 of a roller coaster ride of a trilogy - GREAT!. Black begins The Circle Trilogy by Ted Dekker. Man what a mind this guy has.I wasn't sure what to expect when I began this book; it was the first book by Ted Dekker that I had read. I am now a true Ted Dekker fan and have started reading the rest of his books.This book begins the story of a man that wakes in another world when he sleeps in this world. A virus is about to ravage mankind here, while in the other world, evil is being released on the people of another time. The story is much a metaphor for the birth of evil in the garden of eden; but do not be afraid to read this if you are not a christian. It is a wonderful story by a christian author, but it does not push the christian message; more so, it just maintains a clean (no cursing, etc.) layout that can be enjoyed by anyone.The story is absolutely incredible and I jumped right into book 2 of the trilogy as soon as I was done with this one.An absolutely incredible story with perfect suspense, creative character development and never ending action.If you are even reading this review because you think you may be interested in this trilogy, READ THIS BOOK
Absolutely fascinating stories. This is that rare history book that can keep one up late, utterly unable to wait til the next day for the end of the story. Kerber focuses on little-known women and their conflicts with government over their rights  and obligations as citizens: loyalty during wartime, voting, serving on  juries, paying taxes. She brings these stories to life with dramatic, clear  writing.  If you're interested in American history, don't miss this boo
It's the best book in the whole wid world. Many people of all ages will like this book, Shiloh Season. If you like the book look through and look at all the pages that have pictures. Read and find out. What happens to an abused dog rescued by a boy named Marty
Exceptional Read. This book has been around as long as I've been alive and I have read it several times.  Of all religious centered books that I have read, I believe that The Seven Storey Mountain brought me back into the Catholic Faith.  Thomas Merton was not an angel  and neither were the Saints.  Thomas Merton was and is a complex person.  If you read this auto-biography, you will not know the real Thomas Merton.  It would be beneficial to read his Journals to get a real look into his mind and in the way he expresses the mystery of God and religous life.  His desire for seclusion in the monastic life was constantly being challenged by his prolific writings and his popularity in the "outside world."  It is also interesting to note that Thomas' background was English Litertature and not Theology, which is to me an enigma in that how can someone from a secular background have the knowledge base of describing his journey into the Great Mystery.  Thomas was truly given the gift of the Holy Spirit in order to write his wonderful journey for us to follow with him.I totally recommend this great book for anyone who wants to understand their own journey into the Great Mystery
Endorsed by the powers and professionalism of the American Kennel Club. More than a million copies of this reference classic's prior editions have been sold, so if this updated 20th edition THE COMPLETE DOG HANDBOOK holds a familiar ring, that's why. But the 20th edition offers even more: not only is it endorsed by the powers and professionalism of the American Kennel Club, but it packs in all 153 breeds recognized by the Club, along with standards, breed histories, and photos - including the twelve most recently recognized breeds. Lest you think this is just for pros, look at the sections advising on how to choose and train a dog, responsible breeding, canine first-aid and more. Add sections on AKC sports and a glossary of terms and you have a real winner.Diane C. Donovan, EditorCalifornia Bookwatch
nurturing concepts for all creative genres. It was a an Italian virtuoso contrabassist who told me to read these Lectures. Stefano plays all the arduously difficult new music literature for the contrabass. He travels with a violoncello,so he can play all that  repertoire as well. When he plays this music he often ponders Calvino, five  primary conceptual corridors toward what he thought of as literature,but  music as well can be contemplated with these ideas. &quot;Lightness&quot;,  well music has a density, Mozart played games with it, and interpreting  Mozart can be a treatise in the dialectic,the transformations and timbral  modulations of lightness to heaviness.,ask any violinist.Calvino of course  expounds on Kundera's popular book, on the weight of the lifeworld of  living in the East,the coal-dusted passageways,or of a fallen love,begun  transgressivly there as well. Dante is a frequent pilgrim(example) here the  lightness of snow falling imperceptibly on the mountainside.  &quot;Quickness&quot;, but not how fast things move,(our Silicon Valley)  odious airjets that may puncture the ozone layer,or violins, but the  quickness of an image to transform our consciousness,to lighten it up from  the cruel oppression of citylife.That's poetry. I think.Robert Musil is  here as well, the complexity,the numbering imagination of his transitory  work to modernity the opening two decades of this century,his &quot;Man  Without Qualities&quot; a seemingly endless work.And Gedda's &quot;Awfull  Mess. . . &quot; on the street a probing detective novel of complexity of a  murder in Rome,on the way to the Labor Bureau of the Roman Government. In  music I frequently think of Visibility when I have nothing to transport me  into the bowels of a Bruckner or an Antheil Symphony,what do I see in the  music,like the weight of this century in the &quot;Largo&quot; from the  &quot;Fifth Symphony&quot; of Shostakovich.Multiplicity as well another  Calvino chapter is here,sprouting its wings like a peacock, all around us  if we only have the patience for it. To phanthom and explore all images of  a work as looked at through a plexiglass. We seldom do that. How exact is  art, &quot;Exactitude&quot; is what Leonardo di Vinci lived his life with,  rewrote almost everything,Calvino tells us, as Leopardi,the Essays
So Funny!. This book was so funny! I would be sitting somewhere and just start laughing out loud thinking about something funny from the book.  I loved it from start to finish and I plan on reading the rest of the shopaholic books.
A non-scholarly review. I really have the feeling that I am not knowledgable enough about the period in question in the Thucydides to provide any kind of reasonable context for the work. Instead, this review will focus on some reading tips and reactions aimed at the more generalist reader who may be attempting to get through the text.First, the text is daunting. Be patient with it, and put it down if you need to. It pays off. I'm not someone who reads battle scenes with absorption, and still I found that if I absorbed the text in small enough doses, then I was able to follow with interest.Second, use the appendices at the back. The explanations about the Spartan and Athenian Leagues, the Greek monetary system, and the Melian dialogues were actually quite helpful in places for reading the text. These appendices are provided in the Penguin edition of the Thucydides.Third, take notes. There are a lot of big thoughts, and I found that I absorbed them better by writing them down for myself to think about later.It is time-consuming to attempt the History of the Peloponnesian War. It is also worth it, to my mind. I got a lot out of reading it even without being a historian with expertise in the time and region. Give it a try, and give it the space that it deserves."So it is now reasonable for us to hope that the gods will be kinder to us, since by now we deserve their pity rather than their jealousy.
A TREAT WHEN YOU EAT !. I like this book very much ! I followed this diet with a friend and she an I were trying to lose weight . Guess what, THE DIET DID WORK ! The book tells you what you have to eat threw the course of the day with foods that are low in carbohydrates. You can decide which meal of the day you choose to have your goodies (TREATS).For EXAMPLE: If you want a Treat for breakfast it can only be with that meal. You can decide when you want to eat your treat, either it be lunch or dinner its up to you. But It will only be that one meal of the day that you choose. You CANNOT eat your TREATS in every meal. Of course, we incorporated EXCERCISE which also helped in the process to lose weight. I'm the type of person who likes VARIETY, so I have many books on diet and nutrition. So when I get bored with one diet I can choose another. When I do find the BEST diet for me, I will tell all you readers out there about it! Stay motivated and be forever fit
Life changing. Timeless. As relevant now as what it was when it was written. Addresses the issues of hate and indifference and argues that the solution is love. Love does sound all too simplistic but it is one of the hardest things to face but its rewards are beyond words
The joy is in the footnotes. As a religious reader of Simmons' stuff online, I was sketpical about buying this book. The extensive footnotes, however, which contain added jokes, exponential material and goofy asides made it more than worthwhile. The fun of this collection wasn't so much in reading the articles again, but in learning what the author thought about them as time passed
Delicious!. At turns stunning, steamy and poignant, Try is a multifaceted gem. Daryl Heatherly is a nuanced and realistic protaganist, and her lover JW is an appealingly calloused New West warrior. What's not to love?Lily Burana's craftmanship is airtight, but her unique prose style is never labored or overcooked. It's this effortless fluidity that makes Try such an achievement. Whether she's describing a cinematic Wyoming vista or a risque body piercing, Burana conjures unforgettable images with ease. Every paragraph is gorgeous.Try is a great American romance with a Western tang. Highly recommended
A MUST READ for Creative People!. I stumbled across this great little book and loved every minute of reading it! For anyone struggling to live their life more creatively, be it music, art,writing, etc, this book is for you. It can be difficult to get where you want to be in these fields, but there is hope and helpful suggestions here
Good for Christmas -- serious or fun. This has almost all the songs and carols you could want, both sacred and secular. Plus some extras I've never heard of (not many, luckily). Great for a party and also for a quiet evening with friends or family. It's missing 2 biggies (in my opinion): White Christmas and Winter Wonderland. Copyright problems, maybe? Otherwise, it has a LOT. From O Holy Night and Birthday of a King to silly ones like The Chipmunk Song ("I still want a hu-la ho-o-op...")and Grandma Got Run Over by a Reindeer. I really enjoyed it last Christmas. It was great for a sing-a-long, too.One tip: Play through some songs yourself before you play for a group. Occasinally, you might prefer different harmony (i.e. different chords) than those given. It doesn't happen often. When it does, just cross out the printed chord and write in the one you like better. I think we're all used to certain harmonies when it comes to something like Christmas songs and carols.I had fun with this book at Christmas, as you can tell. I think it'll be a regular for me in future Christmas seasons.
BAM - that's how I feel!. A must for those in the depths of life's hell.  I began what I believe to be my mid-life crisis a few months ago.  A dear friend gave me his copy of this book and it now travels with me everywhere.  I have referred back to my highlights on several occasions.  And, the best thing is becoming aware that our experiences are a part of a much larger journey.  There are pieces within the text that I had to reread several times, but the overall message was clear and I never felt overwhelmed by the effort to find the meaning or relation of a certain passage.  Hollis is on my A list of respected authors - I even had him recommend my current therapist
On the right Frequency. In the John Grisham catalogue,  The Street Lawyer is viewed as one of his lesser works.  I am surprised as it impacts me the most, and recently discovered why. While watching Frequency with Dennis Quaid, I took note of the many possible plot holes that existed.  Yet when reading a review of the movie by film-critic Roger Ebert, I was struck that he left these "important" issues to the side and focused on the heart of the film, a father and son who almost supernaturally communicate across time to save the father's life and bring the two back together.  The film worked by keeping the father and son relationship in the forefront, thus allowing Ebert to remember his father.  The Street Lawyer works not only as a light reading page-turner but also as a novel that focuses on the homeless and successfully keeps them in the forefront of all action that goes on.Lawyer Michael Brock, owed to crisis, leaves his salary and future at a prestigious law firm to dedicate his talents to fighting for the rights of the homeless in Washington D.C.  Along the way we meet Claire Brock, who will go the way of failed first marriages, Ruby, a possible replacement, Mordecai, the larger than life lawyer for the homeless  who leads Michael's new thread bare law firm, and we get to know the homeless' plight through visits to D.C. shelters, conversations of poor municipal care, and a well-conceived plot involving an illegal ouster of rent-paying squatters that causes...well, I won't spoil it for the new reader.What is revealed, almost between the lines, is Grisham's friendliness towards religion.  The homeless are often fed by sympathetic churches, Ruby is the daughter of a minister, and the vice of greed is shown for what it is, a selfishness that hurts others and is often confused as a virtue ("Weren't we just chasing money? Why did we work so hard; to buy a richer rug, and older desk?").  Most telling is Brock's crisis experience.  When visiting the bodies of a homeless family in the morgue, we read, "I closed my eyes and said a short prayer of mercy and forgiveness.  Don't let it happen again, the Lord said to me." (pages 113-114 of the  1998 paperback edition) This line, that his new work is a calling from God, lifts the book to a new realm.  I recently talked to a lawyer friend of mine who teaches human rights, has participated in human rights conferences around the world, and has even counted votes with Jimmy Carter.  She said the non-religious approach to human rights holds that human rights and respect are essential to maintain world and regional harmony.  Yet this essential item is a construct rather than an absolute, and falls away if one does not agree that harmony is essential, that is, one might place a personal, political or religious viewpoint above harmony, making it his or her absolute, even if this involves killing.  Michael's calling is an absolute.  If God did indeed say it, then working to better the condition of the homeless results since people are made in His image, an absolute that would even cause Michael to leave it all and work for little to make their lives better.  That is not to say that the novel becomes "Christian", far from it.  But the biblical worldview is there, and this gives the book substance.The Street Lawyer does have weaknesses.  Its short chapters are designed to build sympathy for the homeless, while painting less than flattering pictures of those who should be doing more (i.e. anyone not homeless).   Michael's last chapter romance with Ruby almost seems tacked on, a sort of  "end with something upbeat here chapter", and certainly not all anti-homeless legislation is Republican.  As well, my father was a gruff, 20-year police veteran who detested, and I mean DETESTED, lawyers.   I don't think that Sgt. Gasko, when armed with a warrant to search Michael's apartment, would respond so previously to Michael's threats, but would have delighted in legally taking apart his apartment and enjoying a lawyer's ranting and raving at the same time.  I know my father would have loved that opportunity.  But the novel works by building on a biblical worldview where people do have merit, keeping the homeless the main thing, and giving me a hero whose exploits, no matter how fictional, awaken in me a desire to do something more for those whose voices society chooses not to hear.
quck, interesting read. Although there is no doubt in my mind that Patton is one of the most brilliant generals of 20th century USA, Blumenson seems to be a bit biased towards this controversial figure.  He rationalizes all of the various controversies that surrounded Patton to put Patton in the best light.  There is no controversy, or 'dirt' dug up on Patton here.  Otherwise a fairly quick and very interesting examination of the life of Patton
H.P.B.'s Magnum Opus. Blavatsky was an incredible mystic and probably the best known Theosophist. The Secret Doctrine is such an incredible work. Although some parts may seem to be cryptic, Blavatsky gives so much information and insight into the occult world. It's not an easy read, but I find myself rereading chapters only to find a hidden nugget that I overlooked before. This is a compendium of vast esoteric knowledge and I am so grateful this scarce third volume has been made available
Moccasin Trail. I really liked this book because it was full of adventure, and a little mystery. The book is about a boy named Jim who gets a letter from his family that he ran away from. Jim tries to gain the trust of his family, and hepl them get land in the west. It's a fun book to read with the entire family.
Good start for a great series. Unfortunately this was not my first VI book but fortunately I enjoyed &quot;Killing Orders&quot; and &quot;Bitter Medicine&quot; enough to look further.  I was not disappointed with the my reintroduction.   Ms. Warshawski is an appealing character to mystery readers, women, Chicagoans (?), and anyone who enjoys reading about a tough, intelligent woman rooting out the bad guys.  Not much of a mystery reader?  I don't really consider myself one and have enjoyed it immensly.  Give it a try
The first true report. It is remarkable that in all the years of Playboy, this is the first book by someone who really wanted to be (and was equipped to be) a Playboy Playmate has told what it takes to be part of Hef's inner circle. And what is even more remarkable is that it appears that the author has written the book on her own, describing how badly she wanted to be in that circle and what happened to her. I applaud her honesty and openness.
Scared Out of My Mind. Brandon Massey is one of my favorite authors.  I've actually had the pleasure of meeting him at a booksigning in Atlanta sponsored by Booking Matters.  Mr. Massey admitted that he really enjoyed working on this project.  I confessed and told him that I had to put the book down because I was literally having nitemares. This book really messed with my head.There is no other way to say it-all of these writers are bananas!  They are crazy.  What normal mind creates stories like these? They were unpredictable, original and anything short of a psychological roller coaster. Now that my night mares have ceased, I am ready for Dark Dreams 2.
More relevant today than ever. Reading Tuchman these days, she seems eerily prophetic.  The War in Iraq is classic folly--the pursuit of policy contrary to a nation's self-interest.  The leaders of the U.S. would do well to study it carefully. The book is for college-level readers, it's not easy stuff.  However, it is well worth the effort.There are so many classic lines in this book!  A sampling of some of my favorites:"Mankind, it seems, makes a poorer performance of government than of almost any other human activity.""No experience of the failure of his policy could shake his belief in its essential excellence." (Said of Philip II of Spain, but it fits George W. Bush to a T.)"Folly, in one of its aspects, is the obstinate attachment to a disserviceable goal.""The wars of the League of Cambrai over the next five years exhibit all the logical consistency of opera librettos.""...it should not be supposed that honor and dignity are better served by persisting in a wrong measure once entered into than by rectifying an error as soon as it is discovered."  (From Benjamin Franklin.)"In the search for meaning we must not forget that the gods, or God for that matter, are a concept of the human mind; they are the creatures of man, not vice versa."As Tuchman points out, folly does not consist only in going ahead with pointless wars.  Tuchman also calls it folly when we insist on economic growth when such growth is demonstrably using up the basics of life on our planet.  I agree!  Tuchman doesn't mention Social Security or Medicare and their runaway costs, but the inability to address these programs rationally looks like folly to me. Do we really want it said of our age "after us, the deluge"?
A BEAUTIFULLY WRITTEN  BOOK. "Talk Before Sleep" tells the story of five friends, one of whom, Ruth, is dying of cancer.  Her best friend, Ann, puts her own family on hold and stays with Ruth both day and night.  This book had particular meaning to me since I, too, am living with cancer.The story is told in a light-hearted, comical manner about a subject that is far from humorous. Each of us could use a group of devoted friends like Ruth's.  They make Ruth's last days bearable, in spite of her pain, sharing past memories, good times, laughs, tears, and enough ice cream to turn them all into the size of elephants!  The ending of the book takes a twist that proves painful for the friends who stood by Ruth until her last days.The strengths in "Talk Before Sleep" are the lessons it teaches us about living each day for the moment and enjoying the camaraderie of friendships. The one weakness of the book is the fact Ann left the reader feeling she had abandoned her responsibilities to her own family to be with her friend - a vary noble gesture, but were her priorities in the right place?  That is a matter of the reader's opinion.  Overall, I enjoy many of Elizabeth Berg's books and this one is no exception.
Great Primer, Great Research. Meticulously documented, supported by great quotes from the players, Calloway's book may be a tad dry, but it is long on data, insight and perspective.  Great, short read and I would say a highly recommended read for anyone interested in Colonial America and our history in general.Indian perspective is worth getting the book alone, to my mind.  As this was my first book on the subject, I was gratified that it was concise and detailed so as to lead me into other areas I might wish to explosre in further reading.Mean Bob Mean[..
It must be good; university libraries don't have it. Reckon I'll have to put out good money for this book.  University of Maryland doesn't carry it, nor does the consortium of seven private university libraries, and nor does the Montgomery County (Md) Public Library.This despite an interesting and relevant topic and reasonably robust sales.  Hmmmm(I add a year later) I have now read the book.  It is refreshingly direct, in the voices of Boalt Hall students themselves.  A few anonymous, and a few who disagree with the book's thesis.  Still five stars
29 years of cooking heaven. I was told about this book in 1976 from English friends living in Indonesia.  They swore it was the real thing.  We had lived in Sri Lanka in the early 60's and I was desperate to learn some of the dishes (I only had our cook's shorthand recipes and my mother's recollections).  I not only learned how to cook from Charmaine (and Julia Child) but over the years saw almost every ingredient finally show up in our San Francisco area.  I had the privilege of having a correspondence with Ms. Solomon in the last few years and was able to thank her for opening my eyes and my stomach to heavenly cooking.  I have given this book to practically everyone in my family and close friends.  It is THE classic Asian cooking source with REAL authentic dishes.Thanks Charmaine
Early King Still Some of The Best. I wanted to re-read Salems Lot for some time, and finally did so recently. Imagine my surprise when I discovered how good it was! It's been maybe 25 years since I last read it and I still enjoyed every page (well, most of them). I must say that Steve's early stuff-Carrie, Salem's Lot, The Shining, The Stand--are still some of his best. His style is tighter now, and deeper, but the early stories were just genuinely creepy
A hard act to follow. Where could Simpson go from here? Hardly almost kill himself again & write another! Well it could be worse, making a living being a guest speaker at business functions. His grain of wisdom seems to be that if you want to succeed, (or get out!)then you have to get in deeper
Recipes are not quite right. I have an older edition of this book that was given to me, so maybe it's not the same with the new edition, but the times for the recipes are so far off.  Almost every recipe I have tried from this book (other than bread maker recipes or just the basic ideas for food) I have had to cook AT LEAST twice as long as it says.My babies have all enjoyed the teething biscuits and everything we've made out of the book.  As far as the recipes not being "healthy" enough, I think we all know that making food at home is healthier than processed prepackaged food and I didn't find the recipes to be truly unhealthy.  In my edition of the book she warns off feeding uncooked honey to babies under 1 year and does suggest hot dogs sparingly.  It's not for people who want to go completely "whole foods" but for your average household I think it's a pretty realistic approach to feeding your child.  It would get 5 stars if the recipes were actually the proper cooking time
Rich and meaningful. This book is rich in illustration and in story.  The book resonates like a  powerful drum beat.  The author tells a tale that seems passed from  generation to generation.  This is a great read for Black History Month.  This is a book you will read again and again to your children.  The  suggested age for readers of 4 to 8 is really too limiting.  Children of  all ages will enjoy and be moved by this book
Don't Try This at Home. Love this book!!  Really cool idea with the photo booth but book is more about text than just photos.  Highly recommend
Leaf Man. Great Fall book.  Illustrations are beautiful, typical of Lois Ehlert books!Kids love the different creatures formed by leaves in this book.  It's a wonderful book to use as a literary base for writing and fall art projects
brilliant beginning but better stuff to follow. At the time of its first appearance in 1985 Between Men was viewed as an important intervention into Feminist as well as Gay and Lesbian studies. It was an important book because it argued that "sexuality" and "desire" were not ahistorical phenomenon but carefully managed social constructs. This insight (that actually originated with Michael Foucault) is often viewed as anti-humanist or post-humanist because it argues that men and women are simply the products of patriarchal power relations over which they have no control. By mobilizing Foucault's theories of the history of sexuality Sedgwick re-fashions Feminism and Gay and Lesbian Studies to make it seem as though Feminism and Gay and Lesbian studies are ideally situated to continue those interventions into the history of sexuality begun by Foucault. Sedgwick's own concern in this book is homosocality and this book's contribution to that topic is invaluable and still provides an excellent starting point for any foray into that topic. Her views on homosociality were groundbreaking, however, Sedgwick's book is famous mainly for its introduction which critiques current research agendas (including radical feminist agendas)as well as spells out the research agendas that she feels Gay and Lesbian studies should pursue.  Its a twenty page introduction that to this day remains the best synopsis of academic feminisms (especially radical feminism) as well as the best articulation to date of the need for a new kind of discipline that can make use of the best part of existing feminisms and continue to evolve Gay and Lesbian Studies in productive directions. In that twenty page introduction Sedgwick lays out an academic template that has retroactively been labeled Queer Studies. For that introduction this book deserves five stars. The rest of the book is dedicated to new readings of classic Eng Lit texts and will only be of interest and of use to students of English literature.Overall the book is appealing because Sedgwick draws a map that is in fact usable. The pitfall of this book is that she uses this map to explain everything. This is of course a charge that can be made against any theorist that believes that their new theory holds the secret to history, to desire, to sexuality, to subjectivity, to relationships of all kinds, to every social situation and to every literary work. Its only later that we begin to see that any theory also has blind spots.Like Foucault Sedgwick  treats "masculinity" and "femininity" and "lesbian" and "homosexual" not as natural and stable categories but as historically contingent and shifting categories. This is fine so far as it goes but it also means that in order to challenge these categories and effect structural changes to the way we view gender and sexuality the academic must argue from some privileged position that allows them access to the ways society shapes its subjects and also allows some privileged insight into how historical change occurs. Again this is true of all theory. An academic that suggests that we are all shaped by history must also realize that their own views are shaped by their own historical-academic-personal situatedness and to her credit Sedgwick does just that in her later, and much more interesting because much more self-critical, Touching Feeling.In that book Sedgwick evolves what amounts to a relational ethics as well as an ethics of academic life that recognizes that various forms of relationality and knowledges are practices that produce affects. If Between Men is a book that makes big claims, Touching Feeling is abook that analyzes the affects of such claims. Touching Feeling is thus a book that concerns itself less with cracking the sex and gender codes of the past (although she does some of that in this book as well) than in thoughtfully analyzing how practices, habits, and beliefs affect the quality of our lives. In many ways Touching Feeling marks a departure from some of her previous work and a return to a much more traditionally humanist approach (a return that was foreshadowed by Foucault's own return to ethics and humanism in his late work). It would seem that Sedgwick is saying that being fully human means not living in others codes and ideologies (nor dedicating ones life to cracking those codes and/or evolving new ones--which is to perpetually postpone the living of one's own life in the present) but living in critical relation to those codes and ideologies and evolving knowledge practices that are nourishing to one's self,one's students, friends and communities.In Between Men it is obvious that Sedgwick is not any ordinary academic. That book was a brilliant beginning and in it we can see the habits and tendencies of mind that make all of her books unique and appealing. Touching Feeling is the fully evolved realization of those habits and tendencies of mind and the book that I think she will be remembered for. Between Men helped initiate one trend in academic life, Queer Studies; Touching Feeling  is already shaping another trend in academic thought, and one that I think will remain current for some time to come: the ethics of relationality.
A must if you want to understand Yugoslavia. This is the sixth book I've read about Yugoslavia since we bombed Belgrade this spring.  It should have been the first.  Like most Americans, I had virtually no knowledge about this important part of the world.  What I read  in the media only confused me.  This author gives a concise overview of  Yugoslav history up through the 80's, and he presents his information in an  interesting &amp; lucid way.  (It is interesting to read his views on  Kosovo, in light of recent events which took place ten years after this  book was published.)  If I had read this book first, the information in the  other books I've read would have been much more useful to me
a great find. After reading Queen of Camelot, I couldn't wait for the Grail Prince to come out. McKenzie handles this difficult Arthurian legend with grace and sympathy, making the ultra-pure Galahad an understandable character. Galahad's problems are relevant to many contemporary issues, and today's reader will have no problem relating to this book. I highly recommend it
A very readable and enlightening history. Overall, this is a very good history of modern Africa. While a lengthy (800+ pages) book, "The Fate of Africa" has a flowing narrative that makes it quite enjoyable to read. The text is supported by the inclusion of a nice selection of black-and-white photographs, and several maps depicting the various regions of the continent.It is impossible to come away from the book with any attitude, other than one that must regard contemporary Africa as a place of unrelenting squalor, violence, and disease. This is not Meredith's bias, but simply a consequence of his objective reportage of events as they have unfolded since the early 50's. There is no way to gloss over a numbing and depressing litany of despots, massacres, epidemics, and atrocities. There are many villains, few heroes, and a vast and disturbingly faceless array of victims, in the pages of recent African history.Meredith tries to portray the end of apartheidt in South Africa as a rare but triumphal achievement of the African spirit amidst all the unrelenting horror. But anyone with even a passing awareness of conditions in South Africa today - massive crime; covertly organized campaigns of violence that are leading to the emigration of many whites; the uncontrolled influx of immigrants from poorer regions of the continent straining existing social and economic resources; and the crippling of a large segment of the black population from AIDS - will recognize that the downfall of Afrikaner rule is cruelly unlikely to lead the country into a new era of stability or prosperity.To his credit Meredith does not close the book with an extended recitation of "how can we save Africa ?". Colossal sums of money have been spent to "save" Africa with little to show for it save the enrichment of a tiny coterie of dictators. The intervention of Western powersis rarely done with the most noble of intentions. There is no clearer example of this than the eye-opening disclosure of the machinations of the French government in Rwanda in the mid-1990s, actions which, as Meredith relates, exacerbated the dutiful slaughter of the Tutsi at the hands of their erstwhile Hutu neighbors.The task of converting their continent from a place of ceaseless misery and suffering, to one with a promise of a better existence for its millions, lies- for better or worse- with the Africans themselves. It will be interesting to see what happens in Africa in the next decade; I am sure Meredith will be the writer best-qualified to tell us the story as it unfolds.
Great book. This book offers excellent advice on how to profit in the pet business. Patti Moran knows the business and covers the bases well. This is a must read book if you are looking to start a home based pet sitting business. Another good book I found on the pet business is "Raising Pet Birds for Profit-The Greatest Backyard Business Ever", by James McDonald.  Both businesses offer the entrepreneur who is looking for a home based business working with animals good opportunities
Another Great Book on Miles. not many Artists are that interesting where you want too read any book you see on them.but Miles Davis was not just any other Cat.the Man changed the way Music was heard&had a style in Hsi Playing&Leading His Band that made him one of the cornerstones.this Book takes on the Man,Myths,Music,times&raps it all together as on.I'd say the book is very fair overall in speaking on him as a Artist&a human being.when you read one Book on Miles you will want 21 more just like it because that is the vibe Miles has on you once you are hooked on His Genius
Excellent book on child OCD. Dr. Wagner manages to present a wealth of information about childhood OCD in an easy-to-read guide for parents of children with OCD.  She also manages to make the book highly interesting, and even entertaining and humorous. As a developmental and clinical psychologist working with children who have OCD, I regularly recommend this book to parents. I am especially impressed with Dr. Wagner's presentation of empirically-based treatment in a form which is readily understandable to parents
Vibrant childhood memories of this one. Love this book... Can't wait to get the new version of it when it is reprinted
Objective and informative. When compared to "American Foreign Policy Since World War II" which I reviewed in an earlier post, this book is preferable. It is clearly more objective and balanced than many texts covering the same subject. It is interlaced with pertinent and supportive graphs, charts, and tables. In addition, it is easy to read and well organized:Unit I - What is national security policy.Unit II - actors and processes in national security.Unit III - issues related to national security.Unit IV - international and regional issues.Unit V - approaches to national security.Most importantly it is guided by facts and empiricism and not an ideological "axe to grind" like many texts on the subject I have read
Well worth the read!. In his preface, author Young states: "Parents, teachers, coaches, business supervisors, religious authorities, authors and critics of all sorts, inadvertently or not, have been responsible for dulling aspirations and destroying dreams." Isn't that so true!From failure (and/or punishment) many of us are afraid to try again. For those who say, "I can't" without ever saying "I'll try," -- this book's message will shake you into trying again.Steve Young has collected over 60 personal stories of failure from entertainers, adventurers, medicine, politics, business, war, and so much more. A few are stories I've heard, most are new to me. Some writers are famous; others not. All have the message that failure is the "best thing" that ever could happen to them.Starting with Erin Brockovich, the authors range from Jane Goodall to Jamie Goldman, John Wooden, Bill Walton, Steve Allen, Ann Bancroft, Guy Gabaldon, Robert Townsend and Sam Donaldson and a whole of lot other interesting people in between.The stories are all great. I had to read every word. This is NOT a book I'll pass along -- it will remain mine, but I will tell everyone about it.I liked the one about Minnesota Viking's Jim Marshall who ran the wrong way and made a touchdown for the other team. He admitted his mistake, learned from it -- and in telling others, it allowed people everywhere to share mistakes they made and never told anyone about until they told Marshall.After the stories, the second best thing is the wonderful collection of quotes focusing on failure and success.The third great element is end-of-chapter quickies like Accidental Achievements (about things invented by accident), Unbelievable Understatement and Red-Letter Rejects (all about famous writers that were rejected again and again before someone finally published their work).Armchair Interviews says: An amazing collection of "get-off-your-duff" stories to energize and support you to try again -- to rise from failure to success, or to look at your failures in a different light
I Sing Your Praises. This book was nothing less than a page turner.  Mark Plotkin weaves his tale of adventure and peril of Suriname with a style unsuspected of a scientist.  Dr. Plotkin goes to the Amazon in search of plants with medicinal value.  The book is not so much dedicated to his finds but his interaction with people and animals of the rainforest.  Furthermore, the book is steeped with the cultural plight and history of the natives.  Interspersed throughout one can find history lessons of certain plants (for instance, coffee originated in Ethiopia before politics and redistribution landed the plant in Brazil).  I must say I found Dr. Plotkin's tale to be inspirational and was sad to see the book come to an end.
cover picture. I was very disappointed when I got my book and on the cover wasn't the 1937 Harley as it showed when I ordered it, but an Indian. What's with that
Good resource for inclusion - it gets the kids talking. When I first read this book I was not crazy about it; I tend not to like books directed at kids that are overtly about autism because the kids automatically know that it is a "lesson" book rather than a story book.  But of all the books I bought in an effort to give the regular education teacher a tool for talking with my son's typical classmates about his autism, this is the one that my typical 10 year old daughter selected.  We have used it for three years and each time the teacher has said it generated an interesting and sensitive dicussion among the children (grades 1-3).  Of course it takes a good teacher to lead the discussion, too, but this book has proved to be a valuable resource
A need to buy for poeple who want to learn about computers. This is a great book to read! I thought that I knew computers, but reading this book I've learned that I didn't. Now that I have read this book, I have helped my friends in many way. Heck, I have helped MYSELF
Comic Art. This book was so impressive we were glad we bought it for our friend!  She loves it, and didn't put it down all day after receiving it
Simple Inspirational. The book and the DVD changed my life what an inspirational story
Best One Yet!. Mr. Rosenbaum,I have enjoyed all your books but this is the Best One Yet. You keep getting better as a writer and the addition of the drawings adds another dimension.I am hoping there is another one in the works.-An Avid Reade
An epic journey. The poem of 'Piers the Ploughman' is often considered to be anonymously composed, as the name William Langland was less an authorial designation as it was an inscription on the back of a manuscript - it would be as if I would be assigned the authorship of the O.E.D. because, in some future time, the only remaining copy was missing the title pages, but still had the hard-cover with my 'ex libris' impression on it. Be that as it may, Langland is considered at least as likely an author as any other, and becomes a sort of stand-in, an 'everyman' for his time period. A few details of this Langland are known - he was a wanderer, a constant reviser (the poem goes through several revisions that scholars have designated as texts A, B, and C (and some argue for Z). This is not a spiritual autobiography, as J.F. Goodridge states in an essay about Langland in another edition, but there are no doubt autobiographical elements in the text. That the lead character is named 'Will' helps in this identification.This poem stands alongside Chaucer's 'Canterbury Tales' as one of the great products of Middle English; this also has the character of being a different sort of Middle English than Chaucer's more courtly, continental influenced variety. Thus, it gives breadth to the history of the English language. Langland is often ranked as a great English poet on a par with Spenser, Milton, Wordsworth and Yeats, as representative of his age both in topics as well as language facility.This epic poem deals with themes familiar for the time - like Dante and Milton, Langland deals with the grand ideas of the meaning of life and the destiny of humankind. However, unlike Dante and Milton, Will and Piers the Ploughman do not go through a mystical, otherworldly adventure or journey, but rather stays rooted to the earth. These are dream sequences, but these too need not be otherworldly - they are things that can happen to every person. The ideas of the seven deadly sins, the virtues, the church, and the images of heaven and hell are very much rooted to regular society images of the same. The discussion of the allegorical characters, aptly named Do-Well, Do-Better, and Do-Best, does much for the moral teaching of this poem, which would have been of primary concern to the author.Langland's text is often more Old English than Chaucerian in ways. It is far more alliterative, a strong component taken from Old English. Also, it is less metrical in rhythm than Chaucer - there is a pause in each line akin to older English poetry, but the metre is less secure.This is a translation of the B-text, a text that is a revision of Langland's own (most likely).  Translator and editor A.V.C. Schmidt provides an introduction and chronology, with lots of detail about the manuscript variations and textual issues.  Schmidt gives examples of the original language for the student to compare the modern translation with a snapshot of the original.This is one of the classics of English literature, perhaps the least known among them.
Excelent Shortwave Radio Guide. This publication is the best shortwave radio guide that I have come across. Super reports on various shortwave radios that are on the market, giving you information which helps in selecting your next radio. Much information about different countries and their shortwave transmissions. This is a got-to-have guide
Really quite thought provoking... all parents should read this and do what they can to foster real play in their children.  This book makes me realize just how many plastic toys my daughter has in her room, how stain-free her clothes are because she doesn't like to get dirty, and how much she is missing because of all of that.  She needs to get outside more, fly more kites (read the book, then you'll know about kites!), dig more dirt, bring home more bugs and animals and make up her own rules and her own games.  Many well-intentioned parents (myself among them) are doing more harm than good to their kids by 'teaching' them how to play, enrolling them in organized activities, keeping them away from 'germs', and filling their rooms with stereotyped plastic toys.  Yikes!  What are we doing?  I am so very glad I bought this book, and if anything I have said in this review strikes a chord with you, then please buy a copy for yourself.  I know you won't be disappointed.  You'll be inspired.  (If you like this book, check out "A Day in the Garden" by Bettina Steitencron -- it is a wordless picture book favorite of ours!
Another Brilliant Book by Patricia Hill Collins. This is another breakout of brilliance from Patricia Hill Collins. Collins has broken to a new level of analysis of the intersections of race, class, sexuality and gender, and offers transformative interpretations of black popular culture.  BRAVO, Ms. Collins! This book is a must-read for any black individual that cares about the lives of the black diaspora, especially in the new millenium
Straight into the mind and heart of the Valentino Rossi we know and love. This book brings us straight back to his days as a child, a teenager, and a motorcycle racer.. A great read into what goes on in his mind, although some of his life's choices that were mentioned seems a bit too forceful or unreal; perhaps a bit fake.. but again, he is a world champion and world champions have a record of knowing what they want to do from a young age.This book is vividly Rossi.  I enjoyed it and like the fact he shared some of his private life
I love these Fandex Guides!. A fantastic &quot;quick &amp; dirty&quot; reference tool!  The PERFECT aid for persons in the online auction selling business.  For example, I had a lovely antique plate that I wanted to put up for auction.  This particular  plate featured a bird sitting in a tree. I got out my trusty Fandex Bird  Guide and there it was ... a Yellow Warbler.   I then got out my equally  trusty Fandex Tree Guide and there it was ... the Downy Hawthorne Tree.   Therefore, instead of describing my treasure as a plain ol' &quot;Bird  Sitting in Tree -  Plate&quot;, I was able to give it the justice it  deserved and described it as a &quot;Lovely Yellow Warbler Nesting Atop a  Downy Hawthorne Branch - Plate&quot;
simply phenomenal. A truly clear and most interesting dicourse on the Seven-Point Mind Training Method of Buddhism. Compared to HH The Dalai Lama and Geshe Kelsang Gyatso's discourses Chekawa's poem, Mr Wallace truly speaks to the Western mind as a both a philosopher and a teacher. However, the book is highly readable and focused without sacrificing intelligence
An ideology that threatens progressive western civilization. An extremely important book. Every American should read this book, especially government policy-makers, so that lessons can be learned and our enemies better understood. Wright has skillfully written a highly readable account of the major players and events leading up to 9/11.With the fall of the Ottoman Empire and with it the Caliphate, the seeds of the modern radical islamic supremacist movement was born. Saayid Qtub, one of the founders of the muslim brotherhood movement in Egypt, and his motivations are fleshed out; as well as how it led to the fanaticism of people like The blind Sheik, Al-Zawahiri and Bin Laden and scores of followers.In addition, Wright describes the key figures in the NSA, CIA, and FBI- those charged with preserving our national security- and exposes the institutinalized dysfunctional culture that impeded the work of people like John O'Neill and the FBIs counter-terrorism department. Wright describes in detail 'the wall' between government agencies; how vital information that the CIA had, that may have enabled the FBI to foil the 9/11 plot, was with-held because of fear that future prosecutions would disclose methods and sources that were essential for ongoing CIA operations.Although this book is quite an achievement and an important read, I have subtracted one star because of some concerns:1. I believe where possible there should have been sources included so that the reader would know where Wright obtained information and how he came to some conclusions;2. By the same token, there is some detail in this book that I wonder is appropriate to disclose as the struggle against the fanaticism that brought us 9/11 goes on; Some in the media, although I am not suggesting Wright is necessarily one of them, believes they are journalists first and Americans second. I think some need to be reminded that it is the American system that provides them the freedom to be the journalists that that they want to be. And...3. Wright, in my opinion, wanders dangerously close to comparing John O'Neill to Bin-Laden- pointing out at one point that O'Neil was praying 5 times a day, and that he had several love interests at once; similar to Bin-Laden's religious practices  and his polygamy. I was disturbed by the comparisons and it made me wonder what was Wright's point. These similarities are about as relevant to their motivations and morality as the fact that they both have two arms and two legs. John O'Neil and Bin-Laden are at opposite ends of the morality spectrum.  O'Neil is a true hero; going beyond the call to protect his fellow citizens. Bin-Laden is determined to destroy progressive western culture.Unfortunately I have noticed a tendency to minimalize the virtue of our progressive culture. we must be clear about what we are defending: If Bin-Laden and his movement has his way, freedom of speach, religious freedoms, women's rights, gay rights, etc... will recede and there will be, what some have called, a 're-primitivization' of the west. Our culture is worth defending, and we need to give those charged with its defense enough trust and slack to accomplish the job. They deserve no less than our support and our gratitude.
Thought Provoking. I've been one to dabble in quantum physics on and off in the theoretical field for a good part of my life.  Toben and Wolf's book made it a lot of fun when I was first starting out.  As I expand my knowledge of the  relationships of this universe, I still come back to this work.  If you  happen to get your hands on a copy, guard it jealously!  I'm in search of a  copy for my adopted niece, and don't intend to lose mine
Good, heartfelt advice. After reading some of the other reviews, I was expecting this book to read like a Cancer Treatment Centers of America infomercial, but my mom was recently diagnosed with cancer and I wanted to get her something uplifting, so I bought this book.  I'm so glad I did.  I didn't feel at all as though the book were a commercial -- instead, I felt that the author was trying to emphasize that she was initially ignored by doctors who told her to prepare to die in a few months, and then she found a place that gave her hope (she's still alive, years later).  I think her point was that if you as a cancer patient aren't getting that kind of care, then you should look elsewhere until you do.  The book was a quick read and was full of caring advice for the patient and the patient's friends and family, all written by someone who's been there
Beautiful. I found this book for my little girl, after discovering a Dinosaur and Shark book for my son. It is so beautiful I sat in awe for about 30 minutes looking at it when I first received it. It's not Disney's Cinderella, so don't look for any comparisons. Instead, it is a beautiful story full of imaginative pop-ups that allow little girls to pretend they are in the story as Cinderella herself. My little girl (2 years) just loves to sit with me and my husband and flip through the story. Even my 3 year old boy loves to look at it
Great Book about a Great person that society is... ...FOREVER INDEBTED TO!!This book takes you back to what John Walsh's life was before "America's Most Wanted", the show he hosts that has captured over 850 fugitives and counting.  It shows you a common man with a good job, wife, and house etc.  It shows you how that life was turned upside down when his son was kidnapped from a Sears store and later found brutally murdered.It takes you to the turning point, when John found out that the FBI had a database for missing cars, but not one for missing kids.  It shows you the anguish he goes through in losing his son, the frustration in dealing with a justice system that had to many flaws, and the determination and sacrifice he would later put up in order to change laws and introduce legislation that would ultimately affect the lives of millions of people.THIS IS THE MAN WHO GOT MISSING KIDS FACES ONTO MILK CARTONS!THIS IS THE MAN WHO GOT THE LAW TO ACTUALLY PROTECT CHILDREN!This book will take you on the journey of a man who went from working in insurance to hosting a show that has captured over 850 fugitives.  Without John Walsh, the world would be a worse place, and not a better one.  This book is an excellent source of information on John's life and of the lives he has touched.  It also shows how one person CAN make a difference.  Thank you John for all that you have done for our country, kids, and communities.
A good book. I'm an (unemplyed) agronomist and I live in Brazil.I bought this good book by Amazon.This boook is good and full of informations.The problem of this book is that, it sometimes makes some mistakes.To example, in prologue is writed that:"Soybeans came from China, corn from Central America and wheat probably originated somewhere in sothwestern Asia."The soybeans and corn informatios are correct, but the author couldn't tells us, that wheat was originated in Middle East.I can understand that an american hate Islam, but I can't understand why an american author make this mistake such as this.He must remeber that wheat wasn't domesticated by islamics, but was originated thousands of years before the islamism be created.Again, on page 41, the author claims that Alexander Graham Bell was a genius.Not correct.Graham Bell, didn't invented the telephone, who was in fact invented by an italian called Antonio Meucci.Even the american congress realized this fact some  years ago.In fact, Graham Bell (a jew) was deeply linked to eugenics movement such as to example: The Wright Brothers,Woodrow Wilson, Theodore Roosevelt, Herbert Hoover, John D. Rockefeller, John P. Morgan(jew as Bell), Lenin(jew), Trotsky (jew), Dr. Morris Fishbein (AMA's president and also a jew),etc.Even with this mistakes, this book is good and informative about this subject.
My daughters love these tapes. My daughters, ages 9 and 5, frequently listen to these books on tape as they go to sleep.  The Junie B. stories are very amusingly told from the 5/6 year old perspective.  My girls have heard all of these tapes multiple times and it has spurred my older daughter to reread the books.  The narrator's voice may be grating to an adult ear, but that seems appropriate for the Junie B. character.
A good book. I admit, it took me about 2 weeks to read this book, but it was good. Jane is a very defined character, and although some of what happens is unlikely to the point of being almost unrealistic, it seemed to make sense.The only complaint I have is that I felt, many times, like I needed a French dictionary at my side. When Jane talks to Adele, and occasionally other people, it is usually in French, with no translation whatsoever.But since it was written in a time when most educated people took French, what can you expect?I would suggest publishers put footnotes with translations. The French is not, perhaps, very important to the story line (not that I would know), but it really bothered me to have no idea what they were saying
Charming, heartwarming book. I loved this book as a child, and now, as a first year teacher, i plan to use this book in my classroom.  The book is informative and sweet, and the pictures are adorable
Another great poem by Ed Sanders. Sanders has perfected a unique style of narrative poetry.  This book tells the story of Ginsberg's life as a private citizen and as a public figure, but it also chronicles his development as a poet.  For those daunted by the Collected or even the Selected Poems, Sanders usefully points out what he thinks are Ginsberg's best poems as he goes along.  Although I did not intend to when I sat down with it, I ended up reading it straight through to the end.  A very moving ending it was, too
All the things my mother never taught me!. This book gives such simple advice - information that intuitively we once probably knew, but as busy adult women seem to have forgotten!!  Worth a quick read
Great basic SciFi. This is a great collection of basic Heinlein SciFi. The title story is about basic jealousy surrounded by miscommunication and the physics of living on the moon. The other stories explore similar kinds of territory. Recommended for exploring concepts of the future and odd bits of probability
If you are entangled... Excellent book that revisits a message told many a times about taking things easy and appreciating what you have in life.I had been going through a spiritual awakening like many other people but was only going down a spiral of seeking 'wisdom', and a perfect state in which I'd one day find a perfect way to live life. This book help me find a floor to stop the free fall. It just reminds us that life is what you are living in this moment, and waiting for this one day when you learnt to be perfect that never is to be is such a waste.Enjoy the journey rather than suffer anxiety, depression and other problems related to finding a perfect psychology.Thanks Anna
Great!. I love all the David Shannon books and this one (as I learned was written before the "David" books- doesn't fail!  He's a very entertaining writer and I love the images-- Excellent
great theology. Boy did the first reviewer have a axe to grind! Longman rates this commentary five stars. He states that it is "a very sensitive theological reading that also brings these two books into touch with the contemporary world.
goes great with Little People Nativity Scene. I bought this book for my 18 month old last Christmas.  She enjoyed listening to the rhymes and even learned to say Baby Jesus because of it.  This year we bought her the Little People Nativity Scene and the book seems like it was made to go with it.  Almost all the characters in the Nativity scene are in the book and even look similar.  It really helped her understand that Christmas is not just about Santa and presents.  Great story and message
A superb reference and resource. Understanding May Sarton is a comprehensive study of the poetry, fiction, and memoirs of May Sarton, a pioneering feminist whose literary works were underappreciated during her lifetime. Author Mark Fulk explores Sarton's writing as speaking to both genders and all sexual orientations, not just female or lesbian readers, and delves in a literary analysis of the true spirit of Sarton's intent. Covering all of Sarton's work, from her initial poetry celebrating women's sexuality to her coming-out novel and her final novel and volume of poetry about the advancing onset of age. Recommended for American literature, feminism, and women's studies reading lists, Understanding May Sarton is a superb reference and resource
Not Flynn's Best. While this book is good--it is not as good as Flynn's previous books.  Does give good background on the Middle East and Special Forces.  Vince Flynn does know how to write a political thriller
Great Examination of Disease and History. In Arno Karlen's &quot;Man and Microbes&quot;, history is approached through the relationship of disease to mankind, starting with the first  humans to the present.  This is a fascinating examination of the microscopic world's impact on the macroscopic world.  The origins of some diseases, such as cholera, the 'black plague' and  AIDS is covered, as well as epidemics affecting only small parts of the world.  Throughout the book, it is emphasized that we could be on the brink of new pandemics -- the most obvious example is AIDS -- that will not only dramatically reduce population, but change our world view and lifestyle.  Modern pandemics and our responses to them are compared and contrasted to past pandemics, with the resulting opinion that although we live in a technologically savvy world, our reactions of fear and panic have not changed all that much.  My only minor criticism by the last quarter of the book is too much repetition; I found my mind wandering and was a little confused by the end.  However, I think that this is an excellent book for those interested in interdisciplinary (biology and history) studies
one of the modern books I ever read. When I read this book, I knew very little of Pakistan's history. And that doesn't matter one bit.Even without knowledge of the allegories that can be made, Shame is a beatiful book, describing human emotions, conflicts, well basically everything you expect from a gripping story, and more than that.If anything, you have to admire the masterful way in which the plot(s) slowly but inevitably unravel(s). Slow doesn't mean that the story has no pace, on the contrary. Seldom have I read a story that was so well structured as this one. I do not like to call books masterpieces, but I'll make an exception for this one
Well worth wading through. This large but highly readable work covers the history and context of emerging or re-emerging communicable diseases affecting the world today.  As a physician with a Masters in Public Health I could appreciate the challenge this author faced in presenting this complex and important topic. She has made remarkably few minor technical errors while presenting fields as diverse as virology, immunology and disease ecology in a clear and compelling manner.  She places the emerging diseases in the social, economic and political context that helps to explain why diseases occur where and when they do and why and how they impact individuals and societies.  Although the jacket copy seems to imply a sensationalized account, the story the author tells is a balanced and highly professional one.  In a world grown ever smaller and more tightly connected the issue of communicable disease and public health will impact all our lives and deserves the attention of every citizen.
Must read. Having two teenagers, one of each sex, I found this book extremely insightful.  It explains why they act the way they do, and tells how to "handle" these turbulent times.  A MUST READ for all who are rasing or about to raise a teenager
great for cultural appropriateness but needs a proof reader!. This book has insightful and accurate reviews of culture and cultural appropriateness; however if you buy the book don't trust the foreign language words or phrases 100%. In the case of the Czech and Slovak section, most of the words are spelled wrong and in some cases just wrong. I wonder who did the research? They should have consulted with a native speaker before the book went to print
An excellent comprehensive guide. Stencilers who want a complete handbook to the art, from choosing between materials and tools to understanding paint differences, glazes, and equipment, will find The Complete Stenciling Handbook packed with essential details. The chapters on how to create different stencil effects, from producing raised art to using layered patterns, supplement techniques and discussions with plenty of color photos illustrating finished results. An excellent comprehensive guide
Wonderful!. The book is amazing. I loved Mishima's language--his descriptions paint such a vivid picture in one's mind; the best part is his constant scrutiny of his feelings and analysis of his Self
Review of Harriet Tubman's Underground Railroad in the Sky. The story of the Underground Railroad is presented in a magical, yet understandable way for primary school children.  Cassie and her brother begin a journey to freedom, just like generations before them did in order to escape slavery.        Cassie and her brother learn about slavery and the reasons why so many braved the perilous journey to the northern states and Canada.  Cassie relives the journey and experiences many of the feelings and events that others did as she desperately tries to catch up to her brother, who has boarded the &quot;train&quot;.        The illustrations of acrylic on canvas enhance and heighten the excitement as Cassie makes her way through the woods and meets with those willing to help her.  I recommend this book to others as a great way to explain the concept of the Underground Railroad and it's place in our country's history
Will help in your practice of yoga. Have been going to hot yoga classes 4-5 days a week for the past three months, so you can classify me as a novice.  What I have noticed is this book really helped me attain better form as I incorporated it into the verbal instructions given in the class.  One area I think that could be improved on, however, is all of the pictures are taken from a side view and clearly a front/back view of the positions would help.  Also, some of the text instructions are hard to decipher when it comes to understanding a position.  Overall, this book has helped my practice and I refer to it often
A Classic. I read this book several dozen times when I was a kid, vicariously living my dream of making it in the wild.  Some kids are bored with it (it goes into quite a bit of detail, and is slow-paced), but others love it.  It tends to interest kids with a lot of imagination or an inclination to be a writer.  The sequels don't hold a candle to the original
The essential Emerson. This edition contains many good pieces of writing by Emerson. Emerson is a philosophical and poetic thinker. This means his poetry is often philosophical and his philosophy as expressed in his essays often poetical. He is in one sense the quintessential American philosopher whose message is an optimistic and life- affirming one. He too is American in calling for a kind of human self- reliance and affirmation. And here it must be remembered that the controversial American moved away from Trinitarian Christianity to be a Unitarian whose sense of the Divinity was both Transcendental and Immanent. It is no accident that he is the great father- figure who hails Whitman's arrival on the scene for they both were capable of seeing in everyday life realities signs of the Divine. Emerson is not however the simple optimist one misreading makes him, but a person who knew deep personal tragedies and had a sense of difficulties of life. He does however believe in human powers and greatness, and he does speak primarily in terms of affirmation. He stands in a way at the center of much of American and even European thought, for it is difficult to think of either William James or Neitzsche without Emerson.I cannot say that he has been a central figure in my life, but I have from time to time through his writings felt illumination and beauty, ' glad to the brink of fear' .
Will keep the little ones busy with lots of ideas. I am ordering this book, my current volume of this book is from the library. This is an excellent book. I am a day care provider, and my children were thrilled with all the stuff we found inside this book. All of the materials were easy to get too.  I highly recommend it to any teacher of preschoolers and up; and to every day care provider
A Good Man's Long Journey. John Tyree is a soldier first, a man second. Or so he thinks until he meets Savannah Lynn Curtis. While on leave, he falls desperately in love with Savannah, the proverbial girl of his dreams. Sweet, intelligent, and giving, John knows he'll always carry her torch.When September 11 changes the world, John is no exception. Moved by patriotic loyalty, he chooses to "re-up" in the army, adding time to his service and breaking his promise to return to Savannah. More promises are broken when he must attending to his ailing father.This is the story of how an ideal love can falter, despite its purity and strength. Not every romance results in a happy ending, but with a great deal of luck, those who don't survive will find meaning from the experience. Love, loyalty, friendship--all those sentiments are great, but to what cost? And how does this make a good man great? This is John's journey to that understanding.It goes without saying that Nicholas Sparks is one of today's "master" storytellers. Part of what makes him so successful is that he has the ability to create moving stories without pulling punches or painful twists. Such is the case in DEAR JOHN. Sparks offers a love story that has all the requisite components--well-crafted setting, high emotion, obstacles, resolution--then breaks it. It is from the sadness that hope emerges, and John Tyree, although still quite young, gains wisdom that will last a lifetime. Sorrow will be a large part of this, yes, but there is room for something more, something that will reach beyond the pages and touch John's tomorrow in a way only he will see.While this works, there is something lacking. It is one of those hard-to-define qualities that marks the difference between a good book and one that is outstanding. Maybe it's the heavy reliance on John's soldiering as an excuse for certain behaviors. Or perhaps it has more to do with aspects relating to John's relationship with his father, who appears to have Asperger's syndrome.I'm giving DEAR JOHN 4-Books for a beautiful story, but not five because of that indefinable element that was lost between idea and paper.Reviewed by Christina Wantz Fixemer11/22/2006
This is what a guide book should be like. Well organized and full of details.   Tom Stienstra enjoys the outdoors.  His years of camping experience provide details on what there is to do and why anyone would want to go to an area, in additions to accurate details about what facilities are there
Nice Introduction to Jefferson. Jefferson is of course an icon of our founding. This book sketches his life from birth to death focusing on those aspects that pertain to establishing the nation's political identity. Also, despite its brevity, the ambiguities of Jefferson are not ignored. Jefferson was a slave-owning aristocrat, yet he championed liberty for all people, at least in theory. However, Jefferson could not bridge the racial divide and he was hardly an advocate of any significant democratization of social and political affairs. His relationship, or lack thereof, with Sally Hennings, a household slave of Jefferson's, is mentioned several times (too often actually) with no hard conclusions drawn. If a brief, yet somewhat comprehensive, biography of Jefferson was needed, this book is a fine contribution.What is obvious is that Jefferson and others constructed a basic, raw framework for a nation and its government. But in Jefferson's lifetime alone, the operation and even the distribution of power within government was an evolving process. In addition, much to Jefferson's dismay, American life was beginning to change from being mostly an agrarian society of small producers. It would be interesting to see a Jeffersonian scholar speculate as to the possibility of Jefferson understanding and accepting the vast changes in American society over the last two hundred years. Would the vast private power of corporations in an industrial society be of concern? What would he prescribe to countervail that power? Would he have accepted gender and racial equality?One has to wonder about the legitimacy of directly invoking Jefferson to support positions on either the right or the left in today's complex society. Jefferson, like anyone else, was a man of his times, constructing ideas and dealing with issues in that context. What is really interesting is that Jefferson strongly suggested that the Constitution be rewritten every nineteen years. He seems to have known what we do not: that documents written to govern the affairs of men are not so sacred as to be untouchable. It makes the strict constructionists of our era appear to be silly. In reading this book, it is obvious that this nation has benefited greatly from a group of very insightful men from the eighteenth century. One would hope that similar wisdom can find a voice in a world where ideas have to compete with sophisticated public relations and propaganda of many forms.
Mary Anne is Hero!. I thought this was a pretty  good book, but when they fight over who gets to baby sit Lucy Newton that's what I didn't like about it. I thought Mary Ann had good judgement When Jenny got sick. Also I thought it was pretty cool when Mary Ann tried to get her friends back together, and made a new friend in the process
Beg steal or borrow!!. GARDENING BY MAIL Now on its 5th edition Barbara J Barton's book is just  about the most comprehensive directory  of gardening resources available.  My copy is very well thumbed! Very wide ranging but top class! Beg, steal,  borrow or buy. Published by Houghton Mifflin. $24.00 ISBN  0 395-87770-
Pure Genius!. This is pure genius at work. I bow my head in awe. This is not recommended reading, this is the kind of book you MUST read if you're into strategy. Cut down on Porter, Kay, Drucker, etc., and read this instead! After reading this, you can re-visit the old schools and see the world in a different light. In short, I am ecstatic. You'll pry this book from my dead hands (if you can get it away from me even then...).Read it, or you'll miss a very funny book (if you don't laugh out load a number of times, you lack all sense of humour) as well as a very thought-provoking book with a very important message, which even manages to make strategy fun (you'll understand more after having read the book). Together with Strategy Safari (by the same authors) and Johnson & Scholes books, this should be enough to get anyone to understand and work with strategy.This has to be one of this decades most important/influential books, so I'll recommend it warmly
A wonderful series and book. In response to the Publishers Weekly Report. It is  a FANTASY EPIC! It is not something you would want to read if you have the patience of a newt. I think the book is awesome and the way he seems to put everything into a cause and effect, helps a lot. Also, Jordan has an amazing sense of detail. More accurate than most history. I love this series and reccomend it to everyone.
Fascinating, albeit incomplete. ReOrient is one the most important works of the last decade in that it not only challenges a dominant perspective in Western social science but it also refutes author's and his colleagues' earlier arguments. Andre Gunder Frank lays down two central arguments in ReOrient which complement one another: 1) the "rise of the West" did not happen due to any internal factors but was predicated on American silver and Asian market; 2) Asia in general and China in particular was the center of global economy until the 19th century. Thus, Frank aims to destroy the bases of Eurocentrism in social sciences.Frank argues that Europe was not an important figure in world economy until the 19th century. Asians were more productive and competitive than Europeans and Asia remained at the center of global economy until the industrial revolution. Throughout this period European nations constantly had trade deficits with Asian nations, particularly with China and India. An indication of this European trade deficit was that gold and silver were never less than two-thirds of total European exports (p. 74). New World silver was for this reason very important for the Europeans; it helped them cover their trade deficits with the Asians and become a more active player in Asian economy. Thus, Frank contends that American silver bought Europeans a ticket in the "Asian productive and commercial train, which was steaming ahead on an already well-established track," (p. 115).One of Frank's original arguments regarding the superiority of the Chinese economy vis--vis the European economy in the 15th to 19th century is the different effects on these economies of the influx of New World silver. To make his case, Frank utilizes Fisher's famous quantity-price equation which maintains that an increase in the amount of money in an economy will result in increases in the prices of goods unless it is matched by an increase in quantity of goods (p. 154). Frank then demonstrates that whereas American silver caused substantial increases in the price of goods in Europe, it did not have any remarkable inflationary effect on the Chinese economy. For this to happen, Chinese production must have increased parallel to the increase in the amount of silver. This means that the massive arrival of new American money stimulated production more in Asia than in Europe (pp. 157-8). According to Frank, this situation attests to higher productivity of Chinese economy compared to European economy. Thus, Frank refutes the orthodox Eurocentric "hoarding" argument on China which assumed that the Chinese used American/European silver by and large in non-economic and unproductive ways, primarily as jewelry: "Asians earned this money first because they were more industrious and more productive to begin with; the additional money then generated still more Asian demand and production," (p. 177).Another historical fact Frank uses to demonstrate the superiority of Asian economies over European economies is the per capita production in these two economies in the 16th to 19th century. Using the estimates of such prominent historians as Braudel and Bairoch, Frank shows that in 1750 Asians accounted for 66 percent of world population but produced 80 percent of total world output; by contrast, Europe, which constituted 20 percent of world population then, produced only part of the remaining 20 percent. This again means that on average "Asians must have been significantly more productive than Europeans in 1750" (p. 173). As in the fist case, Franks' reasoning is simple, but smart and convincing.After all these economic comparisons, Frank concludes that the Europeans did not "create" the world economic system but "purchased" an existing one with American silver. He therefore asserts that "the rise of the West" must be derived from the prior and contemporaneous development of "The rest," (p. 224).Prospects:The principal importance of ReOrient lies in its demolishing the bases of Eurocentrism in theories that explain "the rise of West" with factors that are internal to Europe. These theories attributed European economic development to Europe's exceptionality in such factors as rationality, religion, science, and geographic location. Yet Frank demonstrates that Europe did not have any inherent superiority in the 15th through 18th century vis--vis Asia and Asian nations were at least as much rational, industrial, capitalist, and dynamic as the European ones. Thus, there was no European "head start" or "exceptionality" that would necessitate the creation of a European hegemony over others. It was American silver and Asian market that allowed the "rise of the West". As such, Frank's arguments change the central question to be dealt with regarding the rise of the West. The critical question is no more why it was the West that rose in the 15th century -because it did not-, but why and how the West rose in the late 18th and early 19th century. As Frank argues, the new question is not about a mere difference in time but begs a qualitatively different answer.What makes ReOrient particularly important is that it not only destroys the myth of "European exceptionalism" but it also uncovers and refutes the Eurocentrism in the critics of these theories as well. Frank argues that such important critics of capitalist world economy as Marx, Braudel, and Wallerstein could not escape the Eurocentrism embedded in the theories they criticized either. While Marx viewed Asian nations as stagnant, traditional and inferior; Wallerstein assigned an insignificant role to Asia and the Mediterranean in the making of his modern world-system (p. 45). Frank views these arguments as mere assumptions and refutes them in two ways: first, he tries to demonstrate that Europe did not have any inherent superiority in the 15th through 18th century vis--vis Asia; second, Frank argues that Europe owe its future "rise" to its borrowing from and integration to a well-established Asian economy. Thus, Frank demonstrates that Europe did not create a world system and incorporated more and more of the rest of the world as Wallerstein argued, but rather integrated itself to the Asian market and "climbed up on the back of Asia," (pp. 4, 30)Problems:Unfortunately, Frank's novel theorizing turns out to be at the expense of some conceptual clarity. Frank's approach to world economy and modes of production renders such important concepts like world system and capitalism ambiguous. Frank argues that there has always been "one world economy/system" and it had its "own structure and dynamic," (p. 139). In Frank's view, existence of any trade relations between regions of the world create a world system. Thus, Frank equates global trade with world system. However, until the 18th century trade was highly regionalized and most regions had miniscule contacts with others. Frank himself notes that Europeans' role in Asian trade before the second half of the 18th century was insignificant and Europe accounted for only one percent of Asian nations' international trade (pp. 178-85). Thus, if we define world-system as a global economic system in which most parts of the world are economically dependent on one another, I will have to side with Wallerstein who argued that such a system did not exist until the 19th century ("The Rise and Future Demise of the World Capitalist System", in The Essential Wallerstein, p. 74). Indeed, although unintentionally, Frank also provide support to this point when he notes that Europeans were the first to "operate in all markets simultaneously or systematically to integrate its activities between all of them," (p. 177). As such, there has been only one world-system so far and -unfortunately- it has been a European one.A subsequent problem that results from Frank's bias towards holistic analysis is his search for single centers in world economy. Frank argues that the entire world economy was "Sinocentric" until the 19th century (p. 117). However, I have doubts regarding China's central role in economies of European and Middle Eastern countries in any period of history. Throughout the 16th and 17th centuries the Ottomans and Persians were more central to Middle Eastern economies than were the Chinese. Similarly, in the same period the British and the Dutch were more central to European economy than the Chinese. I therefore tend to agree with Pomeranz who later stated that the pre-1800 world was "a polycentric world with no dominant center," (The Great Divergence, p. 4).Another shortcoming in Frank's book is that he cannot adequately account for the "rise of the West" in the late 18th and early 19th centuries. His argument is that Asian economies were altogether facing a Kondratieff B-cycle in the first half of the 18th century and this allowed Europe to finally outdo the Asians. He therefore asserts that "the fall of Asia" preceded European political and military intervention in Asian nations (pp. 266-8). The first problem one might have with this argument is that it is impressionistic and allows little room to human agency. A more fundamental problem that I have, however, is that Frank's account does not consider the possibility that the Asian economic decline in the first half of the 18th century could have been a temporary problem and Asian economies could have easily recovered if it were not for European military intervention. Indeed, Frank himself reports that average annual exports from Asia by both Dutch and British East India companies declined in the decades of 1730s and 1740s "but recovered in the 1750s," (p. 270). Frank also notes that throughout the 18th century the balance of trade between Britain and China was constantly in China's favor and the British could reverse this situation only through forced opium trade in the 19th century. Thus, contra Frank, I believe that Asian economic problems in the 18th century were not insurmountable and "the fall of Asia" was indeed a European creation. As such, we still do not have a satisfying answer as to why Europe outdid the Asians by 1800.
bible. really like the book its about time this type of bible came out, Iam not a believing christian and read it for its literary art. A great book of myth and delusion It is interesting to read thoughts from ancient mind
Wow. This is one of my favorite in the series so far. The characters are well developed proportional to their respective roles. Also, this book develops the overall series plot well. As usual, Snicket brilliantly contrasts the loathsome adults with the children to create his upside-down world; in this book, the adults are especially unlikable. There is also the beautiful twist at the end for which Snicket is known
A good book for novices. Although it is a little bit old and there are so many other books on the subject, I still think that it is one of the bests. This book gives you a good basic knowledge of wireless circuits and systems. It's a good reference to look at too. In general, all books by BR are good, he is an incredible writer. His books are always very good to start with when you don't really know anything about the subject. As you get to know the subject more and more, you will know the value of the book and will discover more practical stuff in it. I totally recommend this one and all his books.
Incredible Story!! Highly recommended...the trials that man can endure are AMAZING!. This story was incredible! Some of the things these men had to do to survive were truly inhuman and at times appalling. Even so th ebook is engaging from page 1 to the end. Amazing  what the mind can do to keep the body from dying...and what it can do to make the body give up. This book had me angry, relieved, amazed and at all times entertained. I highly recommend it!
It's a Text Book. It was very helpful to complete my assignments.  Plus with an online class you have to really have the book or you'll be lost.  Great information in the book that helped me understand Ethics better
A Life Changer. Like many other reviewers, I am rating this book as high as I can because it actually changed my life--it gave me a new way of looking at money, things, shopping, ego, status, and time.  It is NOT a budget book.  It is an attitude-changing book.  Because of this particular book combined with much thought, I decided to retire early and work part-time, to live very modestly and within my means (most of the time)and to quit wanting more stuff. My day is now my own, every day is a holiday if I want it to be, and I don't even know when the work-week begins. This one is a must-read
Mark Twain at his best!. I've been reading a lot of classic literature recently, and I also recently saw the Mississippi River for the first time...so this book seemed liked the perfect one for me to read right now.This is a "non-fictional" book by Mark Twain. (I guess that means based on some truth but embelished in various ways?) In it he recalls the years he spent during his youth as a steamboat pilot on the Mississippi River.  Then he suddenly jumps forward many years in the book to when he is an older man. As an older man, he decides to go back and travel on the Mississippi River again. He finds the river much changed.  The course of time (the Civil War has come and gone, the expansion of the railroad, and the forces of nature) have greatly changed life on the river.  The once thriving steamboat trade has almost disapeared.Besides his personal recollections, he also includes other interesting stories,history,folklore, talltales, and such. It is written in typical Mark Twain style - his dry sense of humor will bring a smile to your face. I really enjoyed this book
Great book from  a Canadian Couple. This is a really great book, with good information, and easy to read format. One of the best parts of this book, is that it tells about other plans as well in simple terms, so you have a better understanding of what is out there for low carb diets. I have read Atkins books, too, and this book is much easier to understand. The recipes are excellent, especially as they use ingredients available in Canada at most health food/ bulk stores. I highly recommend this book, as well as their cookbook called Easy Low Carb cooking, which is full of great, easy recipe's
A welcome and recommended addition to community library fiction shelves. Second Honeymoon by Joanna Trollope is the tale of Edie Boyd whose her youngest child, Ben, leaves home to create an empty atmosphere in what has become a terrifying emptiness Edie soon comes to feel all around her. Nonetheless Second Honeymoon emerges as the inherently engaging and occasionally inspiring story of one family's unconditional love, timeless closeness, and eternal forgiveness. A truly accomplished novelist, Joanna Trollope has written an original and a heartwarming story of parenthood with a realism and an ultimate optimism that will hold the reader's attention and satisfaction from beginning to end. Second Honeymoon is a welcome and recommended addition to community library fiction shelves
Moving story of Injustice and Imprisonment. Author Bernard Malamud (1914-1986) won the 1967 Pulitzer Prize for this stunning portrayal of injustice, prejudice, and false imprisonment.  Yakov Bok is a poor Jewish handyman from Kiev falsely accused of blood libel - killing a Christian child in order to use his blood to make Passover Matzos.  Such false charges were not unheard of in Eastern Europe during periods of anti-Semitism.  Readers feel as if they are practically beside Bok as he sits in prison, isolated, frustrated, and clinging desperately to hope that his innocence will somehow be demonstrated.  Bok must also contend with his previously unhappy life, his lack of faith, a wife who left him, and anger from some inside prison who believe the charges.  Bok's sanity and sturdiness waiver under the stress of his predicament, and he struggles to retain his sanity and compassion.This powerful tale was partly based on the case of Mendel Beilis, a Jew from Tsarist Russia who was acquitted of the same false charge in 1913 after having spent two years in prison.  This is a superb tale injustice, and the mental struggle of an individual to survive the ordeal of false imprisonment.
Absolute must-read!. Curious minds that have delighted in games will love this book!  I adored the compilation of shared thoughts from "Who's Who" in game design.  Aesthetically, the book is so cute!  My copy sits on my coffee table.  The book had me at the cover..
A Masterpiece In It's Own Time. This book was one of the most addicting page-turners I have yet to pick up. It's lesson on life is adamant throughout the book, and seems to be an urgent message from the author. Wonderful story...a must read..
This is the one marriage book everyone should read!. I learned more about building and maintaining a happy marriage from this book than from all the other marriage books I've read combined, and I've read them all.  This book is funny, easy to read, and filled with  practical, solid christian advise. Dr. Dobson explains the differences  between men and women and teaches basic lessons on communications and  co-habitation that every married couple should know.  I routinely give this  book as gifts to newlywed and engaged couples.  I've bought myself several  copies because I keep giving them away to friends who have troubled  marriages.  I pray that God will bless your marriage as you read this book
Interesting but not so practicle. I actually use asset allocation in my investing strategy.  [...]The author goes over some complex concepts to show how to develop a protfolio that maximizes return and minimizes risk.  in order to implement what the author discusses involves difficult and tedius math, although the actual math concepts are not covered in the book.  Being an engineer, the math required doesn't bother me.Also required is access to tons of historical market data, hich the author gives some references on how to obtain.Basicly you need to spend a bunch of money obtaining the data, and a bunch of time crunching numbers in order to come up with an optomized portfolio.  Not very practical for the average investor.Still there is information in the book that is useful for an advanced "asset allocating" investor, such as the demonstaration of the low sensitivity of portfolio performance to exact allocation percentages.  The book is also reasonably easy to understand for a person comfortable with statistical math (thorrough knowledge not required).
Gently humorous. This book is the last book written by James Herriot - actually James Alfred Wight (1916-95). James, a native of Glasgow, Scotland, qualified as a veterinarian at 23 years of age, and quickly fell with his new location of Yorkshire. Beginning in 1970, James began to write books, reaching into his years of experience as a vet, and spinning out enthralling and entertaining stories of things that did happen and things that might have happened on the Yorkshire Dales.As I said, this book was James's last, being published in 1992. In it, we read adventures of a country vet, doing battle against disease, hypochondriac pet-owners, uncooperative animals, the weather, other vets, and...just about everything. This is another great James Herriot - All Creatures book, one that I loved as much as the earlier books. If you like good storytelling, or are interested in veterinarians, then you will love this book. It is a gently humorous story that is sure to entertain all. I highly recommend it!
Fascinating, useful, and well-written!. ... This is a great history of social entrepreneurs, military leaders, and other great strategists who figured out how to get what they wanted.  Great short chapters on Joan of Arc, Patton, Alice Paul and the suffragists, Japan, and even Picasso and Matisse.  Turned out for me to be an excellent source of fun cocktail party chatter.  But it is a very very good and unusual kind of self-help book.  Yes, the book is NOT about military strategy, but is is about strategy in personal life.   I thought it was better than a ton of other popular history or self help books.  It helped me understand how to be more successful at figuring out how to get what I want.  On the cover General Wesley Clark calls this a "very important book" and I agree
Incredible. This book confirmed my feeling that David Muench is, for lack of a better description, the Ansel Adams of color photography.  I already owned his Appalachian Trail book, &quot;Uncommon Places&quot; (I think it's called),  but my brother wanted a California-related book for Christmas, so I picked  this up, sight unseen.  Quite simply, it's breathtaking.  The photos span  the length and breadth of the state, from Humboldt County's misty redwood  stands to the La Jolla coast, to Yosemite and the mountain passes and lakes  of the Southern Sierras along the John Muir Trail.  There are even a  handful of urban photos that make downtown L.A. look quite nice.  If ever  you doubted that we live in the closest to a natural paradise as there is,  take a look at this book, and doubt no more
Going to the chapel and we're gonna get married!. Though married for 25 years (and still honeymooning) I can still recall the major effort that went into planning my wedding day. I read stacks of bridal magazines, met with florists, spent hours looking at dresses and invitations etc. I wasn't sure what I wanted and didn't have a wedding planner to simplify things. If only Instyle: Weddings had been published back then.Instyle: Weddings is a lush, lavish, and comprehensive look that will help you plan your ideal wedding. Generously sized at 12x11, this 248 page book is packed with information, it will be your wonderful wedding companion and planner.  As you read through the book and gaze at the photographs you will be inspired and learn so much to help you create your perfect day. And you will save hours of time. Everything you need to know for your special day (except if Uncle Al will get a little tipsy)is in this book.The book covers all aspects of the wedding; The Ring, The Invitation, The Dress, Beauty, The Flowers, The Cake, The Photography, The Wedding Party, The Ceremony, The Reception and The Registry.Each section covers the topic indepth. And gives information to save you time. The ring section for example, describes the 4 C's to look for when purchasing a ring - color, cut, clarity and carat. It includes detailed photographs of different styles ranging from classic cuts to antique and contemporary. Types of wedding bands are also described. After studying the photos and reading the information, you will have an idea of where to start when you go ring shopping. The flower section alone will save you hours of time. The book describes what types of flowers you may wish to consider depending on the type of wedding you are having. There are gorgeous photos of different types of flowers, ideas for bouquets, how to use the arrangements to decorate and more. You won't need to visit a lot of different florists to get a feel for what you want.There are tons of ideas in each chapter. And in addition to the basics like choosing a dress the nitty gritty details are included also. You will learn everything from how to select a gift for the attendants to hiring an officiant to selecting wedding favors.I saw a show some years ago where a couple was spending thousands of dollars on their wedding despite having just a few hundred dollars in the bank. I felt sorry for the couple who would start married life with a pile of credit card debt. Instyle: Weddings will give you ideas on how to save to help you stay on budget. If you like a certain type of flower that is pricey, they suggest a less expensive look alike alternative. If you want a big diamond but don't have the dollars,read the advise on how to get your flash for the cash you have. Lots of ideas on how to save here.Instyle is generally about celebrities. This book does include some celebrity photos. But the majority of photos are of cakes and rings and invitations and flowers and so much more ....photos of love. This is not a book about celebrity weddings..this is a book about your wedding, your special day.If you wish to plan a lovely wedding, Instyle: Weddings will save you hours of time and provide so much help to inspire that special day. A beautiful book!Lee Mellot
Not quite as educational as advertised. The dust jacket for this book, which you can view here on amazon by clicking "Search inside this book" advertises: "This translation has been made especially for American children who want to learn Spanish.  They will find a complete vocabulary at the end of the book.  In addition, some Spanish phrases and expressions that may be unknown to the beginner are translated at the foot of each page."Strangely, the book itself does not have those features.  While it is a charming book, and my children will certainly enjoy it, there is no vocabulary at the end of the book, and there are no footnotes
18 museums in color on glossy paper. Hundreds of illustrations: mostly color photos, but also plans, sections, hard line presentation drawings, renderings, etc. in beautiful colors or B&W on glossy paper, brief project descriptions.CONTENTS:6 Introduction8 Deer Valley Rock Art Museum - William P. Bruder20 San Francisco Museum of Modern Art - Mario Botta32 The Menil Collection Museum and Cy Twombly Annex - Renzo Piano42 P.S.1 Museum, The Institute for Contemporary Art - Frederick Fisher50 Lecture Hall and West Wing of the Brooklyn Museum - Arata Isozaki, James Stewart Polshek60 Domus - Arata Isozaki, Cesar Portela72 The Guggenheim Museum - Frank O. Gehry84 Arken Museum of Modern Art - Soren Robert Lund96 Natural History Museum, Rotterdam - Erik van Egeraat108 The Old Provence Research Institute - Henri E. Ciriani120 Kunsthal - Rem Koolhaas128 Natural History Museum, London Primates Gallery and Earth Galleries - Terry Pawson, Keith Williams136 Chiado Museum - Jean Michel Paul Wilmotte144 Stiklestad Cultural Center - Jens Petter Askim154 Okazaki Art and Historical Museum - Akira Kuryu162 Shoji Ueda Museum of Photography - Shin Takamatsu172 Chikatsu-Asuka Historical Museum - Tadao Ando178 Museum of Modern Art and Wakayama Prefectural Museum - Kisho Kurokawa190 Biographie
A delight for its demographic. For book-loving audiences, this is an almost perfect entertainment. This story of six Jane Austen enthusiasts (five women and one man) whose lives intersect and are illuminated by their discussions of Austen's novels is an example of post-modern "lite" literature, in which the book becomes an alternative text to a "canonical" work (cf. Michael Cunningham with THE HOURS  vis-a-vis Woolf's MRS. DALLOWAY), and it is a rare work of genuine charm (there aren't that many charming novels being written at this time) and surprising pathos. It's a novel for those who love to read, for those who love Jane Austen, for those who love talking about books.
Excellent, unbiased and well-documented overview. This book was on the syllabus of Professor Zachary Lockman's course on Israel and Palestine at Harvard, where I first learned of it.  It is extremely well-documented, unbiased and comprehensive, and is also a very easy read.  One of the most interesting aspects of the book is its documentation of early Zionists' use of terrorist tactics which Palestinians have more recently begun to use.  Although some readers criticize the book as unbiased, it is difficult to make that claim since the book is meticulously documented and relies heavily on Israeli and historical documents and newspaper archives
Rebus Versus The Wolfman. I'm baaaaaack!After reading the first Rebus novel (Knots and Crosses), I knew I'd continue to read the rest of Ian Rankin's excellent crime fiction stories.This is actually the third novel in the Inspector Rebus series, and author Ian Rankin's prose continues to astound me. He masterfully weaves a tapestry of plot, character, and location throughout nearly every page (Example from the prologue: `She drives home the knife. The moment, she knows from past experience, is a very intimate one. Her hand is gripped around the knife's cool handle and the thrust takes the blade into the throat up to the hilt until her hand meets the throat itself. Flesh upon flesh. Jacket first, or woollen jersey, cotton shirt or T-shirt, then flesh. Now rent. The knife is writhing, like an animal sniffing. Warm blood covering hilt and hand. (The other hand covers the mouth, stifling screams.) The moment is complete. A meeting. Touching. The body hot, gaping, warm with blood. Seething inside, as insides become outsides. Boiling. The moment is coming to an end all too soon.')But this time we're no longer in Edinburgh. No? No. Inspector Rebus is sent to London (Oh the pain!) to try and help catch a serial killer whom the local coppers can't pin down. They've nick-named the murderer "The Wolfman", because he bites the victims on the stomach after he kills them. But why send Rebus? Well, in Knots and Crosses, he helped find another serial killer in Edinburgh, and so George Flight (a local London CID guy) requested Scotland's "expert". Rebus sees himself as anything BUT an expert on such things, but reluctantly goes to England's capital to do what he can.Come to find out, he can do quite a bit; including getting into lots of trouble. He falls for a beautiful psychologist named Liza Frazer (who might have connections with the killer!), disappears for hours or days on end, drinks like a fish, and goes on television and announces that they've caught the killer (even when he knows they haven't). But Rebus' mind works a bit differently than most folks. He can worm his way into a killer's mind as the case unfolds. And we again see how Rebus' past comes to the forefront and aids him in capturing the villain.The great thing about Rebus is that he's so f#$%ed up that the reader can identify with all of his vices and character flaws. He's no superhuman, and he knows it. But what he does have is a nose for killers, and this bodes poorly for them. Because once Rebus is on your trail, you'll never get away.Now, it's on to the next in the series!
ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!!!!!!!!!!!. This book is on of the best books i have ever read. It takes the story of a young modern woman and tells you how she can change from rags to riches. I was so into the book, I just couldn't put it down. I reccomend this book to anyone. Sidney Sheldon at his best!!
This is the book I wish I'd had when I was a hiring manager. If you want to increase your ability to attract and hire people who will help build the company while avoiding costly hiring mistakes, Johanna Rothman's book, Hiring the Best Knowledge Workers, Techies & Nerds, can help.The book is full of detailed guidance on each step of the hiring process, from creating a hiring strategy to making the new hire's first day a great one. The book provides templates and examples to help determine the required and desirable skills for a job, identify elimination factors, and articulate interpersonal and cultural fit qualities necessary for success.Assessing skills in an interview isn't sufficient; it's how people apply those skills and adapt to situations that determine success. So Johanna details how to use behavioral questions and auditions to gain a clear picture of how a person is likely to perform in your context.Hiring the Best will help you fine-tune your hiring process, make the best use of your time, and increase your hiring success.
Unexpected Twist. As you can imagine, things didn't exactly turn out as he'd expected. Heggstad's first day into Columbia, he's kidnapped by rebels and held captive for several weeks before being released. If that sounds like an interesting read, it really is!The first part of the book appears to have been written from a collection of daily postings on his website and reveals nothing of what is to come. As a result, the writing through the first part of the book is rather clunky and a little hard to read with mixed tenses all over the place. By the time he gets kidnapped, the writing changes dramatically, as I assume he's retelling the events at a much later date. And as the book progresses the writing continues to get better and more eloquent.Heggstad is brutally honest, even to the point where he opens himself up to criticism when telling of his trepidation and unease just before he gets captured. He also tends to be a bit of a hot head and reacts in ways that may have made his situation worse.Overall, the book is worth every effort to read. I managed to read mine, cover to cover, in less than a week, but by the end I was as ready to be back home as I imagine the author was. Few motorcycle books exist, and even fewer of them are worth much attention.
Enlightening. I never realized just how bad things were in the Muslim world until I read this book. This book gives a very detailed and personal account of the problems Muslims are facing because of their belief system including endless poverty, broken homes and abused women. She is one of the few Muslim women to criticize the practices and beliefs of Islam and as a result her life is in danger and she needs around the clock protection. She also exposes many of the problems European countries are facing because their multiculturalist leaders and intellectuals refuse to defend freedom and secularism
A well-written and illustrated story!. Sam and Victoria's mother makes a dozen cookies to share.  Then the doorbell rings and two friends arrive.  Now the cookies must be divided between four people.  Just as this is settled, the doorbell rings again.  How many people can a dozen cookies be shared with?  Not a problem.  Grandma shows up just in time with more!   This book is a must for children learning multiplication and division.  I am an Education Major at the University of Arizona.  I took this book into a third grade class just finishing up their multiplication/division unit.  We integrated their white boards and they illustrated the division of cookies, and the resulting equation as we proceeded through the story.  They really had fun!  I highly recommend this book.  The story is well written and the illustrations are terrific!
He answers just like he writes. Let's face it: If you like Bukowski (Hank, for those who really adore him), nothing is too much. You probably have already read &quot;Bukowski - A Life&quot; (by Neeli Cherkovski) and most of his books and, if like him  like I do, you have read them all several times. And, every time you finish  one of his books, you say to yourself: &quot;I want more!&quot; Well, now  you got it! Fernanda Pivano asks the right questions, and Hank answers  them, just like he wrote his best books. Sometimes, he's funny. Sometimes,  he's mean. Sometimes, he's sincere. But, always, you have truth. His truth,  at least. So, buy this book, buy some beers and read it. You'll have just  one problem: You'll want more
An Valuable Resource for Teachers and Parents. Author Carol Peterson has created a winner in this guide to creating living history events for children. Peterson takes three historical themes--ancient cultures, Native American culture, Colonial America, and Pioneers--and deftly uses a combination of crafts, games, recipes, legends, and songs to give children experiences they'll never draw from a textbook. Teachers, home-schooling parents, scouting leaders, and camp counselors will find this book brimming with creative projects. &quot;Jump Back in Time&quot; can be used on many levels--as a resource for school-wide or organization-wide events, classroom-level activities, or with individual kids. Parents will find great ideas for doing a little &quot;stealth educating&quot; while playing with their kids. As an educator, I highly recommend this book
I read every page. This book is a great reference book, and also a great read.  I read every page of the book and created a careful outline of it (which will be available at davidritsema.com).  The book was required for my doctoral program in NT and I found it be very helpful in providing the panoramic view of biblical backgrounds to the NT
Captivating story of trends in development thinking. Mallaby tells a fine story that achieves a balance between good storytelling and insightful analysis. He discusses several questions:(1) What have been the major trends in thought regarding development strategies within the World Bank over the last several decades, specifically since Wolfhensohn took over in 1995?(2) Why does the World Bank move so slowly? Who are the competing stakeholders to whom the Bank must listen? What are their respective interests and how do these interests conflict?(3) Who is Jim Wolfensohn? What are his major strengths and faults? Did he do a good job running the Bank?The book is quite a bit more than a biography; it provides a brief history of what's been occurring in developing nations throughout the last decade and why. I enjoyed Mallaby's writing style - clever, articulate and adept at using memorable images to discuss complex ideas. I gave the book 5 stars because I felt that Mallaby succeeds at balancing analysis with narrative and doing so in sparkling prose. This book is useful for anyone interested in learning a bit more about what the World Bank does, what are its challenges, what are the big ideas being tossed around by development experts and, of course, who is Jim Wolfensohn
funny, insightful story of growing older and wiser at age 15. Moonbeam Dawson does not like the hippie name his mother gave him. It says more about her than who he thinks he is at age 15 and he decides he must change it and declare some independence. He chooses Reid,hoping that will bring a little less unwanted drama into his life. Reid takes a step away from his warm, single-parent mother and begins to discover work, girls, heartache, and loyalty. We are enchanted with his journey,whether we are 15, 50, or even more.As Reid makes peace with his mother,the fact of his Native American father, and the quirkiness of his childhood, he reminds us that our roots are as important as our wings and that growing up requires both, with love
Excellent!. I absolutely loved this sequel to Something Borrowed. Just as good as the first in my opinion.
Exactly what we need in the Arab world. One question seemed to have dominated American policy-makers and elites in the wake of september 11: How can we make people in the Arab world (and to a lesser extent Europe and the rest of the world) understand what America is really about?I think there is nowhere better to start than De-Tocqueville's "Democracy in America". A Frenchman and a social observer, he offers an analysis of the phenomenon that is America that is way different than what we Arabs are exposed to. My family mostly gets its info about America from Hollywood, McDonald, Gap and Arabic media (which has good reasons to fret about American interventionism in our part of the world).The reactionary and ad-hoc measures that the American policy-makers are taking today (like establishing the scandalous and disenfranchised Al-hurra satellite Arabic TV station) only undermine and insult the intelligence of Arabs who see right-through such gambits. We need a thorough, eloquent, compassionate and outreaching approach like that of de-Tocqueville to convince us that after all, America is a force for good in the world...Ideally, our own Arab de-Tocqueville should emerge, though I'm not very optimistic... today, America to Arabs is not just a curiosity like it used to be to the French in the 19th century, it's something much worse than that, this is why action has to be taken..
Great review or opportunity to learn in advance. We've used the Summer Bridge series for 4 years with our kids and love the product.  The series covers math, reading, and writing with equal emphasis.  There are occasional activities that are fun rather than just educational.  As a parent and educator, I would highly recommend this
A new review-dotting the is. I made an earlier jokingly one-liner that does not justice to the book- or to Lenin. What I think should looked for in this book is exactly the following: that Lenin was the first marxist ever not to consider the development of class consciousness a kind of spontaneous outgrowth of the concrete existence of a working class. Therefore the necessity for politics - specially party politics - to take precedence in marxist analysis over pure economic analysis. This jump in esentials was made by Lenin very early in life, as his _Development of Capitalism in Russia_, written in his late twenties, is still a prime piece of economicistic marxism; _What is to be done?_ is already a prime owrk of a new, politics-first, approach. One may think whatever one wants of the solutions found by Lenin - abaove all the party of professional revolutionists, disciplined and centralized, but one may not deny him the fact that it was him who first made a new kind of marxist approach to issues that is still very much with us
A must-have for Ford fans-and any film library. I've just finished this, and I have to agree with a critic who reviewed  &quot;About John Ford&quot; for the Times of London: 'One of the best books  published by a filmmaker on a filmmaker'. It certainly is.   The author,  Lindsay Anderson, was himself a distinguished director(&quot;O Lucky  Man!&quot;; &quot;If&quot;), a longtime admirer of the films of John  Ford-and a damn fine writer on the subject.  Anderson uses clear and  thoughtful prose and a great, copious selection of stills to illustrate his  take on many Ford movies-from his classics such as &quot;The  Searchers&quot; to less often discussed titles(&quot;They Were  Expendable&quot;; the silents).  Not a dull page in the book(not always the  case with film studies!).  Lots of humor.  Great frankness.  And best of  all, several chapters detailing interviews and encounters Anderson had with  &quot;the old man&quot;-priceless stories that give the reader a real  flavor of Ford-for better or worse.  Reading this book produces two  tremendous urges: first, to watch all the films discussed again; and  second-to make movies.  A classic
A unique and welcome new style of artbook. This new edition of History Of The Poster by Josef Muller-Brockmann (1914-1996) brings back into print a seminal work originally published in 1971 and which has been regretably out-of-print for many years. Despite its name, History Of The Poster is not so much a straightforward historical narrative as it is a fantastic gallery of posters used for politics, propaganda, advertising, and art throughout history. A tri-lingual book in English, German, and French, History Of The Poster contains a brief introductory essay then reveals almost three hundred posters in full color, followed by an afterword remarking on present and future trends. A unique and welcome new style of artbook.
French Politics/Philosophy and the Industrial Age. This a classic, certainly a novel of high standard amongst the famous French writers of the time period of pre- and industrial age. It deals with head character Julian Sorel - the student training for priesthood and the  master of hypocrisy. His love affairs with Mde de Renal and Madamossiele de  la Mole are just the tip of the iceberg. As one can gather without reading  Shaw's commentary, it is a story about the Scarlet and the Black, ie  nobility and the priest's habit, and the clashes associated with them. Of  course Stendhal puts his own political view into it, which in itself is  interesting. This book portrays French society during the 2nd restoration  (1815-30) and the continuing admiration of Napoleon despite his fall from  grace. Of course there is also the clash of sectarian Catholicism and  Stendhal vents his anger at Jansenism - this can also be seen in  contemporary Austro-Hungarian life in regards to censorship of book  publications , especially in the life of France Preseren. Overall a good  book, and very educating
A Very Intriguing Story with Interesting Characters That Are Real. Paddy Meehan worked the night shift at the Scottish Daily News. She hoped to someday get a break in her career and move up, but for now it was night rides around town to find a story. She came across one that would change her life.The police radio in the car Paddy rode in, driven by Billy...a friend of sorts, brought her to a large house where a domestic fight was happening. As Paddy inquired about what was happening, the man at the door told her and the officer that it wouldn't happen again.Paddy saw the beautiful woman through the open door in the mirror. She had blood on her face. Paddy asked if she needed help. The woman shook her head and backed away.The man told her everything was fine and put money in her hand and said to keep the story out of the paper and shut the door. Paddy didn't want to take a bribe but didn't know what to do with the money. Her family was struggling financially for her father and brothers were out of work. Paddy was the breadwinner.Many changes were happening at the Scottish Daily News for it was also struggling making money. Coworkers would change immediately, as well as her boss. Was she next? Would they find out about the money?The next day, Paddy found out that the woman from the big house was murdered. Why didn't she ask for help? She could have walked away. This story was one that burned inside Paddy and she was going to find out who did this and why....even if her life depended on it.Some of the terminology used in the book makes the reader pause for understanding but the details of the scenery and action are vivid. Paddy is a very lovable and unique character.
How Christianity Changed the World. This book exposes the truth behind the institutions of compassion and education that secularism  has conveniently eliminated from the pages of history.Knowing these truths opens ones eyes to the reality of true Christianity in our world.A must read for truth seekers
Kim Stanley, the Complicated Best There Was. About time someone had the fortitude to dig deep for information about Kim Stanley, one of the greatest actresses of the 20th century.In The Goddess, though the author does not agree, I found her, at the age of 32, quite believable playing a 16-year-old. Her immense talent made her voice young, the flicking of her hair young, the set of her shoulders young. Like Brando, whose weight disappeared when he smiled, the lines under Kim Stanley's eyes disappeared, or seemed to, when she played 16.Kim Stanley could act with her back turned to the audience, and there was no mistaking what her character was thinking.Jon Krampner has gifted theater- and movie-lovers with the fullest, and only, history of this fascinating, tortured actress
Packed with quick recipes for busy cooks. The third edition of this guide is packed with quick recipes for busy cooks, showing how to make meals without a lot of fuss at either campsite or back yard. All that's needed is a Dutch oven: Woodruff provides beginners with the rest of the basics, from the oven's care and storage to using it to cook meals and wild game
Great for online trivia games!!!. I spend alot of time reading questions online ( i.e. paltalk). I've used this book among others and find that the subjects are conveniently broken down by category and the answers are readily accessible on the next page vs. flipping to the end of the book. This is a great book to have for online games
For Former High School Players. If you have ever played high school football under the lights, you will enjoy this book.  When I started the book I realized it was very slow in the beginning and began to expect a below average book, but I kept reading and it turned out to be great! The end is very exciting and emotional for all former football players.  I highly recommend this book
Facinating!. I can't believe I didn't know anything about this time in US History before.  The Chicago fair as background to a serial killer is facinating.  This book is very well written.  You'd think a book about architecture might be dry, but its really not at all.  Highly recommend this book.  Its a slo a great book for a book club
awesome!!!!!!. I am very pleased with the contents of the book, my vietnam veteran friends alsowere happy to find out about this book....
Mature Moorcock. Mike just gets better and better.  The themes of the mulitverse, law and chaos and the philosophies there in are wonderfully laid inside the dialog of this fast paced adventure.  Set in three voices, Elric's Daughter, Elric and Von Bek, the novel crosses times and space in America to its breathless end.Hear Hear for Michael Moorcock and his evolution from the pulp comic type writing of the first Elric Books to what he is publishing today
I actually give this book 10 stars...**********. This book is a MUST HAVE for anyone planning a trip to Walt Disney World.  It is jam-packed full of all the important information you need to plan your trip.  The book has an extensive list of all the WDW resorts including maps of the resort, ratings, cost, a blueprint of the room layout, and a million other little details.  The book also has a wonderful list of all the WDW restaurants; including those in the parks and at each resort.  The restaurant guide is extremely comprehenisve and helpful when making any advanced dinner reservations.  Of course there is also a TON of information on each of the four parks; including comprehensive, easy to read and helpful maps, touring guides, time tables, etc.  You name it - this book has it.By far the coolest part for me the is wonderful passpockets.  These groovey little yellow pockets hold all your important information before your trip (helps keep it all in one place!) and during your trip (great place to cram receipts so you know where they are!).  The pockets allow for quick and easy access to important papers while keeping them protected.All in all my best recommendation is just to buy the book and see for yourself.  There are probably over 1,000 features I didn't mention in this review.  I can say that you won't be disappointed!I should add that the authors of this book also keep updating.  The 2006 edition is better than those of previous years, and I can only see this as being an upward trend
A Lexicon Fit for Years of Study. This lexicon is invaluable for doing Greek word studies.As a layman struggling to teach myself Greek, I find it a great place from which to launch my Greek word studies.  It contains more than 15,000 references to classical, intertestamental, early Christian and modern literature.This edition contains more elaborate definitions of Greek terms than other lexicons I have seen.  The benefit of these, to me, is that it helps give me a fuller sense of the word being studied and helps me to avoid anachronisms.There is no doubt in my mind that this is the lexicon for serious Greek students.
Incredible!. Welcome to the Monkey House is one of the best collections of short stories to date.  It is an incredible read
Essential reading for law enforcement. This book depicts a geniune need in law enforcement. The need to hire, train, and maintain ethical personnel is explained and stressed to the  reader in a way that has been overdue. The occupation of a law enforcement  offical world wide has a real need to be a true character , role model, or  the public offical that can be trusted. Edwin has a clear style of writing  with a no nonsense approach to describe past , present, and future  occurrences of police conduct. I believe the criminal justice system would  beam with pride and public trust if law enforcement would read and act on  the issues and suggestion that Delattre brings forth in this fine book
The Best of The Simpsons Books. From an academic perspective, David Arnold et al's book is amusing, but too "lite" on theory at times, with non-media-scholars coming to grand conclusions that media scholars in the eighties came to. Mark Pinsky's book is a very amusing book, written with such a love for the program that it's delightful, but I didn't feel it enlightened me about The Simpsons as much as it made a strong argument for and defense of its morality and ethics (a book that's a must for Simpsons-dislikers). Steven Keslowitz's book is atrocious, poorly written, and not worthy of a single purchase. Which leaves this book as the best serious treatment of The Simpsons.Why not the 5th star? Well, several of the contributors start to wander away from the topic, and I also feel that if you're going to analyze the media in an academic way, you need to secure a few more articles from actual media scholars. This oversight is evident in the lack of essays looking at The Simpsons from some form of structural or economic standpoint. The book is more humanities-based than social sciences, and that's a pity.However, it still examines some important issues, and thus digs under the surface of the text in a convincing and thoughtful way. Alberti's introduction is arguably the best "article" in the book, as he positions the program brilliantly, and gives a great sense of the ways in which The Simpsons might be doing something special that very few if any other programs in television history have. I found the essays thought-provoking, and a lot more dense than other writing on The Simpsons.So, while I could see how a fan of the show who wants to keep viewing it as light and mellow wouldn't enjoy this book or appreciate it, if you actually want to engage with the program and its politics on a deeper level, this book does an admirable job. Very good stuff, some essays especially excellen
Religious but provides almost scientific breakdown of anger. I'm not a very religious person but his book broke down anger and all the aspects about anger in such a way that I feel much better.  I know I can now work to control my anger and not let my anger control me.  While reading this book I even had opportunities to try his suggestions and ideas on my own - anger toward my children, my wife and myself.  I was amazed how well it worked.  There were still times I slipped, but I was able to use his ideas, see where I went wrong and make a conscious decision to correct it next time.  So don't laugh at me if you go past my garage and hear me say out loud, to myself, as my van runs over the basketball, again, "I'm angry"
Brilliant essays on collecting. There are a number of essays in this book that makes it worth reading.  My favorites are:1.  The System of Collecting by Jean Baudrillard - " (collections) constitute themselves as a system, on the basis of which the subject seeks to piece together his world . . ."2.  Collecting and Collage-making:  The Case of Kurt Schwitters by Roger Cardinal3.  A Collector's Model of Desire:  The House and Museum of Sir John Soane by John Elsner.  If you are a rabid collector of anything, you will delight in this ULTIMATE collection in which a man turned everything he did and his very house into a museum.  He made multiple catalogs of his "collection" throughout his life and arranged and rearranged until his death.  It's an amazing story.There are 12 essays in all, including one on Freud's statue collection, Cook's collection from his Pacific voyages, and collections of the Austrian Habsburgs.  I found it a fascinating read
A Classic of Worship and Devotion. As an evangelical who has recently come home to the historical liturgical church this book has truly been a gift from God. It has opened up my personal devotions and Bible study in deeper and more meaningful ways then I ever imagined. We use this for worship at the church I attend and it is awe-inspiring to realize my worship and prayers are risen to God using the same words and liturgy as those believers decades and centuries before. I would recommend any evangelical who struggles with the shifting modern trends of the American church and having the center of prayer and worship being their personal feelings to explore The Church of History, One Holy Catholic and Apostolic. Explore the Catholic, Orthodox or Traditional Anglican churches and discover that the history of Christianity did not begin at your conversion, the founding of America, or even the Reformation. This jewel of the Anglican Communion is, with the King James Bible, the English speaking peoples greatest gift to the Church and is a great place to start a journey away from church as defined by contemperary culture to one defined by History, the Church Fathers, the Apostles, and Christ Himself
History in a Flash. Well Done Mr Lee.This story takes you on a thrilling ride, through the lens of the Time Camera.Great characters, especially Zak, takes the reader with them whilst they view history's greatest moments and then the events which seem to almost spiral out of control as a result.History with a twist..what will happen next
Brilliant writer with a few blemishes. At his best, Hemingway is not to be rivaled.  His spare, gritty style is at its best in &quot;Killers&quot;.  However, there are a few stories that could have used a little more in the way of a story line, especially the celebrated &quot;Hills Like White Elephants&quot;.  But I quibble...go out and get this one
Extremly well written, excellent info about managing people. I liked the style of the book. It's extremly well written--very easy to read. I couldn't put it down.Jack writes in a very direct way ('no fluff, just stuff'). He provides very useful experiences about managing people.The whole book is written from a practical and pragmatic view. You will not find any graphs or formulas here. For example, though a thick book could be written about Six Sigma and it's mathematical bases.. no, Jack admits, he never studied in depth the statistical part, morover he explains the basics of it on one A5. So you 'get it' instanly, and you can decide, whether SS is appropriate for you, or not.I think the best value of this book is how to handle people. There are dozens of valuable examples. It goes into details (how does the private-life of employer impact the organization?) while he remains interesting.Jack has a great self-reflection, he admits, he made mistakes, even exposes parts of his private life.After reading comments at amazon about this book, I can say the reviewers fall into two groups: those who hate the book, and those who love it. Those, who wrote critical comments about book, always adressed J.Welch, not the book itself. I think, no matter you hate Jack or love... the contents of this book will undoubtly help you
Accessible and Rigorous. Alan Jacobs is an English professor at Wheaton College, home of the Wade center, the largest collection of original Lewis writings and extant works in the world (as well as the inspirational wardrobe and Lewis' Beer mug).  It shows.  It becomes obvious early on in this text that he is intimately familiar with Lewis's writings and letters.  It is robust and well documented while being readable and interesting and well worth the pages.  I brought it with me on a recent visit to Oxford and found it made the university come alive with the formidable specters of Lewis, Tolkein and Charles Williams.A couple of other thoughts:-This is, without a doubt, a sympathetic biography (a friend of mine called it `gushing') and Jacobs sticks up for Lewis against all his detractors.  But he also deals plainly with less savory his subjects life (the nature of his relationship with Minto and his falling out with Tolkein) and in all is an able biographer.-There is some repetition of letters and quotes.  I this found helpful rather than redundant as different stages of his life and thought were tied together, but it is worth noting.
A Must for Parents Dealing with Sibling Rivalry. "What About Me?" is an excellent book for children.  It teaches them important life skills that are so crucial and the illustrations are simply beautiful. This book is a wonderful way to address sibling rivalry - Great for the entire family.Mom Writer's Talk Radio  www.momwriterstalkradio.co
A Delightfully Pessimistic Survey!. Randy Clarke's book is a must have work for understanding libertarian accounts of free will.  At the very least, it is quite helpful in giving an overview of many of the issues involved in developing a cogent indeterministic account.  Many philosophers have thought that indeterminism is a hindrance for securing freedom; and so Clarke wants to find a view that secures such freedom.  Any adequate account, he thinks, will be (i) comprehensible; (ii) broadly logical; (iii) will have a characterization of requirements such that fulfilling them entails that we are free; and (iv) the location of indeterminism is not superfluous.The structure of the book is as follows: first, he sets out some issues pertaining to incompatibilism and what an account of freedom must secure.  For example, a satisfactory account of freedom will secure our making a difference in the world, among other things.  This first chapter is in part about the different ways of construing the incompatibilist thesis, and there are interesting implications for the rest of the book.  Next, he moves on to consider noncausal accounts (Ginet, McCann).  Concluding these are unsatisfactory, Clarke considers event-causal views (Mele, Ekstrom, Dennett, Kane).  After concluding these views don't provide enough control, he moves on to agent-causal accounts.  While he contends that the most plausible account, an integrated view, which includes agent causation + event causation, can answer many of the typical objections, he ultimately finds the libertarian project *doubtful* (not obviously defeated) because of problems pertaining to *substance* causation, where an agent would be a substance and not an event.I've skimmed over quite a bit of information and many of the interesting things he has to say, much less what I think about the arguments.  Let me just finish by noting that he largely assumes incompatibilism to be true.  If you buy the book looking for such arguments, you will find very few.   Second, this is a difficult book, regardless of your philosophical pedigree.  But having said that, working carefully through this book has a nice return.
The Knowledge Transformation point of view. In this book Heidi presents the challenges of developing and implementing knowledge portals in organizations in a very articulate yet simple way.  The book walks you through the phases and the challenges associated with implementing both knowledge management practices and systems.  You will get insights to what others have experienced and what you could expect.  "If you just build it, they might not come" you have to get the culture and the people involved in the process
Great Read-Aloud. This book was a fantastic read-aloud book for my second-grader.  We both thoroughly enjoyed it.  I know he would never had made it through the story (because of the difficult language) if he had read it himself.  It was a little tough getting into the plot, but once in, it was hard to put down
Pronoia etc. it is "so long ago" ... I seem to have been enjoying it forever. The delivery was prompt and I highly recommend this vendor.Ri
always glad to have more muldoon. I felt that this book exceeds Moy Sand and Grave in quality.  It evokes some of the mystery of Muldoon's previous work.  Many of his poems are densely inscrutable, yet somehow utterly compelling.  One often gets the impression that he may be obliquely referencing things beyond what is immediately offered in the writing.  ...but I am not much of a scholar: is there a skeleton key
Very good. I found this book very interesting and well written, but not for all readers. It covers all quantitative risk management topics with a good mathematical approach: this could be a great textbook for general risk management courses,  and it give importance to EVT technics, mulivariate models and copula-modelling. The treatment of market risk is complete and exhaustive, and a good actuarial approach for credit risk can be found too. The operational risk chapter is poor, it gives only an introductive section for it and for actuarial models.It requires a good mathematical background to be well understand, but it is a  great book to introduce the whole quantitative risk management theory.
I enjoy sick humor!. If you laugh at children falling down this is the book for you.  He may push it sometimes but isn't that what a good writer should do?  Knowing he is half Greek, so am I, I was hoping for a good egg cracking story or roasting lamb in your backyard.  Unfortunately there wasn't one.  Santaland was my favorite
Dark Short Stories. Considering all the works of Kipling I have read, this collection of short stories contains some of his his darkest and in some cases hints of dark humor.  A very enjoyable read with lots of references to Freemasonry.  Many of the stories pointedly show the scars of the first world war and how they affected both the soldier and the civilian. Some very good short stories that take place in lodges.  If you enjoyed the Man Who Would Be King or if you are a Freemason you will probably enjoy this book
Perfect book for compulsive read-the-end-firsters. I just bought my fourth copy of this book -- I've given away my others and I had to read it again."Traveler" is not the kind of book that will change your life with its insights,but it does so completely capture an ordinary man's crazy quest to finish the right book (he starts 10 different beginnings of books!)and is so astoundingly creative that it  feels fresh and relevant, even after multiple reads.There is really no other book like it.If you like unusual books and have better-than-average patience, I encourage you to give this book a try.
The best drama I've ever read. I thought Gentlemen Prefer Blondes was a great book.  Most books that are made into movies are not as good as the movie version, but I actually thought this book was a little bit better. I thought the book had great details to let you see what was going on.   This book is set in a diary form and is narrated by Lorelie, a beautiful woman who loves diamonds and can trick men into buying them for her.  I liked the diary form because this helped you know when everything was taking place.  You can also really tell what kind of person Lorelei is just by the way the book is written.   This book is like a big soap opera; Lorelei and Dorothy are always trying to trick someone into buying them something.  They charm one man and then make him promises that they will come back and go on to the next.  That is what makes you want to keep on reading, the fact that you don't know who they are going to trick next. This book is one of the best books I've read.  Anita Loos does a wonderful job throughout the whole book describing Lorelei and Dorothy's adventures.  It's just like watching a movie in your head.  If anyone wants to learn how to get what you want from a man I suggest taking some tips from Lorelei and reading this book
For DAT review- AWESOME. This book is awesome!  I used it to study for the DAT.  A little more detailed than I had to know for the test, but it provides a complete picture without having to read a whole textbook.only one annoying, but at the same time fun, part: you have to color the pages to get an overall picture.
Love this book. This is a classic. My little girl loves this book. We have been reading it for two years now. She is two and half years old.  She laughs at the monkey stealing the keys, and loves when the wife wakes up and finds all the animals in bed with her.  Fun book
Foot First, Heart in the End. One person can make a difference. That's the big lesson Jenna Boller learns outside of the classroom and it changes her forever. As she returns to school in the Fall, she immediately realizes how much she has matured over the summer. It's as if the other students were frozen in time.  Jenna grew up at Gladstone Shoes. At first, she is consumed in her own problems, most notably fixing the strained relationship with a dysfunctional alcoholic parent she helped put in jail. A sister obsessed with her own appearance is also scarred by family problems but refuses to deal with them. At work, Jenna's boss, an elderly women, Mrs. Gladstone, seems out of touch and too gullible, giving the wrong people, like the troubled Tanner, a second chance. As Jenna learns, it was all a matter of having the right person redirect Tanner's high energy in a more positive direction - and Mrs. Gladstone make Jenna his boss, partly responsible for the transformation. Mrs. Gladstone knows that in her heart Jenna does not understand her methods. Jenna believes Mrs. Gladstone is soft, an easy mark.  As the story unfolds, Jenna observes as Mrs. Gladstone takes on her own son, exposing the corruption that has infested Gladstone's new corporate offices. As her mentor, Mrs. Gladstone explains, "I want you to learn from this. I want you to write it in your heart."  In the end Jenna intuitively creates her own mentoring role, helping someone else put the best foot forward.  Joan Bauer has written a most enjoyable, uplifting book that will not only resonate with young reasons, but with all who read it.  It kept me smiling
My Mother... My Opinion??. It took me a while to get into this book... there were several occasions where I tempted to give up on it.I'm glad I stuck with it though.Those of you with a difficult mother/daughter relationship will probably benefit from reading this book.  I know I did.  Even though the author isn't a mother (which does bother me a little), I feel that her theories make sense.The version I have of this book is quite old and was published in 1977(I picked it up in a used bookstore).  I'm not sure what type of editing has been done on newer versions but I'm sure the main message will be the same.My Mother My Self would benefit women who would like a deeper understanding of their relationship with their own mother, and also their daughters.  Men might like to read this to understand the complex dynamics of these relationships
Wonderful Study of the Plurality of Slaveholders. James Oakes' The Ruling Class is a history of American slaveholders that effectively dispels the image of the paternalistic plantation aristocrat as the definitive, or even typical, portrait of the average slaveholder.  It was interesting to see how much the Southeners and the Northeners had in common in political and ecomonic outlook.  The average slaveholder was a grasping capitilist continually on the move and trying to advance himself.  Slaves were a commodity to be used in this regard, as were the slaveholders' democratic politics and the expansion south and westward in the United States.  The paternalist image built up in mythology after the Civil War existed but it was not representative.  This book is effective is demonstrating the ways in which the slaves were an active, often rebellious, factor in this capititist drama as they also rejected any paternalist notion of their enslavement and saw the truth of the picture.  They were a commodity both for labour and commerce.  The book is excellant in portraying a complicated picture of the slaveholding class that involved many people of different ethnic, religious, political, and economic backgrounds all bound up in a capitilist explotiation of the slaves as a source of upward mobility in a very fluid society.  A good place to begin to learn about this period of history
This book has helped me. I have been able to really learn a great deal about how others in my life affect my relationship. I also have been able to put into words what I was feeling - my husband read it but felt it was just too conservative and didn't really support all the reasons to stay married, but it did get us talking. It made me feel I wasn't crazy to try to stay married - and that for anyone to consider a divorce without truly trying to work things out is a big cop out
Poetic Medicine. There are many exercises in the book to inspire your poetry and many inspirational quotes. I've read it twice and intend to read again, as each time I read it different exercises and examples appeal to me. There is an exercise where you write down all the words that appeal to you in poems, to remind you to use them in your own works
Excellent literature. I bought the book to have a comparison with the recent movie version. Always interesting to notice the difference
More than a translation. Oedipus the King is one of the classic works of Western literature. It was originally written as a play in around 429 BC by Sophocles (~496-406 BC), a Greek philosopher and playwright. It took the Greek world by storm, and has been handed down to future generations who have also been greatly influenced by it. Most notably in modern times, Sigmund Freud (1856-1939) took this work as pointing toward a deep-rooted psychosis, the Oedipus Complex.Oedipus the King (also known as Oedipus Rex or Oedipus Tyrannus) is the story of Oedipus, the king of Thebes, which is suffering under a horrific plague. Finding out that the god Apollo has laid the plague on the city until it should punish the murderer of its previous king, Oedipus pronounces a curse on the murderer and sets out to discover who the murderer was. Sadly for Oedipus, there is fate upon fate wrapped up in this mystery, and doom upon doom.This book, is not merely a translation of Oedipus the King, instead it is an "acting version," created by the Stratford Shakespearian Festival Company of Canada for High School level students. The book begins with an introduction to Sophocles and Greek theatre, and after the play are copious notes, critical excerpts and questions for discussion. The play itself was written so that a young reader, with no background understanding of Greek theatre or culture will understand it.Overall, I found this to be a great book. I enjoyed the information about the play a lot, and believe that it will be very helpful to any reader. But, foremost, I enjoyed the play itself. The story is powerful, and quite enthralling. I have never seen this play acted out, but do think that this translation would make it excellent. I loved this book, and highly recommend it
A nice review of all of the major myths of Greece. This book offers a nice overview of Greek mythology.  All of the major stories, and many of the minors, are included here.  I would have liked to see more of the myths from other cultures, but it is understandable that they are not included, given the fact that the work was done in the 1950's. A worthwhile introduction to myths
This book on directing is straight to the point. This book is a good read. The author gives his take on the business, and offers some good adivce.
Perfect Summer Fun. For fans of JBJ this book is a wonderful companion.  Your kids can follow along with JBJ as she writes her journal and they can fill in their own versions on the next pages.  My 7 year old devours the JBJ books in about 30 minutes, but she has spent hours and hours on this.  It was especially great for the summer because it gave her a chance to practice her writing skills
Essential reading for a classical education. I read Sophocles Antigone for graduate Humanities class.  It is an essential reading to understand Greek Tragedy.  It is also a foundation stone of literature in studying Western Civilization.  Steiner's book was a great resource in understanding Greek Tragedy.Antigone, daughter of Oedipus in 3-cycle play, faces capital punishment for burying her brother who rebelled against Thebes.  Obeying instincts of loyalty of love and the divine law, she defies Creon, the King and her uncle.  Creon says laws of states outweigh all other laws, and family loyalty, when he finally relents it's too late.Over the centuries there has been a great deal made about the conflicts played out in the play, law of state vs. law of goods, personal vs. state duties.  Loves knowledge vs. state knowledge.  Greek understanding of tragedy- Aristotle lays down understanding of Greek tragedy.  He based it on Sophocles.  Tragedy- most important thing for tragedy is plot, it is all essential. Tragedy defined as- is imitation of an action that is serious, complete and of a certain magnitude in language embellished with incidents arousing pity and fear ant to the audience it accomplishes catharsis of such emotions.  Every tragedy must have six parts that determine its quality.  1. plot  2.  character 3.  diction 4.  fault 5.  spectacle and 6.  melody.According to Aristotle, tragedy is higher and more philosophical than history or poetry; it is one of the highest expressive forms because it dramatizes what may happen.  History is a narrative that tells you what has happened tragedy shows what is possible.  History deals with particulars, tragedy deals with the universal.  Tragedy creates a cause and effect chain and shows how the world operates.  It frames human experience in universal discourse, tragedy is central in this effort.  Tragedy arouses pity and fear in audience because we can envision ourselves caught in this cause and effect chain.  Plot most important feature, the arrangement of incidents, the way incidents, and action is structured.  Tragedies outcome depends on the outcome of these cause and effect changes not on being character driven.  Plot must be whole, beginning middle and end.  Beginning must have a motivation that starts the cause and effect chain of events must be a center or climax that is caused by earlier incidents.  There must be an end some kind of closure caused by earlier events in tragedy.  This is all part of the complication of the tragedy all must be connected.  You can't have a dues ex machnia in a superior tragedy.In tragedy, the hero or heroine walks knowingly towards the fate that is written and can't be changed.  Unity of action plot must be structurally self-contained, each action leading invariably to the next without outside intervention.  The worst kinds of plots are episodic, like a Jerry Seinfeld sitcom, can't be something about nothing, must have unity of action.  Magnitude, quantatively meaning length, and quality of action, it must be serious.  Must be of universal significance, depth, and richness.  Character- most important feature is the fatal flaw.  Motivations of characters are important but character is there to support the plot.  Character must be a prosperous renowned personage.  Change of fortune from good to bad will really matter and bring fear and pity to the audience.  In ideal tragedy, the hero will mistakenly bring about his own downfall.  Because they make a mistake, because knowledge of our selves is always partial, we can't have complete knowledge of ourselves.  Hall quotes Descartes in the article, "The limited error prone perspective of the individual.  Subject is always imperfect and human and these limitations include our ability to know in any reliable way ourselves."  The fact that we as subjects, as agents can never fully know ourselves means that we are always prone to error, error is the essence of the tragic hero, tragedy is the essential drama of human subjectivity.What is Hegel's understanding of concept of tragedy?  He revises Aristotelian principals and logic.  Immensely influential German philosopher, he writes about; tragedy in the Aesthete 1820-29, he proposes, "the suffering of the tragic hero are merely the means of reconciling the opposing moral clients."  According to Hegel's account of Greek tragedy, the conflict isn't between good and evil, but between competing goods, all is good.  Between two entirely ethical worlds that clash and can't come together.  Both characters have an ethical vision or belief that they have to follow it is there one-sidedness of their vision that clashes with the one-sidedness of the other character.  Both sides of contradiction are justified.  Conflict of irreconcilable justifiable ethical worlds, ethical visions.  Just as his dialectic must lead to an ultimate synthesis, so to must tragedy lead to a synthesis.  This is dramatized in the death of the tragic actor, which becomes the synthesis.  Hegel says; "the characters are too good to live."  They are too good to live in this world.  What is interesting is that Hegel so wants to correct moral imbalances his emphasis is on moral balances.Greek tragedy is great reading for people interested in aesthetics, history, psychology, and philosophy.
GO AND BUY THIS BOOK. This book is amazing, it tells you step by step to teach your puppy in day life, how to choose a good breader etc. I'm planning to get a puppy in 3 months frm now, this book taught me how to handle the puppy since the first day you brought it home. Really good book
best if you know brazil  well. I read this book in portuguese, when it first came out in Brazil, and i absolutely loved it. This book is not only about Caetano Veloso and his music. Caetano Veloso has a very unique way to see people and to write about them, and in his life he had the privilege to meet some of the most important people in Brazil's cultural scene. In his book he tells us many precious stories about Chico Buarque de Hollanda, Gilberto Gil, Nara Leao, Paulinho da Viola and so many others. Some important moments of his life and also of Brazilian history are also told from a very personal point of view: stories of Caetano and Gil's prison and exile during brazilian dictatorship were specially moving to me. And then there are some fabulous stories about the beginnings of Caetano's carreer, how it all started. Caetano has such an insteresting point of view about everything, it's awesome to be able to get inside his mind, and that's how i felt reading his book. I actually ended up reading it twice. I think though, that this book can be better appreciated by people who really know brazilian music and culture well. Another reviewer mentioned that Caetano talks about lots of "obscure artists", but i don't think this is a true statement. He talks about very important people in brazilian culture, including writers, film directors and musicians. The people he mentions are very known in Brazil,and he also talks about important european and american artists. The people he mentions in his book are not obscure at all. Probably, if you know who he is talking about it makes for a much better reading experience. So, if you have a curious mind and are interested in art, music, and Brazil, this is certainly a wonderful book to read. And, like me, you may want to read it more than once..
Insightful but ends in obscurity. This is a must-read for any postmodern Web developer. Helps keeps your eyes from succumbing to tunnel vision ideas like web 2.0.TimBL tells his story and provides a great explanation of his intention for what the Web really is. Points out that really the Web is only half done, and should spawn some really great killer app ideas for any smart developer.The latter half of the book seems filled with Tim's unclear ideas for the future, which are unclear because he doesn't know. Getting too old to see any further perhaps? Such is the fate of all visionaries.If you're a developer, read this book. It's a quick one
Every soldier should carry a copy. 'We few, we happy few, we band of brothers.' What more need I say? Henry V is an imortal classic of western literature. And this edition is complete and accurate. See the film if you want, but be sure to read the words at least once. They are inspiring
Ritalin is NOT the answer ... nurturing their brilliance is!. Interesting how if Winston Churchill were a child today he would be a prime candidate for Ritalin or Concerta or Strattera ... or whatever ADHD drug is out there. So would the likes of Werner Von Braun, Richard Branson, Charles Schwab, Thomas Edison, John F. Kennedy, and all sorts of brilliant men who made their mark on the world.The increase in drugging children for being "out of the normal template" is a crime and tragedy. Indigo children are especially prone to being poisoned because of their inner authority, independance, and innate intuitive instinct for deception they are more than willing to speak out against. The only difference between a prescription and a poison is dosage. Younger and younger children are being drugged because their parents blindly believe a doctor. Medical intervention is a neccessity but no drug is a cure all magic pill. A prescription is just one line of defense is treating a condition. Cognitive therapy and other psychological methods can address what a drug cannot. It is a multi-line of defense.This book is a wonderful tool for parents who want to know the alternative to a drug. I can't sing its praises enough. Drugging a child is a mask for emotional problems that are the root of problem behavior. And really ... it's a parent's duty to fight for their child. I recommend this book for all the mothers and fathers who want to do all they can to bring out the best for the son or daughter who needs them.The next time someone says a child is difficult ... try to see the other side. Brilliance has its beauty and its rambucious side
Unparalleled Educational Resource!!!. As a marketing professional who has little time to research investment opportunities, I was seeking a guide to educate myself about using investment information effectively.  Investment Survival is an expansive educational resource that uses pertinent examples applicable to the laymen to provide a comprehensive guide to constructing a well-balanced portfolio.  I will refer to this valuable guidebook for years to come when making decisions about my stock portfolio
The Adventures of Tintin: The Crab With the Golden Claws / The Shooting Star / The Secret of the Unicorn (3 Complete Adventures. Good book for kids and aldult as wel
interesting trivia. E.D.Hill has interviewed a great many people for this work and has compiled them into a series of interesting anecdote
No difference between Boston &amp; Birmingham. Funny how busing caused such a flap in Boston and no southerners hopped on buses to go demonstrate in the streets of Boston
Superb!. This is the best edition of Chaucer on the market, including all of his major works. If you're serious, this is the one to get.
You Have Got To Buy It. This is a great book and I highly recomend it to any one over the age of 8 or 9 that loves horses
A talented writer. I had the pleasure of being one of Hudson's students, especially when I was able to discuss the pilot on the dust jacket, Capt. Field E. Kindley, of Gravette, Arkansas, one of the first Americans flying in a US unit to shoot down a German.  Hudson took great pains to insure the accuraccy of this book, and continued to seek out information about the men and units he wrote about in this book.  It is THE BOOK on the fledgling American Air Service, and having been a WWII fighter pilot, Hudson wrote from a pilot's point of view, and was able to discuss the salient points and the bad points of the experiences that these men had and how it shaped the future of our air force. I strongly recommend it to any serious military student
Excellent Star Wars. Ok, so the book starts out a little slow, but I must say that is because the book is written from the first person stand point, the only starwars book I know of to be written from that perspective. This story follows Corran Horn from Stockpole's Xwing series on his journey to become a jedi knight. Corran's wife Mirax is missing and in order to find her he must come to terms with his heritage. So he changes his name to Keiran Halycon and joins Luke Skywalker's Jedi Academy as one of his first students. The story goes right along with the jedi academy trilogy and then precedes after Exar Kun's defeat to Corran leaving the academy for his own reasons ( he doesnt like how luke runs the academy, it doesnt work for him) to continue his search for his wife. But in order to save her he must make a choice join the dark side or lose her forever. You will have to read the book to find out what happens there. But if you know anything at all about star wars you know everything usually works out in the end
Escape to Paradise!. This is one of my favorite books by Nora Roberts. Setting is her specialty. She really knows how to take the reader with her on every adventure. You really come to care about these characters, and it's great to escape with them to the sunny ocean setting and go deep-sea diving for the very first time in your life! This one earned its 5 stars!
Clear View of Murky Personnel Evaluation Process. This practical guide is a must-read for anyone who conducts performance evaluations - especially for those new to the process. Step-by-step, it explains why you should evaluate employee performance, how to set up a program and how to conduct the evaluations. The appendices alone are invaluable. Author Glenn Shepard provides nearly 60 pages of useful, hands-on materials. Appendix A is packed with words and phrases that will enable you to be specific about your observations of employee behavior in areas such as attendance and workplace safety. Appendix B provides five performance evaluation forms that demonstrate a variety of evaluation techniques, such as using essays or assigning numerical values to weighted descriptive scales. Appendix C includes several self-evaluation forms organizations can use as models. We recommend this book to managers, supervisors and human resource professionals who must develop workable, legally sound employee performance evaluation systems
Objective, Insightful and Entertaining Book from Cochise to Geronimo. This is a fascinating and well written account of the Apache and their war against whites and Mexico from the 1860's to their total loss of freedom that ends with Geronimo and his final band's surrender and incarceration. Roberts writes in a very readable and flowing style providing insights and first hand quotes from both sides of the conflicts. He also gives you both sides of any controversy, particularly letting the reader know the veracity of individuals with conflicting statements, which is very refreshing. Roberts is able to clearly differentiate between the different tribes that were identified generically as Apache and he presents a fascinating history involving the many chiefs that led their people during the conflict. The author covers extraordinary well the different chiefs and their roles, such as the great Cochise (Chokonen), Mangas Colorado (Chihenne), Victoria (Chihenne), Juh (Nednhi), Nana (Chihenne) and of course the infamous warrior Geronimo (Bedonkohe). The biographies and retelling of events are so descriptive and thorough that you get a genuine feel for the main characters, the conditions of the mountains and deserts and the people, white, Mexican and Indian. The first chapter starts with Lt. Bascom's ill-fated effort to retrieve a child by holding hostages from the wrong tribe, Cochise's, which sets up a violent war against the whites and a distrust that lasts for decades. That, among several failures such as consolidating reservations and the killing of a medicine man (similar to the killing of Sitting Bull just a few years later), substantiates the Apache distrust of whites. The brutality between parties is evenly told by Roberts as women and children suffer during American and Mexican attacks on Apache villages while the violence towards whites, particularly Mexicans who the Apache loathe, is hard to fathom particularly towards the isolated ranchers and their young children. And the killing and torture is in extreme brutal fashion fueling hatred and fear among the Arizona population. One Apache explains the violence as emanating from a deep hated associated with the violent deaths of their own people by their enemies. Perhaps the best example of this is by when a chief eats lunch with his best white friend and then calmly executes him after dinner demonstrating his severance from trusting whites. Besides the Apache, Roberts covers the agents from the successful but slighted Jeffords to the young egocentric Clum called "strutting turkey" by the Apache to the various Generals that tried their hand in subduing the "renegade Apache", Stoneman, Howard, Crook and Miles. The eccentric Crook is most successful utilizing Apache scouts to go deep into the mountains of the difficult and isolated Sierre Madre to track Geronimo but he is finally undermined publicly by Geronimo's frequent escapes and changes of heart. Thankfully, Roberts recognizes the role of Lt. Gatewood who finally brings Geronimo's band in as the self centered General Miles provides Gatewood no record of accomplishment. At the end, Roberts provides details on the Chirichua's long imprisonment and isolation and Geronimo's post capture history, he with withstood numerous bullets living to an amazing 85. This is the best book on the Apache fight for independence, it is an exciting book to read and one of my all time favorites.
Great book!. I will reccomend this book to anyone! This is one of the best books!
The Business of Healthcare Innovation - Highly Recommended. The market dynamics, business models, and corporate strategies of pharma, biotech, genomics, medical device development, and health care information technology are converging. And you better get ready.Written by business gurus at the Wharton School and health industry executives, The Business of Healthcare Innovation provides an invaluable analysis of key business trends in the manufacturing side of health care. Editor Lawton R. Burns, Ph.D. and contributors focus on the producer side of health care and demonstrate how manufacturers serve as the principal drivers of health care innovation.Specifically, The Business of Healthcare Innovation:1. Provides an insightful, detailed overview of the most influential players - namely, the pharmaceutical, biotechnology, genomics/proteomics, medical device, and information technology sectors.2. Describes and assesses the market structures, business models, and corporate strategies of each of these six sectors.3. Shows how the six sectors are converging, drawing increasingly on the trends, tools, and solutions of each other.A compelling, business-savvy look at the manufacturing side of health care, The Business of Healthcare Innovation is highly recommended for executives, policy makers, investors, and consultants to business and government decision makers
"He was one of us.". Of all the great novelists and writers of English, Joseph Conrad was one of the most pessimistic. His view of human nature was not encouraging or, to use modern jargon, "life affirming." Like Shakespeare, he always sought to look under the mask, to remove the polite smile of civilization and expose the red, toothy maw beneath. He often sent his characters into the "interior;" a jungle always described as a black-green hell, hot and dripping, where man was free to release the bloody and awful God within."Lord Jim" follows this pattern to an extent, although in this novel, the character struggles to be honorable and kind. In a nutshell, an English officer - young, handsome and noble - is terribly disgraced and struggles to restore his honor. The storyteller in the novel, Marlowe, is the same character Conrad used to tell "Heart of Darkness." It is the relationship between Marlowe and Jim, the young officer, which provides the most fascinating element in the work.Marlowe meets Jim during the latter's military hearing, where Jim is desperate to tell someone the story of his disgrace. Marlowe, a merchant captain coincidentally in port, reluctantly hears him out. This event establishes a deep, psychological bond between the two men that courses through the book. It is through this relationship that Conrad explores some of the fundamental assumptions of human nature: Is man, basically, good and honorable? Is there even such a thing as honor or "good," or is every belief we cherish about ourselves a thin chimera, shredded easily by the base nature within?Certainly there are few "honorable" characters in "Lord Jim." One of the great treats of the book is the flotsam of humanity that Conrad skillfully parades before the reader. Take, as an example, the merchant Chester, one of many who offer Jim extremely dubious work once he is in disgrace (in this case overseer of an island that produces tons of bat guano, which has great commercial value) or Chester's right hand man, Captain "Holly Terror" Robinson, described thusly:"The Notorious Robinson. The man who smuggled more opium and bagged more seals in his time than any loose Johnny now alive. They say he used to board the sealing -schooners up Alaska way then the fog was so thick that the Lord God, He alone, could tell one man from another. Holy-Terror Robinson. That's the man. He is with me on this guano thing." He put his lips to my ear. "Cannibal? -Well, they used to give him the name years and years ago."Yet, there remains something that makes Marlowe care about Jim, something he is at pains to understand himself. The fascinating thing is that most of the time Marlowe is nearly repulsed or irritated by Jim, made squeamish about shaking his hand, or will cross a street to avoid him. There is a quality in Jim's disgrace that dims Marlowe's own cherished memories of youth and high adventure. Yet, as Marlowe says repeatedly, Jim "was one of us." This phrase changes, bit by bit, in the course of the novel. At first it means, primarily, white, English, and of a certain class. As the novel progresses, the phrase begins to take on a much broader meaning, touching something fundamental in all living men.As Marlowe puts it in describing Jim: "Woe to the stragglers! We exist only in so far as we hang together. He had straggled in a way; he had not hung on; but he was aware of it with an intensity that made him touching, just as a man's more intense life makes his death more touching than the death of a tree. I happened to be handy, and I happened to be touched. That's all there is to it."Again, like Shakespeare, nothing is obvious and much is open to interpretation. Does Jim succeed in regaining his honor, there in a remote jungle? Did he fail? Or, perhaps, was he aiming his shot at a romantic tendril of air, never really there at all. If you read this great work, you will have the pleasure of deciding for yourself.   ---- Mykal Banta
I use this reference everyday!!!. The Tarascon Pocket Pharmacopoeia is the single reference book that I use EVERYday I practice.  I make sure to get my copy as early as I can every year to check all the newest changes and additions.  All I need to practice medicine is my stethoscope, a pen, and my Pharmacopoeia
OUTSTANDING BOOK!. This really outstanding book has it all! If you want to train for a short race, a marathon or anything in between, this book is the way to do it! Colorful pages!  Easy to read charts. Advice on just about everything any  runner or would-be runner needs! Great book
Wonderful Writing Wolff. Tobias Wolff writes a wonderful memoir about his experiences in Vietnam.  His poignant writing and storytelling makes the pages in this book flow like a steady stream.  Wolff is a masterful storyteller who captures what it was like over in Vietnam, during his time, and  skillfully brings out those adventures to the page.  I recommend this book along with This Boys Life if you are in the mood for a well-writen memoir
Extremely Powerful. I just finished reading this text, and I must say this is one of the most powerful books I have had the privelege of reading.  Dostoyevsky penetrates the depths of individuals who are alienated from and yet envious of society.  I have never read anything as remarkbly accurate as this text is in representing this complex, torturous situation.This text will alter your perception and change your way of thinking, creating an epiphanic experience that is spiritually enlightening and ultimately rewarding.
For the serious scholar. This book by Pritchard best serves serious historians though not necessarily those specializing in the Near East. Indeed the images and the translations are valuable for the mythologist or the art historian.  I have  found it to be very useful in my own research
All the legal tips, tricks and traps explained. Plenty of books impart the basics of how to work independently - but too few include all the legal tips, tricks and traps involved. WORKING FOR YOURSELF: LAW & TAXES FOR INDEPENDENT CONTRACTORS, FREELANCERS & CONSULTANTS covers everything from setting appropriate fees and understanding how and when taxes are paid to limiting liability and getting paid. Record-keeping processes are simplified with sample logs and entry advice, chapters on how the IRS defines an independent contractor versus a paid employee are essential keys to keeping independent status, and advice on pricing and insurance offer key strategy-oriented tips and approaches. A 'must' for any who would work independently.
Enjoyed it.. Great read. First book I've read by Rice but now I'll be checking out her other ones :
A FEISTY, APPEALING VOICE PERFORMANCE. For many audio book listeners actress Lorelei King is the voice of Stephanie Plum, as she has also read Eleven On Top, Hard Eight, and To The Nines.  King is a gifted voice performer who has made this gutsy, appealing character her own, fortunately for all of us.Ever since the day New Jersey gal Stephanie hit the shelves in One For The Money (1994) she has continued to win fans and capture bond jumpers.  As many will recall, when several jobs didn't work out Steph needed income and fast or it was move in with the parents time.  So, she went to work for her cousin, Vinnie, a bail bondsman.  Now, Steph had no training in this line of work but she had more than her share of determination.  Plus, she has a little help from Ranger, an experienced part Latino bounty hunter, and  Grandma Mazur who wants some excitement in her life.Grandma is something else.  When Steph tends to fret about her, heartthrob cop Joe Morelli tells her to forget it.  "Don't worry about your grandmother," he says.  "She's like that `53 Buick.  Frighteningly indestructible.  Maybe even immortal."Well, everyone in Seven Up may need a touch of immortality as Steph finds a corpse in the yard of Eddie, a deft bail jumper.  Then when her friends start vanishing, things really heat up.  Speaking of heat, add a proposal of marriage from Joe to all of this.Excitement abounds as Steph copes with murder, kidnaping, and would you believe a liaison between Grandma and Eddie?Fun listening for all!- Gail Cook
"We only want the government to talk with us and to say that we are not traitors.". So said one of the student leaders, as quoted by Shen Tong (himself a leader) in "Almost a Revolution." This is a very fluidly written, personal acount of the events leading up to the killings of workers & students by Chinese soldiers in Tiananmen Square, Beijing, on June 5 1989.  Fortunately, with more recent events in Ukraine, "Soviet" Georgia, Tajikistan, even Lebanon (not forgetting Eastern Europe), we have seen how revolutions gain strenth, often like tropical storms that develope into hurricanes with surprising rapidity.  Meteorologically, we can explain such happening on the weather front ONCE THEY OCCUR, but we're rarely capable of predicting such developements until they are almost in our faces, so to speak.  The event that sparked events in China was the death of Hu Yaobang on April 15th. "Hu Yaobang had become something of a hero since he had been made the scapegoat of the 1986 student movement and ousted as general secretary, and many of us," says the author, "had hoped that he would be brought back someday to lead China on the road to reform."  Acknowledgement of his passing by many, however, soon began to be read by the government as a renewed call for reform.  Thus began the chain of events that resulted in students' boycotting classes, printing flyers, and finally, camping out in Tiananmen Square.  In the author's view, "there was clearly an internal struggle going on between Li Peng [a hardliner] and Zhao Ziyang [a Chinese leader who had declared on May 7th his openness to a dialogue with the students]." Evidence of such was the fact that "starting May 17, the press in China operated without censorship from the goverment for a few days."  Mikhail Gorbachev had arrived for a visit 2 days earlier and the Chinese government was seemingly  caught off-guard in the headlights of the world's media for a moment while it contemplated how to respond a mass protest in Beijing's central square.  The one fault of this book (besides no index) is that the author has nothing to say about this visit by Gorbachev.  He mentions the Soviet leader's arrival and departure, but literally nothing otherwise; no impressions or anything how such a visit affected events on the ground in Beijing, or within the corridors of the Chinese government.  This was before the collapse of Eastern Europe, mind you, but I find it hard to believe that the issue of Gorbachev (glasnost/reform) wasn't a topic of discussion amongst at least some of the student leaders arrayed around Shen Tong.  Back to events: Martial Law was declared on May 20.  On May 21 word began to filter out that Zhao Ziyang had been removed as general secretary of the Chinese Communist Party (though it wasn't announced until May 26th).  The crackdown came soon after, but the author wasn't as much a witness & participant to this aspect as he was in all the events leading up to it.  He doesn't, consequently, write much about the tanks entering Beijing (or the famous photograph of the solitary man courageously standing his ground before one particular one), or what exactly happened that day---he doesn't even guess at how many Chinese were killed.  But, this is nevertheless a remarkable story (that reads quickly & gives much interesting detail of the author's childhood, particularly as it relates to his coming to question things & the role his intellectual father had on his developement). Cheers!
demonstrates a difficult concept well. We use this book and its predecessor, Me On The Map, to teach map concepts in First grade. Children this age generally have difficulty with the &quot;nesting&quot; idea of these things--that you can be in a county, state, country, continent, on a planet, and in a solar system, all at once. These books do a good job of making this more tangible and easier to grasp. It is especially effective when students do a re-write following the reading and personalize it to their own place on the map
&quot;How to Write and Think Clearly About Any Subject at All&quot;. I think we all have a &quot;fear&quot; of certain subjects.  For me, that  fear manifests itself in the field of math.  I was terrified of it in  school and even now would rather discuss almost any other subject.  Zinsser  helps us face our fear of subjects we think we don't understand by writing.   How will that help?  You probably know a lot about the work you do.  You  could probably also write very competently about your profession.  In  &quot;Writing to Learn,&quot; Zinsser shows us that writing across the  curriculum (which is very prominent in education right now) can help anyone  learn how to organize and present their thoughts in a logical manner so  that they can be understood by those who might otherwise be intimidated by  them.  Zinsser gives many examples from writers that support his statement  that writing is helpful in all subjects in the curriculum:  science,  history, music, math...MATH???  How can you write about math?  It's all in  Zinsser's book, which is as entertaining as it is informative
Far out dude!. The character Jake on 2 1/2 men was asked by his father what the book "Lord of the flies" was about  and he repied, "a really big fly." Continuing with that thought, Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance is not about motorcycles and how to fix them. The book is an outstanding search of self and and the healing of a relationship. An old standard that holds up in time; it should be on a must read list with the best of literature.
State of the Art. This book embodies what multicultural counseling is all about, the state of the art. Not only are the most recent empirical findings and directions presented, but we are also treated to the real life narratives of prominent multicultural counselors (in particular I really enjoyed Janet Helms and her sense of humor). In my opinion this is the perfect melding of head and heart/soul and represents both science and art. My gratitude goes out to the 85 people who have put this important work together. This book is a must have
Book of Jubilees. The Book of Jubilees is a interesting read because it is a book that many New Testament authors were familiar with and perhaps influenced by.  The book tells the entire Old Testament over again from the perspective of the authors of the time (Helenistic Jews) and includes many elements not mentioned in the actual Bible or not elaborated on extensively in the actual Bible.  The book relies heavily upon the work known as the Book of Enoch which also had heavy influence on the authors of the New Testament particularly the authors of Revelation and Jude.  If you want to understand the Jewish thought of the time of Jesus this is a great book to read
Love doesn't come with a pedigree. With more than 75% of the dogs entering America's animal shelters being mixed breeds, it's about time someone championed their unparalleled virtues.  The care and detail taken by the author demonstrates her profound  understanding that fancy schmancy papers or prissy pedigrees are a poor  measuring tool when choosing a canine family member.  This book will go a  long way toward awakening public awareness to the wonderful dogs that are  waiting eagerly in shelters, each hoping that today is their day to earn a  loving home.  Well done
History truly is an adventure. The Corps of Discovery comes alive in this author's capable story-telling talent.   The personal introduction of how the Lewis and Clark adventure affected the author's life brings context and relevance to the story from the beginning and instills the author's passion in the reader.   Taken from the logs written during the adventure, you are led to discover with them all that they discovered as if for the first time.  You will never look at America west of the Mississippi quite the same way again.   Your imagination will soar with the wild country it was not that long ago.   More than dry scientific and anthropological studies, the Lewis and Clarke journals are an adventure travel log full of surprises and discovery.   Mr. Ambrose has done an outstanding job of sharing his sense that history is an adventure.   You will find it difficult to put this one down once you start
A Must Read. I must admit to being completely flabbergasted by the negative reviews of this novel. I could barely put it down, it moved me so. Most reviews focus on the family relationships that are hauntingly revealed by Jane Smiley throughout the book; I also found the descriptions of the land and farming practices to be insightful and engrossing. This is one book that doesn't disappoint, and will stick with you for a long time
Good Book. This book was a page turner that makes you think about yourself.  It was written very well. There was a lot of dark sides to the book, but over all it was a book I would recomend that you read.
Good, but dated. This book presents a fairly empathic view of the Saudis. It doesn't absolve them of the harshness that often makes up part of their lives, but it doesn't dwell on them either. I find it objective and balanced.The only real problem with the book is that, as others have noted, it is very out of date. The few pages added to this edition don't really cover the incredible transformations that have happened in the country since Ms. MacKey lived there. It really should have been re-written.A better, contemporary book is Thomas Lippman's "Inside the Mirage", current up to 2002. Even that has already been overtaken by political events in some regards, the information is far more applicable to modern Saudi Arabia
Cogent rundown on why the economy matters to you personally. In this brief, cogent book, author Tim Harford provides an accessible, entertaining introduction to economic thinking. This deftly written report belongs on the shelf of anyone with an interest in economic matters - and as the author makes clear, everyone has an interest in economic matters. He deftly punctures the balloons of those who advocate fair trade coffee, protectionism, government-underwritten medical care and other such policies. These tactics may seem humane on the surface, but he contends that they often merely advance the selfish goals of the few at the expense of the many. If the book has a weakness, it is Harford's tendency to take certain points of political opinion for granted and to state them as moral choices without qualification or proof. For instance, he puts forth the admirable - though some would say questionable - notion that governments are obliged to cushion the shock of unemployment. That, however, is a quibble. We highly recommend this concise, comprehensive book
fabulous first Wine Country Mystery. Two years ago, Lucie Montgomery had her foot maimed in a car accident.  She fled from her Virginia home to spend time in France recovering.  Forced to use a cane to help her walk and still overseas she has shown no indication to return to her family's winery.Her time in Europe ends when her brother Eli informs Lucie that their father Leland was killed in a hunting accident.  She comes home to the Montgomery Estate Vineyard for her dad's funeral, but is stunned as the once proud five hundred acres has been neglected since she left.  Lucie soon learns why as Leland let the winery go to ruin while he invested in questionable schemes that wiped out the family fortune.  Eli and their sister Mia want to sell the winery as they prefer the money to continue with their upper class lifestyle.  As stunning as her siblings wanting to sell their heritage, Lucie is further shocked when Mia flaunts her affair with Greg, her sister's former lover and the person responsible for her mutilated foot.  Meanwhile Lucie's godfather Fitz Pico warns her that Leland was murdered and anyone else opposed to the sale will probably die too; he leaves her with a key to a box that may hold a fabulous diamond necklace.  The next day Fitz is found dead.  Lucie believes the killer struck again and plans to uncover the culprit before she joins the murderer's row.MERLOT MURDERS is a fabulous first Wine Country Mystery that uses a wonderful backdrop to the amateur sleuth investigation.  Lucie is a delightful protagonist struggling with her father's death as much as his allowing their estate to become dilapidated.  Her siblings make matters worse with their avarice.  Fans will enjoy toasting newcomer Ellen Crosby to the sub-genre and think twice while sipping a glass of Merlot.Harriet Klausner
An Emotional Read, but well worth the effort. This books helps to understand the why of an extramarital affair - especially the Entangled Affair.  I was the infidel and the shame of what I had done threw me even deeper into depression and a confused state of mind. My counselor recommended the book for me &amp; my husband.  I read the book - my husband did not.  It helped me to realize  I was not alone and not a horrible person.  I stood by and took my husband's anger, because I felt I deserved it, but I feel if he had read the book, it would have helped him more than me.  My personal belief is that both spouses should read the book to get a better understanding of why the affair happened and how to recover. I'm giving it four stars because I have not read another book on extramarital affairs for comparison
A critical mass of critics . . . I was just out of graduate school and working in my first professional position when the first Star Wars movie (now known as "Episode 4") came out. I loved it. I had been a confirmed pulp-sf addict since the mid-1950s, and I was predisposed to enjoy the film for what it was, not for what the critics thought it was (and what they apparently wanted me, as a card-carrying intellectual, to believe it was). But I'm not too proud to admit that I also loved "2001: A Space Odyssey" and "Close Encounters of the Third Kind" when they came out. I mean, this stuff is great fun, right? The stuffier film critics, though, decided that George Lucas had killed the movies -- just as there were cries of anguish back in the late '20s, when the movies began to talk. Yes, the Star Wars universe has had a great influence on culture, and not just "pop" culture, but so have Gucci and Ronald Reagan and McDonald's. Most of the contributors to this anthology are of an age to have grown up on Star Wars, and the distinction can easily be made between those who don't take it, or themselves, too seriously (Jonathem Lethem, Neal Pollack, Erika Krouse, and Elwood Reed), and those for whom Lucas is Evil incarnate (notably Arion Berger and Tom Carson). The book is an interesting read for those, like me, with an interest in film-making and screenwriting that goes beyond just sitting there with a bag of popcorn, but I could only shake my head at some of the breast-beating Jeremiads
Awsome!. I liked this book because it has good discriptive language and the caracter Miyax she's a strong and brave girl
Great Go-To Book. I originally got this book when I first moved out on my own. I had some cooking experience which I gleaned from my mother, but with a limited spread of recipes and without much on-my-own experience.This book helped me a great deal as a beginner cook, and taught me most of the basics. Years later, I'm a much better cook, and though I rarely use this book's recipes at face value, I often reference it for a guideline to dishes that I enjoy, while adding my own touches. Also, when I'm preparing to try something new, this is generally the first book I go to, even after all this time.Other cook books have come and gone, but this one has staying power for me, earning it its five stars. A great purchase for a young adult, or even an every-day cook who just isn't very good, or who has a limited array of recipes. It is also a great reference for anyone who just wants a base to branch out from
My 6 year old son absolutely loves this book!. The book talks about actual pirates and their adventures.  My 6 year old son absolutely loves it
Swell introduction. Although I note some of the other reviews of this book are  not too favorable, for me it's a very cool introduction to an artist of whom I had never heard.I received it for a gift from a good friend who knows that as an artist, color is "my thing".  To learn of this woman, who worked color to its absolute max during the years I was growing up, is thrilling.  If nothing else, it has inspired me to seek out more of her work & what can be bad about that?  If a book doesn't serve the reader/observer by piquing one's further interest, then and only then has it failed
Great companion to the factory service manual. This book is a great companion to the factory service manual. Lots of color photos, and step by step instructions. From routine maintenance to performance upgrades.This book has it all
For anyone of any age wanting to enjoy the game. Now in a fully revised and updated second edition, Soccer: The Ultimate Guide To The Beautiful Game by Clive Gifford is an in-depth guide to the basic skills needed to play one of the world's most popular team sports. Included are all the rules and strategies, along with a brief history of the popular and widely beloved sport of soccer. Full-color illustrations throughout, including three-dimensional realistic computer models of soccer players handling the ball as well as photographs of real-life athletes, Soccer: The Ultimate Guide To The Beautiful Game stands out -- both as a "user friendly" how-to manual and as collectible to cherish for dedicated soccer enthusiasts. Soccer is very highly recommended for anyone of any age wanting to enjoy the game as either a participant or a spectator
Mr. Thoreau's Work: Walden. Fortunately, I read The Annotated Walden, annotated by Phillip Van Doren Stern.  Thank goodness I chose it.  Without Mr. Van Doren Stern's introduction, side bars, pictures and comments, I think I would have been thoroughly lost.I have to agree with a few of the reviewers who stated how pompous Thoreau sounds; he does.  He tries to act superior,only to have the side bar notations state something different; something that a friend mentioned.  For example, he says he "could easily do without the post-office,"  yet a contemporary, Sanborne, is quoted off to the side of the annotated version as having said about this quote: "Few residents of Concord frequented the Post Office more punctually or read the newspapers more eagerly than Thoreau."He contradicts himself constantly.  He mocks people who don't read, and then says he barely read a few pages of one book in the two years he was at Walden pond.  He could be vindictive; lashing out at Flint's Pond (and Mr. Flint) because Flint would not let him build a cabin on his pond.  He comes off as a snob, saying most men learn to read only as a necessity; for work, to add up their profits. But *true* readers are hard to come by.  "I aspire to be acquainted with wiser men than this Concord soil has produced.."Yet, he also has some really great words of wisdom. He questions the wisdom in working so hard during the best part of your life (youth) only to spend the fruits of your labor "during the least valuable part of it."  Enjoy life while you are young. Why work so hard when the endgame is death?  He comments on things that are still true to this day; fashion and our obsession with appearance.  Work to provide for yourself, not to overburden yourself and keep yourself in debt.Someone reviewing this book on Amazon wrote that it was a failed experiment; that he meant to live in the woods as a hermit of sorts and failed miserably to do so.  That was never the extent of his experiment.  He never says he's going to lead a solitary life.  He states he visited the village every day or two.  "As I walked in the woods to see birds and squirrels, so I walked in the village to see men and boys."I find myself having mixed feelings regarding this book.  He is so contradictory, but then, so am I.  He can be judgemental and then he can be spot-on.  It was a difficult book to get through,  Again, had I not had the annotated version, I would have been truly lost.  He frustrated me at times.  I was not reading literature.  I was reading someone's diary that often went off-tangent (like this review).   Is it Top 100 book worthy?  My opinion: no.  It was good at times, painful at others.  I took 2 months to trudge through it, all the while reading 5 other books just to keep me going.   I am glad I read it.  I won't do it again though.  Sorry, Mr. Thoroea
Jurgen: in a search for Beauty. James Branch Cabell was once the most celebrated figure of American literature. He was the favourite author of Mark Twain, and was also praised by other renowned writers, including Sinclair Lewis. This book, Jurgen, is among Cabell's very finest (all his work is fine), a book that was long closest to Cabell's heart, and the one that has the centre of his philosophy, the eternal search for Beauty, his one Ideal, as the main subject matter.Jurgen is the place to start. And after Jurgen, I would go back to Figures of Earth, of which happenings actually precede those of Jurgen, and then on to The Silver Stallion. Other great ones by Cabell: The King Was in His Counting House, Smirt, Smith, and Smire
One of the first enlightening books on China!. "China cannot thoroughly be understood from either a Western or a Chinese viewpoint. To grasp its nature requires an orbital, historical view of both the West and China," says Wei Wang, author of the best-selling business title The China Executive.Indeed, because of the same approach Will Hutton has adopted, The Writing on the Wall is one of the first truly enlightening books on China.Particularly admiring is the author's "ambition...[to] help tilt the balance towards international collaboration, contribute to a reappraisal of the so-called China threat and a recognition of the situation as an opportunity..." [China] requires our understanding and engagement - not our enmity and suspicion, which could culminate in self-defeatingly creating the very crisis we fear."Because of China's increasing impact on the world, anybody who cares about global peace and prosperity should read this book. And unlike many other books on China that are meant to terrify you, this book will enlighten you!
Very good. I enjoyed this book very much. It is well written and the author leverages real life examples which is refreshing. In my opinion this book gives you a very clear introduction to semantics and why they matter. I would recommed the book to technologists and business managers alike
Charming. I fell madly, totally, and completely in love with the heroine of Elinor Lipman's The Inn at Lake Devine.Natalie Marx is around twelve when the short novel opens, and her family has just received a politely worded rejection letter from the proprietor of the Inn at Lake Devine:  there are no rooms at the inn for people with Jewish names.  The first half of the book recounts Natalie's comic attempts to visit the inn, her real but limited success, and the interesting people she encounters along the way.The second half of the book concerns the twenty-five-year-old Natalie's re-introduction to the inn and her romance with the innkeepers' son.As always, Lipman's characters are quirky, yet true to life.  They respond to real life situations in real ways, yet Lipman's compassionate eye for the comic shines through.
Cats Are Funny People. It's always amazing what cats can(& do)get into.  You can almost see them think.  There's always something about them that is almost human. They can surely work their way into your heart.
Naked Once More. This book is one of E. Peter's very best, and I know, I have read every E. Peter's book including those under Barbara Michael's real name.  The book is a clever satire and mystery rolled into one.  There are many Peter's  books I would happily re-read, this one tops the list
Crime Writing at its Very Best. Peter Robinson grew up in Yorkshire, and is the author of thirteen previous novels featuring Inspector Banks. He is the winner of numerous awards in the United States, Britain and Canada, and in 2002 he won the CWA Dagger in the Library. As I also come from Leeds the background to his stories is something that I have experienced first hand and because of this I have a special affection for his books. However they would be first class crime fiction wherever they were based.Inspector Banks receives a phone call from his brother Roy in London, something of a novelty in itself. But the phone call is quite disturbing and has an air of mystery to it. Banks immediately leaves his patch in Yorkshire and heads off down to the big city to seek out Roy. Meanwhile DI Annie Cabbot is called to the scene of a murder on a quiet stretch of road just outside Eastvale. A young woman has been found dead in her car. The strange thing is that the victim has Banks's name and address  written on a piece of paper in the pocket of her jeans.Meanwhile Banks is staying in his brothers luxurious, but empty house, uncovering more and more details about a brother, that he never really knew and didn't particularly like. Up north Annie tracks down the female victim's friends and colleagues. It seems that both trails are looking likely to intersect at some point  and the consequences could be terrifying for both Banks and Annie . .
VERY difficult to put down once you start reading it!. WOW, this is one of the most gripping and moving accounts of personal combat and experiences in Vietnam that I have ever read.  I had great difficulty putting this gem down, as it is directly related in first-person and the author does a magnificent job of making you feel as if you're right there alongside the subject of the book (Franklin Miller).Nothing is held back, and if you've ever served in the military, you'll fall right into step with the narration.  Everything is presented in all its gory detail, so if you're a little squeamish, you might want to skim across a few sections.  The ending is particularly heart-wrenching, especially the afterword by the author's widow.I highly recommend this book to anyone interested in the up-close and personal views of combat in Vietnam
Among the Top 10 Spiritual Books of All Time. This is one of the best spiritual exercises in history, especially for teachers, students, theologians, missionaries, and anyone involved in teaching of any sort. Thomas' words provoke deep thoughtfulnes and concern in ones sprituality, and remind us to be vigilant in our service to the Truth
great learner. These books have simple illustrations, but they are more of a learning tool than stories.  They are great for 5-6yr olds beginning to read.  My daughter can read them faster that other beg. readers and that boosts her confidence and each set gets a little harder.  I love them.  I just wish there were more than 3 sets of these books
Yum!. Sandals,platforms,heels.A real feast of footwear is shown within the pages of this compact(but quite thick)book. Great fun to flip through and a great resource for research as well..
Essays about being absorbed by the written word. The Browser's Ecstasy: A Meditation On Reading by Geoffrey O'Brien is a simply fascinating selection of thoughtful and thought-provoking essays about being absorbed by the written word, as well as the wonder and the pleasure of being transported by and through books to times, places, and thoughts heretofore unknowable to the solitary reader. An inspirational and welcome reflection on the pastime that marked the dawn of recorded human history down to the present day and into the forseeable future, The Browser's Ecstasy is enthusiastically recommended reading for anyone who has ever had a book transport them through journeys of the mind into lives, places, people, and events far from their own native habitat
Grooming Service Coordinator for a major pet company. I have used this book for many many years and rely heavily upon it for all of our groomers.  The information is precise and the drawings are accurate.  Kohl and Goldstein's book should be in the hands of ANY groomer wanting to  advance their all-breed grooming skills.  It should NEVER be 4-6 weeks out  of print
Excellent!. This book is excellent, it hits all key points for the PHR Exam.  It would be very useful for someone that does not have a HR degree or it has been a while since you graduated from college.  Also, if you do have a HR degree and recently graduated from college, it is a great review tool.  Even though I have a Bachelors in Business Administration, and recently graduated, I learned new information about HR!  Plus, you cannot beat the price
A  fantastic book not to be missed. Gen Bell writes it and you feel like you are there with him during the events  he writes about. It is  similar to G.I. Basel's Pak Six ( another must read). I've also read both of Col Broughton's Books and they are also  "must reads" as well, but  100 Missions is a personal view of his experiences. I remembered  the name Ken Bell from hearing about a mission he flew together with Col Broughton  (and about ran of of fuel if I remember right), so knew that I had to buy this book. I am not quite done with the book  and could easily read it non-stop, but want to savor it  because it is that good. You get some interesting read ins to some of the personell  that were at  Takhli. I know I had an opinion of Col Scott ( not a positive one) and  it will be interesting to read more about  Maj Bell's  thoughts of him in the book.Though  a Major when  the book begins basically, he had no combat experience; wen to Nellis AFB  for the fighter weapons school and  then to SEA. His writing shows what goes on  in his mind, his fears and doubts about the future and also the excitement of seeing combat. He tells about his  mistakes and what he learns as he flys into RP6A and becomes  a real weapon for the U.S. Air Force.
I love it!. Wow! This was exactly what I was looking for. I read Eat To Live by Joel Fuhrman and was looking for a true vegen cookbook with recipes that you could like.It has things in there like vegetarian meat loaf, meatless chili, veggie burgers, lasagna, cheesless enchiladas, soups, rice flour muffins, pie, oat flour oatmeal cookies,  falafel, dressings, sauces, wheat-free bars, beans, stuffed peppers, potato salad, and even cookies... plus lots more.And no meat, dairy, eggs with very little (if any) sugar (uses fruit) or grains.There's a recipe planner where basically if you eat meals from this cookbook, you are going to lose weight and get some extreme nutrition all with familiar recipes.I've never eaten like this before so this is a first and I'm new at it. It's working for us, though and I can tell a big difference. Plus I eat until I'm full and have lost 15 pounds this first week (maybe some of that was water?).Anyway... I LOVE this cookbook and it's definately organized and the meals are easy to make - as long as you have a food processor. I wish they had a hard cover version.
Fantastic. This has to be something to add to your collection... if and only if you are truly an advanced player.  The average player needs to grow a bit before all of the gems in this book can be revealed.A new player should buy the book, put in on their shelf and plan to read it as part of the next set of books to read and ... and after they've picked up the subtleties of the game
Great intro to drawing. My kids (ages 7 and 5) have loved this book.  They have learned to follow the linear instructions and are so impressed with their ability to create.  We also purchased Ed Emberly's "Drawing Book of Animals".  Both are great for young learners
Gripping!. Readers feel the ever-looming presence of Fran Benedetto's abusive husband Bobby almost as much as she and her 10-year-old son Robert, as the duo flee toward a new life in Florida.Even though Fran and Robert have been given entirely new identities -- thanks to Patty Bancroft and a network of volunteers -- Fran feels that she is simply biding time until Bobby finds them. Although she and Robert slowly begin to make friends and become active in their new hometown, Fran cannot shake the horrific memories, the sorrow over lost opportunities, and the fear that someone will discover her biggest secret.And, true to real life, Fran must ultimately confront Bobby and her past head-on before the conclusion of this powerful book
A Must Read (or Listen). This book is a wonderful story for all ages. We like to take the audio version on car trips as it engages, and is appropriate for, all listeners
Like reading a soap opera from another era. This was a lightning-quick read; there is not much particularly challenging about this novel, but it was a lot of fun.  Maupin successfully evokes a very specific time and place (1970s San Francisco) and interweaves multiple storylines.  Some important social issues (homosexuality is a big one) are dealt with in a non-judgmental and entertaining way.Tales of the City features several characters who rent apartments at 28 Barbary Lane from one Anna Madrigal, a mysterious woman in her fifties who has a sketchy past.  Mary Ann Singleton fulfills the role of naive Midwestern newcomer who falls in love with SF while vacationing and decides to relocate, only to have significant trouble adjusting to the completely different social mores of her new home.  There are, of course, many other characters, each with their own storylines.  I am looking forward to reading the next installment of the series
Action, suspense, demons, witches and werewolves-it doesnt get better than this!. Rachel Morgan is a top contender in the tough-chick, detective/bounty hunter, preternatural thriller in an alternate universe genre.  Red-headed Rachel is an appealing hero, a witch who loves the thrill of danger and can kick monster butt.  Her loyal fellow business partners, the vampire Ivy and the pixy Jenks, are fascinating co-conspirators in Rachel's adventures.This third book of the series immediately starts the action with Rachel negotiating her familiar status with the demon Algaliarept, "Big Al", and in the process freeing the demon's current familiar, Ceri, adept in demon magic and a formidable new ally for Rachel in her struggle to avoid being dragged into slavery by Big Al.Rachel's understanding of vampires is growing along with her relationship with sexy, leather clad Kisten--who is there to console her when she is abandoned by former boyfriend Nick.  Rachel discovers more about Trent Kalamack's involvement with illegal medical research and inadvertently gets in the crossfire in a gang drug war.This series gets better and better.  Harrison has built a believable fantasy world where humans live side by side with supernatural characters.  Learning about the world of witches, vampires, werewolves and pixies is interesting and fun, juxtaposed with thrilling adventures. The tone of the book is humorous and lively.  Sexuality is primarily implied rather than explicit (a relief if you are traumatized by the torrid sexual antics of another character in this genre).It is best to start with the first book, Dead Witch Walking and go through the series in order--the relationships and the lore of the alternate universe build over each book and it is much more enjoyable to be in on it from the beginning
A great book!. Just a great book showing all of the choices women can make, why we sometimes make the wrong ones without realizing it, and to learn how to make better ones without sacrificing our dignity. The book gives great examples to learn from
Table of Contents. For those of you curious about which stories this book includes:The Feather Pillow, Sunstroke, The Pursued, The Decapitated Chicken, Drifting, A Slap in the Face, In the Middle of the Night, Juan Darien, The Dead Man, Anaconda, The Incense Tree Roof, & The Son
Sharpe's Fury. Excellent read.  It's been a long time coming waiting for the new book on the Battle of Barrosa.  Sharpe's Fury is definitely a book that anyone can enjoy and maybe spark an interest in a little known history that shaped the world
A must have for beginners. This is the one and only book I learned the tarot from many moons ago. This was in fact, the only book to learn from for many years. I imagine this classic in the hands of anyone beginning to go through the basic meanings of the standard Rider-Waite images. This is the basis of most other packs. The meanings can also be applied to the Marseille deck. I do not advise one to begin with this system, as the minors are not illustrated.The contents give an overview of the basic history up to the 1970s of the history of the cards. The astrology information was very helpful, numerology was ok. I have never been a big fan of numerolgy for I personally feel is to be too simplistic. As for the Quaballa, this goes right over my head and always will. Maybe someday I will take an interest in this. I would probably start with this book!Some of the information is a bit dated, but I am sure this perennial favorite will be relevant for many generations to come. If you plan on seriously studying the cards, I could not think of a better place to begin!
Engaging and readable. Schivelbusch's Tastes of Paradise provides a refreshingly light-hearted,  yet engaging glimpse at some of the substances which, through  our  stomachs, lungs, and palates, have played a not insignificant role in  personal and cultural interactions of European civilizations.   Concentrating primarily on western societies between the sixteenth and  nineteenth centuries, Schivelbusch devotes over 50 pages to each of the  subjects of coffee, tobacco, and alcohol; he also includes ample discussion  of the historical role of chocolate, spices, and nineteenth-century  opiates.  I read this book as part of a college-level World History class  (middle ages- present) and found it to be an enjoyable and worthwhile  complement to novels, primary sources, and textbook readings we studied.   Spread out in small doses over the course of the semester, it provided an  unusual vantage point from which major themes such as Industrialism,  Christianity, Romanticism, and social class structures could be more  readily understood.  Over 100 black-and-white reproductions of period art  enhance Schivelbusch's lively discussion of the material.  Without  suggesting that these substances played an unrealistically inflated role in  history, Schivelbusch offers a highly accessible discussion equally  suitable for the student or casual reader
A Mother for Choco. I think this is an excellent book for young children. I have a 21/2 year old little boy and this book is a great tool for introducing adoption.
The plot builds like a snowball rolling down a mountain. This books starts out with a rather run-of-the-mill premise - kidnapped boys from a separated couple.  Once the story gets past the "did the father kidnap his own children" cop phase, it picks up steam and I couldn't put it down.  I typically do not get excited about first person narratives, but in this case the technique is key in keeping the suspense going.  I couldn't put it down
Where are you tonight, Sweet Marie?. This was the first serious modern work on alchemy that I've read, and boy did I luck out! It is a work charged with authenticity and vision. von Franz gives you some historical background on the origins of alchemy, then introduces this 16th century alchemist, Gerhard Dorn, and his inner and outer struggle to illuminate and heal the schism between spiritual alchemy and Western Christianity. Dorn doesn't come to any happy conclusions, but the chapter on Medieval Magic is worth the entire read. It includes a serious attempt to examine the question of evil (oh thank you!)and the historical process of projecting the contents of the psyche onto some aspect of the body. Also an inspiring section on the "cloud" as symbol in alchemy and christian mysticism for the confusing and darkening part of a person's journey inward to her own core. Also, peppered throughout are juicy tidbits about things like necromancy, pyromancy, hydromancy and something Jung himself was into for a while called Geomancy--which she explains in a brief but fascinating aside. The book is developed from transcripts of a 1969 lecture she gave in Zurich at the Jung Institute. It reads like a lecture, with the rythmns and addendums of the spoken word mostly intact, but obviously translated. That's ok--it flows like pure gold and is a great window into this whole Zurich scene and the living body of work that von Franz and Jung together embodied. This little work is bound to inspire and fuel some aspect of your own imagination. Enjoy
As Much of a Writer's Manual as a Riveting Tale Told By a Master Story Teller. I am not sure how I should classify ON WRITING. It is part memoir, part guide or manual, and part autobiography. As a reader, this book entertained me. As a writer, this book empowered me.In a conversational tone, King gives lessons and encouragement to beginner writers and struggling writers in this book. But he manages to do so while telling his incredible story of hard work, disappointment, success, and his tragic and almost fatal accident. This is a book not only for aspiring writers like myself. It also a book that any King fan must read or anyone that appreciates a good story.
Rachel Ray. One must make allowences for the occasional sloppiness of Trollope's writing, given the serialized format and the incredible number of novels he wrote while working full-time for the post office. He always has something important to say and usually says it well. This novel is one of his shortest and one of his best. Like George Elliot and Charles Dickens, Trollope was dragged kicking and screaming into industrialized England in the 19th century. And, like them, he saw beneath the glitz and glamor of new-found wealth and the breakdown in social classes that followed the Reform movement in England. He seems at times to be overly preoccupied with the demise of the "lady" and the "gentleman," but this concern reveals a well-founded alarm over the vanishing of such Victorian values as "nobility" and "duty to others."  In this novel he expresses many of those concerns while targetting the Evangelicals, an attack that is right-on and timely indeed. He reveals the hypocrisy of so many of those who are filled with resentment and hatred of their fellow humans while professing to bask in the love of Christ.I would rate this novel, alongside The Warden, as first-rate and excellent ways to come to Anthony Trollope, who is, in my view, a vastly under-rated writer, despite his flaws
The Corvinus Clan. Here's an overview: Marcus is after Selene because in her past, a past she doesn't remember at first, is the location of a dungeon her father built. Inside is William, his brother, locked in a cage for over 600 years. Marcus is close to his bother and wants to free him (the brother was imprisoned by Viktor after a murderous rampage that was killing thousands of people and turning them in werewolves but without the ability to change back. William, himself, is always in Lycan form throughout the entire book and Marcus is usually always in his hybrid form, preferring that to the human mask he can wear.We are introduced to a group of people known as The Cleaners, they clean up the mess the Lycans and Vampires make. They are the people who blackmail or payoff witnesses to keep their mouth shut. They have documented the history of the vampires and the Lycans and the war between the two.Selene spends most of the book saving Michael until he dies by the hand of Marcus (violently as well), Selene discovers she loves him but it is too late. Meeting the cleaner's leader she is offered a chance to get revenge, because --although the leader had the opportunity-- he couldn't bring himself to kill Marcus.With the help of the Cleaner's elite crew, they fly to the dungeon to try and stop Marcus from releasing William on a world not ready to understand such a creature. In a body bag is Michael, Selene can't bare the thought of leaving him behind. He lies at her side and she transforms her love for him into hate aimed at Marcus. She knows she is going up against a force much stronger than her, even with the gift from the Cleaner's leader, fighting Marcus and possibly William is near suicide. Especially when she realizes that she is too late and the two brothers are united once again...and William has 600 years of hunger to sate.While this is happening something miraculous is happening to Michael. Dead cells are sparking to life and the genetic code is multiplying. Fractured ribs reknit themselves, ripped organs healed, a new heart blossomed and brain activity resumed.But this new Michael is stronger, smarter and the sub-hero of this book that he is meant to be. Still, things are not easy in their battle. William is strong and smart and damn fast, faster than Selene and Michael. All the Cleaners are killed by William and they turn into werewolves to fight and destroy our heroes.This book reads much like a movie, meaning that Greg Cox didn't add as much into the story as he did for book one. Book one is 400 pages, this is 275 with a larger font. Still, the book is a damn fine read as we wait for the movie to be released and it is a tight and entertaining read. The hours will zip by.This book needs to be on your shelf next to the first book, which is next to the first DVD.Sadly though, this book I feel will only be appreciated by the cult fans of the first book/movie. Of which, I am one
a thoroughly enjoyable treatment of a very complex subject. I heartily agree with the editorial reviews written above.Hundert is a very good writer. He has brought three crucial subjects of study together in a highly informative discussion that would benefit any worker in the mental health profession.What I found most enlightening was his focus on avoidable mistakes by professional practioners. The mistakes are easily corrected by basic philosophical analyses.While it may be understandable that the book has gone out of print (since professionals are rarely interested in having their mistakes pointed out to them), I hope this gifted writing keeps writing.
Erudite, informative, challenging, scholarly essays. Egypt vs. Greece And The American Academy: The Debate Over The Birth Of Civilization collaboratively edited by Molefi Asante (Professor of African American Studies, Temple University) and Ama Mazama (Associate Professor, Department of African American Studies, Temple University) is a selection of erudite, informative, challenging, scholarly essays by an eclectic variety of learned authors, each one of whom focuses on different aspects of the rise of human civilization, from how a genetic model compares to ancient African history to observations about Eurosupremacism in academia. A fascinating, involved, iconoclastic compendium, Egypt vs. Greece And The American Academy is very highly recommended reading for students of Black Studies, as well as a seminal and ground-breaking addition to academic reference collections for the study of ancient history and the developmental origins of Western Civilization
A Fantastic Book to Introduce Your Child to Art!. I can't tell you how wonderful this book is for me and my two-and-a-half year old daughter. It is such a delight to curl up in bed and turn the pages as she gleefully points out the item that starts with the letter A, B, C...and so on. We've only read it a handful of times, but she's already gotten each picture and letter memorized. It makes me so happy to be able to introduce her to fine art at such a young age and for her to find so much enjoyment from it. This is truly a gem of book for every parent & child's bookshelf
A Genuine Classic. "What can we say? A genuine classic now available with every footnote and factoid known to every woman and man.
Nice and Creepy. Forever Will You Suffer, a first novel by Gary Franks, plays out like a film, with strong and eerie visuals, some genuine shocks, and a lingering feeling of creepiness.  I strongly recommend it
Spicy Hot!. This is a gem from Dave Dewitt the King of ALL Peppers. He knows his stuff about all there is to know about chiles, from mild to the 'insanity' peppers! It goes into great detail about the history of peppers to how to grow them. The book's layout is in an A-Z easy to find guide. The index is very good as well so you can find what you're after. I have made a scrumptious HOT HOT beef curry from this book, just to give you something to make your mouth water. A good addition to your chile book collection or library
Great Perspective for Younger Children. A very simplistic but impacting look at maps from a me/mine perspective beginning with her room, house, street... all the way to world and then back to room.  The theme is "everyone has a special place in the world and this is how you'll find me"; using a map.  The illustrations of the map are very vague in terms of detail, but gives a great relative perspective of the area it comprises.  It will introduce the younger children and provide a more vivid explanation to the older ones.  I would recommend ages K-4th grades
Great for inspiring designers. This book is great for young inspiring designers to use as a learning tool and reference book. It shows how to make a grid system work and how to modify different styles of grids to a designers particular needs. The book is less in content and more focusing on showing images of the grid at work. This is a must have book and the price is well worth it
Awesome. This book is an awesome read, and I hope that I can convey how profitable and riveting a read the book is.  It is the story of God moving on behalf of one of His children, the author.  She is a Christian who suffered with acute and excruciating pain for seven years from a neurological disorder.  The pain was debilitating.  Somehow, with great courage, she resolved to get a hold of God and not turn Him loose until she received her healing.  It is an amazing and compelling journey that reaches its apex with her healing, a demonstration of God's great mercy.  It's a story of faith and support from a loving family even in the darkest and cruelest of hours.  If you have a physical or emotional problem, or perhaps both, this is a must read book for you.  If you are interested in how faith interacts and intersects with God's designs then I encourage you to read it at once.  This isn't abstract or esoteric writing; it is the language of where the rubber meets the pavement.  The book has a prophetic and didactic voice, and I can't recommend it enough.  I sincerely commend it and anticipate that God will use it to strengthen and bless the reader with His great mercy
Women's Timex Easy Reader Watch - Black Review. Women's Timex Easy Reader Watch - Black Revie
Murky goings on. Private eye Philip Marlowe is hired by the rich Mrs Elizabeth Bright Murdock to find a rare gold coin, the Brasher Dubloon, which is missing from her late husband's collection. Mrs Murdock suspects the thief to be her daughter-in-law Linda. However, this being a Chandler story, things are a lot more involved than that, and Marlowe has to figure his way through some intricate and unforeseen twists and turns, including a series of murders.I suppose you could criticise this novel as a formulaic Chandler piece: the rich get into trouble; they and their children are unstable, burdened or cursed by their wealth; murders occur; connections between the characters are discovered and become more complicated; the resolution at the end is swift. Nonetheless, you know what you are getting and it's enjoyable stuff for all that: the dialogue is as good as ever and the period feel is of course authentic. Good fun.G Rodgers
America IS Beautiful. America is by far the best portrayal of a young person trapped in society's system of foster care that I have ever seen.  The book may be too real for some, but not if you are a realist.America's battle to understand who he is in this world is an exhiliratingly sad ride that alerts readers to a child welfare system that is overworked and understaffed.  America actually gets "lost" in the system, which is symbolic of the thousands of American children who are ignored and "lost" everyday in our country's protection services.America reminds us that our children need more than just parents to raise and watch out for them.  Our children need other adults, teachers, coaches, counselors, neighbors and general role models to look out for our youth and set a positive example for them.All of those commercials that ask for communities to take a second to get to know their youth are not for those of us who already do that.  Even if you chose not to have kids, our country was not built on the attitude of "It's not my responsibility."I love America symbolically, literally and on so many levels I can't even put it into words.America is beautiful.  If this book doesn't touch your emotions, then you are not human.  This book is raw, real and heartbreakingly intriguing.Thank you E.R. Frank for an expertly written Young Adult novel.
-Very- highly recommended. Representations and characters of finite groups are a classical subject, with substantial developments well underway a century ago.  As a result there has been gradual refinement and polishing of the field. The beauty of this subject is shown well in this book.  The style is clear and order of exposition excellent.  Moreover, the authors write with great patience, both in respect to presenting calculations in detail and in providing the steps to proofs.  This is not to say the book is easy, but rather that the distance from step to step is very well suited for advanced undergraduates and beginning graduate students.The book is highly mathematical in its outlook, except for the final chapter, which deals with normal modes of vibration of a molecule.  There are some real gems.  In a certain finite group, is it possible to find an element of order two and one of order four whose product has order three?  The answer may be found in the chapter, &quot;An Application to Group Theory.&quot;  The presentation of the Frobenius Reciprocity Theorem is a exceptional delight.  As for prerequisites, a good grounding in general group theory at an undergraduate level and a reasonably good acquaintance with rings and modules should suffice
Not Just for for Stated Purposes. I would have given it 4 stars for somewhat condensed writing style (almost abstract-like) had it not been for the nearly universal applicability of the book's ideas to many other areas besides weight loss and excercise: business, career, relationships, housekeeping, etc
Unintentionally Classic. It's a terrible book. The characters are uninteresting, the motivations are obscure, the machinery is obvious, the sex is strange and unerotic, the writing is terrible. But in spite of everything, Naked Came The Stranger is a hoot. There's nothing you can point at and say, "This redeems", but the book is so weirdly enjoyable that it really doesn't matter. Read it in autumn, hide it from your friends, finish it in an afternoon. One of my all-time favorites
If you liked McCullough's &quot;Truman...&quot;. McCullough's &quot;Truman&quot; taught many of us about the beginnings of the cold war and the nuclear age. If this book isn't as &quot;entertaining&quot; as McCullough's book about Harry Truman (not many writers are as entertaining as David McCullough) it is certainly a &quot;must read&quot; if you want to fully grasp what Harry Truman's presidency was all about, the gravity of the problems it faced, and how cold war policies came into being. Also the &quot;creation&quot; of NATO - a subject quite relevant nowadays. Acheson was indeed a marvelous writer, and this work offers tremendous insight into what went on &quot;at the creation&quot; of Cold War politics. Acheson was a brilliant individual (Truman certainly recognized the combination of political talent and genuine humanity when he saw it). Acheson withstood a lot absolute trash thrown at him by McCarthy and his cohorts, ironically so, since it was Truman's original policies that opened the door to that sort of thing. But survive it all he did, (and so did we) and as a result posterity has lots of good things to say about this wonderfully creative and far-sighted patriot. This book fills in many of the details that &quot;Truman&quot; simply didn't have room for, a biography written by a man we learned far to little about in school and college
Wonderful and Reflective in so many ways!. First I must say that I had seen this book and even picked it up several times in the store, only to put it back down. I don't know, I think it was the cover that made me question it's appeal. However, I finally said, what the heck...I have nothing to loose, I can always put it down. Well, you can imagine my surprise when I found myself flipping page after page, and transporting myself to a small part of the world, Natchez MS. I had never heard of the author Greg Iles and this was my first introduction to his work. I really enjoyed it. The opening pages draw you into a story that promises more.The story was simple, and although there were startling revelations, it was not hard to follow. Penn Cage, attorney/novelist/widow returned to his hometown following a sensational trial and victory, to raise his daugher in a small town wholesome environment. Penn sits on the school board of his old school with his good friend/doctor/Golden Boy Drew Elliott. There is even mention of Drew saving Penn's life when they were young, and they have been friends ever since. From all appearances, Drew and Penn have it all. They are wonderfully successful, have great reputations, wonderful children and are the movers and shakers in the town.  They have it all...one would think until one event spins both of their lives out of control,,,the rape/murder of a "pregnant" Kate Townsend. Kate is the beautiful, valedictorian who was scheduled to attend Harvard. From her death, we learn that Drew has done the unthinkable, he has been carrying on an affair with his 17 year old babysitter, Kate, who he intended to leave Natchez and be with until her untimely demise. He, he confides is trapped in a marriage with a woman who is addicted to painkillers, and the only thing keeping them together is his son. Through a series of twists and turns, the readers finds Drew and Penn facing armed blackmailers, and fighting for their lives (Penn's from a crazed drug dealer and Drew, who is tried for capital murder, where the sentence could be death).There are a host of complicated characters: Mia Burke (Penn's babysitter who he finds himself attracted to but not willing to cross the line. She is also the amateur sleuth who helps him eventually unravel the case. She is also Kate's rival,in love and school.); Sunny (a bitter, racist cop, whose own ambitions will eventually be his downfall); Shad Johnson (the Black District Attorney who has political ambitions to be Mayor); Cyrus (ex-military/drug dealer/obsessed with Kate); Marco (a drug dealer/war refuge who sees life through the terrifying eyes of a child who saw and experienced too much); Kaitlin (Penn's girlfriend who doesn't like small town living) and several others.There were some parts in the story that I would have liked to know more about, but overall, this novel had everything for a successful story.  Natchez, although it appears small and quiet (25,000 residents and dropping) is a hot-bed of secrets and desires. You eventually learn that there are sexual exploits (among teens and adults), forbidden love triangles, drugs, racial tension, blackmail plots,and death. Everything is not what it seems.I really enjoyed this novel, and know that you will too.
Delia - Oh why do you stay in England?. Delia, oh Delia. The woman who taught me how to make toast!  (I was actually making it wrong all these years...) Delia is one of those  television personalities who you really would like to have as a friend. Her  books are extremely personable and can literally be read aloud - gives you  that &quot;Delia is in the house&quot; feeling. The Summer and Winter  Collections are Superb books. Also check out How to Cook One and Two.  Excellent. Now, where can I buy the How to Cook video collection
pretty good- but definitely five. For those who love cult movies or people just looking for the tip of the iceberg on good cult movies, i highly recommend this book. Though, the book has over fifty movies given with small &quot;60&quot; seconds synposizes and information reguarding directors, plot, actors or people's reactions, such as critiques, of the movies. Since around fifty movies are picked, obviously many movies are left out, especially good ones such as (in my opinion)Hedwig and the Angry Inch or Velvet Goldmine. THe author has said that he will maybe make a second volume if he recieves enough emails about the readers favorite cult films (his emial is in the book.) THe book features movies such as Fight Club, AKira, Reservoir Dogs, Dr. Strangeglove or: How I learned to stop worrying and love the bomb, Rocky Horror Picture Show, Withdrawl and I, SKidoo, Carnival of Souls, Freaks, Faster Pussycat Kill Kill,Harold and Maude- ect and this book also addresses whether a cult film can be a blockbuster as well. good book n_
Hard to put down. This was a very easy and fun read and hard to put down.  The ending was a bit sappy, but the book was such a page-turner that the sap is forgivable. I found myself so engrossed with this book that there were a few nights I stayed up a little later than usual because I got so caught up in the story. I hope Hollywood decides to make this one into a movie.  Funny, adventurous, and compelling
OINK!. Good stuff...a real good time for a music student...
Well Written. This book is incredibly well written and easy to understand, even for those with no background in development issues or economics.  Sachs is to be commended for delivering economics in the everyday prose of the average citizen, and bringing these issues into the forefront of contemporary politics
A great guide on what really means &quot;best-practice&quot;. I think the main advantage of this book is providing a clear and easy way to approach what best-practice really means, specially when here, in Europe, we usually make very complex model from  everything. A useful reading for consultants which in our continent are creating a very confusing best-practice consulting tools. The best: the idea of customer-center best-practices (better than all this re-engineering radical tools that fail most of times)
A book for Cultivation of Sexual Energy and Much More. Erick Yudelove has been a student of Mantak Chia.  He has put together a manual for practice that encompasses the information that could be found in Mantak Chia's books, but is further enhanced, clarified and perhaps simplified by Yudelove's own discoveries.The book covers some basic practices from Taoist Alchemy such as Six Healing Sounds, Microcosmic Orbit, Inner Smile and some forms of breathing before proceeding with sexual practices.  The book also includes the practices related to the Fusion of the Five Elements, Bone Marrow and Standing Chi Kung
Must Have!. If you like pasta this book is a must have. I am Italian, and learned to cook because I appreciate good food, and I like to eat! Eating is essential to life, why not eat the best foods, you only live once! I learned from watching my mother and grandmother cook and I can tell you the recipes in this book are the real thing; after all my mother bought this book for me. In my opinion(and my mother's) Marcella Hazan wrote the bible of Italian cookbooks with &quot;Essentials of Italian Cooking&quot;(also a must have), and this book is written by her son, so it is natural that the apple doesn't fall far from the tree.  I have used this book countless times over the years, it is my reference for any pasta dish.  It is easy to understand and follow, and after a while you will realize all these dishes are easy to prepare. Great illustrations on how to make fresh pasta and excellent sauce suggestions for different types of pastas. Lots of pictures so it makes it easy to understand what the dish is meant to look like, and what the ingredients should look like...I may have had a head start being of the Italian culture, but this book should make it easy for anyone to understand. Italian cooking is not centered around spaghetti and stewed tomatoes over tons of burned garlic, Italian cooking is colorful, diverse and subtle. This book will give you some insight into true Italian pastas, and the importance of fresh ingredients. Buy it, read it and eat in good health Per Cent' Ani
Excellent white or black. I really liked the book.  It was informative where the others where not.  I just don't understand why it is focused on black women.  Everything I read applies to any expected mother
I like this writer!. I enjoyed this book a lot.  I liked the characters and loved the ending.  I think you'll agree.  Give it a try
Spiked. I read very few non-fiction books, and most of them are histories.  I DO read journalism every day.  But this is a first in that I've just finished reading and am now reviewing an entire BOOK comprised solely of journalism---ahem, it was a Christmas gift.And, so, what do I think about this book about killed (or "spiked" seems to be the operative word in Journalese, at least in this book) pieces of journalism?  I feel grateful to the gods, or Fate, or genes or whatever powers that may be or may not be that I never felt compelled to go into journalism.  Even Joe Conason, whose blurb for the book tops the front cover, says in his review for Salon that the overall effect of the book is one of depression.  True, literary endeavours, with which I'm more familiar, can be just as cruel and cutthroat when it comes to publication, but this is to be expected.  In the arts, it's either feast or famine - Mostly famine- One ends up working for the sake of art itself.  If it ends up finding grace with some publisher or agent, it's a nice lagniappe.  If not, not.  But journalists are in it to have their work published, posthaste. It's not so much that these pieces were killed that irks one (although, of course, that plays a part), it's the red-in-tooth-and-claw nature of the day in and day out life of a journalist that I found monumentally depressing.Well, a few comments and I'm done:  The most robust article (unsurprisingly) is P.J. O'Rourke's "A Ramble Through Lebanon,"  written in O'Rourke's uncanny, inimitable style combining erudition with a keen eye and ear for the absurdities of life.  The "spike" was made by Tina Brown, who ends up being the "killer" of many of these pieces, who simply wrote, "You can't make fun of people dying."  What a blockhead!  It's clear that Ms. Tina Brown has no sense of nuance or irony or she would have seen that this is exactly NOT what O'Rourke is doing here.  I consider myself lucky that I had never even heard of her before reading this book.Award for eccentricity:  Tad Friend's article "Jesus Worms" on an engaging few days spent with eccentric (and histrionic) Brit travel writer Redmond O'Hanlon.  I've read O'Hanlon's works and fancy them, regardless of the obvious fact that you have to take them with more than a few pinches of salt.  He belongs to that "Dr. Livingston I presume" tradition of intrepid, eccentric Brits losing themselves in various hearts of darkness to cheerfully emerge and write memoirs that encourage people like Noel Coward to write pieces like "Mad dogs and Englishmen".-The only thoroughly enjoyable piece of the lot.Finally easily the finest piece of reportage here, splendidly well-written and well-documented, is John Entine's "The Stranger-Than-Truth Story of The Body Shop." This piece clearly deserves some sort of award.  I'm so out of touch with this whole journalistic enterprise that I don't know what sorts of awards are bestowed on pieces like this one.  But whatever they are, this piece is worth the entire book.  I'd never heard of The Body Shop either. But I have no compunction now in saying that some public-spirited citizen should have taken an acetylene torch to these stores long ago.  - To restate, this superb writing and investigation all for nought make it also one of the most depressing stories of the bunch.That's it.  The book was well worth the read.  But I'm plunging back into literary fiction tomorrow.
Music 101. Very informative but not overwhelming. Easy to read - follow and understand - color photos and solid build.
Hard SF Is Not Entirely Dead. If, like me, you lament the state of science fiction today, and if, like me, you long to read stories that will transport you back to the days of the masters of "hard" science fiction--writers like Arthur C. Clarke, Robert A. Heinlein, Hal Clement and Malcolm Jameson--then this thick volume could be just what you're looking for.In general, I find today's science fiction unreadable. Every once in a while, out of desperation, sheer boredom or an attack of unwarranted optimism, I pick up a new-release SF paperback, or check one out from the library. I am invariably disappointed. Some current SF books I can't even finish, whereas I continue to read the old ones over and over. I can't recall ANY memorable SF books written within the last 20 years. In my humble opinion, there are very few recent books that even begin to compare to the "hard" SF classics like "Space Cadet," "The Deep Range," "Mission of Gravity" or "Bullard of the Space Patrol," to name just a few."The Hard SF Renaissance," however, gives me some hope that all is not lost. If you're a fan of "hard" SF, the stories in this book should appeal to you. While I don't agree that they collectively presage a "renaissance" of the "hard" SF style, they are nonetheless all quite good and live up to their billing. I commend this volume to you if you want to read good, "hard" SF without having to pull out an old, dog-eared, brittle 1950s classic from your collection.
A Must Have for All Parents!. This may be the most sensible, wise, clear and reader friendly book about parenting adolescents that I have read.  Clearly the author not only cares about kids, but also knows how to help parents get untangled from the conflict and confusion of trying to understand and guide today's teens.  Written with genuineness and humor, I can't imagine any parent not finding themselves between the pages, laughing and learning and coming out with more clarity and a saner family life! I work in a school district and we have included multiple copies for our parent resource library -- an invaluable addition
Very Well Done. An in depth look into the Franchise run US of the future.  Going into great detail of a possible future of a world run by corporations instead of governments.  Following the Hacker Hiro Protagonist through his dealings with the mob, and a viral church.  Very well done, a great read with plenty of action.  Where everythign leads to something more.  I highly recomend this book to anyone with an open mind on the future.  Or just looking for a realistic near future sci-fi
The Hunchback of Notre Dame. All said about classics, this was one of the best classics ever written. It fills you with emotion, an extremely thought provoking book that talks of love and unloved, loyalty and betrayal, gratitude and unrelenting coldness. Reading this book is like going back in time to the 15th century, we can see  masquerades roaming the streets of France. A lonely bell ringer with a hunched back ringing bells, longing to see his beloved girl. The archdeacon, who, by nature may not be evil, But the endless temptation made him an absolute devil. An absurd love triangle that was almost funny, and yet resulted only in tragedy. A gypsy prostitute filled with remorse and anger, and yet..... yet everything turned to nothing......The famous Quisimodo is probably the ultimate symbol of an ugly face with a kind heart. He is one of the bravest protagonists I've ever encountered. He has a heart of gold. And yet he received nothing, that, was Hugo's tragedy at his best.Besides an extremely well-written book, the main thing about this book is that it's heart wrenching and thought provoking. One of the best tragedies ever written, if you like to shed some tears while reading, then this is the right book for you
A must read for every project member. Although I have been working as a software engineer since 1995, I never dared to become a project manager.Before reading this book I could not figure out what a good management is all about. Many projects dohave a project manager, but they do not have something which deserves to be called project management.Many engineers complain about their project management, they know that it is bad, but they don't know howto make it right. Unlike technical stuff, which you can learn on the job, it is not possible to learn softwareproject management on the job.Very often, the most senior, the most confident or the most arrogant employee is chosen to become the manager.This approach very often fails, and a lot of money is wasted just by chosing the wrong manager.In the last few years I got tired by all the fuss about management. There are so many people talking aboutproject management and that it is important to make it right. All these people complain all the time but theyare not able to distinguish between good and bad project management.I decided to buy this book, because I wanted to know how to make it right. Since this book is written by anexperienced program manager from Microsoft, I assumed that it should contain all the wisdom which I have been longing for so long. And this book didn't disappoint me.The "Art of Project Management" covers areas as diverse as schedules, estimations, specifications, relationshipsand priorities. You find answers for every aspect of a project.The content concentrates on project management rather thanon the project manager.But the most important point above all: Everything you do, should result in a benefit for the customer.This book is a good reading for everyone working in a project. Ordinary members - like me - learn how to help the manager to make the project succeed.
Insights into the Early History of Space Flight. For those familiar with the history of manned space flight, most of the information in this book is familiar. But there are also some "what if" alternatives mentioned. For instance, Shepard wanted a 3-day Mercury flight in 1963 following the flight of Cooper's Faith 7. This never came to pass. Considering how far the US was behind the USSR in man hours of space flight, this would have been a good idea.
Delightful from beginning to end. As a parent, this may very well be my favorite bedtime story.  Don't judge the book based on the TV show-- it is much better!  Max and Ruby are making birthday cakes for Grandma.  Max is making an earthworm cake but Ruby wants to make an angel surprise cake with rasbery fluff frosting.  Despite Ruby's increasingly restrictive instructions, Max keeps knocking her ingredients off the table, and Ruby keeps sending him to the store with a shopping list for replacements.  Max wants red hot marshmellow squirters to top off his cake, and his attempts to communicate this to the grocer make up the heart of the story.The illustrations are delightful and are cleverly incorporated as part of the story.  My 3 year old loves this book, and believe it or not he gets tired of it before I do
Phenominal book!!!. This book should be required reading for anyone who wants to be married or desires to be a mature and loving man or woman.  It is tender while remaining straightforward amd informative.  The author answers much asked and not often answered questions in a loving way.  I counsel young people and recommend this book to them.  This is a timeless classic
A Lesson for Children and Adults Alike. I see plenty of people complaining about the CD, but you are living in your generation by saying it is not as good. I have ONLY heard the new version and the children in my class LOVE IT. They will one day remember this song with the same nostalgia as you do about the old one! Please don't give a wonderful multicultural book about unity a lower rating than it deserves because of this.Also, regarding the person who refuses to read it to her kids because of the homosexual references: the purpose of this book is to educate children to be tolerant of these facts! If you "protect" your children from such facts you only add to the ignorance that later becomes non-tolerance
best intro to vulnerability discovery. This book is designed as a beyond Hacking Exposed type book.  It certainly lives up to that by concentrating on more fundamental knowledge.  Among it's strong points, this book is the most solid introduction to vulnerability discovery techniques I have seen.  Another point to this books credit is that I was unable to find any errors in the examples I ran (about half)The authors start out with a 4 chapters that discuss things like... what pen-testing is, ethics, legal issues.  Some of the more useful discussions in this section include legal issues, and reporting vulnerabilities to vendors.  Some of the less useful discussions include the difference between gray, white, and black hats.  Omitted was discussion the true old schoool meaning of 'hacker.'   The first 4 chapters rate three stars.Chapters 5 and 6 discuss some cool tools including: p0f, amap, ettercap, xprobe2, metasploit, CANVAS, and IMACT.  Enough information is included to get you going on each one.  Also the underlying principles are discussed.  Good chapters.   Chapters 5 and 6 rate four stars.Chapters 7 through 11 discuss: Programming, Linux Exploits, Shell Code, and Windows Exploits.  The "Programming Survival Skills" chapter is a little light, but that can only be expected.  These chapters are very well done, and this is the best section of the book.  The explanations are very clear and concise.  I tried many of the examples in these chapters, and they worked flawlessly.  The authors attention to detail will make these chapters very valuable to those learning vulnerability research and discovery.  The material here provides a solid foundation.   Chapters 7 through 11 rate a strong five stars.Chapters 12 through 15 discuss reverse engineering, writing exploits, and patching the holes.  Tools discuss include valgrind, sharefuzz, SPIKE, IDA Pro, RATS, its4, debuggers, and more.  This is a nice introduction to reverse engineering.  It's enough to get you going, but it's not quite as deep as many will probably want.  The discussions here are well done.   Chapters 12 through 15 rate a weak five stars.Overall, I rated this book a strong four stars.  I would have loved to give it five stars if the first few chapters were better.  I wouldn't mind seeing them removed and replaced with expanded technical content in any future editions.  Based on the strengh of the remainder of this book, it's hard to imagine a better introduction to advanced vulnerability discovery techniques.  I wish I had this a few years ago
Best read in years!. I didn't bargain on getting a complete understanding of quantum physics from a great work of fiction, but that is what I got.  You can be in two places at once. This work of art is the most enjoyable book I have read in years.  Rollins is to be commended for outstanding writing, research, plot development and overall hyper-speed fun
not a picture book. A nice introduction (and more) to native plants of the Pacific Northwest. My only criticism about it is that it doesn't have great photos. I bought this book to give me an intro to plants in that area, as I'm designing a garden for a friend. This book doesn't give much sense of what the plants look like in a garden. I'll have to go there. It's comparable to Judith Phillip's book Southwestern Landscaping with Native Plants (for, obviously, a different part of the country)
Good textbook. We were required to buy this textbook for our Engineering Economics class at UT-Austin. I found this book helpful as an introduction to business. It gave us quite a number of examples and review questions  to help us understand the major concepts. Even though the book may have contained a little too much information, I really liked it since I learnt a lot from it
Cooking Up a Storm: The Teen Survival Cookbook. Sam Stern uses an appealing approach to cooking for teens.  I appreciate the fact that he chooses healthy menus and manageable recipes for the events in the teen's life.  He makes it possible for the teen to have fun in the kitchen and serve delicious food for him/herself and friends as the result
Good principal, disappointed in tone and tangibles... I thought the principal behind the book was something that will help virtually every married couple.  My husband and I laughed at sections b/c we found some of the anecdotes so spot on to our daily lives.  Eggerichs clearly explained to us why we keep going through the "Crazy Cycle."  The Respect/Love needs in men/women is potentially a marriage saver or breaker.I have 2 constructive criticisms of the book.  I still recommend this book, however I do give these caveats:1.  This book talks as if men know how to love their wives.  There may be a million books out there on how to do it, but we didn't have those.  My husband and I were reading this one.  And I grew weary of hearing how women needed to learn to respect their husbands.  Frankly, I grasped the principal within the first few pages.  After a few chapters, I felt like rolling my eyes a little.  Because he paid so little attention to talking about how men should love their wives, it felt like that part was very trivialized.  I understand that was not the point, however, the title was "Love & Respect", not just "Respect."2.  I would have liked more tangible examples of exactly what it means to "Respect" my husband.  I want to do it.  And he made it clear that "nagging, complaining, and whining" at him were disrespectful.  But I need more examples.  What are the active things I can do?  Is it disrespectful to remind my husband to take the garbage out the night before?  If it is, then how do I make sure the task gets done w/out reminding him?  It isn't an issue of control, but I have to get the kids out the door in the morning and I need help and I need him to do this one thing.  Make sense?  I need to know how to have those discussions w/out disrespecing him.I hestitate to use this as a small group book b/c it is so one-sided.  And it tends to repeat itself.  Again, I got the principal pretty quickly.  And as good as it is, after a while, enough is enough.  Another reviewer said it felt a bit like a brochure for the conference.  That is exactly how I felt.A good book?  Yes.  A helpful principle?  Absolutely.  A must-read?  Maybe.  But definitely helpful to a Christian marriage and therefore, I do and would recommend it
A weekend gardener in Boca Raton. What a great book!  My garden looks great thanks to this excellent book with easy and practical ideas.  I took this book to Home Depot and Target.  My garden looks amazing and is LOW MAINTANCE.  Many many thanks to Pamela Crawford for this outstanding book.  She gives a few suggestions for indoor plants, but I hope an indoor plant book is her next project.
Thorough, deep and enjoyable, but a little anthropocentric. I enjoyed reading this book very much and would recommend it. The discussion was deep and enthralling. Many issues were explored but some important ones weren't explored quite deeply enough - I wonder why. Although it seems to try not to be, I found this work to be too anthropocentric, which the very last paragraph illustrates clearly. At the end of the day, I don't think it's all about us
stunning. This is, quite simply, a gorgeous book. Filled with amazing photos by Stephen Johnson, it provides a wealth of information for photographers of any ability.The book starts with a history of digital photography from the early days to present day. His chapters on Photoshop are second to none, with lots of clear explanations and photos which show exactly what he means. Where other photography manuals fall down by being too technical, or expecting too much background knowledge, Stephen's book actually shows you what the effect of changing this, or tweaking that will do.  As a Photoshop manual, it is worth the cover price alone. Coupled with the background to digital photography, it's an absolute bargain.A must for photographers, professional and amateur
ENJOYED THIS THIRD OF THE SERIES AS MUCH AS THE FIRST. The story of Anne continues with this work and the author stays true to her style, story line and character developement.  This, like the other books in this series, have a rather timeless nature about them and a comforting charm.  The reader, of course, must remember the time they were written and the style and syntax used at that time.  From my own point of view, this is great.  I enjoy this type of writing and certainly enjoy Ms. Montgomery's story telling abilities.  In this work, Anne goes off to Redman College and her adventure continues.  Recommend these books for readers of all ages.  Wish there were more works out there like it.
ideas on negative painting. this book has lots of new ways to use negative painting skills and helps you produce a different style of work.this is very exciting and encourages even the inexperienced painter with exercises to practise.the only downside is the large amount of space given to very basic and boring instruction on composition and page design
Hilarious!. Non-stop laughs! I couldn't put it down.  I laughed so hard, my face hurt!  Funnier than The Dilbert Principle
I loved it!. What a brilliant, brilliant book.  I think it was the perfect length.  Any longer and it might have gotten monotonous, and we simply cannot have THAT.  Oh, this book was delicious.  I ADORE all sorts of modern mythology, and we all know that Gaiman is the undisputed MASTER of that particular genre.  Harlequin Valentine is a precious little romance with a vicious little twist at the end.  So, sit down with a plate of hash browns and some ketchup, and enjoy
An Innovative Alphabet Book. Although a big fan of Lisa Campbell Ernst's previous books, this book sets a new standard for excellence in children's books. The innovative style she presents in this alphabet book is intriguing for both children and adults.  While reading this book aloud to young neighbors, they soon learned the fun of using their imagination to determine what each letter might be if turned on its side or upside down.  This book is a delight for all ages.
triumph motorcle restoration hints and tips by an expert. not just another feeble attempt at a restoration guide. this book is the  definitive work.  provided tremendous assistance to me in my mechanical strugles with a basket case bonneville restoration. still have to get your hands greasy
Captivating, Unforgettable. I watched the movie three years ago and still come vividly tomy mind, so I decided to buy the book and it was much better than the movie.  This book really moved me and left me to tears I found myself reading it until 2 o'clock in the morning, could not put the book down and hoping at the end that Ishmael and Hatsue can get back together.  This is the best book I have ever read.  Thanks to the author - a masterpiece, well written and hypnotizing.  I would really like to meet him and I am also planning a trip to Canada and US to see the place where the movie was filmed.
A foundation stone for modern philosophy. Immanuel Kant (1724-1804) is considered one of the giants of philosophy, of his age or any other. It is largely this book that provides the foundation of this assessment. Whether one loves Kant or hates him (philosophically, that is), one cannot really ignore him; even when one isn't directly dealing with Kantian ideas, chances are great that Kant is made an impact.Kant was a professor of philosophy in the German city of Konigsberg, where he spent his entire life and career. Kant had a very organised and clockwork life - his habits were so regular that it was considered that the people of Konigsberg could set their clocks by his walks. The same regularity was part of his publication history, until 1770, when Kant had a ten-year hiatus in publishing. This was largely because he was working on this book, the 'Critique of Pure Reason'.Kant as a professor of philosophy was familiar with the Rationalists, such as Descartes, who founded the Enlightenment and in many ways started the phenomenon of modern philosophy. He was also familiar with the Empiricist school (John Locke and David Hume are perhaps the best known names in this), which challenged the rationalist framework. Between Leibniz' monads and Hume's development of Empiricism to its logical (and self-destructive) conclusion, coupled with the Romantic ideals typified by Rousseau, the philosophical edifice of the Enlightenment seemed about to topple.Kant rode to the rescue, so to speak. He developed an idea that was a synthesis of Empirical and Rationalist ideas. He developed the idea of a priori knowledge (that coming from pure reasoning) and a posterior knowledge (that coming from experience) and put them together into synthetic a priori statements as being possible. Knowledge, for Kant, comes from a synthesis of pure reason concepts and experience. Pure thought and sense experience were intertwined. However, there were definite limits to knowledge. Appearance/phenomenon was different from Reality/noumena - Kant held that the unknowable was the 'ding-an-sich', roughly translated as the 'thing-in-itself', for we can only know the appearance and categorial aspects of things.Kant was involved heavily in scientific method, including logic and mathematical methods, to try to describe the various aspects of his development. This is part of what makes Kant difficult reading for even the most dedicated of philosophy students and readers. He spends a lot of pages on logical reasoning, including what makes for fallacious and faulty reasoning. He also does a good deal of development on the ideas of God, the soul, and the universe as a whole as being essentially beyond the realm of this new science of metaphysics - these are not things that can be known in terms of the spatiotemporal realm, and thus proofs and constructs about them in reason are bound to fail.Kant does go on to attempt to prove the existence of God and the soul (and other things) from moral grounds, but that these cannot be proved in the scientific methodology of his metaphysics and logic. This book presents Kant's epistemology and a new concept of metaphysics that involves transcendental knowledge, a new category of concepts that aims to prove one proposition as the necessary presupposition of another. This becomes the difficulty for later philosophers, but it does become a matter that needs to be addressed by them.As Kant writes at the end of the text, 'The critical path alone is still open. If the reader has had the courtesy and patience to accompany me along this path, he may now judge for himself whether, if he cares to lend his aid in making this path into a high-road, it may not be possible to achieve before the end of the present century what many centuries have not been able to accomplish; namely, to secure for human reason complete satisfacton in regard to that with which it has all along so eagerly occupied itself, though hitherto in vain.' This is heavy reading, but worthwhile for those who will make the journey with Kant.
A tragedy of manners. The book tells the sad tale of Lily Bart living in New York at the end of the 19th century. Her fate appears so real, merciless and inevitable because Edith Wharton's family history was acquired with the great names of the old New York society. The author manages to create a protagonist who at twenty-nine is already past the age of marriage which would be her only chance to secure a safe and comfortable future. But her character is complex and contradictory and the causes for her destruction lie within her own psyche. That is why she manages to cut herself at every turn by a combination of lack of judgement, lack of care and a great deal of arrogance towards the men who show interest in her. And so her decline, misstep after misstep, appears both gradual and inevitable.The author remarkably shows the social claustrophobia under which Lily Bart suffers. She evolves in an airless world of tight corsets, heavy draperies and closed rooms where she attempts to gasp for fresh air but fails and suffocates. She doesn't acknowledge that a woman of her class and situation can only support herself through an advantageous marriage. Edith Wharton clearly both disapproves of the wealth of the very rich and portrays them as inevitable. Because such people are invincible, Lily Bart is the agent of her own decline since she refuses to bargain with them in order to triumph. In this sense she is finally a victim because she cannot resolve the conflict between her ideals and her comfort or between what she aspires to be and what society insists she becomes
This truly did save my sanity and our relationship!. Oh boy...Was I a mess after I found out about the affair.  I couldn't stop obsessing about it and the anger stayed at the boiling point at our house.  He was too immersed in shame to reach out and help.  We wanted to save our relationship but weren't sure how.  We couldn't manage a civil conversation about anything and I wanted to know every detail.  I happened across a magazine article about cheating that suggested this book.  I went straight home, ordered it, paid for overnight shipping, and started reading as soon as it arrived.  It definitely helped me regain my sanity and helped us talk in a constuctive way so the healing could start.  He wouldn't read the book but I shared the advice it gave and we both followed it.  We've succeeded and strangely enough, are probably doing better now than before the affair.  If you've been the victim of an affair and wonder when the pain will start to subside, I strongly suggest you order this book.  When it arrives, put everything else aside and just read and read and start to regain your sanity.Good luck to you
Heartbreaking and inspiring. I've never before read a book that contains such a wide variety of experiences, writing styles and outlooks.  This anthology does not shy from confronting the horrors of abusive families, as is evident from the first line in the book: "healing is my own anticolonial war."  But it's also incredibly inspiring for the ways that all of these children have survived to tell such wrenching stories in complex, jarring ways.  As a parent, it was difficult to get through many of the essays, but always I found an incredible burst of hope when I least expected it.  As a survivor of childhood abuse, I also could see my story being told in so many different ways.  Unlike most books that address childhood abuse, every story in this anthology is stylistically challenging, innovative, and carefully crafted.  I highly recommend it.
An excellent resource. This is a great resource, especially for new parents. We learned a lot about how to keep our baby happy and content by recreating the "fourth trimester" womb experience. Of course, every piece of advice in the book did not work exactly for our little one, but many did, and we took an a la carte approach, using the book to customize the best way to keep him happy (and get a little more sleep ourselves).
A rare gift. This is arguably the greatest British novel concerning the first world war; the society it changed and killed off forever, and the sheer state of stagnation and disaster of English society and social structure(and that of both her allies and enemies in the great war) that led to millions of needless deaths and the death of Britain (and europe) as dominant world powers; that mantle being handed over to America.From such a simple story of doomed love and repression,Madox Ford is one of only a handful of English writers who can capture the essense of England and push through his message with such force.I expect some readers will find the book a little slow;errudite and jar a little at the couple of anti semite comments made (Disraeli as a loathsome little jew) but in a way that better evokes the era. Europe tried to recapture its lost dominance by using the jew as a scapegoat that culminated in an even bigger tragedy less than a generation later.A true-and criminally forgotten-masterpiece
For Love of Gold: The Burden of the Miser, Scathingly Told. Marcel Proust famously said of Balzac: "He hides nothing; he says everything."  A more fitting quote has never been attributed to this visionary of the mid-19th century, this paragon and paradox, who at the age of thirty declared that he would devote his life to a chronicle of his contemporary era, classifying the social strata of France through narrative.  Balzac went on to write more than ninety novels of his self-styled 'Human Comedy', the deliberate rival and successor to Dante's vast metaphorical triumph, a handful of which are rightly considered to be among the utmost achievement of classical literature.  Balzac's ego was as vast as his ambition and his talent, and he considered 'pretended portrayal' - shallow platitudes to disguise interior deficiencies - as vain and unworthy. In his art Balzac sought to consolidate and epitomize whatever themes he worked on at the time, drawing inspiration from his own experiences and multifold resources...if Henry James is correct in his claim that Balzac's great glory stemmed from the fact that he pretended ~hardest~, through the combination of overwork and intuition, then his unique status is assured on that effort alone: but we have his works to draw on, all ninety-three of them, to reassure that Balzac's spirit and intent were pure: in other words, the art of complete representation.  Few can match the French genius in this regard.Each of Balzac's novels tackle a different theme of the human condition, and in *Eugenie Grandet*, written in 1833, the subject of avarice is contemplated, and devastatingly revealed, through the author's usual concoction of dry wit, scathing portrayal, minutiae-obsession and omniscient understanding: Balzac's perspective is that of the all-seeing, all-knowing Godhead third eye, simultaneously deconstructing and putting into perspective the actions and consequences of the miser, in all his sordid, gold-grasping compulsion.  It's difficult to second-guess or place doubt upon the fiery condemnations explicit in this text: just brace yourself for the ride, and expect the grunts of agreement, the surprised whistles and the startled outbursts of laughter that inevitable result from a tour through this man's prodigious mind.  Entering Balzac is to confront oneself with genius, to learn and be humbled...and be entertained, lest I forget, in ways rarely qualified by his contemporaries.  It is this humorous quality, implicit in his contemplation of human nature, that endear Balzac so close to my heart; even when you know events are going to turn badly, as they so often do, the rare psychological and sociological insight of the author, so keen, pessimistic yet never despairing, buoy one across the tides of tragedy.I loathe to speak too much of the interior text of any Balzac novel, which in turn always somewhat hinders my attempt at review, for it is my belief that the shape and scope of each particular episode of The Human Comedy should be discovered by the diligent reader with as little knowledge about the text as possible, therein to reduce spoiling the impact of the narrative; a foolish desire, I know: and a standard overview of the surface is necessary.  Thus: *Eugenie Grandet* tells the tale of the quintessential miser, Monsieur Grandet, a man who, as another reviewer accurately depicted, is a caricature of money-grubbers everywhere - but what a caricature! One cannot help feel as much amused as disgusted by Grandet's penny-pinching and wily business shenanigans, which include the affectation of a stammer to throw off opponents, shady negotiations to curtail any forced obligations, and casual back-stabbing of his compatriots when there is coin to be made; the portrait is made complete with massive amounts of gloating and caressing of his gold behind closed doors.  Grandet lives to make money, and to have as little of it leave his possession as possible, thus reducing his immediate family to a state of penury entailing shaved lumps of sugar, a ban on fires for most of the year, an utter lack of decorative excess and a strict rationing of bread and water as the main constituent - jam being an outrageous luxury! Madame Grandet and her daughter, Eugenie, suffer like saints in this condition, ignorant of any other sort of lifestyle, at least until cousin Charles Grandet of Paris appears at the door one day, a dandy whose finery and extravagance shocks the elder Grandet and bewitches the deprived Eugenie.  From here I will reveal no more, except to say that Grandet's miserly affliction condemns his offspring, even from beyond the grave; avarice becomes a hereditary endowment, unconsciously applied, though the daughter - shy and virginal - continually exerts her generous nature despite the installed programming, giving a faint ray of charitable bliss to the grim consequence of the denouement.In all of his novels, Balzac peppers the narrative with observational asides and digressions, enhancing the story with the reflections of earned experience:"The beginning of love and the beginning of life have a pleasing likeness to one another.  Is it not everyone's concern to lull a child with soothing songs and kind looks, to tell him stories of wonders that paint the future with gold for him?  Are not hope's dazzling wings always spread for his delight? Does he not shed tears of joy as well as grief, and grow impatient about nothing, about the stones with which he tries to build an unsteady palace, about the flowers forgotten as soon as picked? Is he not eager to grasp time and put it behind him, to get on with his business of life? Love is the soul's second metamorphosis." (pgs 168-169)It is these moments of internalized perception, brought forth from quill to parchment, that bring the events surrounding into perspective; that make Balzac an author to be poured over, analyzed with delight, to be read again and again.  *Eugenie Grandet* deserves its place next to *Lost Illusions*, *The Black Sheep*, *Pere Goirot* and *Cousin Bette* at the forefront of The Human Comedy, and literature in general.Highly Recommended
Love First. I found this book to be helpful.  It is more for people who love a person who is currently on some form of substance.  It talks about intervention, etc.  I did however find some of the chapters to be useful for dealing with a person either while it's before or after they decide to quit using their "drug of choice".  It taught me to be patient and show lots of "LOVE
know thy Self. in my humble opinion, Ramana Maharshi was/is one of the greatest saints of the modern era. in this precious little book he speaks to us from the viewpoint of eternal Brahman, the ground of all being. this wonderful little book is a collection of questions his many visitors would ask. his answers are as close to true knowledge of the Divine as anything i've ever heard or seen. this book is an excellent introduction to the sublime words and methods of this modern saint. this could be a very important guide for the sincere spiritual aspirant who wants to finally know his or her true identity. these truths can take us where knowledge is known by direct perception and words alone utterly fail us....
Good improvement from last edition. This is the book that I used to teach comparative vertebrate anatomy.  The previous major flaw of the book was the many inaccuracies in the figures.  However many of these appear to be changed.  All in all this book is a good book to reference to for a variety of questions about vertebrates.  Not the easiest of books to wade through for a beginner but Kardong for the most part does a good job in explanations and descriptions for a book of this leve
Great Read/Great Detail. Although this book is larger than most of the other MS exam books, it provides great detail and enabled me to pass the exam the first time and with flying colors.  I've had some "issues" with some of the other MS exam books, however, this one MS actually did a good job with.Piece of Advice for the Exam - Study and KNOW the GPO sections, OU sections (especially design and managment), and RRAS sections.  Very little is covered outside of those things, believe it or not.Good Luck
Pathos and Politics. I have read most of E.L. Doctorow's novels and take great pleasure in the smoothness of their narratives, the sense that Doctorow has not misplaced or misused a single word. This same master's quality is evident in "The Book of Daniel", where it brings great imaginative precision to the lives of the Paul and Rachel Isaacson, a couple who are executed as spies and who are modeled on the Rosenbergs. To me, the book's most moving writing has the narrator, the Isaacson's son Daniel, remembering his parents as people with friends and commonplace lives, not as the couple who became powerful political symbols. In the book's end, Doctorow puts Dr. Mindish, the government's chief witness against the Isaacsons, in Disney Land 15 years after the trial, spinning pathetically on a ride, lacking identity in a gaudy and forgetful America
Shadows Of The Dark. John Zaffis is the nephew of Ed Warren a renown demonologist who is now retired due to poor health. The book starts out explaining how his interest in the paranormal grew because of his uncle as a child and then leads into various cases.The book gives us a small peak into cases, but really doesn't go very deep into them.  The scientific and photographic evidence is also a bit lacking in this book. You get the feeling reading this book that he edited out many of the darker details of the cases, perhaps for the protection of his readers.I like the fact that Zaffis calls himself a "Psychic Researcher." He states the term "Demonologist," is to easily used these days, and this is from an older man who has dedicated his entire life to this field. I agree. He also covers issues that season investigators learn from the school of "Hard Knocks." One such issue is the fact that before being contacted about a darker case he also has activity in his own home such as tapping, smells, and what-knot. This was something I learnt from trial and error.If you are new to this field of study this is a great book, or if you simply have never had an experience with a non-human entity this is a good book to read.
Frighteningly Real, Bumpy Transitions (spoilers). Note: There are spoilers in this review.I can see where some other reviewers could find the story Dani tells in "Family History" unbelievable.  One questions the lack of diagnosis, the rapid digression the daughter makes after returning home from camp and the unanswered question of why she accused her father of molestation to begin with. The irony here is, those are very real despite how preposterous they may seem. And while the question evolving around why the daughter made such an accusation could be seen as frustrating, I think you're missing the bigger picture, the more important point.  Children who are confused, who are having a difficult time with making the transitions that occur during puberty and feel they aren't getting their needs met can, and have been known to, make such ridiculous accusations not because of the pain they are bringing to others, but rather because they feel that's the only way they'll be able to be heard.I found that Dani did an excellent job of detailing the love affair the narrator had with her husband up to and prior to the deterioration of the entire family that it seemed perfectly clear why the daughter felt like she had to yell rape just to get everyone to see there was a fire burning.  Yelling fire wasn't going to get the response she felt she needed but screaming rape did -- she just wasn't able to see what the consequences could be.However, I wasn't convinced this was worthy of a five-star rating. As a writer myself, I appreciate flipping between past and present, even the need to start off smack in the middle, then back off and give a bit more of an explanation.  However, I found myself thrust into an antagonizing situation with far too much mystery surrounding it that I wasn't able to get into Dani's tale until much further into the book that I would have liked. I found myself too irritated with the narrator for several chapters in and the whole premise for why Kate (the daughter) was sent off explained far too late in the book.  I think those should have been laid out better to which I fault the editor more than I do the author.All in all, it was a great book.  I enjoyed it and look forward to reading more of Dani's books.
Great breadth of languages, tools, and examples. Great breadth of languages, tools, and examplesThis is the most comprehensive regular expressions book I have seen. After steering you through some regular expressions essentials (about 250 pages or the first 1/3 of the book) it then gets into specifics and examples for all of the following languages and applications:StarOffice/OpenOffice.org WriterMicrosoft Word and VBA for Microsoft WordFindstrPowerGrepExcelSQL Server 2000MySQLMicrosoft AccessJavaScript and JScriptVBScriptVB.NETC#PHPXML SchemaJavaPerlMost other books I've seen concentrate just on Perl. For anyone who uses 2, 3 or more of these languages or applications (and who doesn't use at least that many) this is much more useful than a Perl reg ex book.Beyond the list of languages and applications covered, there are numerous examples in every chapter that can easily be used as is, or modified to fit your needs. A few of the examples are:Converting dates to international formatFinding words in close proximity (in the same sentence)Cleaning up an online chat transcriptValidating a social security numberIgnoring whitespaceSeparating a delimited string into partsFinding repeated words or charactersAdding links to URLsMatching Canadian Postal codesVerifying IP address formatFinding HTML/XHTML header elementsMatching telephone numbers
Twilight Zone fans will love it. I really liked this one.  It's been a long time since I've read any short story collection, and I'm glad I read this one.  Actually didn't read it, I did this one on audio, there were different narrators for the stories lending different voices and all well done.Although the theme of hiring hit men was repeated in some of these stories, they all kept me guessing.  Also since they were all with twist endings I anticipated what might happen but didn't often see what was coming.This is my first Jeffery Deaver book.  I had avoided them since I HATED the movie of "Bone Collector" but I now want to read some more of his books; I'm hoping that Hollywood ruined a good writer's work
AMAZON PURCHASES. I AM VERY IMPRESSED WITH THIS BOOK AND HAVE HAD ONLY GREAT QUALITY OF ITEMS PURCHASED AND QUICK SHIPPING AND RESPONSE FROM AMAZON.COMTHANKS FOR THE EASY WAY TO PURCHASE ITEMS
Quick Read, Fantastic Advice. This book is short and easy to read, but contains outstanding advice.  It walks you through the process of figuring out what type of boat might work best for you, and then helps you locate and evaluate potential boats.  The checklists were great - they helped us be very thorough in looking over boats, and helped us realize when we found a boat that was a great steal.  In addition, the author walks you through the negotiating process and gave us tips that saved us hundreds of dollars.  He deals with the emotions of the process, which was very helpful as well.  We always negotiate on all our purchases, but some of the tips here were new to me and worked extremely well.  I'd highly recommend this book to anyone thinking about buying a boat
Bringing the Holocaust back down to individual tragedies. In some ways, Joseph Stalin was right when he said, "The death of one person is a tragedy, the death of millions is a statistic." Millions of people were killed in the event now referred to as the Holocaust, yet to truly grasp it, one must consider each of those people as an individual with a life, loves and aspirations. It is only by reducing the Holocaust down to this level that we will keep the emotional attachment needed to keep the memories alive. This book describes some of the events in a Jewish family in Germany as Hitler rose to power and began the program of persecution against the Jews.There are the early years, where most Jews believed that Hitler was someone who rose quickly and would fall even faster. After that, there were years of living in fear, as the gangs of Nazi thugs freely destroyed Jewish property and engaged in intimidation. The Blumenthal family also experienced a series of disappointments as they were granted permission to emigrate to the United States and moved to the Netherlands in anticipation of their departure. After months in a refugee camp, they became prisoners again when Germany invaded the Netherlands. They were then transported to the Beren-Belsen camp, where thousands died, although it was not a true death camp.After the war, those who were still alive managed to make it to the United States where they finally ended up in Peoria, Illinois. This is a story of death, destruction, disappointment in the actions of others and finally building a new life in an unfamiliar place. It is a triumph of the human spirit and reduces the statistic of six million deaths back down to the level of a tragedy.
A tough to digest, enthralling work. The mother of a 14-month-old baby girl who spent the first 6 weeks of her life in the NICU at a NYC hospital, I took this book very seriously. I admit that my paranoia has flared up many times in the first year of my daughter's life--always hearing about the risks and potential problems that preemies face, it's hard to avoid it.  Though she seems to be "caught up" and healthy, I often wonder if there is something lurking behind her blue eyes that I won't discover until she's older...something that will immobilize her, me, our family. Something that cannot be controlled with tough love or "time out" type punishments. While there is no sign of any such problem, I cannot seem to fully accept the fact that she is and will be a normal child, teen, adult. I have spent so much time fretting and imagining worst case scenarios that I wonder if I could be willing her to have some kind of abnormality--or if my own negativity and insistence on surrendering to my worst fears will ultimately become her cross to bear. Will I be a smothering parent who is too afraid of the "what ifs" to allow my child the chance to grow up unencumbered by an over-protective mother?I read "And I Don't Want to Live This Life," over a weekend, which, for me, is a quick turnaround considering that I am a working mother of a baby girl, and part-time step-mon to a 3-year-old. True to tradition, my husband sometimes makes me feel as if I've got three kids instead of two. So finding the time to get through a substantial read can be challenging. But this is not the type of work that can simply be cast aside and left untouched for more than a few hours at a time. Every time that I found myself with a few mintues to spare, I would grab the book and delve right back into the story of the Spungen family, engrossed to the Nth degree until some calamnity, like a broken toy or a spilled glass of milk called my attention away from it. One particularly long read came when my daughter was napping on Sunday afternoon, and my husband and SS were playing catch in the yard. I spent a good 50 minutes reading, but stopping at times to try and recall if any of the symptoms that Nancy exhibited as a small child were mirrored by my own daughter. Nancy didn't like to be held or touched--my Natalie refuses cuddling 80% of the time. Nancy was aggressive and unloving as a child.  Natalie often swats at me when I try and feed her some unwanted food, or when she's tired and I attempt to distract her from a nap because it's too close to bedtime for that. Every so often, my husband would stick his head in from the yard and ask what I was doing, then see me reading, and say something like, "I hope you aren't doing it again." He knew the subject of the book, and knew what I was thinking because I had already asked him more than once since Saturday morning if he thought that Natalie might have some sort of behavioral issues. Always, his answer was, "NO! She's a normal child...stop trying to find something wrong with her." And every time he said it, it calmed me and convinced me and I continued on, grateful that I could remain empathetic to Deborah's plight, but stay safely in the Parents of Healthy Kids club. And then, sure enough, 20 minutes later I would feel some of that confidence fade, and again I would look up from the page and wonder, "My God...does Natalie do that too?"But the difference between Deborah and myself is that once her child was my daughter's age, she never wondered about Nancy without already knowing the answer she dreaded--yes, there is something wrong. Despite the staggering ineptness of the medical community at the time, despite the "experts" who told her time after time that nothing was wrong, she KNEW that they were off base. She KNEW that normal children did not act like Nancy did. It wasn't hyperactivity, it was ADHD, it wasn't inpatience or normal aggression. Nancy wasn't a spoiled brat. It was neurological, chemical, and untreatable by boundary-setting and infliction of punishments.It is a mother's worst fear to face the knowledge that her child won't be "normal." Won't function on their own without major difficulty, won't have normal relationships with other people. To know that the child you so love and care for will not know the extent of that love for their own child because fate has simply not allowed for such is unbearable. What if your child will never live without knowing major emotional or physical turmoil, never see the sun and feel anything but the burn of its heat, never touch a flower without fretting over its thorns? Perhaps they will never love us, their parents, either--maybe the compacity will just not exist. Every parent knows exactly what Deborah Spungen feared, and can understand how difficult it would be to embrace the truth, how much she must have wanted to believe the incorrect diagnosis time after time. What do you do when no one will help your child, help your family? How to you soldier on when you know that the black clouds are an indefinite intrusion? When there is not a single thing you can do but wait and watch for the end of a life that once had so much promise, so much hope, and so much love, to fade into the eternal blackness of night?This book is truly a must read for any parent who has worried about their child. I guarantee that it will touch you. After all, the most successful stories are filled with characters who, regardless of personality traits or geographic location, or even time period, are relatable in some way, and Deborah Spungen and her family exemplify the sympathetic protagonist(s) perfectly. I would even concur that Nancy's schizophrenia, which I believe 100% was the cause of her plight, acted as the antagonist instead of Nancy herself. Nancy's murderer was not Sid--it was her disease. The accomplices were the doctors that refused to diagnose her, the therapists that turned their backs, the headmasters that should never have held their positions. Had this child been born decades later, Nancy would have been properly medicated, observed by a psychiatrist, and considering her supportive family and their the financial means, lived the most normal life that a person afflicted with such a disease is capable of. The relationship with Sid Vicious, the terrible drug addiction, the inability to function would never have come into play. It forces the question--how many other children grew up like Nancy, having suffered some sort of brain damage at birth or in utero, and were left misunderstood, misdiagnosed, and mistreated? How many of the murderers, serial killers, abusers, other such criminals that have been made infamous by their crimes were "Nancies?" How many of their victims would still be living unscathed at this very moment had their predators not been mishandled by an ignorant society?To be fair, parts of Spungen's book did induce a raised eyebrow, particularly when she named Nancy outright as the cause of her infidelity. The stress and loneliness that Spungen must have suffered as the primary caregiver of a difficult child is no doubt harrowing; however to put all responsibility for such a disloyal act against her husband on Nancy's shoulders only exacerbates the mistreatment she suffered as a result of behavior that she was unable to control. I also felt, at times, that Spungen and her husband disregarded the mental health and general well-being of their other two children by allowing Nancy to control the household at an age where said children were too young to understand what was truly going on. I cannot say that I have the solution, but the pain and confusion that Susan and David surely endured as young people surely has had a substantial effect on them.  But again, what do you do with your child when no one will help you understand how to deal with him? How do you turn your back? Also, about halfway through the book, as Spungen realizes that her daughter is fast-approaching the point of no return regarding her deteriorating personality, she often begins to express her wish to get "the old Nancy, MY Nancy" back. However, although I don't doubt the sentiment, I can't say that she made it clear when writing the early part of the book that she ever felt close to or accepting of much about Nancy at all. Sure, it's implied through her pain and determination that Deborah's love for Nancy was immeasurable, but I do wish she has been more willing to share some of the early closeness and relationship with Nancy that she suggests later on did exist.As someone else mentioned, the title of this book is something of a misnomer, as the majority of the work deals with Nancy's life from birth to adolescence, and only the last small chunk addresses her relationship with Sid and her murder. I would not recommend this book to someone who is simply looking for more literature on the 70's punk rock scene, or of the infamous Sid and Nancy pairing. "And I Don't Want to Live This Life" is the story of a child's undiagnosed mental illness and the journey of pain that the entire Spungen family was forced to take, courtesy of an untreated case of schizophrenia, and the ignorance of a medical community
Holy Grail has failed. The computerization and digital signal processing development let improve classical indicators essentially due to application of modern methods of information processing to prices. Indicators began to smooth better and to delay less. However . First, the prices are non stationary, i.e. the characteristics of filters are varied during the time. Second, as different from technical problems, the kind of a signal and noise distributions for the price are unknown, i.e. nobody know what to filter actually. Third, being filtered by means of Fourier and similar methods prices change the previous values to the addition of the new data: we receive ideal trends under a history data but we can only trade them from right hand to left hand.Fourier transformation is based on representation of initial series by the infinite sum of sinusoids with a various phase, amplitude and frequency. Recently wavelet transformations was widely adopted in various areas of data processing in which initial series are represented as the sum of some locally defined functions named wavelets. They are constructed by shifting and vertical and horizontal scaling of certain the prototype function. Wavelet transformation, in essence, is fractal that allows the effective using it in the technical analysis. First, it allows to carry out the multiscale analysis of prices, objectively identify trends on various scales by duration and amplitude, separate traders to various groups: scalpers, day traders, swing traders, position traders and long-term investors. The multiscale analysis can be interpreted as the analysis on various time frames. Second, it allows determine noise as the insufficient for reception of the profit amplitude and frequency movement of the prices that effectively allows filter the price series simply subtracting the lowest scale wavelets from it. Third, the additional filtration of white noise without delay is possible. Fourth, long-term trends are defined objectively. Fifth, wavelets do not contain optimized parameters in construct to standard indicators. Sixth, the used wavelets type is adapted to deal with the time ordered data and does not distorted on the last price values. Seventh, the used wavelet transformation is very effective computationally that allows use it in real time for the large massives of tick data. Eighth, it is effective to use wavelets as input data for neural networks and other methods of forecasting and recognition.
Very Detailed. This was the first "Lost" book I've ever purchased and I was not disappointed. My personal favorite part was the summaries of the show's literary references. Really interesting stuff. The amount of detail in this book is astounding. Anything you could ever hope to know about the first two seasons is in here. R.I.P. Boone
Perfectly executed!. This book was perfectly conceived and executed.  These 24 smart stories by 12 smart women cover the whole tonal range -- funny, poignant, gut-wrenching, beautiful, thoughtful, irreverant, wonderfully sappy...  And the publishing concept itself was brilliant, a clever way to crack a difficult market: strength in numbers, taking power into their own hands...in retrospect it seems so obvious, but I'm sure that two years ago these women had little idea how brilliant they were being... I'm 50 years old now, and anyone who has reached my stage of geezerhood knows the value of having even one good solid friend.  I attended a salon event these women put on in San Francisco recently, and I mentioned to one of them just how great I thought it would be to have twelve friends as tight as they seem to be.  Her response: "Well, now you do!"  And that is the feeling that one comes away with after reading their book: Twelve new friends
Spare, unsparing poetry, as contemporary as laser. Margaret Atwood is an unnerving poet. The poems from herlatest collection, Morning in the Burned House, slip intothe dark spaces of the heart and probe the truths hiddenthere with a surgeon's calm attention and impersonalcompassion. Nothing frightens off her surgical pen. And, tostretch the metaphor, there are the same displays of black,laconic humour with which every surgical team challengesdeath to another round. While many of the poems maintain acool detachment, more or less amused, Atwood is equallyadept at embracing the intensely personal with both love oranger. The most poignant poems in this collection deal withthe death of the poet's father - and indeed, as the titleof this collection suggests, a sense of loss is at the heartof many of these poems. Atwood's poetic vision of theworld is often sharp and bleak. She speaks of this in&quot;Owl Burning&quot; when she writes, &quot;You have soft feet./Youdon't know what it's like/so close to bedrock'.This is contemporary poetry at its rock hardest - andit's most memorable
Everything was great except the accent. This was a wonderful book and I was ecstatic to find the Audio CD was "unabridged."  The reader did an exceptional job, except for giving the characters - especially the children born in Vermont - a Massachusetts/Boston accent?  I live in Vermont, and although it's 2006 and not 1936, native-born Vermont children don't say "Mahhgret, Mahhgret, I just cahn't..."  It irked me a little throughout the otherwise exceptional vocal performance.
Good, considering the time. Harvey is a totally spoiled boy. It starts when Harvey is on a ship with his Mother (I forget where they are going) he is washed overboard, and saved by a fisherman `Manuel.' On the fishing boat Harvey makes his first friend, learns to work for his keep and so on. The story worked, it wasn't cheesy, maybe because it was one of the first novels of that type, but the plot of Harvey "growing up" seemed just to be there so you will read the book. The characters were well developed except the cook, you never really figure out where he is coming from. Most of the book was about fishing of The Grand Banks, very interesting is you like fishing and ships, but if you are reading it for the story, there is not that much, the ending was also weak, we are happy the Harvey is reconciled, but I really think that his parents would make a bigger stink. Good historical value, Kipling is a very enjoyable writer, yes I liked it but the plot had some flaws. I do recommend it though.
Streetwise is great!. I love the Streetwise Maps.  I have one for NYC too.  It helps you get around in an informative way.  Very handy when traveling through the city and beyond
My Granddaughter (7 years) loves this. Since this is all about princesses, my Granddaughter loves to color and make them all "really pretty
very dramatic and somewhat disturbing tale of survival. But this book is missing something.  It has plenty of drama, interesting sidebars, but I think a lot of it was rambling and Hemmingway didn't know where he was going with it.  Nevertheless, the tale of Harry Morgan's struggle to keep his family fed in corrupt Key West is interesting.  The dialog is powerful, particular in the bar scenes.  And Hemmingway's style of direct prose writing is entertaining.  You will feel the pain of the characters in this difficult story
One of my favorite read-aloud book during elementary school. When I was in kindergarten, our teacher played the cassette for our class as she turned the pages of the book...letting us hear the story as it unfolded. It has left a lasting impression, which I  will pass to my kids. I have wanted to get a copy of it because I loved the tongue twister name and I'm happy to see Amazon carries it.I don't believe that it sends any negative messages, like a few reviewers here. The story starts off with the first born son Tikki being all important, while Chang the second son is cast to a side. However, in the end Chang is the hero and both children are important and loved. It is a happy ending. Nowadays, people get too sensitive and caught up with being "PC". This is a children's book meant to entertain and cause a few smiles. It does that and even teaches that everyone is important and makes a difference. Almost 25 years after having this story read to me, it brings a smile to my face and fills me with warm memories of my childhood.This book will be fun for both the child and reader. The story sticks an important message into the minds of young ones who may be resistant to another approach. In the end when the child grows up he/she will remember the basic story but most of all the fun shared while reading the book. I highly recommend Tikki Tikki Tembo.
Disection of the Neocon Foreign Policy and its Affect on the U.S. This book by two veterans of conservative leaders, the Reagan and Thatcher governments, provide a thorough takedown of the Neo-conservative foreign policy as demonstrated by the (now former) leadership of the Defense Department and our current UN ambassador, among others.  These Center-Right authors have provided a thorough trouncing of the neocon viewpoint, starting with its earliest iterations and ending with a discussion of the current policies and projections of the leadership.Halper and Clarke write many sensible things to me, and I am coming from a Center-Left viewpoint.  This may be one of the most incredible parts of the book.  I have come of age in my foreign policy thinking since just before 9/11, and while I would take a more liberal perspective many of the criticisms of the Bush Administration foreign policy than Clarke and Halper have, they are still the same as my own thoughts.  This may also be one of the book's demonstrated weaknesses.  The authors quote heavily from liberal thinkers but cite only scarcely from their fellow conservative intellectuals.  This seems to be because other, more serious, conservative criticisms of neocon failings either aren't popular or are non-existent.  If this is the case it is a shame.Whichever the case, this is an excellent book to get the idea that there are those on the right unhappy with Iraq and other unilateral foreign adventures undertaken by Bush and the neocons
Good option to learn MSH!!!. Monad (http://www.oreilly.com/catalog/msh/) presents the next generation of command interpreter included in the next Microsoft Operating Systems. Andy Oakley, the Author, show new commands and resources, through clearly samples and detailed descriptions, increasing the level of complexity slowly and comfortable supporting users to learning about all topics without doubts. Complete and one excellent book to have.
It will change you. If you want to read a book about the Arab-Israeli conflict in order reinforce your position, this is not the one.  This book offers no solutions nor presents any new arguments.  In fact, its poignant depiction of suffering on both sides will make you question any prior views you've held, and that's a very difficult choice for some people to make.  The prose is almost hypnotic, transcending the dryness of most non-fiction books.  There hasn't been a book like Shipler's Arab and Jew in the last fifteen years.  This book was written before the first intifadah, so some of the statistics are out of date, and rhetoric has intensified.  I only wish Shipler could update this great work
Another Fun Book only this time with my hero - Nancy Drew. Love the idea for these books - Perry Mason - Nancy Drew - can't wait for the next one. Love the research that gets sprinkled in to make a fun book. Who's next Mike Hammer - Philip Marlowe??
Comic book inking. Janson gives a well written breakdown of the techniques needed to develop into a good inking.  He discusses the finer points of story telling through the medium of illustration and uses a wide range of artists he admires as examples. It has become one of my go to books when drawing storyboards. This book, as well as his one on penciling is a must for anyone seriously interested in illustration.
A truly compelling story. I read this book in my third year of undergraduate study in English.  This book challenges the paragdigms of the 50s and 60s and also serves as a coming of age story.  Theresa is a very complex character whose actions are  sometimes laudable but most always easily understood by the reader, and  sometimes by Theresa herself.  This book impacted me greatly because I  identify with the protagonist.  I am anxious to read it again and determine  how it will affect me at yet another stage in my life.  I highly recommend  this book, but I especially encourage young women to read it. It is  beautifully crafted and Rossner has the ability to profoundly affect every  reader with her vivid imagery and insight into human instinct
A moving book on Western Culture, the novel and music.`. This is a moving book, written in Kundera`s clear, humorous style which talks about the novel and warns us from distortions of novels` meanings    by translators who do not understand the authors. Kundera`s love for his  art and breadth of vision is astounding and his teachings on life and  philosophy on which this book is based on are very inspiring. Reading this  brilliant masterpiece we will learn one thing: history- we can never get  rid of history: &quot;how sweet it would be to forget that monster&quot;.  The suitable book for lover`s of Milan Kundera
Gangsta Rap Coloring Book... so funny!. I got the idea for this coloring book from a friend who had it sitting on her coffee table.  I bought three for little Christmas gifts and everyone loved them! Well, I had to keep one for myself.  Nothing like a coloring book with Crayon Bullets to brighten any holiday
Jake Bernstein Trading Stocks Book. This book has a very good trading information regarding Gaps Strategies and Stochastics.  I have been looking for a while a book which explains how to trade the gaps, finally found one.  The explanation is very strightforward and complete.  In addition he gives some own created stochastics strategies (i.e.) stochastics pop which are very reasonable
A Patina of Memories... As someone who grew up in a small town in Texas, I can identify with so much of this book. My late Mother's childhood and her stories of growing up in a rural area with colorful characters are very similar to Mr. Foote's story. If you didn't grow up in this era or in a small town, these stories may not have the charm I feel about them, but Horton Foote could bring a tear to a glass eye with his charming memories, and I will bet that he can tug at your heartstrings as well. There is a place for sentiment and burnished memories in this busy life of ours, and I found myself wanting more after reading this memoir. As I read this book, I found myself envisioning the whole story in a pleasant sepia toned, soft cocoon of a state of mind. You come too
A Wonderful Novel. Charles Frazier's Cold Mountain changed me.  As a writer, he really showed me how much I need to learn.Mr. Frazier's bold use of period music throughout the novel has inspired me to reach deeper into research for my own books.  Beyond that, his careful, precise use of language kept me hooked throughout the pages of this wonderful story.  I enjoyed the cadence and the way new words from that era captured my thinking.  I say "new" but they're really old words that have evolved or dropped from modern usage.Deep in the heart of this rich, colorful narrative you'll find a tender love story.  You'll also find the land lovingly described in a rich tapestry woven together as only Mr. Frazier seems capable of these days.The war and it's brutality is described in some detail, but it only serves as the backdrop to Inman's struggle to return home to his true love and the country he knows and loves.  Being a person that loves the mountains and desires a simpler life, I found myself identifying with Inman from the very beginning.While the film was okay, forget it and buy the book.  There is no way to translate to film what Mr. Frazier has accomplished with the language and the music.  Simply put, I love the way he describes the sound of the music.  Try and describe the sound of music sometime.  It's not easy.  Especially the type of music described here.There are many surprises in this novel, but from my perspective, there is no way a thinking person can read this novel and NOT walk away a little bit richer, a little bit more fulfilled, and having their view of the world altered just a tiny bit.Obviously I recommend this novel.  In my first novel, only one novelist made the acknowledgements portion of my book.  That person is Charles Frazier.  Thanks for the lessons, Mr. Frazier.
Beautiful Collection. Please understand that a writer's style is not always indicative of the type of writing he/she likes to read. I think those expecting a side-splitting collection of stories will be disappointed here.This being said, I think Sedaris has compiled a wonderful collection of stories. I am encouraged that Sedaris included a short by Alice Munro, one of the masters of the short story in modern times. A definite must
Window Seat: The Art of Digital Photography & Creative Thinking. A wonderful example of Creativity and the use of a limited subject to make for an interesting photo essay. I especially like Julieanne Kost introduction on creative thinking and the exd of the book where she explains a lot of her techniques
movement that matters. How can such a small book give you so much information. This book provided me with new tools to create functional training program for my clients. It also provides an effective approach to assessing my clients movement skills. This book is a must for anyone in the fitness industry
Food for thought. Not new information, but it's good to be reminded of these principles
Wonderful and pertinant. Regardless of your religious background, this book speaks to the timeless struggle for a more moral behavior.  I just re-read this book and found it even more inspiring than the first time.  Even if you become a little entangled in the scholarly prose, it will still hit the heartstring in a gentle,hopeful,and powerful way.  Lewis has incredible insight to the human soul and condition.  Never condemning, but always  aware of human frailties, he guides one to look within oneself for the light that illuminates each of us.  I do not find this book "preachy" in any way. It mearly points out the moral difficulties all men face, shows one the humor and tragedy of human behavior, and the hopeful and loving God who has given all men the power to choose for themselves.  I wish everyone would read this little book.  It could change your life
A Wonderful ending to an even better series. The last book in the series is my favorite because it is when Belinda finds herself. I was so excited when she found Drew and I cried at the end. If you havent finished the Love comes softly series you need to
The definitive biography. I read Ferling's biography of Adams after reading McCullough's John Adams. I was a bit disappointed with a few aspects, and thought reading Ferling would round out my knowledge of our second president.  I wasn't disappointed.  Ferling's masterly and scholarly work provides an outstanding insight into Adams, his activities, his motivations, and his relationship with his wife Abigail.  In particular, Ferling pulls no punches in describing some of Adams' rather significant character flaws, particularly his burning ambition (and his subsequent abandonment of his family in pursuit of it).  Richly footnoted, the work still remains THE biography of Adams, despite McCullough's recent work and its NY Times bestseller status
The best of the best of the best. After seeing that Frank Miller made Sin City a movie I was amped!! I thought "Great, next. he'll do Ronin" but nooooo, he did 300. That MUST mean Ronin is the next Miller movie, I hope. This is by far the best graphic novel ever. Its exciting, funny, and builds suspence like M. Night Shamalan only wishes he could do. If you have never even seen a comic book, I know that you could still enjoy this book
Very good but don't expect it to be easy. I really enjoyed this book.  I had a hard time with his writing style at first but found it easier as the story went along.  I felt this was a wonderfully challenging book.  So much I did not know about the 1800's.  I would tell anyone to read it and give it a chance.  By the end of the book you will be flying through the pages.  However, this book took more time for me to read than almost anyother book I have read!Enjoy
This book will explain what you don't know about Boltanski. I saw his exhibit in Paris a few years ago and I was intrigued about this artist.This book will give more explanation on his work and why he does it. Some of the writing can be too academic and hard to understand. There's an interview with Boltanski which I loved. He's very opinionated and an interesting artist. There's not much info on him on the internet so I'm really glad that was made
Very good book for Understanding PTSD. This is the first book I attempted to read after being diagnosed with PTSD. It helped me understand my unexplainable behavior and symtoms and helped me come to terms that I was not "crazy, as perceived, but simply having a normal reaction to an abnormal trauma. I would love to meet the author sometime. I HIGHLY recommenend this book.
Makes teaching what the Bible says easy. For those of us parents who have difficulty recalling the exact passage and location in the Bible of a scripture, this book is a dream. Categorized by topic, such as perseverance, honesty or attitude, the book offers multiple scriptures supporting each attribute, and a "questions for discussion page" about each one. The book is helpful as a teaching tool whether for gentle correction or introducing topics for discussion. As my kids have gotten older, they will say, "Mom, what does the book say about (fill in the blank)?"This book works in wonderful conjunction with the Bible as it leads the reader to ask questions about where passages originateand what the circumstances were.I highly recommend this book, whatever the age of your children.
Face the Fire. Nora Roberts once more hits 10 stars with this trilogy.  If you love Roberts, this is one of her finest
Great Story that is little known. As an industry insider (worked for Malcom McLean from 1969 to 1986) its great to see that the story of the development of the container and its amazing economic impact has been recognized.  The container, along with the jet plane and advanced communications, are the three major innovations that have made the world a smaller place and permitted globalization for all its benefits (and shortcomings).  I would prefer to see more of the business economic facts covered including the economics of a successful container line today.  The coverage of United States Lines in Chapter 12 is too superficial and could be expanded.  Overall a great attempt to cover the history of the container industry
An informative book about Special Forces. Mr. Couch has provided a look into the actions of the US Navy SEALS in the conflicts in Afghanistan and Iraq. For security reasons the missions are described in a very broad sense without a lot of details, which is as it should be. He also gives us a glimpse into the trainig and organization of this elite force. These are well trained, brave warriors who deserve recognition for the job they do. It is a well written book, right to the point and worth reading if only to find out how tough the war on terrorism really is.
A Fellow Comedian and Writer's Review. Okay, the title's really long.  In fact, that's all I read in my first sitting, then I took a much needed break.I'm a standup comedian, I've worked with or met many of the comedians in this book, and I briefly met one of the authors, Mark Schiff, at The Funny Firm in Chicago back when I was just starting out in comedy back in 1990.  (Whew!  I'm getting old.  I was eighteen then.)  I wanted to get that all out in the open.  All that being said, this is an unbiased review which, with my background, is able to shed a little more light on the subject.When touring as a comedian, many of us stay in comedy condos, basically apartments where the clubs put up the acts for the week.  There's not a lot to do during the day, so we often end up sharing stories from the road.  And they tend to be very, very funny, even outrageous.  There's strange things out there.  Stalker fans, rutheless club owners, serendipitous events... well, you get the idea.  Long-time veteran comedians Mark Schiff and Ritch Shydner astutely decided to gather some of these stories and share them with the world in a book.  I actually had a similar idea, only to share stories of comedians' and bands' worst gigs, entitled "Ghastly Gigs."  (A much shorter title, you'll notice.)  Perhaps I still will.  In fact, I definitely will.  I will start gathering the stories today.The stories in "I Killed: True Stories..." are wide and varied.  Some are about sex, some about bad gigs, some about bad weather, and at least one is even heartfelt.  They are all funny and, at times, laugh out loud hilarious.  No doubt some people will squirm at some of the more graphic stories, but they're really not that graphic.  Ritch and Mark interject terms like "privates" instead of using the proper physiological terminology, when called for in a story.  Given that some of the stories are about Rodney Dangerfield or come from Chris Rock, the graphicness is hardly surprising.  In the business, we call these stories "blue."  They hardly compare to the graphic nature or conversation of R-rated films such as "American Pie."  Still, some readers will find it to be raunchy.  Graphic?  Yes.  Raunchy?  No.  I am always intrigued by such a position.  Raunchy is reserved for unnecessary graphicness, where the description is unneeded.  For I Killed to be honest and accurate, it most contain some graphic depiction; otherwise, the stories would be somewhat lacking and leave the reader questioning what the story was actually about.  None of the stories involve graphic violence.  I always find it amusing that people will label a non-violent story about sex "raunchy," yet not label an episode of "Law & Order: SVU" "raunchy."  Most of the crime shows on TV are far more graphic and descriptive than Mark and Ritch's book.  Yet, because they are violent, they are not "raunchy."  Chew on that.The layout of the book is quite simple.  The name of the comedian telling the story is in bold.  The story itself follows the name.  Then, it's on to the next story.  In short, the book is a collage of funny stories of many of the industries most popular acts.  There is one flaw with the book.  The first rule of comedy, or any form of entertainment for that matter, is "know your audience."  Some of the lingo used in the book would not be familiar to people outside the comedy industry.  The terms aren't too hard to figure out, but they can be confusing.  For example, what's a "feature act?"  A "hack?"  If I were a savvy salesman, I would tell you to read my book "God is a Woman: Dating Disasters" first; it's about funny dating disasters only, but I make an excellent point of defining all the comedy lingo as I introduce it.  But I'm a sucky salesman, so I'll simply provide a key here:Gig - A show for which a comedian has been hired to performOpener - Opens the show and typically emcees itFeature - The middle act in the show, going on between the opener and the headliner (aka closer)Hack - A comedian who does other acts' material or does old bits that have been done to deathOne-nighter - A one-night gig, usually in a smaller venue like a small townHell gig - A gig that sucks, usually a bad one-nighterComedy condo - An apartment where the acts are put up by the clubBit - A joke or concept in a comedian's actTag - To recall a bit again later in the show, sometimes more than onceMost of the terms are eventually explained by some of the comedians in their stories, but not until long after they have been introduced.  This could be an editing flaw with the book and have nothing to do with the authors.  It is an oversight that occurred somewhere and gives the book its only real flaw.In summary, "I Killed..." is a simple book that is quite funny.  It's an easy, flowing read that achieves its goal of conveying life on the road and making us laugh.  I recommend it and give it 4 out 5 stars, citing its only flaw as failing to explain some of the comedy lingo when it is first introduced.  Fun read!  I am looking forward to the sequel I Killed Two, which is already in the works.  I can't wait to read it!
challange. This diet is a challange, you have to remember what you can and can not eat together.  However, once you figure it out, it is a good diet. You never feel deprived, and are never hungry.  The food is good and it is great to not have to count calories.I have lost 10lbs in less than two weeks.  One more thing, you do not have to give up desserts
my commentary on the commentary. I needed this book fast for class. I'm a seminary student. I got it quick and didn't miss a quiz (if you know what I mean!)I am a loyal customer. Steve
Great Read!. This is the second time I've read this book and enjoyed it so much! I even ordered two extra copies for friends and they loved it and have passed it on to friends. A true adventure  and I didn't want it to end
Worth your while. Once in a while a book speaks so strongly to so many people, that it does the impossible. It is popular and worthwhile.  The best part is that this book gives simple pragmatic execrcises to change communication for the better. Get the book and stay married.  Another great reading that I recommend is "In the meantime"  by Vanzan
Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Birds. Written many years after the fact, this book is well worth reading many years after the fact.  Kingbird Highway is an autobiography, a travelogue, and a `where-to-bird' guide for 1973.  It is a tale of life, liberty, and the pursuit of birds.  Kingbird, alias Kenn Kaufman drops out of high school to pursue his dream (obsession) of seeing more birds in a single year than anyone had ever seen before.  There are several catches to his liberty and pursuit of birds.  He must see the birds north of Mexico, a technicality that affects his dream.  He has almost no money, so he does cheapest Big Year ever with the lowest dollar to bird ratio ever. He spends only about $1000 by hitchhiking everywhere and living off Little Friskies in a can of cold soup for dinner.   Kingbird Highway provides a wonderful map of where to bird even now over forty years later.  For example, the Brownville Texas Municipal dump is still the place to see Tamaulipas crows.  Read in conjunction with a field guide, Kingbird Highway opens a world of birds, their habits, and habitats that might otherwise escape notice.
Among the Heroes. Deora,Todd,Jeremy,Tom,Wanda and the rest of the heroes, including United 93's original pilots, should all be read about by every American. Reading this book is the best way I can think of to gain a bit of information about these American Heroes and the lives they lived. It's good to know about the people who stopped Mohammad Atta and the four other terrorists on their evil mission.Well done Jere.
International Finance. Excellent book for anybody that want to have an introduction to understand international financ
Great. It is hard to go wrong with Anna Pigeon. This is like many of her books with the strong nature content and interesting characters. Keeps you guessing all the way and wondering if she will make it in the end
This is an informative and inspiring book. This book will be valuable for the amateur and professional alike.It's splendidly illustrated and the photos of scenic drops,scrims,and translucencies show some first-rate work. Best of all this book is by two  WORKING professionals who not only know what they're doing but also have  the ability to cogently and effectively communicate the multiple ways  scenic art is produced.The two authors are not &quot;bookish theorics&quot;  as Shakespeare would put it, but accomplished pros who are out there doing  it! A must for anyone who's interested in becoming a scenic artist or  simply wants to paint their school or community theatre production in a  more effective, efficient, and beautiful way
More than just a war book---the making of a great general. A truly engaging book, not only in the great behind-the-scenes detail and insight that it provides on the Gulf War, but in the way in which it allows the reader to follow the making of the man.  From his days in grade school, to living in Iran, to his world travels with the U.S. Army, to his tours in Vietnam, you can see how these experiences caused him to be so driven to conduct the Gulf War in the "right" way for the American soldier
Zany and Smart. I cannot but think of &quot;Under the Net&quot; and smile and it is for this reason that I'm so endeared to Murdoch's gem of book. The last time I really laughed out loud while reading a novel was Don Delillo's &quot;White Noise&quot;. Behind all the zany situations and comedic characterization is a smart, strangely gratifying take on life. Highly recommended
excellent source to confirm my thoughts!  I'm not crazy. My mom is the classic 'Critic' and I responded just as I should.  I broke off communications with my mother because she controlled too much of my life and is only out for herself.  My worst fears, that there is nothing I can do nor is it because of anything I have done.  Page 106&107 especially related to me and my mother.  I now know I must wait for her to clear her demons from her childhood for her to have any peace and therefore any chance at a healthy relationship with me and my family.  Please read this book if your mother makes you feel guilty for any reason..even if she doesn't mean to or not know she is doing it.. the answer is here...maybe you can fix your 'little' problem before it becomes 'big' like mine
One Has to Take Sides. Here is a remarkably subtle and slowly simmering novel about, if I may resort to a clich, love and war. The story takes place in the war-torn Vietnam of the 1950s, when the French colonialists were brutally trying to hold on to their failing system of subjugation, and the Americans were just beginning to get involved. In tandem with this mostly forgotten but ominous period of history, we get a forlorn love triangle involving an upwardly mobile young Vietnamese woman, a middle-aged British journalist who is mentally exhausted from the war, and a nave young American operative who knows nothing about the true misguided horrors of his idealism. Both the love triangle and the surrounding carnage of war are used to great effect by Graham Greene, as he slowly lays out subversive and hard-hitting ruminations on the difficulties of complex human relationships, and the soul-crushing horrors and futility of war. These realizations are mostly from the tired and cynical mind of Fowler the British journalist &#8211; a very well-drawn character who finds it impossible to maintain his attempted neutrality in both the romantic and political struggles around him. This novel is a quiet masterpiece that subversively explores how the political and the personal can affect real people. [~doomsdayer520~
Is this Review a Manifestation of Ultimate Truth or a Figment of Your Imagination?. What a fascinating journey through a bizarre and brilliant mind! I had always wantedto learn more about Philip K. Dick, but had been turned off by other articles andbooks that had drained the life from Dick's story with overly dry and pedantic prose.In contrast, Carrere offers psychological insight and philosophical speculationthat can only be described as "Phildickian." As one who had read all ofDick's better-known works, Carrere seems to have reanimated Dick's spirit in thiscompelling, partially novelized tale. What the reader sacrifices in footnotes andverifiable fact is more than made up for by the sheer human interest of the story.
Excellent book. Great cookbook! The side comments by each chef makes the book more interesting. A big plus is the range of easy simple to complex "fancier" recipes. Also, this book gives you an idea of the types of recipes each chef presents in their own cookbooks. Highly recommended
My Side of the Mountain. The book I read is a pretty fun book! The book My Side of the Mountain by Jean Craighead George is a book where a boy runs away from the city to the mountains. He finds out how to live.Later he gets a pet falcon and names it Frightful. Soon he finds a man, but he thinks he's a bandit, then he becomes friends with the man. The boy, Sam, finds out he's a professor. He's good at making jam too.Before the winter he has Halloween with the animal friends he has made, and invites them to his house inside a tree, but it doesn't turn out well after the party.Sam kills some deer and rabbit to make clothes for the winter. He wears the rabbit's fur as underwear because it's waterproof.After the winter his parents and sister come to visit him, but they are going to live in a cabin instead of his tree house, so he gets angry but later calms down. I think the writer wants the reader to try running away. I like it because I think I would try running away in the mountains to see what happens.I highly recommend this book for both parents and kids to read.
A very good coming of age novel. The narrator is Will McLean, a Georgian of Irish descent and son of a Marine.  In 1963, he enters the fictional Carolina Military Institute in Charleston.  Like all the "plebes" (first-years), but especially as an outsider, he finds life at the Institute to be brutal.  But he finds three friends who stand by him: Tradd St. Croix, an old Charlestonian from a very rich and respected family); Pig, a rough Italian, and Mark, another muscular Italian from up north.  The rough but kindly "Bear" Barrineau asks McLean to keep an eye on the Institute's first black cadet.  But McLean's journey to manhood is full of twists and turns, as he falls for a girl whose life he can never be a part of and also finds hismelf embroiled with a shadowy, corrupt gang of Institute cadets and grads called "The Ten."  This plot is interwoven among 500 pages of musing on the beauty of Charleston; the fiece, loyal love of boys who've been through hell together; regret; what it takes to become not just a man but your own man; courage; and triumph.  There is a lot of purple prose, and some rather awkward dialogue, or at least stretches of dialgue that don't seem to belogn to the scenes they're in.  And while Conrad's remarks on the Vietnam War, which proceeds to escalate as the book pregresses, are poignant in their understatedness, the "first black cadet" subplot is seen only from a distance, in staccato blips, and Conroy has absolutely nothing weighty to say on the matter of race, racism in the South, racism in the military, or the appalling horrors a brave black knob would face.  Instead, he has his narrator describe in great detail his final basketball game, which he won with such a sweet shot, man.  Give me a break.  And some of the books' big revelations are easily guessed far in advance, and leave the reader wondering why Will doesn't piece together the obvious clues himself.  Still, despite the book's flaws, it is for the most part fine reading.  Conroy does have much of note to say on the subjects of maturing and courage, and I raced through its 500 pages.  Conroy also has a way with words and can turn a poetic phrase or two, even if he gets melodramatic at times, and he knows just how to lead the reader along on an emotional roller coaster ride.  It's not up there with the all-time classics, but it's one of the finer popular novels you'll find
FileMaker Pro 8: The Missing Manual. Very good - somehow this book manages to cover the basics and get to the more complex aspects in clear understandable terms. I'm sure for the power user there's stuff missing but for a mid skill user who (for example) wants to use portals effectively it's very clear
Why no mention of gas chambers at Auschwitz???. Reading this book with my high school students led to some of the best literary discussions I've ever had with young adults. So many reviews on Amazon.com have extolled the virtues of this story. One review caught my attention-mactan's review asking why there was no mention of gas chambers by Wiesel.  NIGHT does address the crematoriums as the "crazy" woman on the train keeps yelling of the fires and those on the train who hated her constant yelling realize the truth as they see the smokestacks from the crematoriums. Also, AUSCHWITZ DID NOT HAVE GAS CHAMBERS. See Auschwitz: A New History by Laurence Rees for an explanation of why this is true- and why the portion of the camp system known as Birkenau DID HAVE GAS CHAMBERS
Wonderful Tool for Learning Top-Notch Pastry Skills. I went to pastry school in France and found these books absolutely indispensable.Need to learn the classics of French pastry?  This book (and the other three in the series*) is for you!  There are lots of detailed pictures and explanations are clear and well written.  Along with time-lines to help you gage how long a project will take.  The recipes are frequently given for large restaurant quantity along with a scaled down version suitable for home cooking.  My only complaint is that there's no index that spans the 4 volumes, though each book does have its own index with references in both English and French.  Very useful.Master the information in these books and you can work in any pastry kitchen anywhere in the world.* Creams, Confections, and Finished DessertsPetits Fours, Chocolate, Frozen Desserts, and Sugar WorkDecorations, Borders and Letters, Marzipan, and Modern Dessert
A Really Nice Book. I really enjoyed reading this book and would like to recommend it to others.  The author is witty and has a great style of writing and the information was really good too.
Joe Black Like Me Review. Black Like Me was a great book and taught me how the black person who lived in the South had such a hard life especially in the Deep South of Mississippi or in New Orleans, which is the setting of the book.  In New Orleans the white person is nice to the black man but the white man does not respect the black man just tolerates him.  In Mississippi the white person is very degrading to the black man.  You cannot even look at a white woman in Mississippi without getting lynched.  John Griffin who was on a bus ride in Mississippi was not allowed to get off at his stop because the bus driver was a white man and a horrible racist and he just wanted to mess with John Griffin.  John Howard Griffin was a courageous journalist because he was a white man who wanted to turn himself black to see how the black man lived in the South.  He wanted to see what the real hardships were for the everyday black man.  For example how hard it is to find a job or a place to live; everyday things that we take for granted in today's society.  The book showed me that racism is a real thing that blacks even in today's society have to deal with. The book was great and I would recommend the book to anyone who wants to learn about the South and how black people really have to live their everyday lives.
I'm a student of IIR. I decided to learn Reflexology from the pioneers of Reflexology ... the IIR (International Institute of Reflexology). This is one of the required books for the home study portion of their courses. It's boring, but informative. I usually just read the first and last sentences of the paragraph. Skim and scan - that's it
Lucky You! You Found a Sensational Read!. This is my second Hiaasen novel after reading the sensational novel Sick Puppy and this was just as enjoyable.  Hiaasen has a knack for novels where the stupid an immoral get their comeuppance and the reader gets lots of laughs and satisfaction along the way.  I'm going straight to the bookstore and getting another Hiaasen novel as soon as I've finished this review, he's that good!JoLayne Lucks works as a vet in a small Florida town called Grange.  Grange's town folk are a bit eccentric and not opposed to conning passing travellers to stop by and see their Madonna statue weep, the oil stain Jesus or marvel at the electric drilled hand and foot holes that are supposed to be a mark of the crucifixion.  JoLayne couldn't be more opposite, she turned down a higher paying career in hospitals to help out animals and recently rescued 45 turtles from land which was going to be turned into a shopping mall. One day she wins the lottery, unfortunately so do a couple of redneck low IQ'd  racists who can not see any reason why they should have to split their winnings, so after a violent assault take JoLayne's ticket as well.  Accompanied by a disillusioned journalist JoLayne is determined to get the ticket back before it is cashed in.  What follows is a fast paced adventure through the state of Florida where you'll laugh and smile as various con artists, corrupt officials and others get what they so richly deserve.
Complete -- the only basic book you'll ever need. I just got the third edition of this book, to put alongside my copy of the first edition which is so dog-earred I may just toss it out now that I've got the new one. This is the best book I've found for someone who wants a solid reference book that covers everything from A-to-Z, or you could say, apples to zinc. If you Fad dieters may not find the latest gee-whiz diet here, but those of us who want down-to-earth, up-to date information still stick with this one
A book for details but not for brainstorm. To write a good essay requires several elements.  This book reveal readers a full understanding of details in how to write business correspondences formally (to avoid Grammar or expression confusions).  However, you should not expect to improve your writing skills by just following up the instructions as shown on this book.  After all, your logical thoughts, knowledge in speicific fields, will finally determine if you are a good writer
a pleasant surprise. when i first received the book i thought i'd made a mistake purchasing it but soon realized i had not!  it has proven to be informative and concise and contains background and technique information i haven't seen in other larger more expensive books. really, a worthwhile addition
Good (supplementary) book on Negotiation. The book is very well structured and extremely readable with real case  problems. It starts off with the big picture of negotiation, leads to  specific points, and includes toward the end a lot of &quot;people  skills&quot; (likes social dilemmas or different cultures). The book is  neately structured with a great conclusion at every chapter. Quantitative  support is used only where necessary and therefore kept to a minimum. I  recommended as a supplementary book to Getting to Yes (still my all time  favourite) or The Art and Science of Negotiation (for the very serious  student)
Great book. I am a small business owner and get involved in pricing daily.  This book provided extremely useful insight into how to make the most money from each deal.  An easy read about a topic that is all too often neglected by the small business owner
Very Creepy. I enjoyed this book a lot and the stories were not all "scare the crap out of you". Some of them were a bit more heartfelt...Drop by Drop- my favorite story in the book, is about a young girl who is visited by a little ghost girl with a shocking message.Dancing with Marjorie's Ghost- Another spooky one that illustates the phrase, "Think before you speak."Shadow Brother- Yet another Goosebumps giver that has the reader guessing, "What really happened?"The Ghost- a short story with a creepy twistFor Love of Him- Sad, yet scary, this story is about a boy who is misleaded by a tombstone, and its owners.October Chill- this is one of the more Heartfelt stories that really makes you think what you would do if you have only a few months to live.Being Dead- heartfelt and comical, this tale is abouta boy in the Great Depression who dies and rightens a few wrongs before passing over.Overall I was very satisfied with this book and recommend it to all Ghost Story lovers
Highly entertaining for those interested in Wall Street. The book is a good read and entertaining for those interested in Wall Street. This book should be required for anyone thinking of getting a job on the Street. Some stories may be hard to understand for readers not familiar with finance terminology
Not to be ignored. This book is a tiny slice of genius. It can't be judged by a descriptive birthing scene in the first chapter, or the descriptive "climax" toward the end. What it should be judged by is the wonderful writing, the spot-on capture of dialect, what it's like to live on a farm under rules that seem foreign to us - but that are explained through prose rather than preaching. We are allowed to see a young boy growing into a man, and the responsibilities he accepts at such a young age are remarkable. Today's children could take a lesson from 12-year old Robert Peck. Less video games, less television, more hard work (reading and learning is included here, not just farm work).We see a masterfully written relationship between a son who loves his father, and while his father is not a great man as many would measure him, his son wants to grow up to be just like him because *he* sees greatness in his father. Any attentive reader should see the same. Readers may not agree with the strictness applied by the father, but the man is loving and caring, and intent on teaching his son how to be a man, and how to act properly.One review said that this was like "sipping hot cider in front of a crackling potbellied stove", and that felt true. It's a rare experience to be allowed a glimpse into another way of life, and have it done so masterfully.With regard to the "graphic" nature of the novel, it wasn't graphic - it was descriptive. Anyone that's read James Herriot's books (All Things Great and Small, etc.) understands this. That's what happened here. If the description in the first chapter of Rob's assistance in birthing the two cows was the only place such description was used, then it could be considered gratuitous. But it wasn't. The author was meticulous in his detail, even for the most mundane things, like creating a tool to help their ox create a pen for Rob's new pig, Pinky.It's understandable that some parents might not find some of the scenes in the book suitable for their children. But that is *their* opinion. They can police books for their children all they want, and, of course, attempt to do so here. But a review shouldn't be about policing - it should be a fair assessment of the work. How this book could make young adults lives more miserable than they already are (because this presupposes that young adults' lives are already miserable, a theorem far too broad to prove) is beyond me.There is much good in this book. To ignore it because of a gory detail or two would be a shame.And...this gets high marks for one of the best titles I've seen in a long time. Not only provocative and nearly impossible to miss while browsing through bookshelves at your local bookstore or library, but absolutely, perfectly suited to the book.
Excellent Christian Resource. Tom Carder does an excellent job of providing insight into not only why so many families are faced with the travesty of infidelity but also offers precise, Christian based exercises for working through the pain for both the betrayed spouse and the wayward spouse and effecting proven recovery methods to rebuild that relationship
Encyclopedia Prehistorica Sharks and Other Sea Monsters. As always, the pop-Up books by Robert Sabuda are amazing.  I loved it and my granddaughter was thrilled with it.  Wonderfully well done.
Simply Brilliant!. Komunyakaa is by far the best American poet writing today.  Pay no attention to those who fail to understand his unique way with words.  Purists write boring poetry anyway..
My Attitude is Great About This Book. I heard Keith Harrell speak at a sales meeting in January and immediately bought his book.  Keith is the real deal.  He weaves stories about his life into the principles he reveals about how much our attitude effects our lives and the lives of those around us.  He obviously has a relationship with God, and he uses that relationship as the foundation stone for his belief system.  I highly recommend this book for adults and teenagers alike
one of the best books ever written. I couldnt put this book down. It takes you to a simpler time and you feel as if you are there with the characters
A slight disappointment. After reading another one of her a little books of I had to have this one.  I have to say I was disappointed at the instruction level this book lacked.  I hoped to see where placement of object offected the energy of the alter. but instead I got a mini glossery and soen examples.  The infomation in the glossery section is very helpful though
This book reminds us of what customer care is all about. Beautifully written in a conversational style, this book is easy to read and makes you feel as though you have personally known the author for a long time. The message is undeniable and Ms. Turner's stories drive that point home without question. If you want good customers and want repeat business, here's how to do it
Theodore Seuss Geisel, pro-life apostle. My favorite quote from this inspired fable is repeated by Dr. Seuss at least twice in the text:  "A person's a person, no matter how small."
Character Study. "The Marines Of Autumn" by James Brady. St. Martin's Press, New York 2000.On the very last page of this fiction book, the author, James Brady declares that the main character, Thomas Verity, was modeled after Brady's rifle company commander in the Taebeck Mountains of North Korea.  That commander was Captain John H. Chafee of Rhode Island, later U. S. Senator from Rhode Island, and Secretary of the Navy.It seems to me that this novel is a character study, where the author, James Brady, presents a portrait of the ideal Marine infantry officer, with both good parts and bad parts.  Captain Thomas Verity is different, if not unique, as a Marine officer because he was born and raised in China, speaks Chinese, because he has seen combat (e.g. Guadalcanal) and then, because, after the War, he had gone to college.  As the Korean War begins, Verity is teaching at Georgetown University.His ability to speak Chinese was the main reason that Captain Verity was recalled to active duty, as the Marines needed someone to monitor Chinese Communist radio traffic in China just across the border from North Korea.  Probably, the author has given this linguistic ability to his main character so that Captain Verity can be privy to the meetings of higher level officers who believe that the Chinese Army is coming.  This permits James Brady to make comments about the U.S. high command's pig headiness about the ability of the Chinese to invade Korea to support their Communistic allies.  It also allows Brady to zap General Douglas MacArthur who repeatedly denied the presence of the Chinese Army at the borders of North Korea or inside North Korea proper.  It is apparent that James Brady does not care for MacArthur, for, as an example in Chapter Two, (page 22) he has one person calling MacArthur, "The Mikado himself".On a poignant note, the main character, Captain Verity, had lost his wife.  Now, with the death of Captain Verity, the young daughter, Kate, will be an orphan.  She asks, "And who will take me now to France to see the bridges".
My Spirit Guide. I love all of Sylvie's books. They are very informative and enlighting
Best haunted House novel ever written!. This book is one of the scariest  horror novels ever written and THE best haunted house novel, period. No lesser scribe than Stephen King has also expressed that sentiment. This book has no faults; it moves with a stream-lined precision and ratchets up the tension to an almost unbearable pitch before coming to a satisfying conclusion.Made into an excellent film in 1973.
From a dud to a stud concerning DNA info!. I thought DNA science was a weak science because of the O.J. trail. But The Genomics Age has made me realize that I was way wrong. This book has impacted my thinking regarding the DNA topic, and I feel I am now as informed as the next guy because of this easy-to-read manual. I actually liked reading this book, my first non-fiction book ever since college. Thanks Amazon for the interesting info. I now want to live to be 100 years old so I can reap the benefits of DNA science that this book has suggested are coming
One of Wells' better works of fiction. William Leadford is a young London Socialist, leading a life of quiet desperation. Around him, the whole world seems to be unraveling, as capitalist wage war on their own workers, and nation rises up against nation. And through it all, a comet has entered the Solar System, and may indeed be aimed straight at Earth. Can the system that dominates men's lives survive its seeming inevitable destruction? And if the comet should strike the planet, what will be the result?This now largely forgotten work was written by H.G. Wells (1866-1946) in 1906, during his brief sojourn with the Fabian Society. This book is less science fiction than his earlier works, such as the Invisible Man and the War of the Worlds, and is more of a political polemic. In it, we get to see the inevitable destruction of the capitalist system that the antediluvian Socialists predicted. But more, Wells uses the comet as a vehicle to posit a new utopia, where man has awakened from his childhood as a species and puts behind him such things as private ownership of land, nationalism, religion, and so much more. Indeed, this book marks Wells' open advocation of free love, which eroded his popularity among the reading public.Now, as for the book itself, I am of two minds. The book starts out rather slowly, and I found myself rather bored with it. But, as it continued, it began to pick up steam, and became quite an interesting read. This is one of Wells' better works of fiction, being much better (in my opinion) than Tono-Bungay and the Food of the Gods.So, if you are a fan of Edwardian literature, or just like a good story, then you will definitely like this book. I highly recommend it.
Game Changing. Every once in a while, an idea or an individual comes along that changes the playing field, the rules of the game, the expected outcomes, or a little of it all.  God Is At Work has the potential for such an impact.I read this book in tandem with "Why Globalization Works" by Martin Wolf.  The "co-reading" had a unique effect.  I felt like Wolf was doing the best job I had read yet of being realistic in his assessment of the free market's potential in emerging markets, given the various undeniable and constraining dynamics at work in those places --- be it infrastructure, tariffs, corruption, education, etc.  Then I was opening up GIAW and reading very similar things yet in ways that coupled an understanding of how the spiritual world was relevant as well.The immediate impression was that GIAW was obviously not written by surmising Christian business hacks.  This book had serious weight and knew its stuff.  To me this was very refreshing as I am an admitted skeptic of Christian culture trying to photocopy yet one more secular realm --- from self help, to Christian music, to Christian novels, to Christian movies, now to Christian business.These were my key impressions...1) Few people really address well the "corruption tax" of developing nations ... GIAW nailed it.  De Soto quantifies it in "Mystery of Capital" (to some extent), but GIAW got to the heart with the concept of "spiritual capital" which I found to be absolutely profound.2) Few people really address well the concept that for business to succeed in emerging markets there has to be reformation in every corner of society --- cultural, spiritual, political, and the underlying economics.  Of the works I've read, most people hone in on the last two --- I think because there afraid to attempt the first and don't know where to begin on the second (because they probably honestly don't count it).3) The clarification of differences between business as missions, business for missions, etc was terrific and much needed.  I think things can get fuzzy in this corner and some of the practical application points might need further fleshing out, but in general, the value of business as a mission in and of it self desperately needed to be clarified among Christians.  Again, GIAW nailed this.4) My one hang-up was the terminology "kingdom business".  It probably really boils down to semantics and my previously noted "resistance" to Christianity's persistent need to clarify its Christian intent.  On the flip side, there is the need to distinguish the characteristics of the business model proposed by GIAW from that pursued by most "secular" business people, so a title or nomenclature is probably required.I hope this will be a breakthrough for the thousands of Christian businesspeople who have longed to know how they can contribute and who have felt on the short end of the very real, yet very wrong spiritual totem pole.  I hope the church embraces the thinking, and that in the long term the game changes in ways that will elevate the impact of this and future generations of believers
Another great novel by Reichs!!. When Temperance takes over on an archeological dig on a small island off the Carolina's, her thoughts center on her relationships, her nearly divorced husband and her tentative relationship with her boyfriend.  As confusion reigns supreme in her personal life, professionally she is about to face another challenge involving what appears to be a series of similar murders.  Is there a serial murderer loose on the island? As she gets closer to the truth, her life and those around her are in imminent danger.  Can she protect those she loves and will the resulting circumstances change everything she feels to be right.To compare Kathy Reichs to other authors is a disservice to her.  She is a talented, creative author with an intimate knowledge and a wealth of experiences to draw from.
It Doesn't Get Any Better. I have read every one of Coulter's books and more romance than I could ever care to count, and this ranks up there as one of my all time favorites of any romance and most fiction books. North fascinated me from the time that he was introduced in Wyndham. I waited impatiently for his story, and I was not disappointed. He is the epitome of the brooding, tortured romantic hero, much in the spirit of Rochester and Heathcliff, but without the violent Gothic tendencies. His brooding is partly by choice, partly hereditary and he does his best to turn it into something silly so that the melancholy does not consume him the way it did his father and grandfather. Caroline is a heroine who, though sometimes a little goofy, is determined and strong and will do whatever it takes to get what she wants. In this case, she wants North, and who can blame her? The secondary characters are typical of Coulter's creations in that they are wonderfully fun and witty. Some of the great moments o!f the book occur during the interactions between North's misogynistic household and Caroline's pregnant charges. The story is basically about a man struggling desperately not to become like those who came before him, a plot that is by no means uncommon, but in Coulter's capable hands, the characters jump out and take on a life of their own, making this story, and specifically its hero, insurpassable. If only we all had a man like North in our life. The world would definitely be a happier place for me
Context is the king of this comedy!. THE MERCHANT OF VENICE can be described as a tragedy only if one follows the modern definition of "tragedy" and not the Greek. The genre of tragedy in which Shakespeare wrote required that all of the players, or at least all of the main players, die at the end,  la ROMEO AND JULIET, JULIUS CAESAR, MACBETH, and HAMLET. In fact, MERCHANT OF VENICE can only be described as a tragedy if Shylock is seen as the main character and not Antonio. (Note, in the list of players at the beginning of the play, only Antonio is called a "merchant of Venice".) In sum, THE MERCHANT OF VENICE can only be described as a tragedy if it is completely removed from its historical context.Shakespeare intended that the actions taken by Antonio, by Shylock, by Bassanio, and even by Portia be seen as comically extreme. Antonio goes to the lengths of seeking help from a man he despises to help a man he loves. Shylock demands nothing but justice, even when the demands of the agreement he made is met and even doubled. Everywhere in this play is there action taken to the extreme.Only a refusal to acknowledge the historical context would be blind to the comedy. There are stage plays, television shows, and screenplays aplenty which follow the example set forth in MERCHANT OF VENICE, showing how comical people can be when their actions are taken to the extreme. If MERCHANT OF VENICE can be view in THIS context, then the comedy shines through.As a writer, I find it comical that anyone would use MERCHANT OF VENICE to point the finger of "racism" at Shakespeare. Part of a writer's challenge is to present convincingly views even he or she disagrees with. The best writer would try to dismantle and disprove the very beliefs he or she holds dear. That Shakespeare has often been judged a racist based on his portrayal of Shylock serves only as testimony to the continuing success of this play. Shylock's speech, complimented by another reviewer, is ample proof that Shakespeare's own views are well hid. Shylock's speech demonstrates magnificently that Shakespeare was able to get inside the head of any man (or woman) in his stories and write the words which that man would speak, faithfully render the thoughts which that man would think, have that man act as only that man would act, and all of it be believable. Simply put, unless you knew beforehand a writer's views on any subject, it would be difficult to find the needle of truth in his or her haystack of fiction if that writer has done their job well, and in this case Shakespeare was damned near flawless!It is true that the movie, starring Al Pacino, does not present this play as a comedy, but that hardly detracts from its excellence. It shows, in fact, that MERCHANT OF VENICE plays well as both a drama and a comedy. In our age, however, given the importance of religious tolerance, I'll admit that it is probably best played as a drama.As for the Pelican series of Shakespeare's plays, they are an excellent resource for anyone wanting to read and study the Bard's work. I've several volumes in this series and hope to eventually own them all. Each volume contains two identical essays, "The Theatrical World" (which provides a good understanding of the historical context, as well as an idea of just how much we know about Shakespeare as an individual) and "The Texts of Shakespeare" (which gives more historical context and also discusses some of the difficulties which editors have experienced in presenting these plays in print to modern audiences). There is then an introduction to each play, which is best left unread until afterwards if you aren't familiar with the play. The footnotes are few, but well-chosen, and do help in understanding words and phrases whose meanings have changed over the centuries
A Dr. Laura Avoider. I have avoided Dr. Laura, her books, and her radio program for many years, fearing she would say something about me I didn't want to recognize.  Ten Stupid Things did just that.  How sad it is that women have such low self-esteem(though Gangi in her book explains this more as the lack of self-love)that they feel they have to settle for whatever and, more importantly, whomever pays any attention to them. If we would think twice, look in the mirror and truly love the person looking back, maybe we could lower the count from 10 to 1 or 2
Sensitive, caring and instructive ; a gentle guide !. I felt as though I were guided by a caring friend throughout the ins and outs of journal keeping.  That Ms.Schiwy illuminates the many different ways to keep a journal and, as well, the different reasons why someone would benefit emotionally as well as spiritually, is a plus.  Perhaps we all could just pick up any old book and take pen in hand, and nothing would be wrong with that , be she makes the adventure of recording one's thoughts much more interesting and potentially more creative by her suggestions.  Added highlights are excerpts from other women's journals, as well as her own.  A must have book for anyone looking to undwerstand themselves better through the art of journal writing
Food For Fifty. Very well written book, leaves nothing for the mind to question,I would highly recomend this book
PROMISING. This is a promising books on how to flip on a market that's appreciating faster than you can say "holy cow".  The problem is, we're going through a slowdown, but the information here is still reliable for things like selling a house in a buyer's market -- you need to make your presentation look good in order to sell a house.  That's a no-brainer to most I'm sure, but specific tips on this book (without giving the plot away), is helpful.Other investment books to supplement this:The Beginner's Guide to Real Estate Tax Lien and Tax Deed Auctions(ISBN: 0978834607
Great resource for the classroom!. Unlike Schindler's List, in Divided Lives, a book by Cynthia Crane, the reader is able to put a face with a name and learn about personal experiences before, during, and after the war.  No longer are these people just statistics, but they are actual people who had a life that was turned upside down by the Holocaust.  Divided Lives is the type of resource that could be used in schools, especially high school, to show the truth about what Holocaust victims went through day after day and the effects it had on the rest of their lives.  Divided Lives not only shows students about the uniqueness of this period in history, but children can also connect on an emotional level and learn an appreciation for their own lives and the human race
Comprehensive review of fundamental concepts. the book gives the fundamentals of risk management. You can grasp the idea of duration, convexity and other commonly used terms. The book especially tells how you will use the terms, not to derive them. I recommend the book,  it is indeed usefu
A Groundbreaking Work. Ignore the silly reviews (here on Amazon) that attempt to pigeon-hole this work as somehow relevant ONLY if one believes the principles of radical feminism. Yes, Young is a feminist. But this book is about much, much more than that. It asks a question that has long needed answering: Do classical conceptions of justice (i.e. distributive justice) adequately account for the diverse experiences of differently situated actors? And if not, how are some groups and individuals marginalized by the dominant philosophical conceptions of justice which have become part of the background understanding of Western civilization? It is Young's wonderful journey seeking an answer to this question that we find in "Justice and the Politics of Difference," and the journey is worth taking with her.
Best Series My Eyes Ever Read. The first two books of the series(Ghost King &amp; Last Sword of Power)are not necessarily needed in the jon shannow adventure but if you want a little bit of a base on the history of the stones of power then I would  recommend you read the whole series but if you want to get to the really  good stuff then start with number three.  I garuntee when you finish number  five you will wish there were lots more to follow i
Refreshing!. I've taught writing for 12 years, and this is one of the best books I've come across in that time. The only reason I didn't give it five stars has nothing to do with the authors--... A book on writing should be especially well-checked for typos and layout errors, but this one has more than its fair share. Still, this is a good book, and I look forward to using it in my teaching
Strongly recommended to all business managers, both the novice and the experienced. Financial Intelligence: A Manager's Guide To Knowing What The Numbers Really Mean by Karen Berman and Joe Knight (owners of the Los Angeles-based Business Literacy institute) with management expert John Case is an innovative and "user friendly" instructional guide to proper and intelligible management of finances and business oriented decision making. Financial Intelligence is an impressive compendium of guidelines and information including the basics of financial measurement, reading income statements, balancing sheets, cash flow statements, separating hard data from the assumptions and estimates, the mechanics of analysis, calculating ratios, return on investment, working on capital, knowing the difference between cash and profit, financial literacy and transparency and how to recognize how the two can boost performance. Financial Intelligence is very strongly recommended to all business managers, both the novice and the experienced, as everyone has something to learn.
Shocking developments regarding Roarke's past. In my mind, one of the keys to keep a series going as long as J.D. Robb has is to get the readers to identify with the characters at some level. That is why the author provides us with information about the main characters' past in every book, and continues developing their stories looking forward. We have seen that a good portion of the previous novels has been devoted to the past of our heroine, Lieutenant Eve Dallas. The abuse by her father and the shock of killing him when she was a kid in order to escape are present in every installment of this series. We do know some facts about Roarke's past too, an abusive father and a mother that abandoned him, but in this novel we are faced with a truth that shakes the foundation of the billionaire.Besides the personal stories, we are always presented with cleverly crafted mysteries, and even though in this book the case Eve is working on takes a secondary part, it fulfills its role regarding entertainment, action and suspense. Everything starts when Nadine Furst, a reporter for channel 75 and friend of Eve, receives an anonymous message that leads her to believe someone is dead. She calls Eve and the lieutenant quickly finds the body of a young girl inside a recycle bin. Nadine not only received a message, but also photos of the victim before and after being killed, with the latter one being staged. The victim was taking a course in imaging, so Eve and her aide Delia Peabody start going after the killer with this consideration in mind. As Robb has done in some of her previous books, we get to "read into the killer mind" in some of the passages and find out that this person believes that the victims will live forever through the images.This one is one of the best installments in the series so far because the developments in Roarke's personal story create an unparalleled eagerness on the reader. I know it did in my case, since I read this one in a single sitting. There are also other developments, like the relationship between Peabody and McNabb moving forward with them thinking about living together, and the fact that Mavis is pregnant. As the series progresses, I have found that it is harder and harder for the author to inform the reader of everything that has occurred in the past of this set of characters, so you will be missing important points if you have not read the previous books. For those that have been following Eve's adventures, I hope that you agree with me in that this book is without a doubt among the best by Robb
Delightful. This book was a wonderful read.  Funny, light, somewhat educational.  Easy to read.  Descriptive to the point that I felt I was there.GREAT!
A good read with some dissapointments. Early Christian Families in Context is a very thorough academic exploration of family, gender and sexual issues in mostly the Greek-Roman world with some reference to Old Testament Israel. While some space is allotted to New Testament sources, this book falls short in not delivering the promise in the title by focusing more on the context (which is great) than on bringing new insight to the phenomenon of Christian Families within the particular context (which is not so great)
Commendable. I do not like Jeffrey Deaver's work. However, a family friend of mine surprised me by sending me in which I promised to read without looking at the cover or looking at the top of the pages to see who had written it. Though hard to do, I managed to read two stories without checking who the author was. When I saw it was Deaver, I was shocked. These stories are absolutely wonderful. Though they are mainly mystery/suspense, there's a sort of twilight zone feel to them. I would highly reccomend this to anyone, regardless of what genres they read.
NOLS Cookery is hot!. I really liked this book on backcountry meal preparation. There are all sorts of usefull ideas from meal planning to packaging. The bulk of this book contains a large list of actual recipes proven at the NOLS. I liked the fact that the book actually has recipes that you could use. I expected a little more in the stove and cookware category, but only a minor gripe. I really did enjoy this book and plan on using it for future camping trips
reality explored. This book explores the forgotten reality of human history from the source. Genuinely educating book
Excellent resource for families and friends. As a nutrition therapist I recommend this book to the parents of clients I am working with. Carolyn Costin offers professional guidance to parents with the her unique perspective as a recovered patient. The chapters  intended for Mom and then Dad are especially helpful in gaining an  understanding in the development and treatment of eating disorders. If you  suspect or know that your daughter has an eating disorder I highly  recommend this book
Larry takes the Republicans to task also. Larry has really exposed many of todays key problems and he presents them very clearly.  He takes on the liberals and Democrats, but doesn't hold back when apportioning responsibility to the Republicans as well.  Larry's views can best be described as libertarian with a view to America's role in the world.  This one goes on the must-read list for my teenage son
Beautiful, Sincere, Sad and Real. These three women lead very different lives but are brought together in a small prison town in Texas. Their lives are deep and involving. The reader enjoys hearing each of their voices because the chapters are separated by narrator so each voice, point of veiw and personality come through wonderfully. This book is wonderful, I read it in two sittings! It's so touching and though if you were to tell someone about the plot they would be like, "oh how depressing, why would you want to read that??" But even though it deals with sad/depressing issues and all three women have painful lives this book is not a DOWNER!!My only complaint was that is wasn't longer, I wanted to know more about the surviving women. I would read a sequel in a second! Read this book, it's beautiful
good account , informative, a little cheer-leading. In a mostly affectionate look at the origins and rise of the prime Arabic channel, the book manages to intersperse historical story telling, behind-the-scenes accounts, and political commentary.  Intentionally or not, the book provides an interesting case study in the differences in style, philosophy, structure of Western channels like CNN, Fox and Arabic channels (though only Al JAzeera is discussed in detail as can be expected from the title).  Certainly, at least for a non-Arabic reader, the book provides a wealth of information on TV/media scenario in mid-Eastern region.One could argue that the author is predisposed to some degree of cheerleading AlJazeera, but given the detailed research and discussion on the efforts of non-Quatar countries in the region, the U.S. and U.K. to shut down or impede the operations of the channel, it is clear that the channel has managed to become the enemy of everyone on almost all issues.  Maybe as the author implies, the channel is infact doing something right!  There is no doubt that a readers respect for CNN will decrease after reading the book and considering that until this book, Western media focused on villifying this channel, the book is bound to temper those wrong notions....Maybe the channel will get its due respect.  One can easily be swayed by flag waving "experts" on talkshows (some of whom have been semi-exposed in this book), this book is a fairly good "other side of the story" for those willing to listen.  Persuasiveness of the author is diminished by what seems his blind cheerleading of the channel....An excellent read, providing accounts of the main Gulf wars and 9/11 from a different perspective devoid of sensationalism
Insightful, brilliant, and exceptionally well-written. Professor Fox does a fantastic job in this deeply introspective work of late nineteenth-century American culture, society, and religion. The Beecher-Tilton episode, now virtually forgotten, deserves retelling. With  unusual deftness, Fox treats perpetually relevant questions regarding the  nature of love and reworks them in this incredible story. Fox recounts the  scandal in a refreshingly new perspective that captures the essence of  American social, cultural, and religious life in the 1870s. A high-quality  work in the historiography of American cultural history
Stop the drugs!. Hello my son was told he was ADHD and took the Ritilin and other forms of the drug, but the side effects were terrible and I couldn't handle the head aches,upset stomaches and not wanting to eat! So I felt there was someone else out there that can help these children get off the drugs. My son was worth the help I could find, my mother saw an article on Dr.Bob's book, "how to stop ritalin in 18 days", so i got the book, than had to meet him, Dr.Bob. My son is know on vitiamns, eating healthier and getting his spine back into shape. He is more calmer and doing well in school. Its not easy but our childern are worth it, for me its better to see him happy than sick on the drugs.The books are a good sorce of information in guiding them(the children) into teaching our kids how to eat healthy and to be aware of what they are eating,and what it can do to them.They need to be educated now and forever, this will help them well into the families.Thank You, Dr. Bob and God Bless You,as you continue!
Insightful and Essential. A master of his craft, in "Propaganda" Edward Bernays splendidly advocates the art he defines as the "consistent, enduring effort to create or shape events to influence the relations of the public to an enterprise, idea or group." (p.52).  Some may recoil from his assertions that propaganda is necessary to give order to a chaotic world and that in a democracy an intelligent minority must "regiment and guide the masses" ... "to clear understanding and intelligent action."  (p.127 & 128)As refreshing today as when he wrote eighty years ago, Bernays explains that, contrary to what many believe, propaganda is not confined to corporate advertising, but is indispensable to political parties, special interest groups, news media, and some government agencies.  Indeed, today's global warming "crisis" would cease to exist without it.Bernays declares propagandists should maintain certain principles including refusing clients believed to be dishonest, products that are fraudulent, and not engaging in deceit or outright lying.  Though severely criticized for establishing the successful cigarette advertising campaigns for tobacco companies, he demonstrated his integrity by dropping the companies as clients when he became convinced of the strong association between smoking cigarettes and lung cancer.  Unfortunately, many modern practitioners are not as scrupulous.This concise book is compelling for those who dare to think on their own rather than being told by an elite few what to think and how to act.
Great Look at a Familiar Event. This is a great read.  The characters are well developed and colorful.  The story takes a familiar event and adds surprising plot twists.  This book made me want to read MORE of Littell
A Nightmarish Testimony. This book is the fascinating memoir of Eugenia Semyonova Ginsburg, who lived through the reign of terror that was unleashed by Stalin from 1937 onwards. Ginsburg is an excellent author who clearly articulates the progress of her decent into madness of the purges.This book starts in the late 1930's when Ginsburg began to be implicated by association in "anti-party activity." Although she had been a strong supporter of communism and Stalinism, her past activities would serve no good in the madness to come. It follows her from the initial interrogations the prisons right through to the gulag. This is an amazing life story, one which I would never wish to experience, and will keep you glued to this book until the end.I really was fascinated by the depth of understanding that she carried while going through the events that she did. I was really intrigued by her exposure of how logic and wisdom went out the window as communism blinded the eyes of the populous to turn on each other in such a brutal way
Love it. The price was excellent, and it came quickly.  My husband loves that Bible, and uses it exclusively
Clear, thorough book for pie baking. I found this book to be indispensible for baking pies. I have hundreds for cookbooks and this is one of the most used book of all the ones I own. The directions are clear and all the recipes I have tried are delicious and have gotten rave reviews from other tasters. I especially liked the pear  tart, blueberry pie with crumb topping, and sweet potato pie. I will be  buying one as a gift this Christmas for my best friend, because she keeps  borrowing it.Great book
The Big We....as opposed to the me me me world. Great great book for monastics like me very akin to spirit friend interaction. Unlike the author, Mark Macy, I am new to ITC and the luminator, but then again I need not know the ins and outs of how my car works to take me where I care to go. Besides, we all like pictures from which to consider and learn, more easily. I offer the idea that much like chanting and Mozart effect physical and mental stillness (so to go beyond), so must the luminator.To me, this book is a very special bridge for the physical egomind which has been closed by rational thought to conscious essence and the possibilities therein of thought conversation (think talking and traveling). Yes, in the dismal egocentered realms of life, such things are not possible due to the many narrow or exculsionary perspectives therein. But just take a look at what this man knows and is sharing with the world in this book. WOW!I've never met Mark Macy nor did I know of ITC before this read, but I find it very very interesting that I have learned (over the years) the same interactive process of which he writes by leaving the slug-like egomind realm and exploring. Some of my best friends no longer have a physical form, are honest beyond measure, and exist to create more of the same;and they know this.Read this book, consider the possibilities it places before you, feel the buzz it creates in you. I dare you! What? No buzz, you say. Lordy lordy, still packing way too much egomind resistance for this new paradigm. Open up your intention and throttle down the fear, one way or another, you'll get There
A Great Leap Forward in the Saga. If you've gotten this far, you know what a kick the Bone series is. Strong, stylish and effective graphics (think Alex Toth) merges with writing that mixes grand epic fantasy with strong character work and  riotous slapstick humor. What you need to know is that volume six carries  more than its weight in the saga-- a whole raft of mysteries are cleared up  here including yet more info about the royal family, the hooded bad guy,  and the search for the one who bears the star. It's a masterpiece of  plotting-- nothing is expected and yet Smith doesn't pull any of his  solutions out of left field. Buy this (and any of the others you're  missing), plunk down in a comfy chair, and read straight through all six
do yourself a favor and read it!. This novel got great reviews and then got forgotten.  That is a shame.  Everything You Know is funny, sad, moving, and utterly convincing.  Ms. Heller did a superb job of getting inside the mind, body and soul of man  just past his middle age.  It's quite a feat and quite a book
Great book, Great author. I don't think DV knows how to write a dud book. In his typical style, this book is a great source for all things induction related. This book is great for someone who has little knowledge on the subject, as it clearly explains  all the fundamentals. It is also just as valuable for the more experienced  engine builder/racer as it contains loads of info on carb mods, manifold  design and mods, mixtures, atomization, etc. It also dispells many myths  that do nothing except slow you down.  Rather than writing books based on  popular and expert opinions, DV's books are based on hard scientific fact.  He does the work, and he has the results.  Knowledge is horsepower! With  DV's books, I've never gone wrong. On a horsepower per dollar basis, his  books are the best investment you'll ever make
A sad, beautiful story. The heart of this book is terrific.  The dialogue, the description and the passion in language and emotion really distinguish this novel
Charming story enhanced with affectionate color drawings. Guess Who's Coming, Jesse Bear is the latest of the Jesse Bear series, a charming set of soft-cover picturebooks about young Jesse Bear, his family, and his friends. In Guess Who's Coming, Jesse Bear, the young ursine shares a delightful week-long visit from his cousin, with outdoor excursions, playtime and happy memories. Written by Nancy White Carlstrom in simple, friendly rhyming verse, and illustrated by Bruce Degen with affectionate color drawings, Guess Who's Coming, Jesse Bear is a highly enjoyable and recommended read-aloud story
Brutally honest. I admit to not being able to pick Bill Moyers out of a crowd - so the fact that this was written by his son made very little difference to me.What did make a huge difference, however, is the brutal honesty in this book.  William Moyers is an addict and admits it.  He does not shy away from the [...] that he did while in the throes of his addiction which makes this story of recovery all the more fascinating.Also really enjoyed his take on Hazelden, which I believe is often overlooked in the world of addictionn - but is a god send.Thank you William for writing such a wonderful book.  Of course, it comes out of your pain - but I am so grateful to you for sharing
powerful and troubling, an important book. History is often written on the grand stage.  The huge battles or landmark laws are recorded.  The feelings of the children whose parents are caught up in the "monumental events" are rarely recorded.  In "Let Me Go, Helga Schneider has given us just such an account.  Her mother was a seemingly unapologetic nazi who abandoned her family to serve Hitler.  Helga is now going to visit her dying mother, who is possibly suffering from dementia.  Helga just needs to know, and engages in incredibly difficult conversations with her mother.  Is her mother still rational?  Is she telling the truth?  Why would she do the brutal things that she herself describes (including tortures and nonchalantly sending another woman who offended her to be enslaved in a brothel).  This is compelling reading, and an underappreciated way of knowing history.  The only comment I have, and it is not directed at Schneider, but at society in general.  We are always surprised when it is a woman who in engages in such terrifying acts, as it violates the stereotype of female behavior.  We would probably not be as surprised if this book were written in terms of going to see her aged father.
authoritative English word origins. The original and revised editions of this text bring to a wider public the results of over two centuries of work in historical linguistics.  For many decades the typical books on Indo-European were dense tomes of closely-argued etymological debate and learned controversy over the finer points about how the original language may have sounded.  Of greater interest to most readers with an interest in word origins and the history of English are the reconstructed words themselves and the progress of a word or word-root through 60 centuries of use and transformation to the present day.  As Watkins notes in his introduction, this dictionary "is designed and written for the general English speaking public and not for specialists in the field of Indo-European linguistics."  The author, a Harvard professor of Classics and Linguistics, popularizes without diluting.  By restricting his focus to English and its close Germanic relatives and forbears, Watkins can include a comprehensive catalog of 1300+ word roots and their development without causing the book to run to thousands of pages.  Some of the most interesting entries are the "language and culture" notes for particularly significant words. Especially in the slim paperback edition, this is a welcome book for anyone in love with words and curious about their origins
Best book on Libya in a decade--THE definitive analysis!. Having just ordered Vandewalle's book for my seminar and lecture course, I can only wish this insightful account of Qadhafi's revolution--and its link to the Sanusi kingdom's attempt to avoid creating a modern state--had been  available much earlier.  It is easily the most sophisticated analysis of  the country ever written, and the thoughtful application of a modified  rational choice and institutional literature to the puzzle of a seeming  absence of state-building in Libya is first-rate and clearly demonstrates  how political scientists/political economists can integrate theoretical  concepts and factual material in a provocative fashion.  In addition,  Vandewalle writes extremely well, in a fashion that makes the theoretical  material accessible even for non-specialists.  This book is a real  tour-de-force, recommended to anyone interested in North Africa and the  Middle East and the problem of state creation in the region
my first exposure to Franzen. Franzen writes in such an evenhanded tone that it is hard to imagine anyone being mad at him.  He is by turns incisive, thoughtful, and intellectual, but his terrain is a personal one, in which he reflects on himself and his reaction to the modern world.  Hardly the stuff of polemics.As the cliche goes, though, beauty is only skin deep and where I see at worst banal observations about Franzen's attempts to make sense of his disconnectedness from the world, he finds people who react to him negatively; those who call him an 'elitist' or an intellectual do not like the fact that he has used the word 'diurnality' in his prose.Now, here's a curious phenomenon: Franzen, an author who seems quite at odds with the modern world, achieves success in the form of an endorsement from Oprah Winfrey.  Ophah Winfrey, who could hardly be less controversial and more banal than Franzen, endorsed his novel "The Corrections".  Suddenly, Franzen had more publicity than he had ever had before; a film crew wanted him to go back to his childhood house in St. Louis, and he started receiving hate mail, from those self-satisfied mensches in the midwest who do not like the "diurnality" in his prose.What do we have here?  Well, I'm not an earnest person, and my admittedly cynical take on this whole scenario (which at once seems to befuddle and concern Franzen) is that many people who could charitably be called casual readers have their choices distilled for them by Oprah.  In general, this is an admirable goal; anything that increases the amount people read has to be a good thing if we accept that reading itself is intrinsically good.  But a unexpected problem arises when you are dealing with a person like Winfrey.  Winfrey is successful because of her safe banality; she does not, to use a cliche, push boundaries, nor does she demand much of her viewers.  Her "I'm Ok, you're OK" rhetoric has earned her millions, in both fans and dollars.Thus, we have the endorsement of a novel like "The Corrections," which, as I understand it, explores the existential angst of three smug, self-absorbed urbanites who, in certain ways, pine for the quotidian pleasures that their suburban parents take for granted.  All well and good.  But, ahh, that writing.  The demands, the heavy use of abstruse words.  Why "diurnality"?  Why not just "daily" or some such other simple, immediately accessible word?  We want our reading like we want our Oprah!  Spoonfed to us so we know what to think, what to feel, and how to react.Therein lies Franzen's troubles: he wants to be alone in the world, to think, to cogitate, to enjoy language and the written word, and, well, everyone else seems to want the artifice of American pop culture
Also look at  Energy at the Crossroads by Vaclav Smil. This book has been well reviewed by others and I do not wish to reiterate their comments.  I have no expertise in the field but I find little to disagree with - we are in trouble, our lifestyle is going to change and the sooner we start dealing with it the more of our culture we can preserve.  I am writing to suggest another source of information which comes to the same conclusions but is a little less alarmist and which is not mentioned in Heinberg's book nor in the Amazon lists of what others who bought this book bought.  This is Energy at the Crossroads by by Vaclav Smil.  It was reviewed in Nature, one of the two most respected of our scientific journals, by Michael Grubb who concludes it is "The most sober, thorough, and thoughtful integrated text on energy available, and it embodies core facts and some fundamental truths that any analyst of energy issues should ponder."   Smil is an academic who has studying energy issues for 40 years.  He is less inclined to forecast than Heinberg having seen so many erroneous predictions however he is clear about the coming end of oil.  He goes into more depth on energy issues, global warming, and especially the alternatives to fossil fuel (no great news).  He does not have the activist impulses of Heinberg - which may of course be good or too bad depending on what it takes to change course.  Smil's book is both longer and more difficult to read because of the amount of science presented and I found it well worth the effort
Good for vegetarians and meat eaters!. This is an exhaustive text -- no stone was left unturned.  Recipes, tips and advice (cook once for two meals).  This book covers it all.  It pulls recipes from multiple cuisines.It's great even if you are not vegetarian.  Many of the recipes can be used to accompany meat dishes
A worthwhile, good book. A nice book! Well-writen and there is a lot of substance here. This is a very useful reference book, and although a bit weak in the maps of the 19th century (especially maps of America interest), it is overall worthwhile and a good source of old map information
Lord of my love, to whom in vassalage. Thy merit hath my duty strongly knit,To thee I send this written embassage,To witness duty, not to show my wit.(Sonnet 26.)How to do justice to the legacy of literary history's greatest mind -- moreover in such a limited review? Forget Goethe's "universal genius" and his rebel contemporary Schiller; forget the 19th century masters; forget contemporary literature: with the possible (!) exception of three Greek gentlemen named Aischylos, Sophocles and Euripides, a certain Frenchman called Poquelin (a/k/a Moliere), and that infamous Irishman Oscar Wilde, there's more wit in a single line of Shakespeare's than in an entire page of most other, even great, authors' works. And I'm not saying this in ignorance of, or in order to slight any other writer: it's precisely my admiration of the world's literary giants, past and present, that makes me appreciate Shakespeare even more -- and that although I'm aware that he repeatedly borrowed from pre-existing material and that even the (sole) authorship of the works published under his name isn't established beyond doubt. For ultimately, the only thing that matters to me is the brilliance of those works themselves; and quite honestly, the mysteries continuing to enshroud his person, to me, only enhance his larger-than-life stature.The precise dating of Shakespeare's sonnets -- like other poets', a response to the 1591 publication of Sir Philip Sidney's "Astrophil and Stella" -- is an even greater guessing game than that of his plays: although #138 and #144 (slightly modified) appeared in 1599's "Passionate Pilgrim," most were probably circulated privately, and written years before their first -- unauthorized, though still authoritative -- 1609 publication; possibly beginning in 1592-1593.Format-wise, they adopt the Elizabethan fourteen-line-structure of three quatrains of iambic pentameters expressing a series of increasingly intense ideas, resolved in a closing couplet; with an abab-cdcd-efef-gg rhyme form. (Sole exceptions: #99 -- first quatrain amplified by one line -- #126 -- six couplets & only twelve lines total -- #145 -- written in tetrameter -- and #146 -- omission of the second line's beginning; the subject of a lasting debate.) Their order is thematic rather than chronological, although beyond the fact that the first 126 are addressed to a young man -- maybe the Earl of Pembroke or Southampton, maybe Sir Robert Dudley, the natural son of Queen Elizabeth's "Sweet Robin," the Earl of Leicester -- (the first seventeen, possibly commissioned by the addressee's family, pressing his marriage and production of an heir), and ##127-152 (or 127-133 and 147-152) to an exotic woman of questionable virtues only known as "The Dark Lady," even in that respect much remains unclear; including the nature of Shakespeare's relationship with the two main addressees, regarding which the sonnets' often ambiguous metaphors invoke much speculation. #145 is probably addressed to Shakespeare's wife; the closing couplet plays on her maiden name ("['I hate' from] hate away she threw And saved my life, [saying 'not you']:" "Hathaway -- Anne saved my life"), several others contain puns on the name Will and its double meaning(s) (exactly fourteen in the naughty #135: "Whoever hath her wish, thou hast thy Will;" and seven in the similarly mischievous #136), and the last two draw on the then-popular Cupid theme. Sometimes, placement seems linked to contents, e.g., in #8 (music: an octave has eight notes), #12 and #60 (time: twelve hours to both day and night; sixty minutes to an hour); and in the famous #55, which praises poetry's everlasting power and as whose never-expressly-named subject Shakespeare himself emerges in a comparison with Horace's Ode 3.30 -- in turn written in first person singular and thus, denoting its own author as the builder of its "monument more lasting than bronze" ("Exegi monumentum aere perennius") -- as well as through the number "5"'s optical similarity to the letter "S," making the sonnet's number a shorthand reference for "5hake5peare" or "5hakespeare's 5onnets," echoed by numerous words containing an "S" in the text.Of indescribable linguistic beauty, elegance and complexity, Shakespeare's sonnets owe their timeless appeal to their supreme compositional values, the universality of their themes, and their keen insights into the human heart and soul; as much as their transcendence of the era's poetic conventions which, following Petrarch, heavily idealized the addressee's qualities: a form new and exciting twohundred years earlier, but encrusted in cliche in the late 1500s. Indeed, Shakespeare's "Dark Lady" Sonnet #130 owes its particular fame to its clever puns on that very style, which went overboard with references to its golden-haired, starry- (beamy-, sparkling, sunny-) eyed, cherry- (strawberry-, vermilion-, coral-) lipped, rosy- (crimson-, purple-, dawn-) cheeked, ivory- (lily-, carnation-, crystal-, silver-, snowy-, swan-white) skinned, pearl-teethed, honey- (nectar-, music-) tongued, goddess-like objects. "My mistress' eyes are nothing like the sun;" the Bard countered, proceeded to describe her breasts as "dun," her hair as "black wires," and her breath as "reek[ing]," and denied her any divine or angelic attributes. "And yet," he concluded: "by heaven, I think my love as rare As any she belied with false compare."Arguably, Shakespeare's very choice of addressees (a young man -- also the subject of the famously romantic #18: "Shall I compare thee to a summer's day;" the first of several sonnets promising his immortalization in poetry -- as well as the "Dark Lady," in turn introduced under the notion "black is beautiful" in #127) itself suggests a break with tradition; and compared to his contemporaries' poetry, even the equally-famous #116's on its face rather conventional praise of love's constancy ("Let me not to the marriage of true minds admit impediments"), echoed in the poet's vow to vanquish time in #123, sounds fairly restrained. But ultimately, Shakespeare's sonnets -- like his entire work -- simply defy categorization. They are, as rival Ben Jonson acknowledged, written "for all time," just as the Bard himself immodestly claimed:'Gainst death and all oblivious enmityShall you pace forth; your praise shall still find roomEven in the eyes of all posterityThat wear this world out to the ending doom.(Sonnet 55.
This Book Will Change the Way You Look at Food. This is a very well written book on food psychology for the lay public and is a must read for anyone who is overweight and constantly struggling to lose weight. It will change your relationship with food. Other reviewers have already given the details in the book that don't need to be duplicated. I wish Dr. Wansink will soon bring out the audio version because this is one of those books that you have to listen again and again so that these principles are ingrained in your brain (and life
This is THE ultimate guide!. This book is huge! About 400 pages in full colour.Where do you start? Every model and every colour variation is shown in this book and it just brings your memories flooding back.I dont even remember half of these toys.Its all in here.Each model,each variation,gift sets and so much more.This has to be THE ultimate book on these series for sure!A huge book,superb quality and good value make this book a legend.To the authors who put this book together,you guys are champions! Thank you
Bold erotic horror. In this collection Lucy Taylor achieves something very difficult and presents us with nine very sex-centric tales without ever losing a handle on her plot or characters (something which, say, Poppy Z. Brite has continually failed at.) A woman searches for a lost city of sin; a hitman meets the love of his life - after death; a young man learns the dangers of idol worship backstage at a wrestling tournament; the spell of a forgotten goddess awakens forbidden lust in a bored Greek tourist.  Very explicit (but never gratuitous), often psychological and complex (see the title story) and recommended for the adventurous horror reader
Halleluiah.  **  Thank God for Dennis Lehane. If you haven't read Lehane's illuminated manuscripts then stop what you're doing (afer you finish this).  Put your mouse down and click on BUY because you will not be sorry. Lehane is all I ever wanted in a writer (and boy, do I want A LOT!), so if you want everything and more in a mystery, then Lehane is The One.  Just be ready because he WILL blow your mind.  (Isn't that what his name means in French?!  A massive explosion high in the air...) How appropriate.   This guy is no faker.  Dennis is a gift from the gods.  Er.  Wait.  He IS A GOD!!!  He certainly is tuned into frequencies we mortals cannot see.Thank GOD for Dennis Lehane!One caveat with this book.  DL writes tough, provocative fiction that makes me dizzy with questions sometimes because the stories are so thought provoking (especially the short stories).   Even thought this specific book is a series detective novel, it is definitely NOT for the timid.  If you're an average romance reader, you should look elsewhere because Gone, Baby, Gone deals realistically with some seriously offensive subject matter: the abduction of children.  The way Lehane breathes life into his stories, lifts the characters up off the page for the reader and creates a complete atmosphere in a book, it's easy to believe this stuff as real and it is pretty awful.  So be forewarned about the bad stuff.My husband says this book "still haunts" him, but he also says Lehane is probably the best crime fiction writer working today.  On this, DH and I wholeheartedly agree
Dazed and confused. Satoshi Kitamura is the Kazuo Ishiguro of the under-5 set. "ME and my Cat" is of my daughter's favorite books, and she's a serious fan of Kitamura's oeuvre. A great book when they've outgrown "Duck Is Dirty" and other board books
King delivers another grand title...Or is it Bachman?. "I'm back from the dead and you don't seem glad to see my at all, you ungrateful son of a bi$ch." During a time when folks began to question Stephen King's story telling ability, the "Master of Horror" pulls yet another ace from the deck. The Dark Half is a strong novel, similar to a short novella, "Secret Window, Secret Garden" from another SK book, Four Past Midnight. However, after reading the first couple hundred pages the close association with that story ends and The Dark Half begins. This novel is a nice breath of fresh air compared to other work that King released during this time period such as: The Tommyknockers, Needful Things, Dolores Claiborne, etc. Its unique style screams Bachman and displays Steve King's uncanny ability to write beyond the "typical monster under the bed" yarn, while capitalizing on his untapped ability to write a great crime novel. With a little mythology and telepathy thrown in to boot, The Dark Half delivers a prominent yarn, that will keep the reader engaged from start to finish. The only major problem I had with the book was the short, abrupt ending, which always seems to plague most of King's work (as his fans love to point out).
The Madness Behind the Mask. High flying, fast living F. Scott Fitzgerald (1896-1940) attained great commercial and critical fame early in life--and then began a rapid fall into a ferocious alcoholism.  In 1925 THE GREAT GATSBY, now regarded as his masterpiece and often described as "the great American novel," was published to only mildly enthusiastic reviews and sold poorly; in order to fund the lifestyle to which he had grown accustomed, Fitzgerald set aside his next book length project and turned to short stories and the occasional bout of "writing for Hollywood."Although Fitzgerald began to formulate ideas for TENDER IS THE NIGHT as early as 1925, the project was slow to take form and was not published until 1934--by which time it had become a reflection of Fitzgerald's stormy marriage to the equally high flying, fast living Zelda Sayre, who gradually sank into insanity and was permanently institutionalized by the early 1930s.  Originally published in serial form in Scribner's Magazine, it received mixed reviews, and when it was published as a novel it did not prove the great commercial success Fitzgerald hoped.  It was the last novel he completed before his 1940 death.The story is set in Europe, where the Fitzgeralds themselves lived through much of the 1920s, and begins with Rosemary, a very young woman who has recently jolted to fame and fortune as an actress in silent film.  Beautiful but in many respects innocent, Rosemary vacations on the Riviera--where she makes the acquaintance of Dick and Nicole Diver, an incredibly wealthy, exceptionally attractive couple who seem to be the height of all the modern era has to offer.  Rosemary quickly subcums to Dick Diver's immeasurable charm and falls in love with him, but Nick is determinedly bound to Nicole, as much from responsibility as love.  Nicole's apparent flawlessness is a facade.  Dick is a psychiatrist; his wife, Nicole, is also his patient.  She is insane.Fitzgerald was often accused of writing about rich and pretty but trivial people.  In one sense this is true, but in Fitzgerald's work the shiny surface is precisely that, a false front that the characters present to the world in order to maintain both their social standing and self-image. As the novel moves back and forward in time, we see how Dick has been "bought" by Nicole's family and how he is repeatedly torn between love for Nicole as a husband and care for her as a patient so that--even as Nicole begins a final recovery--he begins his own destruction, sucked dry by the endless personal and professional compromises required of him.  Increasingly dark in tone, TENDER IS THE NIGHT is not so much disillusioning as it is ultimately, painfully  nhilistic.Fitzgerald seemed to regard TENDER IS THE NIGHT as both his most personal and his favorite work, and there are few who would not regard it as a masterpiece.  Even so, it is very much a flawed masterpiece, occasionally problematic to a point at which it snaps the reader out of the very reality it attempts to create, most often due to Fitzgerald's own authorial self-indulgence.  That said, the characters and their situations are not always as convincing as one could wish and the structure of the novel is occasionally muddy.  And yet--Even with these glaring issues running throughout the novel, TENDER IS THE NIGHT is the sort of book that you think you will not finish and then suddenly find yourself on the last page.  Whereas THE GREAT GATSBY tended to focus on the mask, TENDER IS THE NIGHT focuses on the face beneath it, and the result is uniquely powerful.  You care about the Divers and even though you sense their ultimate fate you, like they themselves, fight against it.  It has moments of brilliance as powerful and often more so than any other novel of the first half of the 20th Century.  Strongly recommended.GFT, Amazon Reviewe
Thank you to the author!  Such an important book to write... When I saw the title, I knew I had to check out the book for myself.  Since I am a bicultural person (of Venezuelan and Polish descent) I could relate to his struggle.  A lot of people doubt you based on physical characteristics, surname and mannerisms when you come from a bicultural background.  The situation was the same for Mr. Johnson, a lawyer of English and Mexican background.  His last name, light complexion and elementary knowledge of Spanish hindered him in integrating into Mexican culture, while his non-Caucasian features separated him from his Anglo contemporaries.  He wrote sensitively about his experiences and enlightened us about his process of self-discovery (finally marrying a Mexicana, having children with her, giving them Spanish names, etc).  I reccomend this book to anyone who wants an education on the bicultural experience or has been through that process themselves.  I can't tell you how many times, to this day, people still deny me my Latin roots because I don't look like the caricatures they have in their heads about how all Hispanics/Latinos are supposed to look (Dark skin, black hair, black eyes), and I don't have a Spanish last name because I was raised by my mom (Martinez, Morales, Rodriguez, etc).  We have to get over our assumptions about people if we want the walls to come down in our thinking.  It is the only way toward liberation
heartache. I thought that this book was very good. It described the loneliness and confusion of not knowing and understanding oneself and one's origin. It is about love and forgivness; patience and acceptance; and loving oneself fully. I liked how the book focused on many diverse issues, such as socioeconomic class, gender roles, separation and divorce, and the life cycle of a marriage and a family. I did not like the ending as much. I thought that the ending could have been more descriptive of the chracters' lives, but instead, it seemed to have stopped abruptly
The Underlying Theory Under Unity. Unity is the official unified messaging system sold by Cisco. It integrates voice, voicemail, video and data through a single telephone line. It complements the full range of Cisco IP-Based voice solutions.As the Fundamentals book in the seriesthis book is concerned with the basic environment the system establishes. This book gives the underlying theory along with the conceptual "here is what you can do" information so that the capabilities of the system can be fully understood during the planning phase.  The Cisco Unity Deployment and Solutions Guide for how to set up and run the systems.As is always the case tieh the Cisco books, the information given here is exhaustive and complete. Except that it's almost 400 pages long, this is what I call the first forty pages of the manual. It's the part that explains just it is that you are trying to do
This Is A Fun Read, & Much More Reasonable than Sarah Vowell. Brian Lamb and his C-SPAN team have written a number of wonderful and extremely-informative essay-filled booknotes on American History and Characters. "Who's Buried in Grant's Tomb" is no exception.With contributions from Douglas Brinkley, Richard Norton Smith, and other noted Historians, this compact, easy-to-read volume is filled with vignettes and facts about all of the  deceased Presidents, their last days, presumably their last words, and where they are buried. Admission prices to their libraries and museums (and this includes living Presidents and Jefferson Davis too) is also included.Brinkley's insightful essay at the end of the book, in which he writes with great eloquence of the attachment of Springfield Illinois to Abraham Lincoln, and of his visits to other Presidential gravesites and museums is almost worth half of the price of this bargain edition.Note: This book was published prior to the passing of President Reagan, yet it does note where he wished to be buried, and has information about the Reagan Presidential Library and Museum.The book shows the human and humorous side of the Presidents, including Calvin Coolidge's funny comment to a woman who said she'd bet him if he would say two words ("You Lose", was Silent Cal's response), or how William Howard Taft, a Unitarian, deftly fought back against religious prejudice.A solid and fun read, especially around the July 4th holiday, and at 4.99 is a much better buy, and totally devoid of  political commentary ala Sarah Vowell's weak-at-the-knees "Assassination Vacation"
Well, Of Course. Listen, this isn't foor some psuedo-anarchist looking to piece together a gun from a broom-stick, a pvc pipe, and an aerosol can.  This is for those who /know/ about basic gunsmithing and have the tools to do so.  Honestly, a SMG is a complex weapon.  This isn't like a shotgun (which you can make fairly easily) or a muzzel-loading musket, it's complex and on the forefront of firearms technology.  If you know about guns and HAVE THE TOOLS, this is an interesting resource.  But if you aren't knowledgable about gun parts and function, and don't have the tools, don't bother.  You'll just be lost.  Honestly, complaining you were cheated because he didn't tell you you needed TOOLS to make a Sub Machine Gun. I'm sorry, but some people actually believe in using their brains in purchases.  So, again, psuedo-revolutionaries should skip this.  Stick to the poorly-written anarchist's cook book and leave the real tools to the big boys
Janette Oke's books. Heartwarming stories about life among the plain people, full of good quality reading about family values.
A Very Helpful Book!. I check out this book every time I am going on a trip from my local library because it is very helpful and has wonderful tips! I really enjoy this book
absolute must read. I had Dr. Lomax as a professor and he is a brilliant man and his book conveys that. It is an absolute must read for anyone considering overseas assignments
CARL SAGAN: A life worth reading. Carl Sagan was one of the most celebrated scientists of the twentieth century. A ma of many interests from smoking marijuana ad enjoying its benefits to prophesizing exciting scientific discoveries, it was not a surprise that Keay Davis was compelled to recount his story. In my opinion, there is no other scientist who was so multifaceted. It is a detailed account of his life, from description of his parents lives to those of the famous scientists he met. His ambition to find out about the world was countered by his enjoyment of letting the public know more about space through his brilliant books (such as The Dragons of Eden, a Pulitzer prize winning book) and his TV showmanship appearing on late night television with Johnny Carson. Facing the jealousy of many other scientists from the attention the media gave to him; he struggled to be accepted by the science community. The value of his scientific work was always I question with his Ph.D. dissertation almost being rejected, his denied tenure at Harvard, and his denied member ship o the Prestigious National Academy of Science. This is a book worth reading because it is about a man who lived his life to the fullest. He is a man who can show us what ambition to be best mean, and how far your dreams can take you, even if it is your belief in extra-terrestrial life. He was a Jewish boy from Brooklyn who became the most famous scientist of the twentieth century. Now that is ambition
Quintessence of a Spiritual Genius. GRAVITY AND GRACE by Simone Weil.  With an Introduction by Gustave Thibon. Translated from the French by Emma Craufurd. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1972 (1952) ISBN 071002262X.'Gravity and Grace' is a slim book of (in my edition) just 160 pages which holds within itself the quintessence of the greatest spiritual genius of the 20th century.  The book is a compilation of brief extracts from Simone Weil's Notebooks and was assembled by Gustav Thibon, who has also added a valuable Introduction of 30 pages, the purpose of which is simply to provide readers with some necessary background, for, as he points out, "Simone Weil's writings belong to the category of very great work which can only be weakened and spoilt by a commentary."M.Thibon has organized these sayings into 38 chapters - Detachment, The Self, Illusions, Idolatry, Love, Evil, Violence, Contradiction, Chance, Beauty, The Great Beast, etc.  (The original French edition - LA PESANTEUR ET LA GRACE (Paris: Plon, 1947) - contained  an additional chapter on Israel (pp.216-221) which the English publishers, for reasons best known to themselves, have silently omitted from the 1952 English edition.  Whether it has since been restored I don't know).I purchased my own copy of this book (bibliographical details of which are given above) over thirty years ago.  Although many hundreds if not thousands of books have passed through my hands since then, it remains one of five or six books I would never ever consider parting with.  Simone Weil's thoughts are so truthful and of such power that one never forgets them and her book becomes one that you find yourself returning to again and again. Here are a few of those thoughts selected at random:"We cannot under any circumstances manufacture something which is better than ourselves" (p.41)."The only organ of contact with existence is acceptance, love" (p.57)."Imaginary evil is romantic and varied; real evil is gloomy, monotonous, barren, boring.  Imaginary good is boring; real good is always new, marvellous, intoxicating" (p.62)."Joy is the overflowing consciousness of reality" (p.73).'Gravity and Grace' brings us the truth about the human condition, the truth about ourselves, and much of this truth is far from comforting. As M. Thibon points out, "It is not a question of philosophy here but of life," the life that all of us are at this moment living and that Simone Weil can help us more fully appreciate and understand.  Her thoughts weave themselves into the fabric of one's mind and will leave any sensitive reader immeasurably enriched.
Tried it and WOW  it worked for me. This kit arrived for my birthday and I used the cut-glass crystal as instructed and could really feel and even see the interaction of the spinning crystal with my finger energy. I could feel tingling in my meridians and more energy. The crystal is not used as a pendulum but is twisted to make it spin over key areas.  Really very intriguing and effective.  Then I had to do other things and got in at 10 pm.  Thought I would watch the DVD.  Did the exercises along with the DVD.  Then thought I'd do some internet research. Got up to stretch and thought the clock must have stopped.  It was 4 am and I didn't feel tired at all!  I was so energized that I  hardly slept even when I got to bed.  Had to get up at 8 am so thought, well, I'll do the exercizes I learned to help me through the day since I didn't sleep hardly at all.  I had a great day and was extremely energetic.  People commented.  And I am a person who is tired all the time and gets sick from missing sleep! I love this stuff and am amazed how incredibly well it worked! But in the future I will certainly be more careful about charging up before going to bed!The DVD was like attending a seminar by Donna Eden, a very sweet spirit.  She introduces you to muscle testing and the energy routines. They are not hard to do or to learn. I haven't even listened to the CD yet but can see from the cards that it contains more energy tricks.  I like the cards because they are easy reminders on how to do the exercises as I am learning the maneuvers. I am wondering if there is more info in the book.  I"ll probably buy it since I am so impressed with this  kit.  If you are tired all the time, buy this kit!Best wishes to all you intrepid folks wanting to learn more about our miraculous energetic bodies
Dense Prose With Great Rewards For The Persistent. Patrick O'Brian is not for everyone.  In fact, I tried to read this book many years ago and gave up.  I went back to it after seeing the movie.  Again, I was frustrated because O'Brian does not make it easy for the reader.  He makes only occasional efforts to explain technical jargon and historical context.  The dialog, true to the early 19th century Royal Navy, is often curious and can be difficult to follow.  Even generally, his prose demands a high level of concentration.I persevered despite these difficulties and finished all 20 books.  It went much better after I stopped trying to read over passages I did not understand and simply kept going.  After a while, things began sinking in and my admiration grew for his characterizations, historical fidelity, humor, and inventiveness.  Jack Aubrey, a good natured Royal Navy captain, brilliant at sea and hapless on land.  Stephen Maturin, a surgeon with a complicated, sometimes tortured personality, very much the naturalist and cunning intelligence agent.  These very different men, with only the love of music in common, enter into a deep, lifelong friendship.Not long after finishing the novels, I read Dean King's A Sea of Words, a lexicon and companion to the novels.  It gives a brief historical sketch of the Napoleonic wars, the Royal Navy, and the state of medical knowledge at the time.  The lexicon provides definitions of many obscure words used in the novels.  All of that made it clear that, however much I enjoyed the novels, I missed a great deal of O'Brian's nuance and subtlety.So, I reread them all.  Only then did I really appreciate his very high level of literary artistry.  The adventure, which pulled me along on the first read, became secondary to the philosophical themes, the Aubry/Maturin interactions, the sparkling dialog, and the detail in describing the workings of the ship, naval discipline and life in early 19th century England.Some advice to those who want to tackle these novels --  If you don't have any background in early 19th century Europe, you should at least read the first 50 pages of A Sea of Words and keep it handy when you want to look up a word.  You also need a good world atlas (the older the better as many place names have changed over the decades).  Finally, read the novels in consecutive order.  I hesitate to say that because the first two, Master and Commander and Post Captain, are among the most difficult to read.  There are some slow spots and as I say O'Brian for the first time can be discouraging.  But they set up everything that comes after and in comparison make the later novels, when O'Brian really gets in the groove, much easier to read and comprehend.Master and Commander begins in 1800 Port Mahon, Minorca (an island off the east coast of Spain) with a rather testy first meeting between our heros, Aubrey, a Royal Navy lieutenant, and Maturin, an Irish/Catalan physician and amateur naturalist.  Both of them poor and without a ship.Jack is promoted to master and commander (a grade below captain) and gets command of a small sloop of war (brig) named the Sophie, joined by Stephen as the ship's surgeon.  The Sophie cruises the coasts of Spain and France for enemy merchant shipping.  After capturing many "prizes," the Sophie eventually battles the much more powerful Cacafuego, a 32-gun Spanish xebec-frigate.  Aubrey's leadership skills are very much on display, along with Maturin's medical prowess (especially for the times) and philosophical bent.We learn much about the Royal Navy.  Rank, promotion, corruption, discipline, punishment, "interest," prize money, ships, guns, ship maintenance and routine, disease, tides, storms, wind, sails, battle strategy, etc.  Fascinating stuff for me.
Hauntingly Enchanted. Never, in all my vast readings of fantasy, have a read a tale that left me so spell bound, so haunted, so enchanted. When I closed the book, finished, it was painful to leave the rich, beautiful world of riddles and mysterious harpists McKillip creates in the Riddle-Master trilogy. Her lyrical writing and deep, often heartbreaking, characters along with the depth and mystery of the plot create a lush world I once thought could only exist in my dreams. It was hard to leave it at the end because I wanted to live there, in that beauty. I love this book more than anything I have ever read and I recommend it to anybody who loves to read, especially to those who often feel misplaced in this world of reality
Comprehesive reference on NW gardening. Of the books I own on NW native plant gardening, this book is my most often referenced.  It is full of detailed information about a vast array of NW native plants.  Dr. Kruckeberg's enthusiasm for the propogation and stewardship of NW natives shines throughout the book. However, this is not a book about landscaping or effective planting combinations; it is a scholarly work that may be useful to a homeowner interested in native plants and their care, or to the professional landscaper in need of detailed reference information.  I am impressed by the breadth of the author's knowledge
Instant Classic. As a serious photographer just now getting into digital, this book has been a godsend, clearly explaining and providing useful context to the often daunting new world of digital workflow issues. The all-color approach with plenty of photographic examples is an added, eminently useful benefit. I'm a Mac-based guy, but this book is platform-agnostic. Bottom line: When it comes to real world digital photo issues, Timacheff and Karlins cover it all beautifully.
The destruction of the Militum Christi. Malcolm Barber examines the trial and supression of the Poor Knights of Christ of the Temple of Solomon, also known as the Knights Templars, as the trial unfolded in France and other countries. The account of the positional jockeying between the French King Philip IV and Pope Clement V is fascinating.  Professor Barber is detailed and scholarly, but he has an absorbing story to tell and he is a wonderful story-teller.  Essentia
Definitive Word On An American Filmmaker. Some have criticized this book, which Welles felt was the definitive word on his films, by stating that it never deals with Orson's children or his failed marriages.  That has nothing to do with what this book is about.  If  you are looking for a biography then look elsewhere.  This is Orson Welles  talking about his films and his life in film and what he was trying to do  and say.  When I finished reading I knew that for once Welles was getting  the final word on his films and that what he said was honest.  If you want  to really know him as an artist I would strongly recommend reading this  book.  It's a very fast read even though it's crammed full of insights.  As  a bonus it also contains the shooting script for Magnificent Ambersons  which would have exceeded Citizen Kane in its beauty if RKO hadn't cut it  to shreds.  I strongly recommend this book
Colorful Children's Book. Though perhaps not completely correct in teaching your child about chameleons, this book is adorable.  My three-year-old son and I read it at the library, and he kept asking about it, so I ordered it for him.  He really enjoys reading it again and again
Excellent Book. &quot;Fire Up Your Metabolism&quot; is an EXCELLENT book for anyone who wants to lose weight in a healthy manner and keep the pounds off.  One of my favorite parts about the philosophy the book provides for losing weight is that I am able to eat carbohydrates and still lose weight.  Thank you Nutrition Twins for helping me fire up my metabolism!!!
Welcome back, appetizers !. Many of us fall into the habit of either not making appetizers or making the same appetizers over and over.  But with Tod Dimmick's book, that no longer has to be the case.  He reminds us that the simple appetizers, as well as the more complex, are within our reach.  I was reminded of many of those wonderful combinations - salty prosciutto mixed with cool, slightly sweet melon or rich, creamy blue cheese mixed with pears.  Welcome back, appetizers.  It's good to see you again
All You Need to Know About Spaghetti. Not only a fascinating insight into the spaghetti western and its master practitioner, but also an examination of where this form stands in the context of Italian cinema as a whole.  Having finished reading, I   re-viewed all of Leone's films.  They are totally different viewing  experiences in light of the knowledge gleaned from this book.  A truly al  dente reading experience
Mostly true, except for the information from McNamara. People were looking for a book that could grab them about Nam when this was a best seller in 1972, and this book has details that people were not getting from television or the front page of newspapers in those days.  Magazines that published book reviews typically had a view of Nam that was tuned more to the nuance of individual points of view than the geopolitical justifications which failed to consider the nature of the situation in Nam itself as a primary consideration.  Portions of this book originally appeared in `The New Yorker,' so the author was becoming widely known as this book was being prepared.  Frances FitzGerald's original trip to Vietnam was in February to November of 1966, and resulted in articles for the `Atlantic Monthly,' the `Village Voice,' `Vogue,' etc.  People who read fashion magazines were particularly interested in what a nice girl might think of a situation like Nam, where large numbers of young Americans were being subjected to a military view of the situation on a personal level so intense that most publications would refrain from printing the kind of expressions which naturally describe the emotional shock of being shot at or booby trapped in some more surprising fashion.This book is not perfect.  The only listing for `Tonkin Gulf Resolution' in the index is for the page on which President Johnson's use of the Resolution is questioned by Senator Fulbright in 1966.  That was the time this book is mainly concerned with, but it gives an enormous amount of background information.  It is possible to find a listing in the index under ` GVN' for `and U.S. entry into the war, 354' which gives the page that reflects Secretary of Defense Robert McNamara's testimony to Congress that:"It was in response to an amphibious sabotage raid by GVN forces that North Vietnamese PT boats attacked the U.S. destroyer Maddox, mistaking it for one of the South Vietnamese vessels."  (pp. 352-353).Actually, the OPLAN 34A attacks along the Gulf of Tonkin coastline were operations planned and approved in Washington, D.C., and McNamara lied about South Vietnamese operations to maintain the secret status of U.S. operations, during which the North Vietnamese PT boats were responding to recoilless rifle fire from a small boat when American intelligence informed the Maddox that it was about to be attacked.  Radio intercepts of North Vietnamese naval messages on August 4, 1964, were used to convince LBJ and Senators that an attack had occurred when two American destroyers were picking up radar ghosts and sonar readings off the reflection of a hard-turned rudder, as shown by subsequent tests.  Edwin E. Moise's book, TONKIN GULF AND THE ESCALATION OF THE VIETNAM WAR has much more information about that secret circus stunt.Jeffrey Kimball's recent book, THE VIETNAM WAR FILES:  UNCOVERING THE SECRET HISTORY OF NIXON-ERA STRATEGY, contains a reference to the author of this book in a Memorandum by Dwight Chapin to Haldeman, January 18, 1973, about a month after heavy bombing near or in Hanoi to get some ceasefire agreement signed, hoping it could be called `The Peace Announcement' (p. 288) and attempting to describe a point of view different from what intellectuals were expecting."The FitzGeralds and the Fondas, the Halberstams and Harrimans, the Clarks and Ellsbergs and Baezes are poised in the wings just waiting to treat the end of the war as their victory and to so opine from coast to coast."  (Kimball, p. 291).I have the First Vintage Books Edition, August 1973, which was after Dwight Chapin's Memorandum, but I am not sure if American bombing in Cambodia had ended when the actual paper in this book was printed on.  There are only six lines of listings in the index for Cambodia, mostly on general issues, but the week I spent there was hardly earth-shaking.  Of more interest to me was the report in FIRE IN THE LAKE about the An Lao valley, where the battalion 1/12th Infantry from the 4th Infantry Division spent the months from September, 1969 to January, 1970.  I believe this was our first free fire zone, with a base high above a village that had been destroyed, surrounded by paddies in which elephant grass was growing instead of rice, but enemy soldiers were found harvesting highland rice on the hillsides.  Enemy contact was the only kind we had, after all other possibilities had been eliminated in the manner described in this book."In Operation Masher/White Wing alone--a multi-regimental sweep through the north of Binh Dinh province--the Allied forces, by the estimates, destroyed an entire enemy division.  In the process they left hundreds of civilians dead and wounded and `generated' so many refugees as almost to depopulate the fertile An Loa valley."  (p. 405)."While the American troops opened roads and `cleared' great stretches of territory, the Front guerrillas came back into every area except those heavily garrisoned by U.S. troops.  By the end of 1966 the NLF continued to govern the An Lao valley as well as the suburbs of Da Nang, Hue, Nha Trang, and Saigon."  (p. 406).There is only one line in the index for Frantz Fanon, but anyone who is interested in how FitzGerald saw a link between revolution against colonial powers in African and Arab countries and the situation in Nam, "including the belief in Fate and the symbolic killing of self, which he called `the behavior patterns of avoidance. . . . the sudden crime waves that spread through the cities, the tribal warfare, and the fierce, irrational feuding of the native sects.  As he explained them, . . ."  (p.509).  You wouldn't want to believe how true the stuff in this book could be today
It was a fabulous adventure. The story was well-written and had a exciting plot.  I liked the pirates, because pirates are cool.  I reccomend this book to many other reader
fantastic. concise, precise instructions.  only downside is that it's not out of date since 7.0 was released; however, the writer is excellent in laying out simple instructions to pull off effective effects
Very useful. Well written. Best reference for integrating herbal, homeopathic, Native American, and  flower essence uses of a plant. Engaging style. Great examples that stick  in my mind. History of plant use integrated well with modern usage
Death and disease level all men. This novel is a combination of a `roman  clefs' and science fiction, with gothic and autobiographic elements.In her vision of the end of the 21st century, Mary Shelley sees the Greek occupying Istanbul and England as a republic with three political parties (royalists, democrats and aristocrats). The leader of the democrats deserts his responsibilities through fear of the plague, while the intention of the head of the aristocrats (a highly idealized portrait of P.B. Shelley) is `to diminish the power of the aristocracy to effect a greater equalization of wealth and privilege and to introduce a perfect system of republican government.'Byron (Lord Raymond) is not in the same league: `Power was the aim of all his endeavors. The selected passion was ambition.'Her vision of mankind is pessimistic: `There was but one good and one evil in the world - life and death.'For life, `The choice is with us; let us will it and our habitation becomes a paradise.'But, `What is there in our nature that is for ever urging us on towards pain and misery? We are not formed for enjoyment; disappointment is the never-failing pilot of our life's bark, and ruthlessly carries us to the shoals.'`It is a strange fact, but incontestable, that the philanthropist, who ardent in his desire to do good, who disdains other argument than truth, has less influence over men's mind than he who refuses not to adopt any means, nor diffuse any falsehood for the advancement of his cause.'Man doesn't control his destiny and the whole of mankind is wiped out by the plague. But, even on the verge of total destruction, false prophets preach intolerance with their `pernicious doctrines of election and special grace'.This book is brilliantly written: `He was no longer bent to the ground, like an over-nursed flower of spring that, shooting up beyond its strength, is weighed down even by its own coronal of blossoms.'It has a few minus points: slow progression, too idealized main characters and a rather too simplistic cause of the whole destruction of mankind.But, it remains a real discovery and a very worth-while read, with an excellent introduction by Pamela Bickley.Many novels have the plague as subject. I recommend highly `Bassompierre' by Hugo von Hofmannsthal.
Very enjoyable and helpful reading on nonviolence. I had two misgivings about this book before I began to read it. Both of my misgivings turned out to be unfounded. The first one was that since I have read my fair share of nonviolence books I feared that it would all be repetition. Cortright starts the book with Mohandas Gandhi and Martin Luther King, but not with the ordinary biographical stories of their lives. Rather he uses them as vehicles to explain the secret of nonviolence together with today's scholars and his own opinions. It works very well and even though Gandhi and King are familiar to me I learned a lot, especially in a later chapter were he writes about Gandhi's and King's views on gender and sexuality. The second misgiving was the subtitle which made me hesitate if I would buy it or not: "Nonviolence for an Age of Terrorism". I was afraid that this was another American too hung up on terrorism; like terrorism was the biggest problem humans face today. As a Swede, living in a country who has not been struck by terrorism or taken part in the "war on terrorism" it might be more difficult for me to understand why terrorism is seen as the biggest problem in the world, when tens of thousands of people are dying every day of poverty. Actually the book doesn't talk very much about terrorism, but poses an important challenge to nonviolent activists. If we want to stop the "war on terror" we ought to be able to provide a better solution to the problem of terrorism than the military does.I have been racking my brain on how we can be more effective in our nonviolent campaigns. This book gave me a lot of food for thought on the subject. But unlike strategists like Gene Sharp, Cortright doesn't limit nonviolence to its effectiveness. He sees nonviolence not just as a method but as a way of life. He tells about his struggles and his times of doubts about the ideas of nonviolence. My respect and admiration for the author rose after I understood how much involved he has been for many decades and still is in the peace movement. Here is a man who not only teaches and writes about Gandhi and King, but actually tries to use their methods in his life. He manages to combines the learnings of the history of nonviolence with the nonviolent movement of today - a potent combination that we need more of. I am sure military analysts sit day in and day out trying to analyze yesterday's battles to learn how to fight more effectively tomorrow. We nonviolent activists have something to learn from the military in that sense. Cortright's book really highlights the importance of making this analysis and to learn from our mistakes.The book gives a refreshing criticism of our nonviolent icons. I had heard negative rumours about Gandhi and King but was unsure if they were true. According to this book some of them were and some were not. But Cortright makes a more important point - you can admire one part of a human's life - like Gandhi's nonviolent struggle against the British occupation while at the same time be deeply critical to another part of the same person's life - like Gandhi's warped views on gender and sexuality. Cortright rightly points out that we should not expect flawless leaders. Talking about leaders, I have been embarrassed to keep coming with nothing but male nonviolent role models in my nonviolent workshops. So I was happy to find two great female role models in this book; Dorothy Day and Barbara Deming. Two women who really deserve more appreciation for their contributions in the nonviolence struggle.In the end of the book Cortright gives us some practical tools to use in the nonviolent struggle were he emphasizes the importance of setting up concrete and achievable goals and warning us from disregarding the importance of fund-raising and working effectively with the media. He also encourages us to try new, creative and some times more risky nonviolence methods; not always the petitions, demonstrations but also boycotts, strikes, blockades and sit-ins. These types of methods have proved to be the most effective in the nonviolence movement according to the author. We who work for peace and justice face incredible challenges. It is easy to get discouraged when you see what you are up against. Cortright gives us hope in spite of this. He shows many examples of how nonviolence has made fantastic gains the last decades. There have been victories even in the cases were it seemed we failed. And it takes time, some times a very long time, to change for the better. What we need in the struggle is persistence and hope according to Cortright. Both these traits have grown stronger in me while reading this book.Martin Smedjeback [...
true WW II story from a different perspective. this book is fascinating as it ties in a captured American pilot's story with that of the French underground.  A sobering view of the  stranglehold the Germans had on occupied France and the tragic and heroic struggle of ordinary people
Fast and Pretty. No problems at all. I loved how fast it came and the book was in perfect shape
Too good for words. Simply put, this book is excellent.  After reading the previous book, Bird of Prey, I had a good background knowledge of some of the characters and the world in which it is set.  The characters are brilliant, so are the plots, the adventures, the intrigue, the love triangles.... the list goes on and on.  If ever a book deserved 5 stars, this is the one
Excellent memoir and very insightful. This is an excellent autobiography.  The General's career and development is amazing to have reached 4-Stars at such a young age.  His modesty and emphasis on the South Korean Army's development into a complete military organization while at war is remarkable.What makes this book sobering is when the General describes how thousands of South Koreans volunteered and were sent straight into combat with little training, only to quickly become casualties themselves, sacrificing their lives for their country.  Another key item from the General's writing is how only after having the time to fully train, equip, and organize into Divisions with adequate firepower, were they able to successfully conduct offensive operations.Bravery and courage helped them hold against the North Korean Communist attack along the desperate Pusan perimeter, but it was the firepower of the attached US artillery units that were supporting his South Korean Division that allowed them to counterattack successfully and reach Panmunjom.The personal family dangers in war is also brought out where he writes about his family, who had to be left behind in Seoul, unable to flee when the North Koreans captured the city.  The additional suffering of the civilian populace is also described in this book, caught trying to flee the Communist Army.Highly recommended reading for the South Korean view of the war.  Excellent insight into how important it is to have trained and properly equipped soldiers when fighting a war rather than relying on conscripted soldiers after war has started as the conscripted soldiers will suffer excessive casualties and deaths when fighting against a motivated, trained, and fully armed enemy
Challenges of Maturity. Perfect World is a riveting fiction novel that tells about the challenges of adjusting to high school and becoming moremature. Author Brian James speaks from a fourteen or fifteen year old girls point of view. The book is set in a town that has  perfectly planned out houses and evenly spaced trees.Everyone in town thinks they are perfect, and they do not talk about problems. The main character, Lacie Johnson, has many family issues though. Her father committed suicide two years earlier in their bathroom. Her mother works two jobs, and Lacie is forced to stay home to babysit her younger brother, Malky. Lacie's best friend has always been a girl named Jenna. Things have changed, and Jenna is more interested in boys and being socially accepted. Lacie is not as concerned about those things. Jenna meets a boy named Avery, and he introduces her to a boy named Benji. But as Lacie and Benji become closer, Lacie and Jenna start to grow apart. Lacie struggles to see the good in the world and feels like she is loosing everyone close to her. She starts to feel like she is going crazy just like her father.The book is written differently than most books. The sentence structure differs. Instead of using periods the author connects similar thoughts with varying amounts of periods; they are similar to ellipses. For example, a paragraph with about fourteen lines of text has only a single period. This book is also for an audience either about to enter high school or just recently started high school. The issues are better suited for them. Some parts of the book contain sexual acts butnothing sexually explicit.The most interesting part of book is how the author is a man, and yet he tells the story from a teenage girl's point of view. Brian James treats the subject of fitting into high school and finding out who you are as a serious issue. As I read the book I also found it hard to put down. It keeps the reader interested in what will happen next. It shows how the world we live in may not be so perfect at all. You have to look inside yourself to find out what a perfect world is to you, and strive to get there given the circumstances that are handed to you.Reviewed by Kathleen O'Reilly for Flamingnet Book Reviews.For more preteen, teen, and young adult book recommendations and reviews, please visit www.flamingnet.com
"stylish" social history. This was such a pleasant, historical read.  I'm very interested in all things stylish, if not fashionable.  This title interested me at once.  It really describes how so many things we use today date back to the era of Louis XIV. Today's obsession with luxury goods really has its roots in France's history.  Louis XIV wanted every aspect of his life, including those around him, to be luxurious.  Today, many middle-class (and sometimes lower class) working person thinks they deserve a Louis Vuitton bag or Lexus SUV.  Living in style is a privilege, but can be obtained with some creative thinking and budgeting, just as long as we have our priorities straight.
Gabriel's Review. Eddie Mott, Sunny Wyler, Pickles Johnson, and Salem Brownmiller are in for a big surprise when they get invited to lunch by Plumstead Middle School's principal Mr. Brimlow.Salem loves to write and what do you know she is writing a story about a middle schooler's first day of school.  She will do anything for a story.  Pickles is very famous for his inventions.  Sunny is acting sort of like Simon Cowell from American Idol because she isn't impressed by anything and she is very rude.  Eddie is really shy.I really like the book because it has lots of details.  I give this book a 4  star rating.  This is a good book, but it took too long to develop, because in one chapter they would talk about one thing and then in the next chapter it would talk about a whole different thing.  Other than that everything else about the book was good.  The ending is really good because it is the first book in the series.  The next book is called, "Do the Funky Pickle."  Over all the book is fantastic.  I think kids in 3rd and 4th grade will love it.
Fell short of my high expectations!!. I say it fell short only because when I got this book I hoped it would delve further into Alice's life, and beyond that, into Diana's life. After reading TAGD, which is one of my all-time favorite novels, Ms. Koen hinted strongly at an interesting history for Alice and Diana, and I just knew that a prequel had to come at some point. YEARS later, it is here, and while I loved the book, I was dissapointed in that it only spanned a couple of years (if that)and then ended abruptly at the most interesting time (I won't divulge so that non-readers won't be spoiled). And not one hint of Diana - so I am wondering if there is such a thing as a "second prequel"?? Ms. Koen simply MUST go further into Alice's life after this book ended and definitely introduce us to Diana when she was younger!! I want more!!
Another wonderful Hobby Farm book from Sue Weaver... I read this book being a complete novice on raising sheep. After reading this book, I really feel I have enough knowledge to raise my own sheep on my hobby farm.The author (Sue Weaver) writes in a wonderful down-to-earth and very easy to understand style. She covers everything sheep such as:  choosing the right sheep breed for your needs, sheep disposition & behavior, sheep housing, nutritional needs, shearing & selling fleece, hoof trimming, delivering lambs, common sheep diseases and how to vaccinate your sheep. Whether you're a total novice like me or an old pro, I think you could learn a lot from this book.This book is put together on nice glossy paper stock. It also has tons of excellent photos. What I love most is that the author shows many photo's on how to correctly do many procedures w/sheep, such as vaccinations. Also this book sports an excellent resource directory. The directory includes an online directory, sheep organizations, sheep suppliers, state & university resources and my favorite the book and periodical guide to all sheep.The only thing I would've liked in here (tho, I know it goes way beyond the scope of this book) is a chapter that had every sheep breed with photos and characteristics listed. Tho, the author does go a bit into what breeds are best for milk and for wool.This book is a great investment. I also have Sue Weaver's other book on raising chickens and it is wonderful as well. If you're reading this Sue, how about a book on raising Ducks and one on raising Alpacas next? :)
Must read for in depth understanding. In depth, though provoking reading for those seeking deep, meaningful reflection.
Dark Celebration. Good book as I like her writings about the Carpathians and not to mention adding the recipes was a very tasty bonus
Very useful reference book. Tom Dinakus'Desert Storm book is an extremely handy volume for anyone interested in modern armies. It is particularly valuable for anyone reading other accounts of the Desert Storm campaign, as it provides a more comprehensive explanation of the forces deployed during the war than is available in most other books on the subject. Even if you're not interested in Desert Storm, it provides a very useful guide to the composition of the US Army at the height of its powers in the days immediately after the end of the Cold War
The Best. 'nuff said.  It's simply the best book you could read if you own an aircooled VW.  Read it cover to cover, follow it's advice and you have a good headstart on being a great owner
a good introduction to concepts of modern image generation. I recommend this book to anyone who wants to understand modern concepts of how to generate images through computacional mathematical methods. It is realy a new approach to join fractals, cellular growth and computer  concepts and limitations. The code does not work well in Window
I revel reading this practical, wonderfully illustrated book. This is a great guide for beginning to learn grounding, that is,  connecting body and soul to earth energy. Illustrations are practical and  fun and provide a direction in experiencing these wonderful methods. I  recommend this for all personal self-care libraries!
A great starter book. I'm not much of a guitar player; I know just enough to fiddle, and wanted to give my 8-year old some experience without paying for lessons to see if the interest in the instrument was actually there first. I'm amazed at how quickly one is able to pick things up with this book; it is clear and easy to use and, importantly, lets kids play "real" songs that build on each other so they can have a good sense of success as they progress through the book. The CD that comes with it is a good aid as well
Good book on fundamental analysis... Don't be put off by the rather cheesy title. This is a very good  book on fundamental analysis. The author has a very readable style, assumes no prior knowledge of accounting or ability to read financial statements. The only pre-requisite is a healthy dose of common sense.The book is very readable and very suitable for a beginning investor. Intermediate investors will find much of the material familiar, but will find some new things to pick up.The only negatives I can find about the book is that it is somewhat disorganized. I also would have preferred the author focus solely on Value Investing (and make the treatment more complete by discussing and building discounted cashflow models)
Magnificent, unforgettable classic!. SWISS FAMILY ROBINSON is a magnificent classic!  I read it when I was about twelve years old; I was rivetted by every scene then, and I still remember every scene now, more than forty years later.  I cannot imagine anyone--adult or child--not being thrilled by this story of one family's struggle to survive a shipwreck, float supplies ashore before a storm destroyed the wreckage of their ship, build a tree house, plant crops and medicinal herbs, and, yes, slaughter the occasional animal to eat or to protect themselves!  Nobody could object to this unforgettable classic except a vegetarian fanatic
Good book -- too bad its out of print. I looked all over the Internet for this book a while back and couldn't find it.  Used sellers are charging way too much (over $100), so I finally just checked it out of the library (very available and no cost).This is a good book, and is the only one I know of with general chairmaking info that covers different chair types.  The other chairmaking books I've seen seem to be specific to Windsor chairs.  I would like to see more books like this ... until then get this one from the library.
Good atlas, could be better. I agree with the other review in that the actual real pictures were extremely helpful yet the depiction of tracts were difficult for me to follow at times.  This is a required text for my neuroanatomy course, and it served a vital purpose.  I like this text and would recommend it to anyone in the field
Great Reference!!!. This dictionary is the best of the Scrabble specific ones that I have.  It gives you specific definitions when checking out words, and gives you different options when trying to make use of a crappy rack!!!!
The war gets uglier. It is the winter of 1942. Six months have passed since Jake Featherston -- President of the Confederate States of America and "the Sarge" of the ruling Freedom Party -- gave the order for the surprise attack on the United States of America, but the Confederacy has failed in its mission to quickly knock the USA out of the Second World War and restore Confederate hegemony in the Western Hemisphere. The Confederacy's grip on Ohio still has the USA cut in half, while C.S. bombers kill the President of the United States, Al Smith, in his bunker. But his successor vows to continue the war, and for each day that the war drags on, the USA gets stronger, while the CSA's borrowed time slowly runs out. Featherston and his chief of staff, Nathan Bedford Forrest III, devise a new plan that will deliver the coup de grace to the crippled USA -- but will it work? Will Operation Coal-scuttle bring total victory to the Confederate States of America and its madman leader? The blacks in the CSA hope otherwise -- Featherston's henchmen have already cleared several cities of their presence, and the construction of an enormous camp in the empty Texas prairie brings a terrifying new dimension to that mysterious slang-term: "population reduction."I thought this was a good book. After the bangs and thrills of the first few pages, the book takes a while to get started, but once the operation on which the title of the book is based begins, the action picks up. I also liked the parallels to the Civil War -- General MacArthur's misguided attacks on Fredericksburg, Virginia, mimics Ambrose Burnside's assault oo December 13, 1862, while Jonathan Moss gets used to life in a prison camp in the middle of Georgia called Andersonville.We also see some new characters -- which means other characters die. One of them was well deserved; the death could not have happened to a nicer person, even if the death comes at an inconvenient time plot-wise.All in all, a good read for the middle of a series. If you're just getting started with these books, then you'll do better to begin with How Few Remain and work your way from there, but for veterans this book picks up right where Return Engagement ended and doesn't stop
Strategy review. The ease of doing business and the product is excellent. I am very happy and will certainly order again
The Wright brothers taught the world to fly--without question--but who taught the Wrights?. Tom Crouch has been a friend and colleague of mine for some fifteen years, so I am not necessarily unbiased in my assessment of his work, but I think you will find that "A Dream of Wings" is the best description and analysis of the pre-history of flight in America up to the time of the Wright brothers that has ever been written. Crouch concentrates on Octave Chanute, Samuel P. Langley, Otto Lilienthal, and others in the pre-Wright era who steadily moved toward the objective of controlled, powered, sustained, heaver-than-air flight. Most important, Crouch shows that the Wright brothers did not work in a vacuum. They were part of a cadre of serious investigators who worked diligently to solve the practical problems of flight. He rightly notes that "a cooperative, well-directed flight research program involving many men with broad technical experience" made possible the success of the Wrights at Kitty Hawk (p. 29). Rescuing this community of researchers from obscurity is the most important contribution of "A Dream of Wings."The hero of "A Dream of Wings" is Octave Chanute, a French-born, Chicago-based engineer who explored the challenge of flight in Gilded Age America. His personal investigations into the problems of flight measurably advanced knowledge about powered flight in the 1890s, and he shared that knowledge with the Wrights as they undertook the research that led to their successful 1903 test flights. The brothers corresponded with Chanute throughout their preliminary research, seeking his counsel and incorporating his ideas into their designs for an airplane. Once successful, Chanute even visited the Wrights at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, while they were testing their planes.Not until 1886, at age 54, did Chanute begin a second career by devoting himself to solving the problems of flight. In typical engineering fashion of step-by-step investigation, Chanute assembled all known data on the science into a single synthesis and catalogued its problems. Very early he began building a community of researchers, organized symposia, and served as the central clearing house for information on the subject. Crouch tells this story exceptionally well in this book, and he holds up Chanute's approach as a model in collegial engineering, as opposed to the proprietary approach taken by most corporations. Chanute deeply believed that the advancement of flight science must be the work of many. He corresponded internationally, and encouraged the pioneers, including the Wright brothers of whom he was a special friend and mentor. He sought no patents on his inventions and gave his findings openly to all. The Wright brothers used his research when they designed their aircraft. Chanute, for instance, advised Wilbur Wright to find a sandy place, with strong prevailing winds, to lessen the problem of landing and of moving the vehicles from the point of landing back to the point of takeoff. This sparked the brothers' decision to journey from their native Dayton, Ohio, to Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, where the conditions Chanute recommended existed nearly year round.No one proved a more effective advocate for the Wright brothers after their famous first flight than Octave Chanute, and Crouch tells this story as well. Chanute steadfastly supported the brothers and remained their confidante until patent disputes erupted over aeronautical technology. Chanute broke off his correspondence with them at that time because he disagreed with their desire to control the technology of flight. For him, technical information was a public commodity, and he believed that the ability to fly would usher in a new age of enlightenment that the Wrights were thwarting. The relation was mending when Chanute died in 1910 and the brothers attended his funeral. Wilbur Wright delivered his eulogy.This is a very fine history of the quest for flight, with usch characters as Octave Chanute center stage in the effort to create practical airplanes. I commend it to all interested in the development of flight in America
Worth Contemplating. This is a hot little book well worth contemplating if you're aspiring to become a serious artist.  For the student, novice artist, seasoned practioner or curious artlover, your money will be well spent to have this on your shelf.
BH&Gardens 501 quilt blocks. The book just arrived. I am new at quilting. There is every applique design you could ever want to use. The other block designs are just beautiful. If I could only have 1 book to use, it would be this book. The directions are clear and very easy to understand. I can't wait to get startedf!!
Quite simply, a Fun Book to Read. Whether you are a fan of the Bond movies or you enjoy a good spy novel, Ian Fleming's Casino Royale is an excellent place to start. The novel served as the worlds very first introduction to iconoclastic superspy James Bond who is easily one of the most recognized fictional characters in recent memory. This one book spawned a movie franchise currently 21 films strong spanning over four decades, as well as a number of independent films and a massive collection of non-Fleming novels. If that is not enough reason to give Casino Royale a try, I will give you a few more.Although a bit outdated at this point, the Cold War setting provides a great introduction to James Bond. The story finds the veteran agent on his way to the casino in hopes of foiling the SMERSH (basically the Soviet version of the CIA) agent Le Chiffre's plan to regain SMERSH money he mistakenly invested. The goal is to force Le Chiffre to seek sanctuary with the British or American secret services in exchange for information. Bond, the best gambler in the secret service, is sent to break Le Chiffre's bank.The story starts off a little slow, filling the reader in on background information about some of the important characters and institutions, but quickly picks up pace and does not slow down for a page. Fleming does not waste words. His descriptions are only as detailed as they need to be. Instead of devoting pages and pages to detailing a characters appearance or whatever, Fleming provides some broad brush strokes and lets the reader fill in the details. This allows the reader to develop a personal connection with the characters, letting us create a bond with Bond (that pun really was not intended) and the other prominent characters that makes us truly care about the outcome.The action scenes are minimal but efficient. The lengthy gun fights in the movies are much more restrained and, in truth, much more realistic. A secret agent would try to remain secret, not just walk in with guns blazing. Casino Royale is a gritty novel. It is no way a glorification of secret agency but instead a mere description of it, showing the reader what life is like for an agent.Fleming's characters are quite intriguing. Le Chiffre is a truly hateable villain whose cruelty will make most any reader cringe. Vesper, the lead female, is a delightful character whose wit makes you laugh and whose melancholy is, at times, palpable.  And of course Bond is a truly admirable character that will appeal to any reader. He's tough, intelligent, courageous, persistent and, above all, very human. Bond's humanity is often lost in the films, yet in Casino Royale he can be wrong and he can lose.In conclusion, there is a whole lot to like in Casino Royale. A fast-paced, intense plot, likeable heroes and detestable villains, strong but brief writing (brevity is, after all, the soul of wit). If you are looking for the novelization of the recent film adaptation, however, you may be disappointed. There is no tremendous chase scene to start off the movie or a brutal fight in a stairwell against a man with a machette. But there truly is a whole lot to like. Quite simply, its a fun book to read
Deja Vu, All Over Again. RISING TIDERising Tide: The Great Mississippi Flood of 1927And How it Changed America--By John M. BarryJohn Barry's stellar history of the forgotten events of 1927 has remarkable parallels withthe Louisiana of today: especially given that a bipartisan committee of Congress has called for the dismantling of FEMA because of its egregious failures in responding to Katrina.The flood itself began innocuously enough in the spring of 1926, when it rained for weeks in the Midwest and South.  "The Mississippi itself grew fat and swollen," he writes, "tens of thousands of acres went under water.  The gauges measuring depth continued to rise...but no one at the Weather Bureau (there was no National Weather Service or NOAA at the time) forwarded the information to Washington).The catalogue of errors and omissions by the bureaucracy runs to chapters of [...], neglect, and racism... with black laborers conscripted in New Orleans to fill sandbags after the levees broke.The recovery from the great flood was just as disastrous: "as people returned to their homes and businesses, the strain only intensified.  The cleanup seemed endless and hopeless. Mud was caked everywhere; four to eight inches of alluvial deposits that had created the delta. It gave off a thick, fetid smell - a smell like dung mixed with swamp gas."People said the victims should have gotten out of the city sooner (does this sound familiar yet?)"The city became an armed camp. Blacks and whites who lived in the city had firearms.  On the levee backs had shovels and hoes and knives with in reach. In both races fear grew; it was a deep fear." (Rising Tide: p. 333).Compounding all of this was a lack of  accurate information, rumors, mixed communications, political corruption, and profiteering.  The only federal response came too little and too late.The Ku Klux Klan... then a fraternal organization to which respectable white men(but not Jews or Irish) belonged... controlled statehouses and legislatures. By the early 1920's at least 3 million Americans belonged to the Invisible Empire... some estimates ran as high as eight million).  (Rising Tide: p. 142).As with Katrina, the issues of race run throughout the story. The treatment of black refugees revealed an ugly truth: the white businessmen who ran the state of Mississippi were more concerned with money than with human life, and a bitter fight began between member of LeRoy Percy's family over whether to evacuate the black refugees stranded in the Delta, or keep them as a work force.  Economic interests prevailed.Once the waters receded, it was time to return to normalcy.  The bankers, lawyers and politicians of New Orleans began an aggressive marketing campaign to convince visitors that the Crescent City was safe to return to. They threatened  to withhold loans from businesses which failed to comply with official policies.  Newspapers were encouraged to write favorable stories about the city's revival... even if the facts didn't support them.Rising Tide is a remarkable account of the manner in which public policy and perceptions were redefined after The Great Flood.
This book was earthshattering!. The first time I read Ms. Bordo's book, I was so into it that I didn't get enough sleep that night.  This book tells us the brainwashing media and society use to control women as well as to maintain the power elite.  If the elite, media or otherwise, didn't use impossibly thin, beautiful, made up blonde women to keep them divided and in control, the whole structure would have collapsed long time ago.Thanks Ms. Bordo for informing me about this, for I've been in darkness for many years
Everyone's favorite badger. In 1964 Russell Hoban wrote, and his wife Lillian illustrated, a charming little book entitled "Bread and Jam For Frances".  Already an established character in such books as "Bedtime For Frances" and "A Baby Sister For Frances", this next story observes Frances as she stubbornly believes that she would like to eat only bread and jam, rather than any other food.  Her parents oblige her willingly, and Frances comes to learn that a person should expand their tastes once in a while.  The book is charming and dated only in the slightest of ways.  Yes, Frances only wears skirts and dresses.  Yes, Mother is the only one making the meals.  But this is such a light happy little tale that these flaws are easily overcome.  Lillian Hoban's illustrations are as cute as can be.  The story itself is amusing (Frances often singing little songs to the food she dislikes out of earshot of her parents).  Sometimes you just want to read your kids something that doesn't involve huge battles, gross out jokes, or didactic morals.  If that's you, then allow me to introduce the perfect solution.... a little number I like to call "Bread and Jam For Frances"
Sennights of stooks, scolds, carbuncles, ewers and poppets. This exceptional fact-based novel of the Bubonic Plague epidemic of 1666 is narrated by 18 year-old widowed mother, Anna Frith, house servant of the local rector, Michael Mompellion. While lodging with Anna and her two young sons, George Viccars, a journeyman tailor, earns a place in her heart (and eventually in her bed) due to the great rapport he has with them.  He soon shows symptoms of the Plague, pus filled bacteria-laden boils forming at his lymph nodes in conjunction with a fever, which burst and become necrotic.  Viccars, seemingly aware of the cause, insists that his things be burned after his death.  Instead, his customers collect their items of clothing, thereby helping to spread the disease (which was determined in 1898 to be transmitted through fleas on infected rats in 90% of cases). Mompellion, in proposing the quarantine during a sermon says, "Greater love hath no man than this, that he lay down his life for a friend," and suggested that "the boundary of this village become our whole world." Of the 300 villagers, all but one family agree to and stay. By the time it has run its course, over a year has gone by and two thirds of the villagers have perished.The cast of characters includes a woman and her aunt who practice homeopathic medicine and are suspected by some villagers of being  witches (because of the incantations they employ in conjunction with their herbal remedies), Anna's alcoholic depraved father, an orphan girl trying to retain the rights to her dead family's mine, and a mysterious ghost.  The story follows the happenings in the village, secrets being revealed along the way.  Geraldine Brooks seems genuinely skilled at keeping to the spirit of the time during which the novel is set, employing the use of dozens of words that have since been abandoned or superceded.  Additionally, she convincingly employs the use of religious themes and beliefs, even though her own are secular.  Year of Wonders is a uniquely interesting and believable story of the Plague.
Helpful guide to coming to grips with the bible. The ESV Reformation Study Bible has been a great help on my second read-through of the bible. I firstly read through the NT and then the Old using the new TNIV bible. That version is easier to read than the ESV, and is a usually reliable update to the venerable NIV. The translators have attempted to show where original masculine language was intended to be inclusive, such as in the use of the Greek word ADELFOI which sometimes means "brothers" but often means "Christian brothers and sisters." Occasionally this use of gender inclusive language smacks of political correctness and spoils an otherwise helpful translation.The ESV also often uses inclusive language where this was intended in the original, but shrinks from doing this with certain words such as ADELFOI and HUIOI [which normally means "sons" but is often intended to include women as well].At times the language in the ESV is awkward, which I noticed particularly in my read-through of Hebrews. It would be difficult to read to others some verses of the ESV and convey the sense correctly.The Reformation Study Bible is an extremely helpful guide to the Scriptures, with excellent introductions to each body of literature in the bible, such as the Pentateuch, the Prophets, the Poetic Literature, the Gospels, etc. It includes helpful introductions to every bible book and also has usually helpful notes on specific chapters and verses.There are also 96 articles on key theological topics which present a Reformed point of view, as would be expected. The editors have shown an awareness of some differences between Reformed Christians and have written the article on baptism, for example, with at least a passing acknowledgment of Baptists who are otherwise Reformed but do not believe that infant baptism is an acceptable application of the bible's instruction on this Christian initiation rite.The authors of articles and notes include R C Sproul, Keith Mathison, Bruce Waltke, Moises Silva, James Boice, Edmund Clowney, J I Packer, Raymond Dillard, Tremper Longman, Gordon McConville, Ray Ortlund, Willem vanGemeren, Gordon Wenham, Wayne Grudem, Simon Kistemaker and Frank Thielman.This Australian reviewer would like to mention that there are also several excellent Aussie contributors, including Leon Morris, Bill Dumbrell, Graeme Goldsworthy, Barry Webb and John Woodhouse.I am disappointed that my hardcover edition has cracked binding: I'm guessing it came this way. But I hope that this is not an indication of poor workmanship in other copies.I highly recommend this bible as a wonderful help in coming to understand the Word of God more fully
I get a good feeling from this book. [...]if you consider yourself an advanced witch or Wiccan, you may want to be less harsh in your judgment of this book, as the people reading it are those like myself, who have an avid interest in witchcraft/the occult, but don't have the twenty years of training in such subjects.  So, in that case, I've made my point clear.I am not saying that this book is poorly written or contrived, on that contrary, it's a very rich book, and I think it is chock-full of important information.  I would highly recommend this book, of course, to those who need a "teacher," and Ann Moura is just this person.  Her book is quite replete, as I mentioned, and I get a "good feeling" from it for some reason.(I also wanted to note that I especially loved that Ann included sections on magical teas and other aspects of the occult like the symbols of planetary spirits and so forth.  This book has it all.)
Frank and honest style.  For those searching for the truth. Must read, especially for 2nd generation Christians, or youngsters searching for God for themselves. The style is frank and easy. You'll come away knowing God better. I happen to come across this book &quot;by  chance&quot;. Now I am reading all other books by Isobel KUHN
Don't leave home without it. Indispensable.  I plowed through GR in my mid twenties without the Companion.  Large portions of Pynchon's encyclopedic epic were totally baffling to me.  However, I've always been intrigued by GR.  So, some fifteen years later, I undertook to read it again, this time with the help of the Companion. Not only did it aid in my understanding of the novel, but I actually enjoyed reading GR this time around.  Now perhaps I'll tackle Mason &amp; Dixon
A Must-Have for fantasy fans!. The bulk of this great book (500+ pages) reprints about 40 fantasy and horror stories culled from both niche and mainstream literary magazines (the Stephen King story included in the book was originally published in The New Yorker).With the thousands of fantasy books being published every year (more than ever, probably due to the mainstream success of Mr. Potter), you really need a guidebook to find your way through the maze. And the comprehensive 150 page section at the beginning of the book will show you the way.There are "Summary 2003" sections for the best of the past year's fantasy and horror books, recommending a full range of titles, from mainsteam mega-publishers like Warner and HarperCollins, to well-known smaller presses like fantasy-favorite Small Beer Press, all the way tiny one-book publishers like Centerpunch Press. There's also summary coverage on movies, anime, manga, and comics, if those are of interest.This is many, many hours of great reading, and it will point you to more great books than you'll ever have time to read!
Underscores the complexity of the human mind. Oliver Sacks' An Anthropologist on Mars is a delightful and enlightening book that reveals the unparalleled complexity of the human brain.Sacks, an accomplished neurologist and author, presents seven case studies that highlight different neurological phenomena.  In his case studies, Sacks follows a newly colorblind painter, a man who can create no new memories, a surgeon with Tourette's syndrome, a blind man who regains his sight, a painter obsessed with images from his childhood, an autistic boy artist, and a high-functioning autistic professor.  Sacks does not treat his case studies as dry medical oddities but rather discusses their neurological experiences within their broader human existence.  Unlike other authors who know their patients only distantly, Sacks works intimately with his case studies and develops meaningful relationships that translate into a deeper, more insightful understanding of his patients and their experiences.While Sacks is clearly a brilliant neurologist, what makes this book so powerful is his ability to weave in medicine, science, history, and philosophy into a coherent narrative.  Every case study illuminates a series of important and thought-provoking questions that challenge the everyday assumptions of perception, reality, intelligence, and what it means to be human.  In the end, the reader emerges with a better appreciation of the complexity of the human mind.The book is very well documented with copious footnotes provided throughout the book.  Occasionally, Sacks neglects to define some arcane medical terms, so readers would do well to keep a dictionary close at hand.  Overall, the book is highly accessible to the general reader who will find it intriguing and intellectually rewarding.
Factotum very graphic. I found the book fascinating for its detailed description of life on the mean streets.It was very raw and seemed quite real.  But it was a very gritty book and was a hard read.  Anyone who calls this a humorous book didn't read it
Big on ideas. I found this book to be great! It gave me alot to consider that I had not even thought about. It you are planning to build a home this is a great book. It starts out giving you advice on what to look for in your floor plan then walks you thru the complete building process. I was hoping for a little more advice on how to go about being your own contractor but the book did not promis that. This book will be by my side for a while
Great Book!. My 5 year old grandson is going through the "bug stage".  I have given him the bug vacuum and habitat and the Lady Bug habitat.  He will sit for long periods of time just reading this book.  He loves to take the book out in the backyard to match what he finds out there with what is in the book.  Best money I have spent for him in a while. I encourage anyone with a child that's buggy over bugs to make the purchase
Winning Custody. This was, by far, one of the most inspirational books I have ever read. The ramifications of this book have had far reaching effects on all aspects of my life. This is a must read for anyone going through a custody dispute. The author really knew what she was talking about
The classic classic... that I still don't get why it's one. This is another of those books that everyone tells you how wonderful and incredible it is. I read it, and... okay. It's a book. And a not-bad one at that. But is it amazing? Is it the greatest, most thought-provoking book of all times? Is it truly just overrated?We have a story where it's almost as though the narrarator is not the main charactor, but rather, her father is. The story seems much more about Atticus than Scout, but that is a matter of interpertation. It's a story about racism, injustice, and thinking about all of that. Atticus is a man who goes against what the rest believes, and though he "fails", he knows that he has succeeded by making people think about the issues they are facing.So we've covered the topic. It's an interesting topic. And the book itself has some wonderful parts, but for the most part it drags on and on.I rate this a four because I feel that it's something everyone should read (if for some odd reason you didn't read it in high school). Whether you like it like so many others, dislike it as many teenagers who are forced to read it do, or merely feel that's it's okay, but overrated, like myself, it's worth reading, not just to find out where you fit, but also to try to see and understand why it is much loved. I myself have only just realized that everyone loves this for the fact that it tackled such social issues. It's worth reading, but not everyone should expect to find it a brilliant classic, but rather, just a good old book
Nobody knows it all. This book is a great manual for learning how extend the use of your brain. It's really comical when someone like "Magellan" tries to serve up their theories on the rest of us as if they are some genius like Darwin. Magellen doesn't know what he's talking about. Any rational scientist in this day and age will tell you that they are still studying and finding things about the brain that was not known on a daily basis. And everyone's brain is unique to them, so it's impossible for scientists to lump everybody in one category as Magellan did. The real answer is that they simply do not know what our brain's potential is. And Magellan is also wrong about our brains not generating electrical energy; that was proven years ago. That why our brains give electrical impulses that can be read on machines. I know far too many people from all over the planet who have learned to do some amazing things with their brains. The only thing that Magellan shows to me is that he has no experience is this area and has no idea that these things are an every day reality for some people in every walk of life. It's totally ridiculous for someone like Magellan to try and dictate what reality is for everyone else. Magellan, if you have yet to experience any of these things in the book, that's your problem, but you don't get to invalidate MY experiences because YOU didn't have them. For everyone else, check the book out and get the validation from your own experience.
Review of  The Breast Cancer Survival Manual. As someone who was recently diagnosed with Breast Cancer, I found the book to be very informative and easy to read
Perfect for me. This is the best layout with lots of color pictures to illustrate step by step the recipes.  I have a handful of well rated Japanese cookbooks but this one has the best layout so it is my favorite and the one I want to recommend.  It makes me WANT to get cooking.This book's style is of the kind found in books that are sold in Asian bookstores.As with all the Japanese cookbooks I own, the writers mention Chinese cooking to compare and declare that something is similar but uniquely Japanese.  However, that is not true but the authors are not authorities on Chinese cooking and culture so they can't be expected to know everything or anything true about Chinese authenticity.  I bear this in mind and forgive the errors because I buy the book out of interest in Japanese not Chinese cooking. This book contains much fewer references and assumptions to Chinese than the other cookbooks such as the false claim that the cheap bamboo steamer baskets are the archetypal Chinese steamer equipment and that the square steamers or metal steamers are not Chinese.  One can say that this is more procedure and less editorializing than other cookbooks.This book could be sold in a Chinese bookstore without being offensive and would delight the Chinese with its recipes. I recommend this book and wish the author had written more than two books.
Enjoyable. I found this book reminiscent of books by Charles Dickens, in that it featured a large cast of odd characters whose lives continued to intersect, eventually forming one huge convoluted web.  Realizing this was the case early on, I enjoyed discovering how everyone would eventually meet.The book tells the story of Daniel, a boy who falls in love with a novel by Julian Carax.  He tries to find another book by this author but comes to find out that he seems to be in possession of the only remaining copy of any of this author's books.  Someone is traveling across Europe, stealing or buying all of Carax's books and setting fire to them.Thus Daniel embarks on a quest to figure out what happened to Carax, whether he is, in fact, dead, and why someone would want to burn his novels.I found the ending of this book, in which it was finally clear how all of the stories affected each other, extremely gratifying.  The novel was a bit long winded in parts and perhaps could have been a hundred pages or so shorter, but I still enjoyed it a great deal
Good Book!. The readings are pretty good and insightful. The chapters are long enough to complete in one sitting and provides the ability for comprehension without too much reading.  The topics provide deep thought and are right on point
Very essential. A must for anyone traveling in a RV.  AAA does not have a book as comprehensive as Woodall's.  Every campground in North America is in here.  The only drawback is its size...large and heavy.  Over a thousand pages can be unwielding, but great as a reference
truly inspirational. Warning: Don't get carried away by the title of this book, it is purely metaphoric.When you are handed a 600 page autobiography of an entrepreneur, at first, you may wonder whether such a piece is worth even leafing through. Who has the time to read stuff like this?LOSING MY VIRGINITY is an extraordinary book written by an extraordinary man, Richard Branson. One may actually have some reservations about reading about a not exactly well-known business magnate (I am talking about India, of course). But rest assured, once you read through the author's bio and the very impressive blurbs, you will realize that it is far from a conventional (boring, if you like) memoir.Branson is one of a rare breed, a paragon of British entrepreneurship, and a genius who has revolutionized British culture and lifestyles. Throughout this book, one can find a real humility in Branson's narrative of himself and his experiences. Like most contemporary memoirists, Branson uses the confessional mode of writing, which has allowed him to do things that a conventional novel will not. Branson's style of writing is so good-humored and his perceptions so remarkable that this book is worth a read even if you don't have the slightest interest in business. As one critic wrote about this book - Heavy but impossible to put down.The book is written in a chronological fashion, and the chapters have rather stimulating titles. The chapters are actual chunks taken from Branson's life, and provide a rich visual and verbal experience to the reader. Some 130 photographs (both color and black & white) are there, and they complement the narrative beautifully.It is fast paced, and has an honesty which is a little trivial at times. Branson reveals much about himself. Towards the middle, he gives a passionate account of his devotion towards music. His other great passion, adventure (some of which have been near-death experiences), is also dealt with in detail. Branson's love for ballooning, which he calls the most exhilarating of all sports, got him an entry into the Guinness Book of World Records, a real tribute to his daredevilry.Branson's tale is novel, and is filled with instances of courage, the courage to break away from tradition. At age 16, Branson started a student's magazine and then ventured into music, which was a big hit. Richard Branson recounts this as a sad moment in his life when he had to sell Virgin Records to Thorn EMI in order to keep a floundering Virgin Atlantic Airways afloat. Today, apart from Virgin Atlantic, the Virgin Group owns Virgin Cola, Virgin Vie, Virgin Brides, Virgin Mega-stores and many more such ventures, which cater to everything any person would want in his daily life.  Now, after conquering the world, he wants to fly you to space.I would hate to spoil the read for you, so suffice it to say that LOSING MY VIRGINITY is a real, inspirational story that can only be told by the man himself.  Such is the popularity of this book that it has become a byword for 'What they don't teach you at Business Schools'. From another perspective, it is a comic recollection of life's ups and downs juxtaposed with anecdotes about rock stars, politicians, friends and foes.One finds no moral story in the end, no grandfatherly advice to the young blood. Instead, one is left with a deep feeling of admiration and a constant mulling over his adventures. If you ever want to know how much a single guy can achieve with "talent, initiative and good ideas", read this book. It comes as close to providing the real experience as any book can, and for this reason alone it should be coveted
Great book. First I would like to state the reason I gave it 4 stars.  In my opinion, 5 stars should be very hard to reach.  Maybe I would give this 4.5 stars if it was possible.  Anyway, I'm a self taught VB 6 programmer with a working knowledge of the Windows API.  First year CS student, though I've read many a book on C and a few on assembly.  I have a large CS library and this is the first book of it's kind that I've found.  It is a little pricey if you compare book size to other, larger CS books, but I don't think it is overpriced.  The material is great, though I wouldn't say it is a beginner level book.  I had trouble grasping enough of the material that it causes me to think either I've still got a long ways to go in learning (more so than I thought at least), or it is just not for the beginner.I would recommend this book to anyone who is serious about a programming career, regardless of the language.  The book's relatively small size should not be a negative factor.  It is not densely packed with information to the point where interpretation is needed, instead it explains in sufficient detail without dumbing it down by over-repetition and such used by some other CS books.  It is aimed at C/C++ programmers, so being familiar with those is a prerequisite, obviously.  Like another reviewer said, there seemed to be a little too much discussion on, say, serialization of linked data structures, an important topic with regards to memory yet I felt a little more emphasis could have been placed elsewhere
Queen of the Vampires. This is an excellant book. Pure and simple, it may not be all Vampire but you can relate to what Lestat feels in this novel. So it hits you on somewhat of a personal level.I highly recommend this book. Once again, once again Rice manages to do it. This book was just as wonderful as all the others. I don't think I've ever come across a Vampire Book so ensightful. Definate reading.
Second generation of Ed Emberley artists!. We own four of Emberley's Drawing books and my kids loved them... they are now adults and I plan to use this newest book with my two grandchildren.  Kids love to draw, but often get frustrated because the results "don't look right!".  These books turn "I can draw??"  into "I CAN DRAW!!" with smiles and laughter all around.  The directions are very simple and the results satisfying... I recommend this book for all the budding artists you know
Good, good. I previously purchased this book, used it successfully, and then lent it(much marked up) to someone (don't remember who)and now I need it again. I didn't follow the program 100%, but it did work. I was on allergy shots, and had asthma symptoms at certain times of the year depending on what was blooming. This book worked for me, and I have tried a lot of them
Review of "Feisty Fido.". "Feisty Fido" presents a clear step-by-step method for changing the behavior of a dog who is aggressive toward strange dogs when he is being walked on leash.  It was not as clear on changing the behavior of a dog who is intermittently agressive toward other dogs he lives with
Courtesy of Teens Read Too. The Van Gogh Caf is magic. Nobody knows quite how or why, but they all agree that it is. Nobody knows it better than ten-year-old Clara. She helps her dad, Marc, run the caf. Clara knows how much the caf loves stories, and the small stories don't often stay small for long.To the people in Flowers, Kansas, who have been going to the caf all of their lives, the unbelievable is pretty normal, and the impossible seems quite possible. Anything can happen at the Van Gogh Caf.From lost loves found, to a cat that falls in love with a seagull. From food that cooks itself, to magically multiplying muffins. From prophetic poetry on napkins, to a possum that helps a man find his life again. You never know what you might find at the Van Gogh Caf.I love it!My only complaint is that it's too short and I want more! My only question is, can I please go visit? Maybe even work there? Oh, that's two questions.Reviewed by:  Carrie Spellma
Well Written and Very Useful. I teach drawing, painting and design and stumbled across this book when looking for the Bargue book.  The book is well written with several useful exercises.Additionally, a clear rationale is presented for teaching academic drawing to the beginning art student as a means to better express their ideas.I work at the New York Academy of Art (NYAA).  Several of the images were made by NYAA instructors and alumni.  An additional copy has been added to our library.JC
Excellent overview!. When I first discovered this book, I realized how important it was. I suggest chapters from it to my students in Introductory Psychology and Child Development. These discoveries are leading the new positions in  education, prompting earlier and earlier &quot;teaching&quot; (enrichment)  for children. Written with enthusiasm and skill
Jump at the Sun:Cinderella. This is one of my favorites of this book series because it makes the whole princess stage that all little girls go through accessible to little girls of color. My four year old loves seeing that a princess can look like her. I was thrilled to find this book
Anyone who loved "Little Women" will also like "Good Wives!". A thoroughly satisfying sequel to a book I grew up loving.  It took me forever to get to Good Wives, but when I did, it was like coming home.  What a treat to meet up with my favorite childhood characters in this delicious heartwarming book
Frank Castle at his Best. What can I say about The Punisher that hasn't been said in comic coventions not only across America but but throughtout the World? From the time I picked up this book and started reading I was just caught up in the Punisher's world. It really gives insight not only as to his motives but just how much he values human life (with the exception of mobsters, hitmen,etc.) When I heard that a Punisher movie was in the making I remember being excited thinking how well the movie would be if they followed the Welcome Back Frank storyline. What the world witnessed however is how Hollywood takes the best things in life and poison everything they touch. The Punisher movie is a very loose translation of this book so if you're a real Punisher fan, just curious about the character, or seen the movie and collecting the book; make sure and pick this one up. It has to be one of the greatest graphic novels written in the new milleniu
Excellent Picture Book. I love Roger Priddy's books. This one is one of my son's favorite books. He loves to point at the pictures and hear us name them. We read it everyday. Good way to increase his vocabulary. He recognizes a lot of pictures though he cannot really say the word as ye
Got to love a Krentz. I think I own every thing she has ever written under every name. This one lived up to my expectations. It was smart and funny
Useful. I am both a wildlife artist and also going into Environmental Conservation. I bought this book when it was 'new', just after picking it up and glancing at it. I knew it was going to be the best, and it is. It is one of the greatest books I have as far as tools, there are pictures for almost every animal in the book, the information is organized and easy to access, the whole thing is just a huge treasure for anyone who loves animals, works with them, or just wants to learn more
This is THE book to understand Spain. The first form of this book was simply called "The Spaniards" and was published in 1986. A completely revised version came out in 1995 with the title changed to "The New Spaniards." This second (2006) edition is significantly different that the first new and completely revised edition. This must sound convoluted, but the evolution of this book reflects the incredible changes that have taken place in Spain since the death of Dictator Franco in 1975. Indeed, some have argued that no other country has changed as much or as rapidly as Spain during the past 30 years.British journalist John Hooper is intimately familiar with Spain. The well-researched, well-written book is as fine a survey of Spanish history, life, culture and attitudes as you are likely to find. His treatment is impartial and fair, though his love and respect for Spain cannot be obscured. It is everything you wanted to know and probably much you did not want to know. By that I mean that the strength of the book is also its weakness for some people. Though I am somewhat familiar with Spain, I learned a great deal and was fascinated with the breath, depth and accuracy of information Hooper provides. I also found myself slugging it out though seemingly endless statistics, economic studies and obscure names acronyms and personalities. Despite that, Hooper strikes a fine balance between academic excellence and readability. Even though you may be overwhelmed by more information than you can absorb, Hooper usually keeps your interest and gets the main point across.If you are planning a vacation in Spain "The New Spaniards" may be more information than you care to know. Even a causal tourist, though, can benefit greatly from this book by intentionally focusing on what is interesting and relevant and not carrying the self-imposed burden of trying to remember or understand every detail. Of particular value is Hooper's firm grasp of the different peoples, languages and regions of Spain. If you are going to Spain as an exchange student or otherwise planning to spend an extended period of time in Spain, this is the place to begin your education.
Another Fine Mess of a Book. Laurel and Hardy are the eternal image to many of down-on-their-luck individuals struggling just to get by in this world, and in his book "Stan and Ollie" author Simon Louvish explains why they appeal to us after almost a century has passed since their first film together. In an exhuastive and well-paced dual biography of the world's greatest comedy duo, Louvish provides insights into the two men who jointly comprised a team that was embraced the world over.Stan Jefferson (Laurel) and Oliver Hardy could not have come from more different backgrounds: Laurel's father was a North England theater manager who dabbled in play-writing, and his son became an actor on the stage just as vaudeville was on its way out and films on their way in. Hardy never knew his father, a Civil War veteran and local celebrity in their part of the state of Georgia. Both men took long routes towards the inevitable pairing, as Louvish demonstrates in what can be felt as a "teaser" of near-misses and almost-rans between the two when they both arrive in Hollywood in the mid-teens. But in 1927, they finally teamed up and started what would become the most celebrated partnership in film comedy.Throughout it all, Louvish gives us a portrait of the men behind the image that is all the more important to know. Hardy, the jolly fat-man, was actually self-conscious about his weight and struggled to keep it under control. Laurel, the simple child-like companion, was something of a ladies man, and the tales of his multpile marriages (including a series of ill-timed weddings to the same woman over the course of years) make for an interesting glimpse into his troubled private life.Laurel and Hardy, together briefly during the last days of the silent era, were able to transcend the barrier of sound, and they may well have been meant for the new entertainment form. Louvish details how they not only survived in the wake of other silent performers (Buster Keaton, Harold Lloyd) falling out of favor, but indeed prosper and contribute some of their best material in the early Thirties.Throughout the book, Louvish intersects accounts of the films they made together with some of the personal details that helped to shape their time together. He also addresses the odd fact of their embrace by the gay community, and Hardy's troubled Southern heritage and what it may have meant to the era of the Thirties (when openly racist portrayals of the black race ran rampant and unchecked). Stan Laurel emerges as a particularly harried figure, as his constant marital troubles become the fodder for Hollywood gossip mavens (a precursor of the current swath of "celebrity marital trouble" stories circulating in today's entertainment-obsessed media).In the entertaining way he critiques their work (first the golden years at Hal Roach's studio, then later the Twentieth Century Fox and MGM films), Louvish comes off not as a grumbling critic but a genuine fan, one who has sat through the dreck as well as the highlights. He can be trusted to give the straight story on the flops as well as the classics ("Sons of The Desert", "The Music Box", etc). Louvish's style is not the dry, bare-bones approach of more "scholarly" approaches to film, but he has the right amount of reverence to make up for any percieved flippancy towards his subjects. After all, his profile is that of a comedy duo, not an auteur like Kubrick or Godard.Louvish successfully argues, what's more, that the films of Laurel and Hardy (while not meant to be artistic statements) are worthy of close study and even analysis for their place in easing the country through the Depression and the Second World War (a claim that he puts forth for the lesser Fox pictures, though acknowledging their flaws). What's more, the friendship between Laurel and Hardy is genunine, unlike so many comedy partnerships that seem fraught with tension.The book is probably the closest we will get to knowing the real Laurel and Hardy, as well as understanding their most memorable films together. It will definitely be the first thing I recommend for L&H neophytes, and for diehard fans as well. Put simply, this is the book to read if you want to know about the greatest comedy duo of the film age.
Practical help. It's a sample of the questions you can get in the software, a great tool if you can't use a laptop or PC.  All you have to do is turn the page and get a full explanation, with references to PMBOK... very useful
Amazing!. I have never had the pleasure of reading any of Dubus' work before.  I truly enjoyed his writing style.  He has an amazing gift when it comes to capturing a person's thoughts and feelings.  I would strongly recommend this book
Mocking the "mediaeval" views of Victorian England. At its core, "A Room with A View" is a simple, pleasant romantic comedy, no less predictable and sentimental than many books in the genre. But this is E. M. Forster, who suffuses his story with both droll dialogue and a satirical touch that somehow manages to be simultaneously lighthearted and acidic.Lucy Honeychurch is the young British heroine who visits Florence with her prim, proper, and priggish older cousin. (Even before I saw the Merchant-Ivory movie, I imagined Maggie Smith in the latter role.) Early in the book, two events shatter Lucy's oppressive Victorian facade: first, she witnesses a murder on the streets of Florence, and then George, a carefree, young man staying in the same pensione, spontaneously and forwardly kisses her in a meadow.Following her "embarrassment," Lucy returns to England and becomes engaged to Cecil, an appropriately named cad whose stiffness and artificiality exceed even those of her cousin and who "should know no one intimately, least of all a woman." Soon after the engagement, Lucy's newly respectable life is thrown into disarray once again when George and his father become neighbors. "It is Fate that I am here," exclaims George to a minister friend with a rationalistic bent, "but you can call it Italy if it makes you less unhappy."Into this formula, Forster blends both social satire and political themes. The novel's political views are far less developed and serve more to define the characters than to present the struggle between aristocratic affectations and democratic (even socialist) principles. Most comically, Cecil's overt professions in favor of egalitarianism are little more than a patronizing, haughty, and occasionally cruel pose.The social satire, however, is integral to the book: skewering the "mediaeval" pretensions of Victorian England, he portrays Cecil as "the type who's kept Europe back for a thousand years" and George as the progressive visionary who decries the brutish "desire to govern a woman" and argues for a world in which "men and women must fight it together before they shall enter the garden." Lucy finds herself caught between their nineteenth- and twentieth-century views; it's an unfair struggle between those who long to remain mired in the past and those who march bravely into the future
Autobiography par excellence. Running with the Bulls is autobiography par excellence.  Valerie Hemingway openly and frankly tells the fascinating story of her life, which began as Valerie Danby-Smith.  Her mother was English Catholic, her father Irish Protestant, and their marriage failed.  Young Valerie grew up in a convent in Ireland, literally, and she spent the summers of her youth, when the convent school was closed, at a country hotel that attracted artists and writers.Aspiring to be a journalist, young Danby-Smith went to Spain.  There she went to interview the American author Ernest Hemingway, then 59 years old and enthusiastically visiting sites from his earlier days.  Thus the 19-year-old Irish woman began figuratively "running with the bulls."Danby-Smith became Hemingway's secretary and confidant.  She traveled in Spain and France with the Hemingway entourage.  She moved to Cuba to help the writer, but soon the Cuban Revolution forced the Hemingways to leave Cuba.  Danby-Smith went to New York City to pursue her career, and the Hemingways moved to Idaho.  There Ernest Hemingway committed suicide.  At his funeral Danby-Smith met Hemingway's youngest son, Gregory, long estranged from the family for reasons she did not learn until many years later.  With Fidel Castro's complacency, she helped Hemingway's widow smuggle the famous author's manuscripts and art collection out of Cuba.  For several years thereafter she sorted the Hemingway papers at the office of his publisher in New York City.  When she married Gregory Hemingway, he was a young doctor in New York.  The marriage took her to Florida, back to New York, and later to Montana, where the tragic drama of Gregory's life eventually brought the marriage to an end.Nothing in this book is expected.  If the book were a novel, the reader would not believe the story, the famous characters, the twists and turns.  But the story is true, and Valerie Hemingway lived it.  She tells her story with grace, discretion, and the skill of a fine journalist whose early mentor had been the legendary Ernest Hemingway.At the time she was hired, Ernest Hemingway had stipulated that a requirement of employment was that she would not write about the family.  She honored that requirement. But years have passed and others have written about her relationship with Ernest Hemingway, so the time came for Valerie Hemingway to tell it like it was.  It was an adventure
A book that is likely to send a sharp chill up through the spines of its target audience. This book was a required reading during my first-year of high school in a course called Humanities 9 and I thought it was a pretty interesting, but very scary read. I must warn you: If you dislike violence, or are adverse to killing in any shape or form, then don't even think, I repeat, don't even THINK about considering this novel, as it is filled with intense violence and there are definitely some killings. Most of this violence is done by a character called Okonkwo, who in a desperate attempt to cover up any sign of weakness, will resort to extremely brutal measures, such as literally pounding with his fist or slaughtering with some huge weapon anyone unfortunate enough to anger him, especially his children. You see, this Okonkwo is a big fella (about 7' 3", weighing approximately 300 lbs) and he is also the championship wrestler of his village, so you KNOW a beating from this dude is gonna hurt. He is also a warlike fellow who treats cowardice like a disease, the only cure of which is an extremely severe beating as his children often experience. If you so much as cry or act in a timid or sensitive manner, then you can expect to feel the wrath of Okonkwo, that is, a severely intense beating that is akin to having a giant boulder fall right on top of you. It is some pretty intense stuff and Okonkwo is definitely Mr. No Play, and that is what makes this book so chilling, yet so compelling and captivating all at the same time
Fabulous, Easy, Fun, Cool, Amazing, &amp; Creative!. This is an incredible book.  The experiments are easy, fun, and cool to do.  You and your child will be amazed at how easy these tricks and experiments really are to do.  If you're a teacher, you'll love this book  for your your primary classroom.  My students have effectively completed  these experiments and were simply amazed at how cool they turned out!  This  is a must have book.  Really!!
A solid book for beginners, especially loose players. 7 Card Stud by Roy West is a solid book for beginning players.  Not complete beginners, but beginners nonetheless.  The first 26 lessons are on 7 Card Stud in medium and lower limits, the next 12 are on general poker issues, and the last 4 are written by Tom McEvoy on Stud tournaments.  I found the book to be good for players that need to be told how to play, although not necessary why to play in a certain way.  West advice is to play tight and aggressive when you have the best of it.  But sometimes, his advice seems too much on the tight and conservative side.  Maybe this is good for the beginning player (to play too conservatively), since most players in the medium and lower limits have the exact opposite problem (they play too loose).  For most beginners who are too loose, they are going to benefit from this book.  If they follow the West's advice to be tight, they will likely improve their results.
refreshingly innovative paranormal mystery. Emerald O'Brien didn't know when she moved from Seattle to Chiqetaw that the town rests on a psychic power field and since Emerald has a strong psychic sense she is open to all the paranormal activity that surrounds the town.  When her friend Jimbo O'Brien asks Emerald to look for his biker friend Scar who disappeared without a trace, she agrees to help him though there are many stories about the Klakatat monster(similar to Bigfoot) who appears from time to time in the Klickavail woods where he was last seen.Emerald, her best friend the medium Murray and Jimbo enter the woods; the psychic uses her sixth sense to locate Scar who was murdered.  The coroner rules he was killed by a cougar but Emerald and Murray sense it was a human who murdered him even though there are many elementals in the area who could have been responsible for the deed.  When another biker is killed in the same place, Gordon, another psychic, is arrested but Emerald's worst enemy asks for her help in proving her cousin's innocence. Since Emerald believe George not guilty, she sets out to prove that the police arrested the wrong man and she won' let the Klakatat monster or the elementals stop her.MURDER UNDER a Mystic MOON is a refreshingly innovative paranormal mystery that will appeal to a wide range of mystery aficionados.  The heroine is very frightened of what she sees and knows in the etheral world but she still uses her psychic powers to go the extra mile to see that justice prevails even if it means putting her own life in danger.  Yasmine Galenorn is an author to keep an eye out as she is heading towards superstardom.Harriet Klausner
A Must for Coaches of Girls Basketball. When I started coaching girls basketball (3rd-9th graders) 3 years ago this was the second book I picked up.  Now I have about 35 books and 20 videos but I use this as the central reference for my playbook and training  manual in coaching fundamentals.  Some of the skills may be too advanced  for younger kids but they will grow up and adapt to it when they return to  you a little older and better skilled thanks to this reference.  It should  be used in conjunction with the videos by the author (available also from  Amazon).  If Nancy Lieberman-Cline ever sponsors a clinic I will be on the  first plane to get there.  As a player-coach-teacher she is the best for  girls basketball
Hilarious and Sad Warning about the Pitfalls of Self-Pity. As many critics and nay-sayers have said about this book, about a sports fans who lives vicariously through sports heroes while drinking and watching life pass him by, this autobiographical novel is indeed an indulgent exercise but that is the point. Self-indulgence, self-pity, self-absorption are killers. They leave us inert. Exley's self-deprecation and humor elevate this from naval-gazer narcissism to a theme about men and their meaning of life crises. Many American men obsess over sports because sports provide a venue for their fantasies of masculinity, heroism, and self-worth. That Exley was able to take this subject, which affected him very deeply, and make the pathology universal is a great achievement in this book, a novelization of his life told with brutal honesty, self-introspection, and wisdom. For an updated novel about today's adults, still trapped in adolescence, check out Tom Perotta's comic novel Little Children.
Privilege and peril among middle class blacks. Black Picket Fences is an insightful and informative survey of privilege and peril among middle class blacks providing an unusual, intriguing study of the pressures of black middle-class families. Sociologist Pattillo-McCoy lived in a black middle-class neighborhood in Chicago: her experiences serve as a foundation for analysis of social issues and change
My infant son loves them!!. I've been reading to my son since he was first born, and he is now 5 1/2 months old.  Out of all the books I've bought for him, he by far loves his Maisy books!!  His eyes light up at the pictures, and he starts babbling (talking) to the book!  My husband and I love reading them to him because the stories are so cute and easy to read.  Thank god for Amazon because I haven't been able to find all of the books anywhere else.  This book in particular is a life saver, because at night he often gets a little fussy and I read this to him before bedtime--it helps to calm him down
The man that could fly. I do not recommend this book to people who like horror or mystery because it is not at all scary and has no mystery in it what so ever. I would recommend this book to someone who just wants something to read because this book is easy to read and is a very moving story. The story was very anticlimactic. Nothing was really left for the reader to try and figure out. This story was not boring, but it could have used some more excitement. Being a Sci-Fi genre, the plot was not supposed to be believable but while reading the story you can get into the characters lives and feel how they feel about their problems. Depending upon the title of the book, I may read another book by David Almond
Karen Rose Does It Again !!!. I have read all of the Karen Rose books and I continue to love every one of them.  The other reviews go into great depth explaining the plot so I won't.  The best review I can give an author is when I can honestly say "I can't put it down!"  When I fall asleep at work due to reading all night I can tell you it was a Karen Rose book.  "Nothing to Fear" did not diappoint me yet thrilled me with more suspense and visual images than most of Karens books.I honestly can say that I wish she wrote 10 times faster so I wouldn't have to wait so long for another book to get published.  When I meet a friend or stranger reading romance I can't help but recommend a Karen Rose book.  This is my latest favorite of hers.  Keep writing Karen!
Superbly Spooky!. I read the first book, The Last Apprentice: Revenge of the Witch, at my son's recommendation and ended up reading it in less than 24 hours.  The Last Apprentice: Curse of the Bane was just as hard to put down! In this sequel, you learn a lot more about the Spook's past, as well as some Ward family secrets. My 10-year-old and I read the book at the same time and he found it just as riveting as I did, although he said I was the bigger chicken.  I will admit that at times, even I had to put the book down for a little while because I was so nervous for Tom Ward, the main character. If your "tween" is the type that wants to climb in bed with Mom & Dad after a ghost story, this is not the book for him/her.  But Curse of the Bane is a delicious, edge-of-your-seat thriller for anyone 10-100 who loves to be spooked! I cannot wait for Joseph Delaney's next book
Good overview of the history of some languages. Tore Janson's "Speak" is a succinct, readable overview of the history of languages, focusing primarily on English and Western languages.  This is a well-written, informative book.Janson starts by giving a brief overview of the development of languages, including mentioning one of his major themes of the book - a language is only a language if its speakers recognize it as such.  He then traces the history of the Mesopotamian languages, Greek, Latin, and then the modern European languages, finally devoting a chapter to English's current dominance in the world.  Finally, Janson concludes with a short chapter on the possible future development of languages.John McWhorter's "Power of Babel" is the only comparable book that I have read.  McWhorter is a little more entertaining and explains the actual dynamics of language change better, but Janson's story is more structured, linear and complete.This book is a good overview of the history of language for a layman.
A Philosophy of Interior Design (by S. Abercrombie). There are very few books out there that combine &quot;philosophy&quot; with &quot;interior design.&quot;  For this reason alone, Abercrombie's book is a worthy contribution to the literature in interior design.  One  trait of philosophical works is their tendency to identify broad but  fundamental categories that, together, describe a particular reality.  I  take this approach to be what the author means by &quot;a philosophy  of&quot; interior design.  That is to say, Abercrombie provides a menu of  basic categories (plan, room, planes, levels, ornament, furniture, art,  details, etc) and parses the reality of an interior built world through  these lenses.  His examples are good, and the book is well illustrated  (although some of the magic of interior experience is not conveyed by the  black and white pictures).  Another good aspect about this book is this:  the author is subtle in not making an arbitrary line of demarcation between  &quot;interior design&quot; and &quot;architecture.&quot; Even though his  categories serve to focus on the topic of interiors, it does so without  disconnecting interior design from the domain of architecture in some  artificial way - and I think that is as it should be.  In other words, this  is a worthwhile book for both architects (who sometimes forget about  interiors) and interior designers (who sometimes forget about  architecture).  As one who teaches design and has been in practice for many  years, I would consider this book a good fit for those just starting to  learn about interior design and/or those who are seasoned designers looking  for something of a refresher on the fundamental nature of interior design.  As the title implies, the book is not meant to be a  &quot;nuts-and-bolts&quot; reference text for the practitioner; it is more  of a meditative reflection about the nature of the worlds that the design  practitioner can create for others
Long, But Worth It. First of all, this is the longest book I've ever read cover to cover. The last page of text is numbered 1463. I read this out of interest in the subject and not because I was taking a class. Although I read over a dozen books leading up to this one, this book was well worth the preparation time and the time it took to actually read it. This book provides thorough coverage of the topic of cellular biology and from what I can tell it may well be the definitive book on the subject.  I have a Masters Degree in Computer Science and I've read many books on bioinformatics and related topics, and the one thing I've come to appreciate is the  almost overwhelming complexity of biological systems and the ominous task of investigating them. The length of this book is an absolute necessity and the CD which comes along with the book provides even more highly necessary information. The creation of this book was an enormous service to all of us interested in cellular biology and the compilation of all this information into a single highly comprehensible volume was an amazing feat
Multi-cultural travelers down an amazing wild river. I am not a regular reader of outdoor adventure stories, but having just been in Peru, this one held my interest.  Joe Kane brings the reader along on the adventure, not only describing the trials and triumphs on the river, but also the look of the land and graphic descriptions of the people of the Amazon.I was amazed that Joe Kane ended up being one of the people who completed the whole trip, not that he didn't want to quit many times.  Many excellent pictures are included thanks to Zbigniew Bzdak.To learn more about the wonderous tropical biology of this region, I recommend the book "Tropical Nature" by Adrian Forsyth and Ken Miyata.
Dear Mr. Blueberry by Simon James. This book is about a little girl named Emily. Emily thinks that there is a whale in her backyard, so she decides to write to her favorite teacher "Mr.Blueberry. Mr. Blueberry answers that she must be mistaken, because whales don't live in ponds, they live in oceans. One day Mr. Blueberry wrote a letter back to Emily about how whales were migratory, and she read it to her whale named Arthur. The next day, Emily looked in her backyard and Arthur was gone.Days and days have passed and Emily was still sad about Arthur, she gave up and thaught that Mr.Blueberry was right. After a while she went to the beach and she saw Arthur there. Emily was finally very happy about Arthur and went back to the beach almost everyday to see him. I think that this was a great book.
A great summer read. Take this to the beach or your favorite vacation spot (even out to the yard in the hammock).  A very sweet book
Great intro to Heinlein. Is this the best book Robert Heinlein ever wrote?  No.  Will fans of other Heinlein books recognize the Sci-Fi Master's style and philosophy?  Yes.  This book is a great introduction to Robert Heinlein, especially for a younger reader just starting out.  It captures the philosophy which was an important part of all of Heinlein's military sci-fi, but is shorter than some of his later works and written in the tradition of his "juvenile" fiction.  However, I would have to agree that it will still be entertaining for adult readers.  Like all great writing, this book has several layers which readers will discover as they reread it as they age.  All-in-all this is a wonderful book.  If you are looking for a perfect gift for a younger fan of science fiction, look no further
One of the best writers of all time. One of the best I have ever read. Also red his other book "snow" but this one is I think is one of the best reads I had. Highly recomended..
Keep Tissues Handy. I was skimming the stacks in the Grief section when "The Orphaned Adult" caught my eye.  What a cold, harsh title, I thought - yet I was compelled to read it.  Until then, I'd never come across a book written specifically for those who have lost both parents, and it was good to see that someone had finally addressed this life-changing event.  What took so long?Based on its unparalleled impact, and the fact that nearly everyone experiences it, you'd think there'd be a slew of books written on the subject.  But there isn't.  Levy addresses this scarcity early on by referring to society's impatience with adults who are grieving the loss of an elderly parent.  It's two weeks, then get over it.  After all, it's the natural order of things.Levy is the revisionist of that theory.  Having gone through the experience himself, he knew firsthand that society - and the literary world - was selling it short and decided to do something about it.  By writing this book, he makes a persuasive case that the loss of both parents - and along with them, our place called home - is a monumental event that deserves more discussion, exploration, and patience.The book is a treasure.  The author has a wonderful writing style that gives you the sense he is beside you, at eye level, confiding in you.  He gently guides you through the minefield of parental loss, attempting to describe, explain, and make sense of some of the most difficult emotions you will ever know.  At the end of each chapter are beautiful, poignant poems written by real people in tribute to the parents they've lost.One of the best features of the book is that, as a psychologist who is himself an adult orphan, Levy is able to write both as a victim and as a learned observer.  He's able to share his own grief experiences alongside those of his orphaned adult patients.  It is this melding - of his first-person accounts as a son, husband, father, and brother, with his clients' stories and his professional observations of them -  that gives the book an extra dimension and makes it more rewarding than most.For those of you who've lost both parents and are struggling with the aftermath -  processing the grief, regaining an identity, facing your own mortality - you'll find much to relate to in this book.  This is a highly emotional read, especially for the bereaved, and a box of tissues should be kept handy.  But while it may evoke tears, it also brings comfort that someone has at last recognized the unique issues, perspectives, and concerns of the orphaned adult.  Levy has brought them out of the shadows and into the light, and has made the case for all of us that two weeks is not nearly enough
rare portrayal of African village life. A story about a black refugee from South Africa who finds a new home and the meaning of life in a small Botwana village.  This book is a rare contemporary well-written portrayal of African village life, values, and impediments to progress
Community Life. This book helps me to understand more how to build up the community life.This is an excellent book for any community learning to accept and live together as a good community with love
He talks to Dead People. Very helpful and detailed book. Interesting and explains many realities or views of life events and how to handle the engeries of ghost activities, understanding things from their point of view
Revised for More Help. Adkins wrote several books. Since this was a revised version, I bought it to go with the other Adkins book
Excellent!  A Must Read!!. This book was the fourth book I read by Mark Hitchcock.  I have never been disappointed with his books and this one is no exception.  He ties the current crisis with what could happen in the near future as predicted in the Bible.  It's the only way to clearly understand what is happening today and what may well happen in the near future.My only disagreement with the author is that he believes Babylon in Revelation 17 and 18 is the city in Iraq that is rebuilt there.  I disagree with that view as I believe Babylon in the end times (Revelation 17 & 18) is a reference to Rome.  Space does not permit why I believe it's Rome but that is what I believe.The slight disagreement I have doesn't take away from recommending this book.  I liked it so much and read it in one day.  It easily deserves five stars.  A must read and a serious wake up call for America before it is too late!
Another wonderful story from Joanne Harris. BLACKBERRY WINE by Joanne HarrisAugust 8, 2006Amazon Rating: 4/5 starsIn this book by Joanne Harris (author of Chocolat), the story revolves around writer Jay Mackintosh, and his search for happiness. The story is told via two time lines. The first one dates back to the 1970's, where Jay's memories take the reader back to his summers spent in a place that was known as Pog Hill in England. Out of these memories came his groundbreaking novel, JACKAPPLE JOE, based on the man that eventually became a mentor to him. Joe and Jay had a very unusual relationship, as Joe was much older but wiser and told Jay of his travels around the world, teaching Jay all about plants and healing and the magical power of herbs.The second time line takes us to the present, when Jay has decided on a whim to purchase a cottage in a village in France that he believes is where Joe used to live, leaving his long time girlfriend Kerry without much of a warning. His relationship with Kerry is one sided, and he feels claustrophobic. Kerry really has no idea what is going on in Jay's mind, but she has a need to fix him and wants him to write that sequel to that great novel he is now known for.The 1970's time line is one of nostalgia but it also has a big influence on Jay's present life, where he is filled with regret for losing track of Joe, a man that he took for granted as a boy, but now realizes that Joe meant the world to him. However, Jay thinks he's losing his mind as Joe begins to appear to Jay once he moves into the old cottage in the French village, and Jay's relationship with Joe begins anew.Throughout the story, a series of wine bottles known as THE SPECIALS are always in the background, giving a sense of magic and surrealism to the story, as is common in all Joanne Harris novels. The Specials react to Jay's actions, and act as harbingers to what may happen next.Jay's life takes a turn when he moves to the cottage, as he gains a new motivation to write that second novel. He also becomes curious about his neighbor, a woman who is known to covet his land and whose daughter is known to the village as deaf and dumb. But Jay knows there has to be a story here, and after he's learned a lot about the other villagers who become sources of potential characters in his new novel, he can't get a grasp on the mysterious Marise.As always, I enjoyed this novel by Joanne Harris very much. The book started out at a slow pace, as the story is set up, but once I got the rhythm of the time lines, the book moved faster. This is a good read for all fans of Joanne Harris and readers of good fiction.
Great book!!! Must keep. I love to buy and keep books for cooking, bread making, pastry, tart, pizza...etc. I bought this book because of the review I read from other reviewers. I am glad I did. This is a great book to keep because it teach me a lot of techniques on how to bake at home. For exsample how to create your own proof box by using a garbage. I tried and it works excellent. I make my croissant(not the recipe from this book. I use sourdough starter to make the croissant). In normal case if I need to proof the croissant it is very diffcult since sourdough starter need to take longer time for proofing and if I put it into the oven and add a little heat the butter will melt due the heat. I had a hard time to make it work. But after I got this book and I use her technique and now my croissant come out perfect and double to 2.5 size in a much shorter time. I haven't try her ceripe yet because I am favorite in sourdough baking. But I still recommand to buy this book. It is a great book for the specail techniques for home baker. Worth for the money.
Brilliant biography of a very difficult subject. Having been a rabid fan of O'Brian's Aubrey-Maturin novels, and then joyfully discovering his two earlier sea novels, I encouraged every friends and family member I thought would be interested to read those wonderful books.  Though biographies are not a favorite genre of mine, I was presented with this book as a gift because it was well-known among my loved ones that O'Brian's work had meant so much to me over the years.I had no idea of O'Brian's persona.Dean King is to be commended for putting together a very well constructed biography of an extremely difficult subject.  O'Brian deliberately obfuscated his past, distorted facts and outright lied to even close friends throughout his entire life.  His attempt to hide his own past must have been a terrible obstacle to writing this biography, but King did a wonderful job.Ultimately, I realized that I would have keenly disliked O'Brian had I known him personally, and I'm glad that never happened.  Instead, I can simply enjoy the fruits of his marvelous creativity.Dean King is to be commended for his hard work and meticulous research; he is honest at those points when he doesn't have all the facts so presents what he feels is the "most likely" scenario.  In summary, being neither iconoclastic nor apologist, King's unbiased and frank account of Patrick O'Brian's strange life and how it translated into the nuances of his novels is perceptive and engaging
The Best and The Brightest. THE VIETNAM WAR AND THE MEDIAI am a Vietnam Veteran, a college graduate of the Vietnam Era, and a professional journalist.  That should establish either some kind of credibility or culpability. The Vietnam War began when I was l7 years old, and ended when I was 30.  That means my  generation of draft-aged males... lived with the reality of War throughout their adolescence. I went to college in the '60s and, like most of my classmates, lived under the shadow of Vietnam for my entire college career..  Flunk out...you get Drafted. (that happened to a friend of mine at Yale. He partied too heartily and ended up as a grunt in the Mekong Delta.) As the War escalated, so did the dissent and the polarization of the country.In l968, the following events occurred:*	The Tet Offensive;*	the Democratic National Convention in Chicago with the arrest of the  Chicago Seven;*	The Mexico City Olympics black power protests;*	The assassinations of Martin Luther King and RFK;*	student demonstrations at Berkeley, Columbia, and Paris;*	And the increse in the Force Level in Vietnam approached 500,000.That  makes 1968 the most significant year in my life. That was also the year after I graduated from College, and, lacking plans for graduate school, enlisted in the Army (not out of patriotism but pragmatism: I made a deal with the devil--- I'd volunteer for three years as a Broadcast Specialist, and the Army would keep me out of The Killing Zone.  When I got to Saigon, I worked for Armed Forces Radio and TV: reading news they wanted me to read (like Robin Williams' character Adrian Kronauer in "Good Morning Vietnam."During my year in Saigon, part of my job was to attend the daily press briefings cynically referred to by the press corps  as "The Five O'clock Follies." (Because they were timed to occur after the evening TV Newscasts in the States).  This was long before CNN; Fox News; the Internet; and Pod-casts.  The mainstream media then had a far greater role than today.  When Walter Cronkite said the Vietnam War was un-winnable, it ended Lyndon Johnson's career. (Johnson later admitted he knew he was finished after watching the CBS Evening News).  Vietnam was called the first Living Room War, because most Americans get their news at the dining room table.  And that included escalating casualties, various atrocities like My Lai (which is kind of like the Marines in Iraq); and the rising chorus of dissent among the young.Another disturbing parallel between Vietnam and Iraq is the arrogance, imperiousness, and hubris of the Secretaries of Defense in both Wars.  Both Robert McNamara and Donald Rumsfeld were arrogant and disdainful of the professional soldiers they commanded.Each time they appeared before Congress and the Media, they said basically : this is the way it is. And don't confuse us with the facts. The Press, in the discordantly alliterative words of former Vice President and Convicted Felon Spiro Agnew (his real name) were "nattering nabobs of negativism"  (How about: "Clueless Cheerleaders of Colonialism"?)Had any of them taken the time to read the history of Indochina and the experience of the French ("Street Without Joy" or "Hell in a Very Small Place" by Bernard Fall; "The making of a Quagmire" by David Halberstam; "Fire in the Lake" by Francis Fitzgerald; or "The Best and the Brightest" byDavid Halberstam  they would have predicted the inevitable outcome of American Adventurism in Other Places. Those who ignore (or, in George Bush's Case, never learned) the lessons of History are condemned to repeat them"--By Philip Henry[...]
One of the best, a must for anyone who moves. Sweigard's breakdown of the body's bony and muscular systems is easy to understand and precise. Even more interesting are her studies in ideokinesis and methods of facilitating positive change in the human body  through the mind. It may sound like mumbo-jumbo, but Sweigard's techniques  and methods are rock-solid scientific. This is an enduring anatomy and  kinesiology handbook that hasn't gone out of date yet and probably won't. A  must for anyone who moves, especially dancers and athletes
A pleasant picture-book. I originally thought this book would serve as a helpful travel guide for adventures on unknown So Cal roads...but it's really more of a nice coffee-table photo book with a bit of history wrapped around the shots.  Great photos, though.
Exactly what it says it is. The book basically refers to itself as a tactical manual for the everyman--and it pretty much is. Very easy to read, comprehend and apply. Written in plain English, most of which is relayed conversationaly, easy to read. Even has pictures
Florence Comes Alive. This is a must read for anyone planning a vacation to Florence, or for those wanting to experience the place and time without the expense, as Martines reaches far beyond the story of a single man and into Renassiance Florence. Readers will find this gripping and complex historical drama impossible to put down. "April Blood" (the Pazzi conspiracy against the Medici) sets the stage for this great book, and Martines combines expert scholarship with dramatic narrative skill in both works.
Great book:. Good read, interesting information, garenteed that you'll learn something! If your new to computers, you may have a bit of a problem understanding some areas, but for the most part, it can be read by ANYONE. Well worth the money if your looking to increase your knowledge by 10-90% with computers!Visit www.tech-bb.net for all your FREE technical assistance
Excellent. The book is well-written and very informative.  I am very happy with my purchase and recommend this book to those that have an interest in the military and government police action
The Avengers start off storming Olympus and end up fighting the Defenders. There are some big names that show up as writers and artists in the issues collected in "Essential Avengers, Volume 5," but they do not show up for long.  Just like the roster for Marvel's premier superhero team, the lineup for writing and drawing this comic book changed a lot.  An original story by Harlan Ellison (1964's "Five Dooms to Save Tomorrow") is adapted in #101, while Roy Thomas finished as writer of the book with issue #104 and then Steve Englehart took over.  Barry Windsor-Smith draws the first three issues here, even doing some of the inking (along with Joe Sinnott and Syd Shores) for #100 and then we get Rich Buckler (#101-04, 106), John Buscema (#105), George Tuska (#106-07), Jim Starlin (#107), Don Heck (#108-112), and Bob Brown (#113-19).The Avengers line-up at the start of this collection consists of Captain America, Thor, Iron Man, Quicksilver, the Scarlet Witch, and the Vision, with Rick Jones hanging around because he is sharing space with Captain Marvel.  By the end Hercules, the Black Panther, Hawkeye, and the Swordsman and his paramour Mantis show up for duty as well, although everybody who has ever been an Avenger shows up for #100 as the Avengers assemble and invade Olympus because Ares the god of war has been causing trouble on Earth.  The Ellison story has to do with killing innocents whose descendants will destroy the world, before we move on to more traditional super villain tales.  As the Avengers hit 100 issues it is the Vision who is the key member of the group and he has to deal with his brother, the Grim Reaper before alone (#102) and in tandem with the Space Phantom (#106-08), while the romantic relationship between the Vision and Wanda continues its stormy way.Unfortunately, there are a lot of issues focusing on Hawkeye, who comes back, quits (#109) and joins the Defenders.  I never cottoned to Hawkeye (and never was enamored of the Green Arrow either) and even in retrospect he is, at best, a light proto-type version of Wolverine (think about it).  There are also several issues dealing with evil mutants and other characters from "The X-Men."  First the Sentinels show up (#102-04), followed by Lorelei (#105), and then Magneto (#110-11).  Of course, Wanda and Pietro were original members of the Brotherhood of Evil Mutants, so there is that history to justify it all and it does make for something different (the problem with a super group is that it is so hard to come up with a group of villains for them to fight, so you have to go with one supervillain, such as Magneto, who is arguably stronger than any one hero, which makes you wonder what happens when Cap, Iron Man, Thor, etc., has to deal with somebody one-on-one).Collected in this volume are "Avengers" #98-119, "Daredevil" #99, and "Defenders" #8-11, so there are some cross-overs that involve not only Daredevil, who is teamed up with the Black Widow at that point, and the newest (at that time) Marvel super group.  This clash was interesting because what happened was members of each group met in mini-battles: the Vision and the Scarlet Witch vs. the Silver Surfer; Iron Man vs. Hawkeye; the Black Panther and Mantis vs. Dr. Strange; Swordsman vs. the Valkerie; Captain America vs. Sub-Mariner; and in the last but not least position, Thor vs. Hulk (which is when the two groups finally get together to go after the evil tag-team of Loki and Dormammu.   The problem with "The Avengers" is that the comic book never really seemed to jell, and it was always one step forward and one step back.  If Buckler had stayed as the artist for most of these issues I could round up, but Don Heck was probably my least favorite Marvel artist during that time and I look at any title he was drawing as being second tier at best
The Best Handbook on TCK. This book gives detailed information on TCK, the advantages and disadvantages of being TCK, how to overcome problems, and how to enhance advantages and minimise disadvantages. It also provides lots of interviews with TCKsI myself is a TCK. Having spent 7 years of my childhood living from country to country, made me sometimes wonder why I never feel fully blended with my own culture, why I have a never ending homesick feeling to the countries I used to live in, why I love to live as a nomad and other questions and feelings that I myself was not able to understand. Glad I found this book some months ago. Good to know I'm just normal, even better ... people like me have our own identity: we are TCK!Highly recommended for TCK, parents of TCK, siblings of TCK, spouses of TCK
Better than any $5,000 "analyst report". This book is truly impressive in that the author displays a powerful grasp of not only the technology, but the economic and regulatory aspects of this technology. You can buy a lot of $5,000 Wall Street "analyst reports" and not come near the knowledge found in this $65 book.Sure gets my 5 star
Hits the Nail on the Head. As a mid-sixties professional who retired about five years ago from my own business,and then found myself in a true depression until I sought help, I found this book remarkably acute regarding the questions that I should have thought to ask myself, the planning I should have done, and the problems that would arise for me when I no longer had the structure of my working life to support me. Doctor Cantor's amazing understanding of the dynamics of retirement has helped me immeasurably to understand myself in what is an exciting but very complicated period, and her practical advice is advice I wish I had had before I retired!! I cannot imagine anyone approaching the later stages of life who would not benefit enormously from Dr. Cantor's insights and help. GET THIS BOOK
Compelling reading. This book combines social/political commentary in the 1930's with a breathless, page turning experience that actually disturbed my sleep. I flew through this book. Wright has a deft touch making this compelling, fascinating reading
breathtaking tour de force. Tim Powers is a marvellous author. This time his imagination takes you on a time-travelling trip. True, it has been done before. Just not like this. Tim Powers makes it real. The research he has done for this novel probably even has some historians starting to believe in the possibility.The Anubis Gates is not just a fantasy novel. It's pure adventure. And much more. It's part literature, the way the author is using his language skills, part fantasy, part comical roller coaster ride. I never put the book down. Not even after my third time. You won't either
Orwell does Asop. A dark fable about what went wrong with the Russian Revolution. Brillient, has most of the themes that showed up in 1984 as well as ideas of it's own. Funny at times, sometimes tragic. Well worth reading. It's also short, so there's no excuse to pass it up
The Book Was Amazing. It was in amazing condition, I am very pleased with the product
Best Year Ever!. I wish I had more free time to read non work and school related material, which is why it took me about 10 months to finish reading Team of Rivals. I found myself picking up the book and reading 50 pages here and there until I fianlly had time to finish this excellent piece of historical research. This book is a fascinating account of the Lincoln Presidency and the state of America during the years leading up to, and through the Civil War. I highly reccomend this book to anyone who is a casual student of history and those who consider themselves wonks in this field. My only advice is that you be willing to devote the time to this book because it is quite large, but well worth it
Very informative. This book is a great source of information for anybody even remotely interested in the intelligence community.  Clarridge does a first-rate job at describing (as much as legally possible) the tradecraft and modus operandi of the Cold War-era CIA Case Officer.  Overall, very entertaining and nicely written
Fantastic!!!!!!!. This was a very good book.  I just kept turning the pages.  This is the first I have read by this author and I was very impressed. After about the first 100 pages it really takes off.  I am glad a friend loaned it to me.  To bad it tok me over a year before I opened it.
A Novel So Unique Doctorow Probably Invented A New Genre In Publishing It!. Ragtime is the story of various levels of American society in about the first decade of the 20th century, a period Doctorow dubs "The Age Of Ragtime" after the popularity of the music Scott Joplin and other composers are writing at this time. In this curious novel, we meet real and invented people interacting on a taut little stage. Here we find Harry Houdini, Evelyn Nesbit, Henry Ford, J.P. Morgan, Harry Thaw, Booker T. Washington and other famous and infamous men and women from this time, and we also meet some archetypal constructs known to us by such designations as "Father" "Younger Brother" "Mother" etc. There is the upper-class white family from New Rochelle, headed by an explorer father; there is the ambitious, hard working Jewish family, new to America's shores, headed by a kind-hearted man whose brain teems with ideas for inventions; and there is a black "family" composed of an unwed father and mother (a Ragtime pianist, and a young woman who is eventually taken in by the white family) and an infant son. The bulk of the story of Ragtime trickles through the lives of these people, and passes notoriously through passion-fueled murder, bigotry, accidental killings, social glory, revolutionary schemes, and acts of---justified?---terrorism. Ragtime moves so far away from the plot of its beginnings it is impossible to predict its destination, a reader merely hangs on for the bumpy, wavering ride through our American nation in its teenaged years
Best Buy for film makers. This reference is worth the money.  I learned everything I needed to know about setting up shots for my first two films from this book.  Diagrams, pictures, instructions.  Wonderful
50 Warm And Comforting. Hug Your Dog!. Do you have a passion for animals? If so, you'll inhale this book. The authors heartfelt emotions can be felt on every page. He clearly adored the animals he cared for over the decades. He described the colorful European countryside, the diverse pets, and the people who owned them in fine detail. Each story is accompanied by an ink sketch that added some warm visuals. My favorite stories were of "Tricki Woo", "Judy The Nurse Dog", "Granville Bennett", and "Cigar." What was nice is that since the stories were broken up, you could not lose your place when you took a break. Yet, I only took one because this was a fast page turner. I have had several dogs in my life and these are the most honest depictions of dog behavior I have read thus far. All animal lovers will enjoy this. Time to hug my dog and adopt another
Rice's Greatest Work. I have read all of Anne Rices work.. and the Mayfair Witches is truly the best..  It was a new form of writing for me at first  however you learn that she did not just jump into the middle of the story in The Witching Hour Rice sets a different pace..  and introduces the characters first ..excellent when you get the hang of it...  I learned more about old New Orleans in this book than I ever did by  visiting it.. WONDERFULreading..
Great Book For Getting Useful Employee Ideas. "Ideas Are Free: How The Idea Revolution Is Liberating People And Transforming Organizations" by Robinson and Schroeder is written for entrepreneurs and managers who want to encourage their employees to contribute ideas and insight to increase profitability and organizational efficiency.The authors argue that managing employee ideas is a crucial area for companies in today's rapidly changing business world. Companies which utilize employee ideas gain competitive advantages in efficiency, product development, understanding customers, and improving the company's culture.Yet, today, when asked, many company managers say they take a "family" approach and use an "informal" method of managing employee ideas.Robinson and Schroeder write: "Tellingly, however, these same managers are not as casual about other things. Take travel expenses, for example. Would these managers leave a big barrel of cash in the corner and tell employees who are travelling to take whatever they need, spend it wisely, and put back whatever they don't use? No need for receipts or a report, because they just get in the way, and 'we're just one big happy family?' ... No organization manages its money this way, because it would soon be out of business. It has to ensure that what is supposed to be happening is actually happening. And, of course, managers who claim-in the absence of any measurement or control mechanism-that large numbers of ideas in their organizations are naturally flowing to welcoming supervisors and being quickly implemented, are deluding themselves."Robinson and Schroeder tell us that many companies which want to encourage employee ideas do so badly, often discouraging employee idea contribution, but creating employee resentment, internal company sabotage, and manager resentment to the ideas.Robinson and Schroeder explain why traditional reward schemes for idea contribution often fail, but do succeed in generating animosity. For example, we learn that an employee of a large wireless company discovered an annual $26 million billing error due to a significant number of international phone calls that the company failed to record properly. The employee dutifully placed his idea for a simple fix in the company suggestion box.Robinson and Schroeder write: "Under the rules of the company's idea system, once the idea was implemented, the suggester would be owed 50 percent of the first year's revenue from it-in this case some $13 million. At the time we visited the company, top management had been 'evaluating' the idea for several years. The idea system manager was furious. The CEO would rather continue losing $26 million per year, he told us, than risk the embarrassment that might ensue from having to pay such a large reward. The sheer size of the oversight would make any manager reluctant to admit that it had happened on his or her watch. A $13 million reward ... would have come to the attention of his board. ...Think of the negative publicity: Not only had management failed to bill customers to the tune of $26 million per year, but it had to pay millions more to discover its blunder. It is easy to see why the CEO wanted the idea buried."Robinson and Schroeder argue that employees want to see their ideas used, so that traditional reward schemes for idea generation aren't even necessary. But, the authors argue that an effective idea system must have several key components, such as quickness in evaluating ideas and providing feedback. Further, the best success is achieved when the company is able to focus employee ideas in key areas.Robinson and Schroeder write: "When managers learn how to aim ideas at specific targets, they gain a powerful weapon. ... When ideas are needed on a specific topic, the most straightforward thing to do is to ask for them. ... The challenge is to identify the right issue, and to define it in a way that is meaningful to employees."Perhaps surprisingly, Robinson and Schroeder argue that going after small ideas is often the most productive, because not only are small ideas the best source of big ideas, but small ideas are often situation-specific which means they often remain proprietary to the company adopting them. And, adopting even small changes can lead to new understanding to help the business or can lead to unanticipated, positive results.For example, "Ideas Are Free" tells us about a machinist who noticed that it took considerable time to change the oil barrels which were used to hold cooling oil which was sprayed on parts as they were machined. He suggested installing an overhead system of pipes to pipe in the oil from a large tank.After adopting the change, the company noticed several results. First, the forklift operator whose job was to replace the barrels of oil could be redeployed to a more profitable job. Second, floor space was freed up. Third, oil could now be purchased in bulk, reducing its cost. Fourth, machine downtime was reduced. Fifth, oil spills were reduced, and because each oil spill required certain governmental paperwork, the cost in processing this paperwork was greatly reduced. Sixth, the new hoses that sprayed the oil had gauges showing how much oil was consumed. Despite recycling much of the cooling oil, they noticed that considerable oil was still lost. They discovered that the loss was due to the oil that remained on the metal shavings spewed away as the parts were machined. After a bit of engineering, the company also found a way to recycle more of this oil, further reducing its oil costs.To help employees become better at generating ideas, Robinson and Schroeder suggest adopting "Idea Activators" such as 1) Employee Job Rotation; 2) Adopting the Customer's Perspective; 3) Ongoing Learning; and 4) Reading Groups.I highly recommend "Ideas Are Free: How The Idea Revolution Is Liberating People And Transforming Organizations" to all managers and entrepreneurs who wish to tap into the benefits of employee ideas.Peter Hupalo, Author of "Thinking Like An Entrepreneur."
good reading. Skeleton Man is another masterpiece for Tony Hellerman. Only problem is he doesn't write them fast enough
Very nice book for theory review. I would say that the structure of this book pleased me. I used it as a theory review for my qualifying exam in Linear Algebra. For that purpose it served quite well. It has a nice, constructive structure. It will make your knowledge organized and will not overload you with too much abstractions. Especially I enjoyed the fact that definitions and key theorems are situated separately from their proofs, that allow you to familiarize yourself with theory in general and after you know everything there, you may concentrate on the proofs to make your knowledge more sophisticated. At least this is the way how I did work with this book. As for exercises, they are not very difficult, I would say undergraduate level only, so that it is good for those who has a weak knowledge in this subject. For those who want to go beyond Linear Algebra I would suggest Kostrykin, 3 volumes, but it is in Russian ;-
VERY GOOD. The book is extremely good because it shows how to keep the salesman on his toes instead of getting complacent and losing the 'touch' by becoming more of a computer person.If you are in direct one-to-one selling - get this book!SATPA
"To you, perceptive reader, I bequeath my history.". And what a history! As a rule I don't review novels on Amazon but THE HISTORIAN by Elizabeth Kostova is the best I have read in years. She creates a whole company of characters and you will like, or at least be interested in, and remember them all. If you like history, this is your novel. If you like mystery, this is your novel. If you like exotic locations and characters, well,,, you get the picture. When I recommended THE HISTORIAN to my mystery-loving wife she asked me if there was any suspense to the story. I told her that the suspense was such that I really hated to put it down. You will too from the first paragraph.
Do you believe in magic and true love? Read this book. This is an old-fashioned tale of true love, purity, hard work and regeneration through oneness with nature.  It's a beautiful story which I read every time I get stuck in bed sick.  I give it to friends who get sick.  Just reading it is healing. I hope you enjoy it
A Review of Sign of the Beaver. SIGN OF THE BEAVER REVIEWElizabeth George Speare writes in a fashion that always gives you something new to be excited about and lets you exist in her writing.  This heart stopping book will delight those who love a creative mix of drama, adventure, friendship, and well-paced wording.  I'm sure those people will agree with me that describing this as a good book is an understatement.  It tells of a settler boy and an Indian boy who meet and have many adventures in the woods of Maine.  The characters are wonderful because their personalities are almost everyone in the world.  I do not know a single person that cannot relate to these characters.  In general, it's a two thumbs up read.
Right on target. If this book could be distributed to everyone in America, we would no longer live in a morbidly obesce society.  The information in this book is very easy to understand, for even someone who knows nothing about nutrition.  The 'diet' isn't actually a diet.  It's a lifestyle change, which will add fruitful years to anyone's life.  While this book does focus on weight loss, it is not only for the overweight.  It deals with getting the body back in balance, so you can maintain your normal weight
The right book. One thing I like about the books Gary Keller puts together is he goes right to "the horse's mouth" and asks those who are making it big investing in real estate, "What are you doing that works so well for you."  He sees a pattern they all have, and then puts a system down in book form that anyone can follow.For the beginner, there are enough details to give you a good idea what to do...beginning to end.  Create a plan, and pursue it.  Stay focused.For the advanced, you get reaffirmation that what you are doing is right, and a few new angles to try.  You'll find a gem here and there that will strengthen your systems and procedures.  Most of all, you get the notion to think big.  I mean REALLY BIG.  A million dollars a year in cash flow BIG!  Big enough so you can share your masses of wealth with the masses, make a difference in the world, and never miss the money.Specifics are somewhat lacking, but don't sweat that part.  There is no right or wrong investment, only a right or wrong way of handling it
What was all the fuss. Wonderful true story of two male penguins that adopt an unwanted baby penguin. Homophobes objected to a line in the book where the zoo keeper says "They must be in love." Kids will love it and it should be in every library. It is a story from which many adults can learn tolerance
A Frank and Beautiful View of Inupiat Subsistence Lifestyle. Bill Hess as created a masterpiece. His grainy and moody black and white capture the bowhead hunt, Point Lay beluga hunts and Inupiat life in respectfully frank perfection.  The book contains several stories that are threaded in and out of the Inupiat Bowhead hunts and gives a good look into the subsistence lifestyle of the Eskimos who live on the edge of the Arctic ocean.Hess' journalistic writing style is easy to read and appreciate.  He was able to get a close-up view on many things most will never have a chance to see from subsistence hunts, search and rescue missions and the 1990's attempt to free three ice-trapped gray whales which had captured the medias attention.  It was interesting how different the story that reached us was compared to the situation and conclusion was on the ice.If you have interest in whale hunting or Eskimo lifestyles, get this book.  It is a great visual and prose look into this arctic world
Very good book on ayurveda, cures and ayurvedic wines. This is nice book to have at home. It has good explanation about deseases and their cures with ayurvedic ways. It gives reciepes to make famous ayurvedic medicines also which are hard to find. Gives information ayurvedic wines also and how those can help in keeping good health
To be in the Electronics business. This book holds a close view of my desires.  In the future, many people will see the value of this book.We are moving from a digital age to more combined digital and analog time.This is because digital signals are very limited in their structure and analog signals are very necessary to give digital more expression and freedom.-Calvi
Nobility and Love. Steve Ilg is as noble as they come and his work is a work of love.  I have read many other books in the fitness category and none compare to the path of Wholistic Fitness.  And it is so much more than just fitness.  If you want a program that teaches you about yourself and expands your perceived boundaries about what is possible as a human being, TBT is the place to be.  If you want to reach all the podiums of life, look no further.Namaste, W
This book was a big help. Thanks for the help!  We have been doing a lot of research on the subject of Preventive Maintenance Scheduling.  This gave us some good insight. Good stuff.Ed S.[...
A shining example of how to live the Gospel. If you read nothing else this summer.  Please read this book.  This book has moved me and inspired me and is the most awesome example of one Christian man living out a truly Christ-like example no matter where he was or who was watching
2nd edition is a classic for applied nonparametrics. I own the second edition. So my comments refer mainly to it. Conover writes very well and covers all the commonly used nonparametric tests. He does a great job of handling the special treatment when there are many ties in a rank test. He also provides many important statistical tables. My understanding of the third edition is that it continues to cover the nonparametric procedures that have stood the test of time and that popular modern methods like bootstrap are also covered
A wonderful book for children... At the age 8, I read this book at the Library. Now, 6 six years later, I finally got my hands on it again and read it word for word. It's even  better than the last time. When I finished, I had tears streaming down my  face- but from happiness. The story opens up in the City of Turmoil, where  a group of children decide to cause mischief that day. Some time later,  they see a stranger. They are fascinated by him, for they have never met  someone so beautiful kind.  The Wanderer is horrified and disgusted by the  evil in the city. He shows five of the children and five other adults, the  `burdens' of dishonesty, deceit and many other things, that they carry.  Suddenly they have heavy sacks on their backs that they can't remove. They  have to journey to the City of Happiness in The Land of Far-Beyond to get  rid of them. So begins the journey of ten people, who must face  difficulties and challenges to get to their destination. They meet people  like Mr. Doubt and Laziness who try to discourage them or tempt them. They  also meet people like Content and Daring who help them along and get them  out of trouble. They learn a lot of things along the way (`it is best to  face up to your fears', `Fright is less scary when seen in the light of  day', and so on) and meet evil dwarves, angels, a cruel giant etc. Finally  the remaining few who completed the journey got their burdens removed by  the Prince of Peace, `who carries the burdens of the whole world'. It is  Jesus, and the land they are in, is Heaven
No pain, no gain--go for the straight and narrow!. The reviewer that refers to this book as being "painful" is partly right. This book is difficult to read, that's for sure. However, leadership, as a topic is not simple. There are no quick fixes. To learn about leadership you will have to read a lot, particularly what the researchers have written. The topic is not simple and certainly cannot be summarized in simple graphs or charts.  You'll need some level of intelligence to understand "The nature of leadership"Managers or students, who have some basic education will be able to understand this book. If you are looking for quick stories, this book is not for you.  Reading "Who moved my cheese?" or "Good to great" will be a better fit for you--these types of books are certainly easier; however, these kinds of books are very simplistic and not well researched (even though they pretend to be).If you want to get fit, there is not simple way to do it. You have to watch what you eat, you have to exercise, you need persistence, and you need to work hard. If you are the type of person that believes in working hard then this book is for you. You are the type that likes to take the straight and narrow way.  You believe in "No pain, no gain.
Pick Any Page, It's a Pleasure to Read. My wife and I both fell in love with this book from the moment we saw it on the store shelf.  Put simply, it is a collection of 1,001 one-paragraph tidbits about everything related to cats--different breeds, the cat anatomy, habits (good and bad), cats in history, famous people who loved cats, "catty" words and phrases, even a section about cat in movies, cartoons, and TV.  As a longtime cat lover, I thought I knew cats pretty well, but I'm a lot wiser after reading this.  (Finally I understand why our cats like to knead my belly.)  My personal favorite was the section dealing with cats in history, particularly their connection with the ancient Egyptians
Humor and Helpful all in one. When first looking at the book, it almost seemed impossible for such a thin book to be of much help for students. However, after reading the book [in the span of 1 hr, I might boast], I realized that this amazingly funny book can be just as equally helpful.Contrary to a former reviewer's complaint about the book merely stroking the ego of college professors, I believe [through personal experience] that being on the good side of a professor is very helpful to gaining better grades.So in the end, buy the book you lazy students, and hopefully learn a thing or two
Best Natl Forest Camping Directory. This is the best directory for National Forest camping.  The forest service has been improving their campgrounds over the years.  This directory will no longer be updated and printed.  (...
Very worth reading. Even though I do not hold some of the same beliefs as Kat Duff this is a fascinating book. I don't see how anyone could read it and not come away with a new gem of understanding to cherish, polish and revisit often
school bus wheels. my husband just started driving a school bus and we bought this book to let the grandchildren know what pop pop did.  they understood perfectly and now refer to the driver as pop pop.
Neglected masterpiece. Conventional wisdom has it that the firest two-thirds of this treatise on  character analysis improved psychoanalytic technique, focusing on   character-based resistances rather than just on interpreting  content--associations, dreams, etc. True enough, but the last third, which  analysts and critics say represents Reich's slippage into maddness, is even  more brilliant and farsighted.  Here, Reich moves into the area of  bioenergy and body-based psychotherapy.  He presages some modern  developments in psychotherapy, and in many respects, moves ahead of where  mainstream therapy resides today. His bioenergy/therapy integration was  also a forerunner of much of today's alternative mind-body and energy  medicine modalities.  Reich was not always the most trenchant writer, but  here is writing his sharp, direct, and provocative. This is Reich's great  contribution, still largely neglected
My Sister's Keeper:  A Novel. What a very touching story...that with stem cell research, could be true!  The author tells a gripping story through each characters' perspective.  This is a story that stays with you for a long, long time!!
RITA Award winner for a reason!. Beneath a Southern Sky is one of my all time favorite books. The writing flows, the plot is gripping, the emotions are authentic to the core, and the characters are still "people" I think about. No wonder this book won the coveted RITA award! Raney is a master at touching the heart and giving hope in the midst of impossibly difficult circumstances.
GREAT REFERENCE WITH REALISTIC PICTURES!. While I was impressed with the exhaustive (yet lively) informationprovided by Dr. Carolyn Male, perhaps MOST IMPORTANT to tomatogrowers are the realistic pictures.  Instead of 100 photos of"perfect tomatoes" - you see the imperfections associated witheach variety: i.e. if the tomato is prone to cracking, greenshoulders, or catfacing... she tells you this AND providespictures! Two years ago, I was kicking myself for producing oddlyshaped and sometimes ugly heirloom tomatoes. Sure wish I had thisbook back then.If YOU plan to grow heirloom tomatoes... BUY THIS BOOK!!!
African-American History done well. Peter H. Wood did a thoroughly researched well written history of African-Americans in South Carolina from 1670 to the Stono Rebellion. I am African-American and read this book for the first time in college; it was assigned to me by a terrific professor, (Thomas R. Hietala). I came to that class with my own concept of what slavery was and what it meant; this book totally challenged me to question my perceptions of slavery. I believed the stereotypic view that Africans were brought here and taught skills here and picked cotton and it was all misery and this book and others he assigned showed me how our modern vision of slavery is very shallow.This book focuses on the rice growing region of South Carolina and it shows how slavers concentrated on capturing Africans from the rice coast because of their agricultural knowledge and skills; he shed a light on who these African people were before slavery. It explores how the cash crop in South Carolina came to be rice. How South Carolina was established as a colony of Barbados and the slave owners in South Carolina were formerly working class overseers who worked for the royal owners of Sugar Plantations in Barbados and later became land and slave owners in South Carolina; in both places (Barbados and South Carolina) the populations became Black majorities.It also shows how slavery system in South Carolina evolved for the enslaved from something that was oppressive and informal into something brutal, permanent and hopeless. The evolution of slavery also changed the owners as they became a numerical minority the also became increasingly paranoid, determined to establish brutal absolute authority over the slaves and blinded by their own propaganda.It seems even more astonishing they began to believe that Africans were better off and happy under a system that enslaved them. The most powerful thing Professor Hietala ever said in our class was "Never forget that slaves always wanted ownership of their own bodies and the power to direct their own lives and destinies; nothing was more important."At times I think historians forget this when writing about African-American slaves. Wood understands this and he also shows respect for how enslaved Africans not only yearned for their freedom but how they planned and took risks for their freedom.  He explores in depth the complexity and challenges of their struggle in choosing to look at the Stono Rebellion and the events that lead up to this big risk.The story Wood tells begins with the history of these two communities (Barbados overseers who become South Carolina planters and enslaved Africans) continues with the development of the system of slavery in South Carolina  and climaxes at the Stono Rebellion. The most fascinating thing about this act of Resistance is how close they came to success. When reading it for the first time I found myself saddened that they did not succeed because their success could have rewritten African-American History by altering the issues that sparked the Civil War and subsequent events; Reconstruction, Jim-Crow and the Civil Rights Movement. In essence their success could have changed my history and had far reaching implications with respect to who I am.I think it is worth reading because of the history it explores and because Wood is an excellent researcher and writer.   He not only uncovers the history but he exposes readers to the lives of enslaved Africans in a new way by portraying them as whole human beings who had a life before slavery.  He treats with respect their existence and culture in Africa and acknowledges how it (African culture) influenced the economy and agriculture of South Carolina and by inference the South. It is a brilliant well researched and written work, as a student I came to appreciate that brilliant scholars were not always brilliant writers, Wood excels at both. I recommend it highly to any one interested in learning more about African-American history.
I really liked this book-. This was a really great book-It really affects you and youaredrawn completely into it. It made me sad, because I felt everythingthat JP felt, even though my life isn't anything like his. I was a little disappointed in the ending, maybe because it was the end of a really good book, and maybe because it needed to be wrapped up more. There still are some things I wondered about. But the book gave me a lot to think about. I'm really glad I read this book, and I recommend it
All the pluses and minuses of the series. As is the case in all the &quot;Writer's Guide to Everyday Life&quot; books, it is of course impossible for author Varhola to cover in full depth in so brief a book the vast and complex canvas that was the American Civil War.  That much said, he does a very good job with the space he has.  His price lists, descriptions of money, and period terms are especially well done and useful, and I found his descriptions of city life fascinating.  As is usual, he does slip up once or twice (canned goods, for example, were developed in Napoleonic France and first commercially manufactured in the USA in the 1820's, though it's true that the industry didn't really take off till the War created a huge demand for portable food with a long shelf life), but that's probably inevitable.  He also provides a lengthy bibliography which (with the Recommendations on this page) should give interested readers plenty of detailed background on the aspects that most intrigue them.  This is definitely a book that should be read by all CW social-history buffs
I've learned so much. My mom just recently got this book.  Even though I don't have any weight to lose, I am very interested in learning more about nutrition and how to make sure I don't gain weight.  There is so much in this book and it is so well-written (I really enjoyed the humorous asides by the author), that I had a hard time putting it down.  I found out so much about myself, about cooking, grocery shopping, dining out, exercise and even how to handle stress.  Even though my mom got the book because it addresses some of the weight-loss issues that baby boomers have to deal with, it's a great book for anyone, no matter how old they are
The Best Little People Book. Oh my Gosh!  This book is so wonderful.  I read it as a kid and I have it completely memorized it from cover to cover.  It sounds even better when you say it from memory to people.  They are like, Whoa!  I am going to buy it for my kids
An all class act. Many of us who appreciate the work of truly great non-fiction writers were deeply saddened by the recent passing of Alistair Cooke.Although best remembered for his long running radio commentary "A Letter from America" and his various television shows of early years, it makes for a pleasant change to go back and rediscover some of Mr Cooke's more substantial literary efforts.A graduate in English literature from Cambridge University and a print journalist of considerable experience, Alistair managed to perfect a difficult balancing act. Throughout his long and prestigious career he steadfastly adhered to the highest professional and intellectual standards while still managing to enjoy enviable success within the mass media. In many ways he "Raised the bar" in regard to industry standards by proving that there was, indeed, a sizeable market for quality work if it was cleverly presented in an entertaining and accessible style.In this book the veteran newspaper man draws upon his impressive array of observational and descriptive skills to create a striking collection of penetrating celebrity profiles. Alistair wrote with the deft, light hand of a popular scribe but also with the probing incisiveness of a psychology professor. At all times he examined the inner workings of his subjects with an almost clinical thoroughness and a commendable sense of fairness. When it came to creating word pictures, the man was an old master.Alistair Cooke was a consummate journalist - an "all class act" and a credit to his chosen calling
How Good DO We Have To be? A New Understanding of guilt and Forgiveness. This was all I had hoped it would be. It was received in good condition and in a timely manne
A Literary Masterpiece. Du Maurier captures the essence of Victorian hierarchal society in the must-read.  Through her controlled use of dynamic prose, this classic romantic suspense practically turns the pages on its own.  Set in the heart of Maxim de Winter's gargantuan estate, Manderley, the narrator learns about Maxim's first wife, Rebecca, and her untimely death.  This novel proves that some secrets, no matter how hard one may try, refuse to stay buried.
Suspenseful, eerie and of course, well-written. I enjoyed this book more so than King's others because he doesn't spend the first 200 pages introducing his characters. He gets right to the story and devours your attention. No two stories are alike, it's hard to pick a favorite. King develops solid characters in a short period of time and gives the reader insight as to why or how he came upon his subject matter.
Tangling with a feisty morning glory. I don't believe I've ever seen a gardening book where the information was as well-organized as it is in "Annuals for Michigan" and its companion volume, "Perennials for Michigan."  Often books of regional interest are thrown together and published on the cheap, but these books are tightly-bound, full of color illustrations, and above all, well written.  And they're really about Michigan climate and Michigan soils.  Someone didn't just go through and change, say 'Iowa' to 'Michigan' with a word processor, then rename the book.According to the authors, Michigan ranks third nationwide in the production of annual plants, so we must have a pretty decent climate for growing them.  I've only had a couple escape from their beds and attempt to take over the yard--the morning glory 'Grandpa Ott' and every kind of mallow I've ever tried--so don't be afraid to experiment.  Our winters usually exterminate the overly bold.The book begins with a pictorial guide called "The Flowers at a Glance" where photographs of the annuals are listed in alphabetical order, by common name.  There is a short introduction on trends in annuals and a map of the average last-frost dates for Michigan, so that you will know when to plant out depending on where you live.The next few sections explain how to start annuals, both by growing them from seed or by schlepping over to the nearest gardening center and buying them.  There are chapters on caring for annuals, and the obligatory chapter on 'Problems & Pests' before we plunge into the heart of this book:  the alphabetically-arranged sections on each of the 443 selected annuals.Each species is described, including height, spread, and flower color.  Each has subsections on 'Planting' (how and when to start your plants), 'Growing,' 'Tips,' 'Recommended' varieties, and (usually) 'Problems and Pests.'  There are over 400 color photographs, usually (but not always) labeled by variety, to help with your decisions on what to plant.  There is also a very nice 'Quick Reference Chart' in back that lists the colors, sowing method, height, hardiness, light and soil requirements for each species.There is even a short list of companies and their websites where you can purchase seed, although a couple of my favorites aren't mentioned, i.e. Thompson and Morgan, and Park Seed.Annuals are so much fun.  If you hate the color combinations you tried one year, you can start all over again the following spring.  Sometimes if you're lucky, a favorite annual like Love-in-a-Mist will reseed itself and return even more beautifully the following season.  Of course, that could also happen with pests like Grandpa Ott--we finally had to concede defeat after five years of weeding purple morning glories out of the vegetable beds.  We sold our house to someone who hopefully loves this old vine.
This book is brilliant!. I'm a professional organizer and deal with many clients who are chronically disorganized. This book has transformed many of my ideas about how to help them overcome their clutter, hoarding, and disorganization problems. Kolberg is so imaginative and creative in her approach, and her inventive ways of dealing with clients' various ways of thinking is truly superb. I recommend this book to anyone who has a problem with disorganization or who deals with those who do. A+
Reason and Passion. This story is about a young woman with very high morals who is tempted to begin an adulterous affair.  The Princesse De Cleves' integrity is the most powerful force in this book.  She is an example of the "stern-faced beauty of devotion to duty."De Lafayette and her friends wrote this book together.  It was written during the 17th century, but the story takes place in the 16th century during the reign of Henry II.  Several real life people appear as characters in the book.  The dialogue brings the characters to life.  The style is simple, penetrating, and poetic.The nobles of this age were generally decadent, so most of the characters in this book are not admirable.  Nevertheless, they are capable of falling in love.  Romantic love can occur anywhere, anytime.Version: 1951 translation by Nancy Mitford, New Directions Books, 4th printin
Excellent into to Large Fomat. As beginer to large format, I was looking for a book that would give me the basics of view cameras and their use. I already have a good foundation of photographic and exposure techniques. I found this book to be just right. No time is wasted discussing basic photography (although a nice intro to the Zone system is included, very basic), and very non-technical introduction to view cameras is presented. There is just enough math and science in this book to make you realize how much you may want to learn. After reading this book just once, I feel I can go out and use a view camera to take a picture
Ginger Pye. One boy named Jerry Pye has always wanted a dog. He finds his sister, Rachel, at his house one day, and he says he is going to buy a puppy from Mr. and Mrs. Speedy, who have a litter of them. All Jerry needs is just one dollar, but he doesn't know how to earn the money. Jerry and Rachel just happened to be in luck, because along visited their friend Sam Doody who told them that he would give them a dollar if they would dust the pews at the town church. Uncle Bennie, considered a hero in the town, Cranbury, for being an uncle at the age of three, helped too. Rachel thinks she sees someone at the entrance of the church, but she soon forgets it. After they finish, they finally get their dollar and they race to the Speedy's barn. But, someone else had wanted the puppy, as they soon find out. Jerry buys the puppy and soon names him Ginger when he gets home. After he had bought the dog, he had thought that he saw a man running with a yellow hat on. Then, he and Rachel hear footsteps behind them. They dismiss this until Uncle Bennie sees a yellow hat sticking through the fence outside, and Rachel finds the yellow hat while Jerry and his friend was swimming. When Ginger stumbles into Jerry's classroom, a boy named Wally Bullwinkle gives him the eye. On Thanksgiving Day, Ginger is stolen. For months Rachel and Jerry search for Ginger. One day, they knock on Wally Bullwinkle's house, and he strangely replies in an angry and agressive manner. Meanwhile, they hear a whine coming from the area that Wally lives in. While visiting a train station, Jerry and Rachel see Wally standing on the end of a speeding train with a yellow hat on. Soon after that, Uncle Bennie comes along with Ginger, and the story ends with Jerry, Ginger, and the Pyes being one big family. Ginger Pye, by Eleanor Estes, is an exceptional novel to read. It is a great mystery, has plenty of suspense, and is a novel that tells a heart-warming story of how a boy finds his dog after months and months of being without his friend.Ginger Pye, by Eleanor Estes, is an exceptional mystery. During the time that Ginger was missing, Jerry, Rachel, and some of their friends looked for clues. The yellow hat was an important clue, for example. When the yellow hat was found sitting on Wally Bullwinkle's head, a large part of the mystery had been solved. Also, the whine was really from Ginger, who had been held by Wally. The reason that Ginger had been stolen was for Wally's own profit. He was supposed to be in a dog trick act for an enormous audience.Ginger Pye has a great deal of suspense. There are some parts of the novel that will keep the reader on the edge of their seat. An example of this is when Jerry and Rachel are walking down the street when they hear footsteps. This would easily put someone into a stage of suspense and would make that person want to read more.Ginger Pye was a heart-warming story that told how a boy found his dog. There were many exerts in the book that would just  make some people cry. A good example of this is in the end of the novel, when Jerry finally sees Ginger after so many months of searching. Instead of being a puppy, Ginger had grown larger and more mature.Overall, this novel was a great thing to read. Except for the plentiful gramatical errors, Ginger Pye is an exceptional book to read because of the mystery, the suspense, and how it tells an emotional tale of a boy and his dog. I reccomend this book for everyone who likes to read. I rate this book a total of five stars out of five.A. Chappel
Better than the tape version... I use an audio copy of P&P when teaching it in class - we read through important passages together without the loss of my voice. I previously owned a tape version - horrible because you had to FF to whatever parts you wanted. In fact my player ended up eating 2 of the tapes. This CD version is much better and I would highly recommend it, except... Normal audio CDs have tracks that correspond with the chapters. Not this one. The tracks were in random places (in the middle of a paragraph, even in the middle of sentences!) so trying to find the right chapter to start on required some detective work. If you're just planning to listen from start to finish, however, this is an excellent version- the reader is splendid
Engaging and easy reading. Bart Ehrman is a biblical scholar that writes like a historical detective solving a plot. This book as well as others of his give a very good understanding of the first three hundred years of Christanity. His easy to follow analitical approach is most refreshing
Literature that rightfully make us proud to be Japanese. If ever criticized, The Temple of the Golden Pavilion by Yukio Mishima is chided most frequently for some of its seemingly mundane, superfluous and repetitive details and paragraphs.  Many give up, or decide not to read it at all, since the text appears heavy and unmanageable from the very first page.  However, after analyzing the book and enduring challenges, one should come to realize the book's deeper meanings.Mishima's writing is filled with archetypes and symbols that reoccur throughout the novel which may seem repetitive, but are utterly paramount and necessary to encourage deeper thought within the reader.  After studying a chapter or two, one can make connections using these archetypes as a guide to interpret the book.  For example, the seasons and the weather reflect the state of mind of the protagonist, Mizoguchi.  Descriptive words such as "brilliant" and "bright" are premonitions of future events.  Other distinctly repeated archetypes include colors, water and fire (they are repeated for the sake of emphasis), which help the reader to stay intact with the extraordinary world that Mishima creates.The Temple of the Golden Pavilion is famous for mind-boggling its readers.  A way one can come to terms with the frequent juxtapositions in the book is by researching a little about the author's background.  Then, one will realize that Mishima incorporated his own philosophies and experiences in the character of Mizoguchi (which resulted in an active voice in its narrations: almost as if Mishima was talking to you personally).  This may explain why the book seems abstract yet realistic, absurd yet understandable.  Some characteristics of Mizoguchi we can relate with--others are puzzling and enigmatic.It is striking to think that the main happenings of the novel actually happened--a stuttering young monk did in fact set fire to the golden temple after becoming obsessed with its beauty, as cited in the introduction of the book.  The plot is simple, and its synopsis can be predicted through reading the introduction and the blurb.  Mishima focuses acutely on the insight of the distressed monk's mind, even forcing the reader to unexpectedly sympathize with the mentally "different" protagonist.  This may be the reason why some readers find Mishima's book hard to understand, or not fruitful.  A reader cannot expect to obtain anything productive out of this book simply from the plot alone.  Its true value can be attained through reading the book proactively, with care.The Temple of the Golden Pavilion has become internationally accepted, possibly because of its universal philosophical messages, unique writing style, and also precisely for its absurdness.  It is an esoteric piece of writing.  It is loved by individuals (intellectuals) who are able to enjoy and appreciate quality writing while carefully deciphering its many conundrums; but it is dismissed by those... seeking a lighter read.For more in-depth information and analysis, please visit:http://goldenpavi.exblog.j
All levels of users gain insights. George Maestri's Digital Character Animation 3 provides new artwork to pair with animator and writer George Maestri's insights on the theory and basic techniques of rigging, walk-cycles, lip-synch and more: all the elements which bring an animation to life. You don't have to have a prior background in digital animation to appreciate this guide, either: chapters offer both the basics of modeling and animation and progress to more advanced levels of applications and characterization, so all levels of users gain insights
Good information. Good detail and a great number of organizations makes this a decent addition to anyone's FR library
Pocket book for the supermarket. This purse-size book is indespensible!  It lists total carbs, fiber, net carbs, protein, fat, and calories to help you make the best choices, or even endulge a little while knowing how much you are doing so!My copy is dog-eared and I carry it everywhere with me.  When I think I might want something (like grapes, for example), I can look them up in the booklet right there in the supermarket and decide if they will fit into my diet plan or not.  (The grapes were too high in carbs, in case you were wondering.)The book also lists many common and name brand items, both high and low carb.It is split into several sections such as beverages; milk, cream, butter, and yogurt; breads, muffins and crackers; fruit; pancakes, waffles, and breakfast pastries; poultry; sweeteners, jams, and syrups; etc.It even has a section for "dining out" with tips on dining away from home, and a "fast food" section with counts for popular foods at fast food restaurants.If you are watching either your fat or your carbs, you need this book
delightfully wonderful. I have read this book twice and both times in 2 days tops! I wanted to climb right in and live amongst the characters. I felt so much love for everyone in the book that it was hard for me to finish it. This is a gem and I am so happy that her new book is out
What's next?. When I came back to USA in 1990 from Japan after 10 years, I was a little shocked. It's there are so many obese. I stop seeing proportionate people as I admired once before (since I'm from Japan; we were small and rather plain looking.) What happened! I thought it's that soda-pop as I always watch the countless gallon bottles my next customers are buying at the every grocery shopping. As I was wondering, this nation sued tobacco companies. So I kept wondering, why don't they blame major soda-pop companies for obese. Soda-pop companies are not the sole culprit, but I was surprised to find that tabacco companies and sweet companies are somehow related. Anyhow, whatever the policy that the government had or have, if any, failed. I really hope to do something to improve American diet. Sooner is better. (I go to large Oriental Grocery Store at least once a month. You will be amazed how much size of green section they carry. It's almost 10 times of what Giants or Safeway carries, for example.)
4.5 stars. Again... early King is the best King.  This book is so good you'll read it back to back
ken gelder is a interlecctual genius. what ken does with this book is amazing for a basic person like me to sit down and read a book like this is amazing i learnt soooooo much!!!!!!!!!!! buy this book!!!!!!!!!!
Winterdance, An Unbelievable Adventure. This is the funniest and most enjoyable non-fiction book that I have ever read. I recommend it highly
A kind of instruction manual and roadmap. Journey Into Community: Looking Inside The Community Learning Center provides the reader with a kind of instruction manual and roadmap of what to expect when a traditional school decides to end its isolation from the community it services. Community Learning Centers will provide teachers, administrators, parents, and community leaders with every tool needed to successfully achieve important education goals with such a transition including improved and high levels of student academic performance; after school programs providing enrichment activities in a safe environment; acquisition of essential technological skills by students and other members of the community; expanding leadership opportunities for teachers, students, and community members; and unlocking the storehouse of educational resources present in the community at large in support of the education of the community's youth. Also very highly recommended reading on this seminal and important subject is Steve Parson's earlier work published by Eye On Education: Transforming Schools Into Community Learning Centers.
A Book That Invites Mental Participation. Does Cliff Pickover provide an answer to humanity's questions about the nature of God? Absolutely not. What he does in this book is much more important. He encourages his readers to think for themselves. By creating a series of paradoxical riddles that continuously entangle themselves in catch-22s, Pickover demonstrates how little we actually understand about a hypothetical "omniscient" being. Can we ever understand God from a human point of view? I don't know, but this book encourages us to at least try. That in itself is a valuable gift.One word of warning:if you are a passive reader, looking for a few hours of lazy entertainment, don't buy this book. However,if you want mental stimulation and a nice potent cerebral workout,definately read this book! It really doesn't matter if one believes in God or not when reading this book. The thought processes evoked by the book are worth the price itself
The best book on the subject. As a therapist, I have found this to be the best book addressing the issues of female sex addicts and female codependency.  It is affirming, thorough, and healing.  Furthermore, it adds the spiritual dimension to the healing process and veers away from "clinical" findings.  I recommend it to all of my clients who suffer from problems with sexual addiction and codependency
A sweeping, accessible overview of the hypnotic process. Rick Voit, Ph.D. Co-author: Hypnosis in Clinical Practice: Steps for Mastering Hypnotherapy. (Routledge)Trancework is a wonderful achievement in presenting a thorough conceptual framework and understanding of trance states, hypnotic communication and the rationale for technique. Through its clear language, thorough review of research, and the introduction of powerful and novel teaching formats, Yapko carefully carries the reader from this well-established framework into very practical applications for psychotherapy. Its progressive building of concepts and logical applications results in a comprehensive discussion of how hypnosis and hypnotic language serve as natural extensions of the therapeutic process to basic skills and clear-cut guidelines for the integration of hypnosis into practice.This book certainly provides the reader with many practical ideas for hypnotic language, induction procedures and clinical treatment planning. Yet, this reviewer believes the book's strength lies in how effectively it lays the groundwork for why these methods make sense. His sections on the concepts behind trance and hypnosis, human suggestibility and responsiveness, brain function, and various contexts in which hypnosis is practiced give the reader a depth of understanding that fully restore this meaning to an extent that few other texts achieve.This is a book with few if any weaknesses. If anything, it may have attempted to do too much and yet, should any of its elements be removed, it would not be the complete work that it is. Yapko's thorough examination of the myths surrounding hypnosis and how they reflect misinterpretations of the process involved serve to illuminate the alternative truths involved. He most effectively dispels myths about hypnosis by examining ways in which responsiveness and suggestibility create the potentials through which we induce trance. This assignment of responsibility and further discussion of normal hypnotic phenomena allow the reader to grasp the purpose of techniques as means of utilizing, not manufacturing, trance behavior. In short, it successfully replaces the mindset of "doing hypnosis" with one of "being hypnotic."Unlike many other introductory books, Trancework carefully and clearly examines those conditions and characteristics in people and in the therapeutic setting that lay the groundwork for hypnotic communication. I would recommend this book for students of hypnosis at any level of training. For the serious beginner, there is probably no more comprehensive and user-friendly text available. It has been my experience that many professionals who have completed advanced levels of training have not gained a comprehension of the hypnotic process sufficient to comfortably apply their skill with any range or effectiveness. In Trancework, these readers will discover an opportunity to expand their knowledge base while increasing the breadth of their hypnosis skills.Because of its clarity and scope, this book would be of great interest to someone seriously curious about hypnosis.
EXCELLENT. This was the second book I read from Lisa See and I was so enchanted with her sytle and informative insights. This was a pleasure to read and I couldnt put it down. It is both captivating and informative. Often hidden from our eyes this culture is opened up and seen from the inside out. I recommend it highly. LOVE IT!!! You will too
excellent textbook. I felt I had to answer the 2 irresponsible reviews above. This is an excellent introduction to critical thinking. It is thoughtful clear, and  enjoyable to read.  Each chapter contains puzzle-like, challenging exercises which reinforce the lessons. It is easy to improve your thinking skills by reading this book and working through the exercises
past lives future healings. This is one of her most awsome books.  It is just one of many many good books that she has put out there for us to grab that knowledge from
Easy to understand. This is a straightforward interpretation book for Tarot cards. Easy to use and understand. I have many books on Tarot cards, but for getting to the meaning of the cards without a lot of extra words, this is the best book for the money.  I have used this book for years and have recommended it to many people
Precise, centered reflection that has not dimmed with years. George MacDonald's classic work continues to take the breath away of spiritual pilgrims who find him for the first time.  These small sonnets are each gems that act as windows for persons to catch a glimpse of the heart of God, and the heart of a man clearly connected to the Spirit's yearning in his life.  These are best read slowly and savored, but as with any true classic, each time they are read, they have a richer meaning.  The readings are arranged by month, one per day
A must read for Fundamental Investors. Philip Fisher's thoughts and experience are invaluable and timeless. Not as boring (to read) as the intelligent investors (though both are equally important reading). I particularly like the chapters about "Fifteen points to look in a common stocks","when to buy", "when to sell", "Five don't", and "Developing your investment philosophies". One particular topic that I like best is about "Don't follow the crowd". Also on "How I go about finding a growth stock"This book also covers what a good business should have (it recaps of what they teach you in business school). I have 10 years of investing experience before I read this book (I know I should have read this book earlier), and in my opinion this book should work as a guideline to develop our own investing philosophies (and not our philosophy itself).  There are no one size fits all strategy in the investing world.  This book will also help to open your eyes (especially for beginner) that investing (the right way) is not easy and is a complex process, however the result from a patient and diligent investor could be great.There are 3 important aspects of a business (apart from the stock price) which this book will cover most of them:1. The Business (and the Industry)2. The Financials3. The People (Management, Personnel)I also recommend you all to read Ben Graham's "The Intelligent Investors" (with commentary by Jason Zweig who will give more recent and relevant example), and Peter Lynch's "One up on Wall Street".  Once you read them all (coupled with some real experience), then you are ready to be an investing pro...Happy Investing
Strained relations. This 18th chronicle of Brother Cadfael has less about him and more about history. In fact, he really only appears at the beginning and at the ending and doesn't have any hand at all in the solving of crimes. The story springs from the tempestuous relationship between Owain Gwynedd, Prince of Wales and Cadwaladr, his treacherous and headstrong younger brother. The brothers have had no peace between them for years as Cadwaladr is forever plotting to seize power for himself, being beaten at this game by his brother and then counting on the strong family ties that exist in all Welshmen, to be forgiven and taken back into the fold. This time, he has gone too far however, and has hired Danish mercenaries to attack Owain's troops. These Danes have been settled in Ireland for generations (a fact I did not know) and were just as much Irish as Danish and were Christian to boot! It was an interesting read for the historical contents alone, even if Cadfael scarcely appeared
Must Have for Baking. I bought this book because I was just the average cook searching for a cookbook that would tell me what to do exactly and why. I learned so much from this book and now I consider myself a good baker. My family and friends and people I don't know want me to make them deserts. I consider this to be a great accomplishment and exactly what I was looking for. If you want to be a good baker buy this book you won't be disappointed and you will learn the proper way to do it. The baking911.com site is fantastic and if you want to know more ask Sarah. I've never met this woman, I consider her to be a good friend and a fantastic chef. She has done alot for all of us who are learning and explains it in layman terms. She even has a online school at baking911.com and I have taken the classes. A major plus. I believe this is the best cookbook I own and I have more than 50 and at the best price.You will find many pictures and more recipes at the web site. Baking Friend Mystie Richards Florid
Superb, mordant, brilliant: one of the best books written. Not only is Tacitus one of the sharpest narrative historians who has ever lived, not only are we incredibly fortunate to have this poignant account of his view of history, but we have Michael Grant's accurate and superb translation. I can't imagine anyone not thinking this is a superb edition: the bloke who compared it negatively with Gibbon (ALTHOUGH I OF COURSE RESPECT HIS OPINION) might try comparing it instead to Herodotus, Sallust, Xenophon, Polybius, Livy, Suetonius, Josephus, and Philo as they are a little closer to Tacitus' era. This is a major intellectual work by a marvelous writer of the first century AD who lived through some interesting times and had an opinion. Of course he is &quot;biased&quot; (in other words, HE HAS AN OPINION). Who isn't ? Everyone should know by 2003 that the historian's bias is one of the first things to look at. Tacitus was a conservative who pined for the golden days of a senatorial republic that he never knew. Of course he hated Tiberius and reserved much of his best invective against him: this may be  the first non-hagiographic biographical portrait of such fulness that was ever written, or at least that survived, and is incredibly valuable just for that. I don't think I need to defend Tacitus much more from anyone who gave him, or who gave this edition, less than a five star rating, (you don't like M. Grant's translation? Then learn to read Latin, fellows -- if you work hard you'll be able to read Tacitus in one year) but I shall say this: Tacitus is like Homer and Aeschylus in the sense that if you think they are boring, it is because you have the problem, not them
'Good Times, Bad Boys' will rock your world!. Twenty-seven-year-old Echo Brennan feels as if the life she's dreamed of since she was in her teens is slowly slipping away, as her life is stuck on pause. For instance, instead of chasing the job of her dreams at DISC Magazine, Echo is stuck writing for the small-time Brooklyn Art & Times (aka the BAT) Newspaper, where she spends her days listening to indie albums, searching for an up-and-comer who can truly take the world by storm; and her nights helping her struggling musician boyfriend, Matt, overcome his four-year long writer's block. Matt Hanley was once the hottest newcomer on the scene, but since he began dating Echo, the most he can do is compose music. Now, with a record deal hanging over his head, Matt knows that he needs to produce something ASAP to please the head honchos at the label, and make his name chart-worthy once more. But things just aren't working out as he planned. Which is why Echo kicks him out, and decides that it's time to put herself first for once, and work on finding some personal success, as well as a boyfriend who brings some stability to the table. However, once Echo and Matt split, Matt suddenly finds exactly what he was looking for all these years: a muse. Echo's quick turnaround feelings about him have left him broken-hearted, so he does something unforgivable...he writes a collection of songs claiming what a horrible, unsupportive girlfriend Echo was - using her name in each and every one of them, and making her the most hated woman in rock and roll. Now, Echo's life is being showcased for the world to see. Suddenly, guys are scared of her, and she can't find a job anywhere. As if that weren't bad enough, Matt's music begins making her question exactly how supportive of his career she truly was; and rethink how she's going to survive in this Echo-hating world. After all, when your reputation in New York becomes tarnished, the only thing you can do is create a new one.As a music lover and writer, as well as a chick lit fan, I was absolutely ecstatic to stumble upon Melanie Murray's GOOD TIMES, BAD BOYS, which took the best of both worlds, and blended lyrics together with shopping, partying, and New York nightlife, to create a refreshing new addition to the world of chick lit. Echo is a hilarious character, whose mixed feelings for Matt and his music is relatable, while her complaints regarding her big hips, and penchant for over-eating anything sweet is hilarious. The secondary characters, from Matt himself, to Echo's glamorous older sister Thalia, and her Park Avenue Princess best friend, Alicia, bring their own dimensions to the hard rock fairytale, and offer a nice contrasting bit of dialogue. Murray has proven that she has quite an ear for music, and knows her oldies rock and roll quite well. Her descriptions of writing for a magazine, the inner-workings of a record studio, and the nervousness some musicians experience before a show are not only in-depth, but prefer a nice backdrop to the various situations Echo is forced to suffer through on an almost daily basis. GOOD TIMES, BAD BOYS will rock your world!Erika Sorocc
Captain Vimes goes into diplomacy. Once upon a time in the Multiverse there was indeed a Fifth Elephant floating around aimlessly. He could not help it, but he crashed violently screaming and kicking into the Discworld, at the same time splitting continents and raising mountains. An eternity later his remains are still buried deep in the planes of Uberwalt, the home of vampires, werewolves and most importanly dwarves. Dwarves who are not only mining diamonds and gold, but lately also elephant fat. It is exactly that valuable asset that brings Lord Vetinari, the Patrician of Ankh-Morpork, to the conclusion that keeping good diplomatic relations with Uberwalt is maybe not such a bad idea. On the other side, sending Captain Vimes on such a diplomatic mission might not belong to that same pool of bright ideas.It is always a great joy to meet the old folks of the City Watch again for another crazy voyage. This time it is not different: it all starts with Sergeant Colon's experiences with the Discworld version of a speed camera, but soon the complete City Watch proves that silliness is their strongest weapon. This time not many new characters are introduced, but this only means that known characters, such as the Igors and that cute little doggie Gaspode, get more attention.The attentive reader certainly will notice the undertone that links certain forces in Uberwalt to a Nazi regime. Indeed references to sub-humans and other Nazi slogans are generously spread throughout the story. In this respect The Fifth Elephant is unique -at least for the Discworld series- in the way that it portraits a strong political message against extreme nationalism. In the end it is not only a funny, but also an extremely smart book
Great practical book. This book is a wonderful read.  It offers a clear strategy and provides ways to set realistic goals.  I think it is really important to read for anyone interested in animal welfare/rights/etc
Garden Retreats Review. When you make a garden, it doesn't matter what type of garden it is. You will still need structure to help tie it to the earth and sky. Whether you opt for a small arbor or a charming playhouse, this book has ideas and plans to help you fill your garden with structures. From practical plans for garden sheds to fun plans for gazebos, Garden Retreats by David and Jeanie Stiles  has ideas for any gardener who enjoys working with wood.Section one of this book covers the basics of building garden structures and fencing. This section covers topics such as planning, types of wood to use, and how to set corner markers. Section two covers garden seating. This section has clear, simple to follow directions for each piece, from a simple garden bench to a lovely pergola. Section three is called special places in the garden, and covers everything from arbors to arched gates. Finally, section four discusses garden shelters. I especially liked the garden shower, but there are also structures such as summerhouses and gazebos, as well.This book includes directions and plans for over twenty garden structures. The plans are clear and the directions are easy to follow. I have several of these projects on my list of things to do next year.
Good Crichton, not his best. Intriguing as always, exciting from the first page, strong for the first 2/3rds and less "editorializing" than usual, but it's just not as good as his higher concept novels. But it's still very enjoyable all the way through, and as always makes you think. It feels a little dated now, but I re-read it last week and enjoyed it just as much as the first time. Sphere should definitely be a part of any Crichton fan's library. Skip the movie, though. Here, the science is less "convincing" than in Jurrassic Park (which is mostly convincing, but stretched) and Prey (which is better writing and fun, but not convincing). But that doesn't matter, because Crichton can write an adventure like few others (as long as character isn't important--character's here take backseat to concept and science). Pace, as always is good. More a rollicking adventure than "something to think about" (typical of later novels) and quite enjoyable on that level. It's the kind of novel you'll tear through in a weekend at most.  And that's a good thing
Balloons Casting Shadows on Stars. This isn't a purely positive review of this book but I liked the content. Take your curiousity, unleash it on a home where homeless items roam, and wonder. The packaging is a little of everything; some happy, some sad, the oddity of the book itself is a nice selling point.One problem I had herein was that, for items found in random places, some sure had paragraphs wrapped around them. Yup, some things have huuuge backstories. Sometimes I found myself combing through alot of wording and I kept wondering why it happened, why people were being interviewed, and if those words were always necessary.That said, I still liked the book and its content because some of the stuff within it reminded me of different things. Checklists of Star Wars figures, a balloon with a wish attached that was supposed to make it to the stars, a love letter that says that a relationship should end because being related just made it feel odd; sometimes it takes forgotten stuff to remind me why I'm reading.
A Long Overdue Return to 'Old Man And The Sea' . . . A Joyful Read!. Reading once again 'Old Man And The Sea' by Ernest Hemingway was simply a joyful reading experience that will stay with me for a very long time.  The writing is eloquent yet raw.  The reader experience humble yet filled with sheer power.  The connectivity is filled with singularity yet there is a sense of one with the universe.There is of course so much that has been written and said about 'Old Man And The Sea' that I will not write a commentary about this marvelous book's movement; however, what I will say is this: there are books that are indeed worth returning to since they have a timelessness to the story, and, as the reader's own life experience grows, so too does the appreciation and understandings of the written story.  In this compelling book, I have found that the meaning of this story so powerful and connected to my soul in few ways a book ever has.Do yourself a favor, go pick up 'Old Man And The Sea' and enjoy yourself.  Though you may be holding a paperbook in your hand, you may soon come to realize your actually holding a mirrow, and you're peering into your own life
Read for comparison, keep for the artwork. Although somewhat brief, this translation of the Tao Te Ching is concise, not lacking.  It is a good complement to the Arthur Waley translation, and well worth reading.  Read, compare, and keep for the art
How to automate review. I found this book very helpful because it shows so many projects and system features that I can incorporate into my home automation system. I never realized how many convenient features that are made possible with the use of this book. It is also easy to do because the pictures show and the text explains exactly how the feature works, how to install the components and what parts by model number are required. I have purchased other books on this subject that were not useful to me but this one is. Thank yo
Sensing our feelings, feeling our senses. Ever heard a song or smelt a perfume that took you suddenly and unexpectedly  back to another time and place? "What is most amazing is not how our senses span distance or cultures, but how they span time. Our senses connect us intimately  with the past, connect us in ways that most of our cherished ideas never could."I've just finished reading A Natural History of the Senses, a book published in 1990 by Diane Ackerman, a poet and essayist who has gone on to publish two more books following the theme of this one. When I began I thought it as beautifully written and as profound as astronomer Chet Raymo's The Soul of the Night.  Ackerman's book, like Raymo's,  kindled my sense of wonder on almost every page.It is a book in which I sense two underlying assumptions. The first, following Thoreau's Walden, that we (all living matter) are very much a product of our environment, and a lot of our physiology has evolved to interpret that environment to our brain. Secondly, that we are now so mechanised, mere technoslaves, that we run the risk of losing that vital connection: once we ignore those signals from our senses about our environment we run the risk of being alienated from it, and alienation is the first step to mental unhealth. The experience of using our body in its normal, healthy state is in itself pleasurable. It is good to remember that life is not all stress and interpersonal pressure, not a shutting out of unpleasant 'facts' by our various addictions. Life is naturally a joyous state.So let's learn about our senses, but not in any conventional sense of learning, for this is not merely a compendium of facts about the senses but an attempt to encourage us to use our senses, to get us in touch with our feelings (sorry about the pun, but you see how close a tie our brain makes between our emotions and our senses).The book is divided into five sections, one for each sense,  with an epilog which considers the synthesis of the senses and the existence of other senses such as are found in some animals. There are some good thoughts on how unique each species' view  of the world is, how particular to our own species is our 'reality'. It is mind expanding to imagine the world as seen and experienced by a spider, for instance, or a cat. One is a little more readier to accept another human's differing viewpoint, for one thing.My edition was a well produced one (Chapman) with handcut pages, marbled endpapers, well-matched colours in the binding and an expressive jacket picture. It felt, looked and smelt enticing. (I love the smell of books)."...the latest findings in physiology suggest that the mind doesn't really dwell in the brain but travels the whole body on caravans of hormone and enzyme, busily making sense of the compound wonders we catalog as touch, taste, smell, hearing, vision." The brain we usually think of (the 'grey matter') is part of a system, the nervous system,which occupies our entire body, and which enables us to react successfully to our surroundings. Finding the balance between sensation and analysis of that sensation is hard for us because of our 'big' brain; it parallels what psychologists, following Jung, call the swing between extrovert and introvert tendencies, or what moralists see as the choice between intellect and hedonism.  Have you ever seen a plant move a leaf or a blossom to face the sun? It is a graceful and beautiful action: for us finding such a balance between sense and survival is not easy, and other life forms have much to teach us.We now study 'body language', unfortunately usually to find out how to make other people do what we want them to. But we respond to others' body language with our own, and much of what goes on goes on at a sensory level. Our much neglected sense of smell, for instance, tells us how others are feeling, gives guidance as to the dominance structure of a group and help us to find a sexual mate.Ackerman's book is not a book on science, but a book that demonstrates what science is for.It is a book that I want to read again, soon. Much of the book's fascination comes from Ackerman's writing itself, the simple and direct style that reveals herself and her feelings as well as explains scientific findings and describes the natural world and human customs and history in poetic images and metaphors. Her lateral cast of mind can find the connections between humans and the world in which we live through mediators such as pheronomes, evolution, the behavior of Monarch butterflies, Cleopatra and Egyptian perfumes, the colour range of insects, the deer who come to her garden, the space shuttle and a thousand other fascinating examples.Ackerman has done something I admire very much - synthesised culture, science, history and poetry to express a perception of human beings and their worlds. For those who've read this far, I've included my own musings to show just what kind of a book this is. If you read it, be prepared to have insights too. Also recommended is Isabel Allende's Aphrodite and those food films, Like Water for Chocolate and Eat, Drink, Man, Woman
This is a well written and comprehensive study of ferns. This book has excellent photographs and drawings, and describes in great detail the may species of ferns.  The beginning of the book is technical, and defines the structural differences between fern types, how to recoginize the parts of a fern, etc. Anyone interested in growing wild or nursery-grown ferns should have this book in their collection.  It will allow you to identify the ferns you have, or see in the forests
A beautiful, enlightening book. For those unfamiliar with Isalm, Abou El Fadl cracks open the tradition.  You can see Islamic reasoning at work as he compares sources, uses the ancient writers and parses out conclusions.  Read especially his deconstruction of alleged authorizations for violence against women in Islam and his defense of the tradition of women scholars. You can also feel his anguish at how much of Islam has turned its back on reason and the core belief that God commands the just and beautiful in favor of a narrow-minded fundamentalism.  Christians struggling to defend against Christian fundamentalism will find an ally here.And, if you love books, you will rejoice in his loving invocation of the conference of books, the collected wisdom of centuries, that swirl around him each night as he studies.  My only complaint is that I would wish to have had more of this book: more Islamic analysis of issues.Abou El Fadl has been accused of being a `sympathizer' of terrorists by Pipes; reading this book will show the absurdity of that claim and how his opposition of extremism is woven into his entire world view.
Good for business, more than I needed. This is an excellent book. I just recently started raising chickens and was disappointed at the information available at the local library. I purchased Chickens In Your Backyard: A Beginner's Guide , Day Range Poultry: Every Chicken Owner's Guide to Grazing Gardens and Improving Pastures , and Storey's Guide to Raising Chickens: Care / Feeding / Facilities . Recent reading at the library about pasture raising livestock got me interested in this title. The volume they discuss is a little more than I was interested in, but that is not the fault of the book. It is well written, an easy read, and comprehensive in the amount of information it contains. The only thing I could add to Claudia Campbell's comments is that information is also included in business organization, strategies and marketing. If you go into poultry on this scale, it has to make a profit to be sustainable. I agree this book is a complete resource.As for my ambitions, I found Chickens In Your Backyard: A Beginner's Guide an excellent introductory text and Storey's Guide to Raising Chickens: Care / Feeding / Facilities adequate for my needs. Both these books have ample reviews and I could not add to them. We live in a small rural area and the library depends on local donations. Chickens In Your Backyard and Day Range Poultry will be donated to the library. Storey's will be kept as a reference
Somewhat helpful, very interesting. I myself write westerns, so I bought this book in the hopes that it would help my writings be more accurate.  While the information contained in this book isn't quite as specific as I would have liked, it does have some very interesting and entertaining facts, such as slang terms cowboys used, the terms used for the different hairstyles during the 19th century, and common diseases that plagued the population.  It also lists the different types of horses, which is a tremendous help for me.  If you write novels or are just an avid history buff (of which I am both), then I think you will find this book interesting
Pretty good. I'm a big Clay fan and from the reviews, I thought this would be a bit better. It was well written, but was a bit on the religious side. I found myself skimming thru that stuff.Clay has had an interesting life and some of the stories about his birth and step-father made me a little sad. They seem like real jerks and didn't understand what a wonderful child they had in their family.If you are a Clay fan, you will most likely enjoy it. It's a fast read, a bit all over the place at times, but worth the few hours it takes to complete. Clay truly is an amazing human being. There should be more young people with his sized heart
Jewels of the Sun: The Gallaghers of Ardmore Trilogy #1. If you are a Nora Roberts fan you will not be disappointed in this trilogy. The added fantasy of fairies and ghosts and the fey Irish who believe in them are a delight. I've read all three and they are all as good as the first. You will move into the Gallagher Clan and become part of the family and their fortunes
Special. I love Appalachia history and would rate this as my favorite book on the subject.  I hated to see the book end
Excellent effort - looking forward to more. Although I think the secondary characters could use a little more attention, the primary ones are well drawn and believable. It's a well-turned plot, though I wish everyoine involved: author, editor, and whoever wrote the jacket blurb, would have been a little more circumspect with clues. One reviewer complained of southern stereotyping; I say: barely. I lived in the area for a couple of years, and the description sounds eerily familiar to me. I had an owner of an extensive marina complex tell me once, "I AM the law on Magnolia Point!" (geographical name changed.) just like Taylor in the book. Out in the country the way "things work" is accurately described. And sorry, but people DO use "Y'all" in the singular. Perhaps they shouldn't, but they do.  In any case, since there is now a sequel, we know DeMarco survived. I'm looking forward to the next one.
Making sense of the Book of Revelation. Overall, this book is an attempt to put the coming events prophesied in Revelation and other books of the Hebrew Scriptures and Christian New Testament into a possible scenario.  Reading it brought those future events more into focus for me.We won't know what is coming until it actually happens but I think Pat did a very good job of conjecturing a possible chain of events from the Bible facts and the collective perspectives that many Bible students, scientists, etc. have come up with over the years.Lastly, it will give any thoughtful person a more sober approach to their own life, encourage them to consider where they are currently at with God and challenge them to think about what they are going to spend their life's strength on.  The last day of life as usual IS coming; the beginning of eternity could start for each one of us at any moment.  We'd all better get ready - the sooner the better
An Outstanding Work. Charles King combines meticulous research with engrossing storytelling to produce a work that is at once intellectually rigorous and readable.  Ambitious in its scope, the book traces the history of the Black Sea from the time of Greek trading colonies to the modern regional powers and environmental issues that characterize the sea and the states and peoples that surround it today.  Not limiting itself to a narrow analysis, The Black Sea puts this region into a global perspective, and is a valuable read for anyone who is interested in this important part of the world, or in the past and future of regional confrontation and cooperation
A great read for those who are selling to CIO's. As a professional services sales person I am always researching how I can better service the needs of clients and prospects. This book provides some real insights into what the New CIO Leader should be thinking about in the future and provided me with some great talking points that will really help to differentiate me and my company
All about Time and more. The one thing one can say about Stephen Teo is that he has figured out Wong Kar-wai in part because he understands the enigmatic director on so many levels. Part of watching movies is trying to figure them out on one level and then to try to catch other levels or layers on a second viewing. Kudos to Stephen Teo - for making me aware of the multi-layered as well as multi-dimensional quality of Wong Kar-wai's work.On one level, Teo reads Wong Kar-wai as intensely local and at the same time are intimately global. Moreover, Teo brings to presence the iconoclastic quality of Wong Kar-wai's experiments. Lastly, Teo deftly navigates the reader to the multitude of symbols relating to Wong Kar-wai's play on time, space, and memory.Teo's Wong Kar-wai (published in the World Directors series) situates Wong's work primarily in a Hong Kong cultural milieu as well as explores Wong Kar-wai's historical context. Teo also is really good at framing Wong Kar wai's work around the literary inspirations and sources. However, Teo does not pull any punches in that most of the literary inspirations are pushed aside and little of the book or movie that are supposed to inspire the movies show up differently in the new creation.One could well imagine that Teo reads Wong Kar-wai's movies as text. Teo's Wong Kar-wai is easy to read but not simplistic at all. He does what few are able to do - sustain an argument questioning Wong's oeuvre. It is an understatement to say that his book is extraordinary because of its range and profundity. Teo brings together an all-inclusive sweep of home grown Chinese interpretation to the movies with a not equally matched familiarity with the Hong Kong film industry. Teo convinces me of both the local significance as well as the international impact of Wong Kar-wai's movies - which ironically fail at the local Hong Kong box office. He locates Wong's movies vis--vis a highly complex local historical background - which I would never have understood unless I had read this book. At the same time, Teo grounds each film against the literary readings that supposedly guide their creation. This is very difficult to do while still maintaining some sense of cohesion. Teo brings in an incredible understanding of authors like Puig, Cortzar, Murakami, Dazai, Jin Yong and Liu Li-chang while still maintaining a real sense of Wong Kar-wai's musings on time, space, and memory.It would not be fair to ignore Teo's ability to understand genre. Teo situates "As Tears Go By" as a gangster movie. "Days of Being Wild" - I cannot help but agree - is an 'Ah Fei' (discontented punk) movie-cum-romance. "Chungking Express" argues Teo is a light romance with touches of noir intrigue. "Ashes of Time" is predictably a wuxia movie - but not really one as it breaks rules while adhering to some very key ones. "Fallen Angels" according to Teo takes over from where "Chungking Express" leaves of. "Happy Together" according to Teo is predictably gay road movie. "In the Mood for Love" is what Teo calls a "wenyi film" evoking deep emotions about love but more importantly repressed desire.One other thing that I am grateful to Teo for is framing Wong's three great "nostalgia" movies: "Days of Being Wild," "In the Mood for Love," and "2046" which are a 1960s trilogy. The films are linked via Tony Leung Chiu-wai enigmatic character from "Days of Being Wild's" mysterious epilogue and working its way to the other two. I loved this book. It brought a new level of understanding as well as a new level of appreciation to my viewing of Wong Kar-wai in particular and movies in general.While Wong's movies move from the narcissism of Yuddy (in Days of Being Wild) and Chow Mo-wan (In the Mood For Love and 2046), the doubling of cops in "Chungking Express," Murong Yin and Murong Yang in "Ashes of Time," the mise-en-abme of role playing within role playing between Chow Mo-wan and Su Li-zhen Chan in "In the Mood for Love" on the surface it would lead one to believe that it was all about identity. Just like the works of Milan Kundera - which are also about identity - but they are also more than that. To reduce Wong Kar-wai's work to identity would be like saying that Tiger Wood's gold game is all about the putting. Yes, Wong Kar-wai explores the crises of misidentification as well as the pathologies of self and others that epitomize an identity without established borders. However, without Teo - we would not be able to understand that it is about that and also more.Miguel Llor
A witchy book. Dorothy Gale finds herself in a strange land. She must muster all of her strength to travel the yellow brick road, find the wizard, kill the Wicked Witch of the West, and return home again. Along the way she receives some help from Glinda the Good Witch. A story of triumph in the face of adversity, The Wizard of Oz is one of the only classic children's stories with a female lead
Interesting study of television. This book provides an indepth look into the effect of television on Indian people, esp women.  I thought the book was easy to read and understand, yet still provided insightful commentary and information.  The book is based off of research the author did, viewing television programs with lower middle class families. I would recomend this book to anyone interested in India, politics, or the history of communications
Great Book -- But What a Challenge. "Love in the Present Tense" by Morrie and Arleah Shechtman presents ideas that are so intuitively obvious (at least in retrospect) that I found myself wondering why I hadn't written the book myself.  With more reflection, I wondered why I hadn't been following their precepts for years.  I suppose the answer, at least to the second question, is that what they propose is hard -- it demands more than probably most of us are willing to give.  But having acknowledged the difficulty involved, I believe they have written the best "relationship self-help" book of recent years.  They are "on to something", and the prospective reader would be well-served by finding out what it is
Good, but slowly being replaced by online resources. This a good book, don't get me wrong. However, having been edited back in 1998, and being -as it is- largely focused on the documents that you, as a Small Business Owner, are likely to be in need of, it now seems a bit outdated and old-fashioned when you compare if with the ease with which you can get (for free) similar formats (business plans, marketing plans, invoices, etc.) online (in office.microsoft.com &gt; Templates, for instance). It is a good reference of what to look for, though, which is why I give it 4 stars
where is the green sheep?. It is a great book for preschooler and beginner to learn to read
Totally kool!!!!!!!. This book was totally awesome! Don't read this review anymore if you don't won't me to spoil the ending.WELL, at the end of INKHEART you kind of pick up that Farid loves Meggie. And, in INKSPELL they're a couple(not really surprising). Well Mo, Meggie's dad, is mistaken for the outlaw Bluejay. Well, Mo gets shot by Mortola, near the heart and he gets a very high fever.The Motley Folk take him in their secret cave and he's there with Resa, his wife. Sootbird gives their cave away to the Adderhead. When the Adderhead gets Mo he locks him up. Then meggie comes to save him and they have to bind a book for the Adderhead to make him immortal. WEll when they finished it the Adderhead let them and the rest of the prisoners go. Basta and some oother people from the Adderhead were sent by Mortola to kill the prisoners. Mo is the only one with a sword and he starts to fight them. Them some new Motley Folk come and help them fight them off.Farid dies when Basta wants to hurt Dustfinger. Basta knows that Dustfinger loves Farid. Meggie cries on the battle field next to him when the fight is still going on.Dustfinger saves Farid by giving his life to him. And the story ends. Sorry if I didn't give you enough details
Remley's scholarship is characteristically brilliant. Paul Remley's scholarship in this work is characteristically brilliant. Cannot recommend it highly enough, even at the eighty-dollar ticket price
Dare to disturb the universe... Some books you forget as soon as you set down. Not this one.I never liked Robert Cormier when I was younger. I thought he was bitter, depressing and pointless--much like another reviewer who gave this book a one star rating. Now that I am more mature I realize he may be bitter and depressing but he is definately not pointless.I guess you can see this book as just a story about a kid who gets beat up for not selling chacolates. You can also see Animal Farm as a cute little story about farm animals.However, you can also see "The Chocolate War" as a compelling demonstration of human sadism and the tendancy toward collective violence and nationalism. It all depends on how deeply you look.
Best Reference Book Ever for Polymer Science. This book is organized in such a clear fashion that you will find virtually any fundamental polymer property, its origin and related theories in it.  Most importantly, this book collects so many property tables that you will be amazed by how useful it is in your research. It is no doubt one of the most cited refrence in publications.  A wonderful reference book for graduate students.
Periodizing the 80s. Camera Politica is a must for all who are interested in studying the development of film studies. In this book, Michael Ryan and Douglas Kellner offer a plethora of studies of films from the late 60s to the 80s in order to make a larger argument about that period of history. Their basic premise is that these films are in a dialectical relationship to the rise of conservative politics in the 80s. Meaning, the growing sentiment of conservativism informs films like Dirty Harry and Rambo, but at the same time, the development of a full fledged conservative popular culture, in which these films are involved, creates a social milieu in which conservative politics appears attractive and the remedy to growing economic and social disturbances.They also criticize liberals for feeding into conservative filmic representations, often identifying the same ills as conservatives in their own attempts at cultural production. But, more significantly, liberal critics did not offer counter-representations that would do the same culture work that the conservative films of the late 70s and 80s did.Thus, they call for a new radical cinema. They are Marxist in orientation (though they are clearly aligned with feminisms, radical race theorists, and student radicals), and so they are suggesting that a Marxian culture and a Marxist cinema must come into being. This cinematic culture must diagnose problems but it also must offer remedies that speak to the large majority of people. Perhaps, most provocatively (especially for the time this book was written), Ryan and Kellner claim that this new Marxian cinema can take the form of the popular Hollywood film, and in fact it must if it wants to reach mainstream society.Though this book is a periodization of films, it also offers new theoretical devices. The first is the notion of transcoding: a film transcodes social attitudes. The second is ideology: the ideological work of Hollywood cinema is to try and offer remedies for social ills, but in so doing, it must admit ills do in fact exist. Thus ideology is double-edged. The third is diagnostic critique: the method of reading films that excavate both the ideological containment and the problem being identified.At this point in history, Camera Politica might appear a bit dated. But if anyone is interested in doing a historical periodization of American culture, this book is simply a MUST. If anyone is new to the area of visual and film culture and wants a book that might offer some theoretical methods as well as demonstrations of readings, then, they might want to pick this book up.This book is a bit of an overlooked classic, and it should be considered a staple in film studies
A work of art. Thank you, Amazon, for recommending this exquisite novel to me as a Gold Box special.  With an afterword by Annie Proulx and the recent success of Brokeback Mountain, this exceptional piece of western literature should now find the audience Thomas Savage so richly deserved in 1967.  As restrained and sparing in language as its central antagonist, Phil Burbank, Savage has the uncanny gift of eloquence through omission, allowing the reader to read between the lines.  I was captivated by his talent, and jolted by an entirely unexpected but immensely satisfying conclusion.  This book has been five times optioned for film, yet never made.  I doubt that will go on much longer
An Honest Truth-Seeker. To anyone with even minimal objectivity, it's no secret major media outlets are biased and have been for decades. But why? Bernard Goldberg answers that question in a straightforward way. Goldberg's perspective gives him an insight few have the privilege of sharing, i.e., that of an industry insider, a CBS correspondent for 28 years. So what's the mystery? Why does bias exists in major media organizations? Goldberg says it's environment, i.e, "groupthink," the "herd mentality," "peer pressure." Decision-makers in those organizations come from privileged backgrounds, they hear conversations from like-minded colleages and assume their slant on issues are mainstream. However, any objective inquiry shows that the opinions of Georgetown and Manhattan are NOT shared by the average thinking person elsewhere in the country.Goldberg offers a creative, drastic solution: leave Manhattan. Get out and have your assumptions challenged in the marketplace of ideas. He admits that secretly some journalists admit this is the way the system operates, but because they have careers and families they don't speak out. Another bold issue Golberg addresses is the idea of special interest groups shaping news content with agendas that are more concerned with their constituencies than providing information to the public. Network decision-makers cowardly acquiesce and journalism is compromised. He cites case after case. Editors intentionally leave out signficiant details of news stories so they might not offend certain groups.Golberg courageously goes where few dare. He has the spirit of a true inquirer, a real journalist. He's looking for answers and is willing to point the finger at some blatant abuses. In concluding his book, he argues that if the media want to be taken seriously again, they've got to address these issues. These matters can't be ignored if credibility is the objective or a reporter or an organization
Very Helpful. This is a great book to have. Easy reading, nice illustrations, great information
Frommer's Washington DC 2006 guide has it all!. Frommer's continues its tradition of excellence with the 2006 guide to D.C.  Most helpful to us were the "Getting to Know Washington D.C" chapter, and the chapter on "Suggested Itineraries".  The pullout map is invaluable.  If you've never been to D.C., or have not toured the city, this book is a fabulous reference
Timeless lyrics and beautiful illustrations!. Take one look at this book and you will realize how much thought, time, and effort was put into its creation. I read this book to my class of four and five-year-olds on the last day of a unit in which we discussed America's landscape, its folk music, and what makes our country unique. What better song to sum it all up than an American classic such as this? They loved it! I sang the verses to them and they joined in on the chorus. I can't remember the last time a book captivated them the way this one did! And to make things even better, the CD comes with, not one, but NINE songs performed by Woody Guthrie and Arlo Guthrie, all of which are lively, memorable, and downright wonderful children's songs. My students, as well as the other teachers, thoroughly enjoy the music. This book and CD are an extremely valuable tool for the classroom as well as the home. I couldn't be happier with my purchase, and I would recommend it to anyone
compelling and well-written. This was an absolute intoxicating read.  I loved it from the first to the last page.  Well-written, dramatic and surprising.  Thank goodness his work has been newly translated.
Couldn't Be Weirder. If you're ready for the bizzare, look no farther than this book. It is as bizzare as any form of Ripley's has ever been. The tv, the books, the museums, it's all as strange.
imagery at its finest. Saul Williams never ceases to amaze me, &quot;She&quot; creates terrific imagery thru written word.  &quot;She&quot; is a very inspired writing that will touch the soul of almost anyone who reads (or listens) to it.  Pictures have never been created so effortlessly with words.The poems are very complex works, but Saul has made each one extremely easy to read. (A feat not easily accomplished)  The CD only adds to the enjoyment of this work.  I am a relatively new Saul Williams fan and can't wait for whats next
Style and Tragedy. I enjoyed the review by Eric Karl Anderson. But I'd like to add a few things about Anderson's identity interpretation on the five characters that thread 'Nightwood' and its meanings. In the introduction of the book T.S Eliot wrote a preface which prepared the readers from possible misunderstandings for Djuna Barnes brilliant story written in prose was a work of 'creative imagination' and not 'philosophical treatise'. I read it twice,  the second time believing it to be a different book. From the beginning Barnes persuades the reader to dislike Robin for her strangeness; living but not present, a turmoil in the cold that disrupted the farse of other characters reality when she touched their lives. Robin and Doctor. Matthew are antagonists. They represent opposite dimensions of the self. The Doctor, although a brilliant mind, accurate in understanding the misery of Man is never the less a failure, in bondage with humility and the truth. In the end he curses Robin for existing; having transformed also him, Nora, Felix and Jenny into doomed creatures in a mysterious and horrific sense of how small their lifes became. In the chapter Go Down, Matthew, the Doctor and Nora could not hold a conversation. They spoke to the readers, not listening to each other. Their lives like a ring closing in their personal pain, existing only in the past, like dummies tragically possessed by death. Robin killed what they proclaimed as birthright, symbolically how she killed son Guido, who prayed to the Virgin by calling the statue Mamma. Loved the last chapter. I, that despised Robins personal distinction of morality was able to finally understand her. Her nature made her different; nor human nor a beast. A creature like the night that drifted 'sonambule' through life. No other human soul could be so free, so they love her but it's not Robin they want, but who she is. The misery in understanding it was not in reach. Djuna Barnes also tells a parallel tale of obsession for an image of love. Robin is that woman like an iman, possessed with a childs memory, but that causes a certain attraction to fear. In 'Bow Down' the writer evoked that it was easier to love a lion for its tamer. The story, and finally Robin were irresistable to my imagination. There is a tempting invitation from the writer to participate for the lonely souls (they become) speak to us, and Robin unaltered by their existance leaves us (readers) out. The book is brilliant. Like many readers have stated, it is a very hard book to fully comprehend in its various contexts. I advice those to wait for an appropriate moment in their lives to read this book. It answers many questions if we search, and dig between words and the quality of a genuine thinker, such as Djuna Barnes
An important and impressive book. I lived in Japan when the subway attack happened and I will never forget  the reaction from the Japanese people: they were terrified! When this book  came out, I bought it immediately, expecting the usual quality level of  non-fiction books that hit the stands soon after an event. Boy, was I  surprised: This is an excellent, excellent read. No exagerations, so  sensationalism, but still both fast-paced and revealing. As a reader of  Japanese newspapers I had a fairly good picture of what had happened  before, but this book gave me so much more background. As another reader  commented, the scary thing is that the authorities did nothing, not wanting  to &quot;rock the boat&quot;
a great read. This was my read of a book by Jane Ann Krentz.  I was pleasantly suprised by the co=hesive flow of the book. I would compare her  story to those written by Nora Roberts, who is one of my favorite authors.  Cady and Mack make and interesting pair, the sparks fly, and it is very believable.  I would recommend this book
a necessary volume. this book, along with stanley karnow's &quot;in our image&quot; and james hamilton-paterson's &quot;america's boy&quot; should be a necessary primer on america's tragic flirtation with colonialism at the turn of the century.  Well-paced and thoroughly engaging, &quot;benevolent assimilation&quot; is  as comprehensive and accessible document on the american annexation of the  philippines, an illegal act that in its time raised serious questions about  the very nature of the Americam republic and the liberal, jeffersonian  democracy late 19th century america putatively still represented. the dream  of empire, and its price in blood is poignantly essayed here. the chapters  where the United States pursued its brutal, racist war of conquest with the  consent of american law are wrenching. quite sad that there is very little  public discussion of this atrocious chapter in our history a full century  later. thought-provoking. capable of inducing a kind of soul-searching and  introspection few events in our history (like african slavery and the  extermination and continuing disenfranchisement of native americans) are  capable of provoking. essential not just for history buffs, but for anyone  interested in reading history with an eye to purifying our creed
Superb. This is the best book I have read on the history of globalization. It is superb. It is well written. It is sweeping in its vision. And the scholarship that undergirds the book is remarkable. Bayly has read widely in disparate fields like African, Chinese, Mughal, and British history, nationalism, economic development, the state, military history, and globalization.Bayly appeals to the professional historian, interested in historiographical debates over nationalism, colonialism, economic development, and many other matters. He brings these debates into his narration in a judicious manner. But historiography does not overwhelm the narrative. This is a book that can be savored by the professional historian and educated layperson alike.
Best essay on this subject I ever read. This is a very well referenced review of this emotional subject. The arguments are measured and compelling. Those who did not like it have succumbed to the knee-jerk reaction of somebody who was stung by a truth they prefer to ignore. It should be required reading for any open minded and honest person
"Sew Nice...". I purchased this book to use as a "text book" for a beginning sewing class I was teaching.  I was very pleased with the book and my students purchased it also after using my copy during class.  It has exactly what I wanted for them: clear and concise directions with good pictures for technique illustrations
excellent book to start real-world circuit design. This book contains good amount of practical information and is clear and easy-reading.  For people who are fresh out of college, this book bridges the textbook education with the real-world circuit design.  Get it now to help you make your first job easier
to close to home. Sometimes the truth hurts. Dr. Laura always tells it like it is, even when we don't realize it. My husband actually bought me this book for his birthday. After I loaned it to someone and never got it back, I decided to buy the cd
Well written, colorful, informative, and important. This wonderful book was recommended to me by a dear friend who is a professor of economics at the University of Michigan.  I purchased it awhile back, but only got around to reading it recently and I know I should have read it sooner.  It is delightfully written and very informative.  The author takes us through each of the models that have been developed for estimating aid to developing countries since World War II and the trillions of dollars that have poured into those countries with almost no positive effect.  He explores possible reasons why this has happened.He starts with a sound fundamental principle, that people respond to incentives and then shows how the measurements made and the programs developed have almost universally created perverse incentives to growth.  Too often these programs have left the world's most vulnerable no better off and too often in worse shape than before because of the dependency they develop on the rivers of money pouring in.What is particularly enjoyable about this book is that the author doesn't go around assigning blame or looking for bad guys.  Sure, he does find some who misuse their authority and disregard their responsibilities for personal gain, but for the most part he shows us how well intentioned programs provided perverse incentives.  We should not be surprised or even disappointed that people chose behaviors that resulted in their own gain.  The author also takes on issues surrounding luck, bad governments that kill growth, ethnic diversity and growth, and the issues surrounding debt forgiveness (how it should and should not be done).Easterly provides an insightful vignette at the beginning of each chapter and illustrates his points within the chapters with many anecdotes.  This is far from a dry academic paper, but it is thoughtful and intelligent.  It is readable by the average person likely to be interested in alleviating poverty in the third world through growth.  The author provides several pages of other works that should be consulted on this topic.  I have read and reviewed Hernando De Soto's magnificent "The Mystery of Capital", and "Economic Growth" by David Weil.I strongly recommend this to everyone because we all need to be better informed about these international issues.  The everyday media misleads and misinforms more than it helps and politicians pander rather than lead.  So, fellow citizens, it is up to us
Canadian rail travel Guide. I have booked a holiday travelling from one side to the other of Canada by rail.  This book is just what I need giving me a mile by mile guide of the track.  I will be taking it with me to increase my enjoyment of the trip
Glimpse of a faithful Christian. This is one of those books where the minute you pick it up and read the first page, you had to finish it.  Bill Bright is truly one of God's faithful servants; choosing to live a life that is selfless and full of integrity as a "slave" of God.  The book gives you a glimpse into the last few years of his life as he battled pulmonary fibrosis.  He finished his work on earth with the utmost joy and no one can capture what he went through better than the man himself.  The book also sheds light into his wife, his children, and his ministry.It's amazing that not more people know about Bill Bright.  He started the Campus Crusade for Christ ministry and has made several films including the JESUS film which has been seem by over 5.5 billion people.  He also came up with the 4 spiritual laws gospel among other outreach materials.  Through Bill's ministry, millions of people have come to accept Christ.  I didn't know about Bill Bright either until this year as I was going through my own struggles in life.  Reading his book and seeing how he finished his life with joy and the blessing he left to those around him brought so much hope and encouragement to my life.  It also showed me a better picture of who God really is and how He blesses the life of those who love Him.  You must give this book a read
Very Good recipes. I've tried most of the Meat recipes and have liked them all. Some could have the spices upped a little bit for more zing. I just wish it had more main course recipes. I'm really not interested in dessert, soups and miscellaneous. I'm disapointed that the recipes don't indicate the approximate number of servings
Good addition to the series, but not my favorite ... Elizabeth's Wolf fits in between Lora Leigh's first two Feline Breed stories (Tempting the Beast and The Man Within) and the third (Kiss of Heat) time-wise. EW is better developed than some of her others, but for some reason it didn't please me like Tempting the Beast, for instance.The story starts off with our military hero, Dash, wounded and in a foreign hospital. Nobody knows that he is a man-made creation with genes spliced from wolf DNA, and it is his animal instincts- which he has kept hidden thus far- that is telling him to get out... and to find the little girl who has written to him while convalescing.After he recovers and is released, he sets out to find the little girl and her Mom, Elizabeth. Once he finally connects with them, they concoct a plan- along with the feline breeds and a couple new friends- to finish off the man who has been ruthlessly hunting down Elizabeth and her daughter.I think what bothered me most about the book was the name of the hero- Dash Sinclair. I guess that's a puny excuse for something pulling down a story for me, but it did. Just too cliched for me.The little girl in the story is precocious, per usual, but her story is intriguing enough. I hope someday Leigh will write her tale of love!I'm gonna give this one a 3.9 out of 5. A good enough addition to the Breed series, but not my favorite.
Rate the BOOK not the arguments!. It amazes me how many of the previous reviewers failed to review the quality of the book (translation, print, etc), but rather insisted on offering sophomoric critiques of Kant's arguments.  No one cares what YOU think about Kant.  If one day YOU make even a fraction of a contribution to the field of philosophy as Kant has, then and ONLY then, may your opinion be considered important to the discussion.  Any idiot can have an opinion.  It is the task of scholars to first UNDERSTAND.  Save the opinions of Kant's arguments for your dissertation.Now for my review:I gave 4 Stars mainly for what I felt were a few discrepancies or at least ambiguities when compared to the German text.  As for English translations, I personally prefer the translation by James Creed Meredith.  Nevertheless, it is always helpful to have several translations for comparison
If you buy one book in your whole life, buy this one. I read this book a few years ago. After I read it, the book went right around my office, about eight (yes, eight) of my colleagues read it.  I have given three copies to my friends and family as presents.  And when my niece is old enough to read then I will buy it for her.  This book will touch you like no other book you have EVER read in your life.  It will educate, inspire, motivate and uplift you.  It will make you cry and laugh out loud at the same time.  I don't want to give too much away but please buy it, buy it, buy it
Absolutely AWESOME!. Usually I write a review only if I dislike something about a book. I rarely bother to write good reviews, because every book gets so many of them. In this case, however, I have to make an exception. For any fan of hard science fiction, "Pushing Ice" is AWESOME! It's got everything: realistic characters, solid physics and astronomy, believable near-future society (circa 2050), glimpses of far future society (circa 20,000 A.D.), some REALLY far future, aliens which are somewhat comprehensible, aliens which are completely beyond comprehension, rivalry, broken friendships, betrayal, marooning in space (on multiple levels), struggle for survival, etc. Even asteroid mining and that perennial "stranded in space" trick - using electric motors as generators :
"The hurt ones were quiet; no one wept, much less screamed in pain...". When the atomic bomb dropped at 8:15 a.m. on August 6, 1945, Hiroshima was a thriving city of two hundred forty-five thousand people.  By 8:20, one hundred thousand of those people were dead.  Combining the broad perspective of the absolute devastation of the city with the tiniest details of six individual lives, John Hersey provides a powerful closeup of a few survivors of the atomic attack on Hiroshima, giving the carnage a human perspective.Focusing on  Mr. Tanimoto, a Methodist pastor; Mrs. Nakamura, the widow of a tailor, and her three children;  Dr. Masakazu Fujii, a physician in a private clinic; Fr. Wilhelm Kleinsorge, S. J, a priest in a Catholic mission; Dr. Terufumi Sasaki, a young surgeon at the Red Cross Hospital; and Toshiko Sasaki, a clerk in a tin works, as they survive the initial attack,  the author follows their daily movements, their subsequent illnesses, their fears, and the eventual outcomes of their lives.  The victims become human, and their concerns become universal, as Hersey shows them digging themselves out and helping their neighbors, filled with an "elated community spirit" in the days and weeks after the bombing.Details of the fires following the bombing, the unexpected radiation sickness, the mysteries surrounding the kind of bomb this was (some Japanese believed that the allies had sprinkled powdered magnesium over the city and then ignited it), the devastating rains that followed, and the monumental scale of the damage are presented in straightforward, factual style, the horrors of the reality so overwhelming that Hersey had no need to try to control his narrative by selecting details or ordering them for effect.Published in the New Yorker in August, 1946, this anniversary remembrance had immediate and dramatic repercussions, perhaps because the focus on "ordinary" Japanese citizens, much like the Americans who read the article, as opposed to "the enemy," resonated with his readers.  Thousands listened to four days of its reading on ABC radio, and many others bought the New Yorker to read his account.  By raising also the question of the ethics of dropping such a bomb (which some of the Japanese agree was acceptable as a normal part of the war), he also forces his readers to consider the long-term implications of atomic warfare.  Dramatic, powerful, and very personal, this account of six lives, changed forever, is a monument to the human spirit in the face of incredible adversity. n Mary Whipple
Outstanding Reference! Just About Perfect!. This 800-page classic reference, on a difficult and hugely multi-faceted subject, appears to cover just about every possible area in this huge category! Not only is it a stupendous browser, but one can practically read it from start to finish without getting too difficult or scientific, for an interested amateur like myself. And there are drawings, diagrams ,sketches covering children's art, illusions, on and on. Plus short bios of the greats (like Newton,Hegel,Rosseau, Sartre, Kant,,etc, etc),plus many lessor known ,but perhaps of equal distinction..Subjects like religion, magic, medicine, out of body experiences, hallucinations, are given active note, not to mention some less known, but still interesting subjects. So if you have a chance, pick this one up. It's also guaranteed to initiate an interest in lots of things you may know absolutely nothing about beforehand! Definitely one of those desert island books that will never go out of style!
Thank you Rachel Ray. Great book, I gave it to my grandaughter.  She loves it. Very easy to follow the recipes and real simple dishes to make.
Cool Kitchens. This book contains an excellent collection of photos of Arts & Crafts period kitchens.  It discusses the philosophy of design Gustav Stickley and others advocated and shows you the results, which are still beautiful, even after all these years.  It is a little short on detail, if you wanted to reproduce the look of the Arts & Crafts kitchen, but it does spark the imagination.  The examples of various kitchens is broken down by designer, so it is easy to pick out their specific design influence.  I found this book an inspiration for some of the designs I would like incorporate in my own home, and combined with some other books of design details, it is excellent
A Spanish teacher loves this book. Since I'm not a native speaker I had my class concentrate more on learning to read and translate Spanish. They pretty much liked this book. They were more interested in the stories about the two high school students Maria and Enrique than the history of the Spanish conquest or the story of Lazarillo de Tormes. The sections are short and accompanied by sets of questions to be answered as well as true false questions and even crossword puzzles. This book is very easy to read. The author uses mostly present tense and lots of cognates. My students were mostly 2nd year repeats and they were able to get through it
A great book. It's a highly informative and non-judgemental history of not only celibacy, but also sexuality in general throughout many different times and cultures. I loved the way Abbott managed to relate each form of celibacy to the social, religious, moral and economical circumstances in which it appeared - it gives the reader a broader understanding of societies and individuals who embraced or rejected celibacy.In addition to this, History of Celibacy is beautifully written, maybe more difficult but extremely pleasurable to read. (It's also good for learning new words, especially if you're a non-native english speaker. I wish I'd read this book before I took my GRE, it would've added at least 50 points to my verbal score
truly captures the life of the young ballplayer. Having played for Coach Gattis in college I thoroughly enjoyed reading this book.  Ten years may have mellowed the man some, but, I could feel the same intensity from the book that he brought to the field.  The book really  captures the essence of what it is to be a ballplayer that is a border-line  &quot;pro&quot;.  Or, as the title aptly states &quot;Good Enough to  Dream&quot;
Excellent coverage of the channel islands. From a recent sailing trip out of Santa Barbara through the channel islands I can tell you that this book is invaluable.  His treatment of safe ports and refuges (arranged very well but conditions) was fantastic and kept us out of danger
A tasty and authentic treat!. Assisted by historians at Harvard and Boston University and librarians at the National Archives and Library of Congress, this book is well-researched and visually rich. But it's also colorful and snappy, a testament to how lively history can be in the hands of someone who truly loves it. Beyer gives us 100 bite-size histories, tasty morsels that are curiously strong. My 11 year old son devoured several stories in one sitting; I consumed the book in one weekend. From events that changed nations...to inventions that changed the world, this collection is a joy, a real page-turner
Very Good Information. Back to basics with lots of good information.  Gives you a new look at how to eat correctly, stay full, and keep healthy
A wonderfully hopeful and uplifting story. By the time I had got to page 47 I was hooked!I found the language a little slower to read than normal, having to get used to the speech of the slaves being written as it sounded, but I actually got to quite like that.Harriet Beecher Stowe writes as if she's the narrator and I could almost see her at the side of the stage inviting us to see the next scene.As we follow the lives of Uncle Tom, Eliza and George, the many people they encounter and whose lives they touch, and whose lives touched them, I cried and I smiled and I felt very humble. This is a very moving book yet oddly without being sentimental and that is to the author's credit. She writes well and makes every character very real and their situations both heartwrenching yet uplifting. A book that not only gives a valuble insight into life at the time in 'Kentuck' and what it was like to be 'sold down the river'....but one that gave me a hope and uplifting that I'd like to stay with me for some time to come.
One of the best in a popular mystery series. This is one of my favorite Anna Pigeon novels.  She is a ranger in Guadeloupe Mountains National Park and comes across the body of a ranger who has apparently been killed by a cougar (hence the name of the book).  She is convinced that the lion has been wrongfully accused of murder, and this conviction grows stronger as more dead bodies appear.  Since an autopsy of the ranger shows that she was killed by the cougar, you know from the start that Barr has come up with an good setup for a murder mystery, with a novel choice of weapon.Ranger Anna Pigeon is an interesting character, with a backstory (she is a widow who escapes New York by becoming a ranger), a long-distance relationship with her psychiatrist sister (a plot device that serves well to reveal inner thoughts), and a vice (alcoholism).  She's cynical and worldly, but that is balanced by her love of nature and the parks.  She's also a bit of a superhero, especially at the end, and I don't find those parts too convincing.The book conveys a great sense of the setting.  Barr loves the desert parks, including the site of this novel, Guadeloupe Mountains (in West Texas).  This is a relatively unknown park, which includes the high point of Texas.  Ranger Pigeon spends a lot of time in the backcountry of the park and makes it sound inviting even though there are no water sources there.The book has a well-constructed plot though the ending lacks a full resolution.  As is generally true in this series, it's easier to make good guesses about whodunnit than it is to figure out the motive.  Some motives are so oddball, "out of the box," that I don't see how you could figure it out from the information given, and that's a violation of the mystery writers' code.  Barr *almost* commits that sin here.Overall, this is a good introduction to the series.  If you don't like this one, don't read any of the others.
My First Intro. This was my first delving into the wonderful world of Nietsche.  Very good and very interesting.  I've had a passing interest in Philosophy for a while and have gotten into it deeper the past few months and this is a good choice, I feel, for anyone just starting to delve into the philosophy game.
A Very Good Book - If You Know What You're In For. The cover of "The Company of Strangers" includes a review describing this book as "'Casablanca' seen through the eyes of John Le Carre".  I couldn't have said it better myself - Le Carre because there is next to no edge-of-your-seat suspense or Hollywood-ready action sequences;  'Casablanca' because this novel is first and foremost a romance, not an espionage or World War II story.  I can appreciate how the prior reviewers who were disappointed felt misled (the cover of the paperback itself strongly points to a straightforward World War II spy tale), but Wilson's writing ultimately makes this a worthwhile read once those misconceptions are set aside.The underlying story is that of a lifelong love affair between English and German spies that begins during World War II.  Of course as time goes on, the necessities of war and the divided loyalties lead to various tragic results.  This means that on some level, the book is truly guilty of being the old familiar boy-meets-girl/boy-loses-girl/boy-gets-girl-back story.  However, Wilson creates so much interest in the history, the locales and the lives of these people whose currency is secrets and disinformation that it nonetheless becomes compelling.The book is structured like a memoir of the lead character, British SIS agent Andrea Aspinall.  And it does cover her entire lifetime, well past World War II.  Because of this scope, it loses pace at times and could very well have been 100 pages shorter.One of the most satisfying themes of the book is how secrecy and deception beceome guiding principles of the characters' professional and personal lives, often with tragic repercussions.  There are secrets within families, between lovers, and especially between competing intelligence agencies.  Wilson certainly takes his time unraveling this tangled web, but the ending is more satisfying because of it.  There are times along the way where the sheer number of double-crosses heaped one on top of another makes it difficult to sort out the characters' motivations.  I seriously recommend keeping some notes on character names and allegiances and using it as a bookmark as you go along - it will help significantly.Wilson's writing is superb if also a little on the dense/verbose end of the spectrum.  His turns of phrase on the passion and heartbreak associated with the story are probably the biggest reason that the book sustains itself so well as a romance.So if you're looking for high-action James Bond-type stuff, move on.  If you're looking for another historical examination of the Axis versus the Allies, move on.  But if you're open to investigating the human aspects of the intelligence game and the nature of personal relationships during times of war, then this book is highly recommendable.
One would think... One would think that after writing five completely charming novels about the despair of three orphans, Lemony Snicket would have trouble writing another novel that lives up to the creativeness, randomness, and humor of it's predecessors.  One would be wrong.Snicket's writing is strong and hilarious as always-- it's the plot that makes this one sometimes drag.  While the story is mostly interesting, hearing about the Baudelaires climbing an endless flight of steps gets old after a while.  This is a small flaw in the story, and the rest of the novel is very strong.  It can be said that a writer who creates a character then readers hate and want to physically shake is a good writer, and this is what Snicket does when he creates the character of Esme, a new guardian of our favorite orphans, who only cares about things that are "in."This story has many literally strong points that the previous novels in this series do not, such as1. a red herring (a literal AND a figurative)2. a huge element of surprise3. heightened suspense4. this book gives you a lot of information on certain things, but also leaves you with more questions.  This technique is often done by J. K. Rowling, author of the Harry Potter series, and is a big reason for the series' success.  Readers will surely want to come back to have their questions answered, and with "The Ersatz Elevator," Mr. Snicket had undoubtedly secured a returning audience.If all of the above doesn't convince you to read this sixth volume in A Series of Unfortunate Events, know this: reading Snicket's fun and informative narration will improve your vocabulary!7/10
Good. Helped me become aware of what I can aim to work towards in listening.  A very good book.  I bought another book on listening at the same time as this (which too had good reviews);  this was BY FAR the better book.  This is a book that leaves you more interested in the subject and wanting to improve
Gorey's a scary guy... Even the most seemingly innocuous tale becomes bizarre and sinister in his hands, thanks to his macabre, claustrophobic writing style.  I don't remember which stories are in which amphigorey specifically, but favourites  include The Evil Garden, The Epileptic Bicycle, The Gashleycrumb (sp?)  Tinies, and of course the Wuggly Ump.  Oh, and the one where the guy  invites all his guests up to see his...sofa?  And then it ends with him  &quot;turning it on&quot; and them being locked in the room...shudder.  Not  for the faint of heart, but brilliant in the extreme.  Don't miss it
Amazing Stuff. This is a wonderful book! Inspiring to adults as well as children of all ages and even got me painting again! Peter Reynolds has done it again with another magical publication. I have bought copies of this book and given it to all my friends; no household should be without one
Wisdom from an authentic life. Sadly very few books and authors today can genuinely be called wise.  This is not the case with Mr. Michell nor his books, this collection in particular enchants, delights and educates based upon it's friendly approachable wisdom.  This is not a wisdom based upon intellectual fireworks or shallow wit, but rather a deep seated wisdom of a life lived with a questioning open mind for the wonders and paradox that surround us.We know we are in for an amazing tour de force when Michell reveals Plato and Charles Fort as his favorite philosophers.  A times the "Britishness" of some of the topics and characters may be meaningless to most Americans, that alas is our fault not his.  This is a traditionalism borne of earth based mythopoeic realities not Guenonian traditionalism of right wing fantasy.  Comparisons are often unfair, but the only other author that comes to mind with that same sense of authentic life wisdom in their work is P.L. Travers.Time spent with Mr. Michell is not only time well spent with a magnificent fun loving human being, but an opportunity for edification.  And how often is that possible in this vulgar day & age.
Ian Myles Slater on: The Way of War and Peace. As discreetly acknowledged on the back cover, this book was originally published in hardcover as "The Tao of Peace." That edition, published by Shambhala, clearly identified itself on its cover as a translation of a work by the T'ang Dynasty general Wang Chen (about 800 C.E.), a product of one of the classical periods of Chinese history. The Westview Press version is a little harder to recognize for what it is.In both versions, it is in fact a translation, with an introduction and commentary by the translators, of "Tao-te-Ching lun-ping yao-yi-shu," one of the more unusual of the many surviving Chinese commentaries on the "Tao Te Ching" or "Lao-Tzu." ("Daodejing" and "Laozi" in the current Pinyin transliteration; the Sawyers continue to use the familiar Wade-Giles system.)  The "5000-character Classic" (as it is also known, and as Wang Chen sometimes cites it)  was of exceptional importance to the T'ang; the supposed author was officially an ancestor of the dynasty, the Chinese roots of which were often questioned.The Westview edition has been repackaged, slightly revised in references to the title, and expanded by a section of "Further Reading" which is in effect a catalogue of the translators' other books on Chinese military thought for Westview, rather than for study of the "Tao-Te-Ching." (For some suggestions, see below.)Ralph D. Sawyer explains in the Preface that they have also provided a translation of the "Tao-Te-Ching" itself, which uses Wang Chen's apparent readings and parsing of the text, and so differs from the many earlier translations, and from the Sawyers' own understanding of the book. Each of the eighty-one chapters consists of a passage of the Lao-Tzu, Wang Chen's explanation of its application, and the translators' explication of its (mainly military and political) context and significance.The two alternative titles of the translation reflect the thrust of Wang Chen's commentary equally well, although the choice seems to reflect the markets served by the two publishers. As is the case with many Shambhala publications, the volume is rather thin on references, although Sawyer's Preface does mention some important translations of the "Tao Te Ching." Since he explains that the book is directed at ordinary readers, he might have expanded some of these brief comments in the Preface -- the ordinary reader may not be familiar with, say, the difference between the Ho Shang Kung and Wang Pi texts of Lao-Tzu, which he mentions in passing. (These are two early commentaries, whose approaches and textual readings mark the religious and philosophical approaches to the book; the received "Wang Pi" *text* of Lao-tzu, by the way, seems not to correspond completely to the one implied in his commentary! For relevant bibliography, see below.)Wang Chen and his "commentary" are the main focus of the book. The Sawyers attempt to show how the general connects his views to a book usually treated from religious and philosophical perspectives. The question of whether Wang Chen is correctly interpreting his canonical text is, of course, of no great concern. The commentary is a common form for expressing original ideas in many cultures with strong text-based traditions, Hebrew and Sanskrit, for example, as well as Chinese. This commentary is an attempt to find a consistent basis for humane and effective government. It was intended to replace the T'ang tendency for random shifting between ruthless interventionism and quietist failure to govern. Whether this instability in policy was a cause of the dynasty's difficulties, or a dangerous symptom, is another matter. Having a contemporary analysis of the dynasty's problems is only part of the book's considerable interest.The secondary literature on the Taoist classic is very large, and the number of translations continues to grow. The Sawyers' work offers an unexpected reading, and does not require a wider knowledge of the base text to be appreciated on its own terms.Those seriously interested in the textual problems of the "Tao-Te-Ching" can now consult the recent technical edition and translation by Rudolf G. Wagner, "A Chinese Reading of the Daodejing: Wang Bi's Commentary on the Laozi with Critical Text and Translation" (2003). Together with Wagner's "The Craft of a Chinese Commentator: Wang Bi on the Laozi" (2000), and "Language, Ontology, and Political Philosophy in China: Wang Bi's Scholarly Exploration of the Dark (Xuanxue)" (2003) it was published in the State University of New York (SUNY) Press "Chinese Philosophy and Culture" series. They are significantly more difficult than "The Tao of War," or almost any of the readily available translations of Lao-tzu.SUNY had also published Alan K. L. Chan's "Two Visions of the Way: A Study of the Wang Pi and the Ho-shang Kung Commentaries on the Lao-Tzu," in its older "Series in Chinese Philosophy" (1991), which, although slightly antiquated, offers a fascinating comparison of two of the earliest of the competing philosophical, political, and religious interpretations, to which Wang Chen was adding
fond memories. This was one of my childhood favorites, along with _The Science Book_ by the same author.  This is the only nonfiction book that I remember with fondness from elementary school.  I read it front to back, although I never tried any of the suggested activities/experiments
Thoughtful and Important. I have to admit that my understanding of this philosophical text by Wittgenstein minimal at best. The book is small and is broken down into short, declarative investigations of the boundaries of human knowledge, presented in terms of logic, and often symbolic language. The mathematical formulas and explanations are extremely complicated and I'm sure more background in this area is needed to really grasp the material. However, there is enough in here that's both cogent and profoundly imaginative to keep casual readers hooked (if they're patient). This is considered one of the most important works of philosophy in the 20th century despite Wittgenstein's closed-door conclusions. I'll leave you with the most imortant line in the book; a finding of genius, or a pretentious cop-out? You decide:"What we cannot speak about we must pass over in silence."
It would have been great... if my wife would have read it or received it with an open mind.
A Great Book about a Great Civilization during the Middle Ages. Henry Adams' MONT SAINT MICHEL AND CHARTRES (MSMC) is simply a great book.  Adams' lucid writing style  and his insights are impressive, and this book should be read by every supposedly "educated" individual.  Adams deals with complex topics such as Gothic Architecture, Medieval poetry and mysticsim, and Scholastic Philosophy with clarity and ease.The early sections of MSMC compare the church of Mont Saint Michel with the Catholic view of St. Michel who was militant and was the perfect example of the Medieval hero defending the Catholic Church against all enemies.  The comparison with this church with that of Chartres which was the examplar of God's mercy via St. Mary is insighful and facinating reading.Such embellishment of St. Mary or Notre Dame(Our Lady)is further investigated in Adams book by Adams' careful treatment of Medieval Poetry.  Adams's translations of Medieval French and Latin are good and give those who are not familiar with these languages a better understanding of both the poetry and the Medieval devotion to St. Mary.Much of this peotry was mystical, and Adams demonstrates the attempt of St. Francis and the Franciscans to use such mystical thought in their missionary efforts to help the very poor.  St. Francis' mysticism is revealed in Adams' translation of St. Francis' poem titled BROTHER SUN AND SISTER MOON.Henry Adams then compares and contrasts Medieveal mysticism, which bordered on Pantheism, with Scholastic Philosophy.  Adams gives the reader an insight to scholastic debate when he summarizes the debate between William of Champaux and Peter Abelard(1079-1142).  Here Adams demonstrates his understanding of how students and masters argued and learned.  He also shows the careful balence the Catholic authorities tried to impose between reasoned debate and heresy.The last section of the book deals with the Angelic Doctor, St. Thomas Aquinas (1225-1274).  Adams careful treatment of Aquinas' thought is worth the price of the book.  Adams gives the Angelic Doctor high praise for both his clear thinking and liberality.  Adams also effectively deals with the liberality of the Medieval Catholic authorities who canonized so many men whose views were apparently contradcitory.Henry Adams' MONT SAINT MICHEL AND CHARTRES is intellectual history at its best.  The book deals with complex ideas and views in an attractive literary style which holds the readers' interest.  This reviewer has read this book numerous times since he first read it in 1968 and has never found the book to be boring.  Readers should also read Thomas Woods HOW THE CATHOLIC CHURCH BUILT WESTERN CIVILIZATION and compare Woods sections on the High Middle Ages with Adams' book
The Very Best Of Sunset. I truly love these annuals, and it shows. Every one of my Sunset Annuals is spattered and bookmarked, because I use them so often.These are well bound, highly colorful editions, filled with the years collection of Sunset recipes. They are catalogued by ingredients ( vegetables, fruits,beef etc) as well as by category, so looking up a recipe is easy.The Biga Bread recipe is worth the price alone. Everything is well laid out, with lots of helpful hints to ensure success, whether you're baking a cake, or creating an exotic Asian dish.What I appreciate most about Sunset, is all their recipes are tested in their own kitchens, to make sure the average home user can recreate them easily. It gives you that extra bit of confidence when trying something new.If you want a durable, practical and highly usable cookbook, I recommend giving the Sunset Annuals a try
Music For the Theatre... The Broadway theater was in a decline in the Thirties due to the Depression, and there were not big standouts, but many movie stars learned their trade during this decade on Broadway. His title, 'Sing For Your Supper' written by Rodgers and Hart came from a minor show, 'The Boys from Syracuse' which ran for 235 performances; the hit of the show was 'Falling in Love With Love.'Porky and Bess was the biggest thing to come out of musical theater during that time (1935), though no memorable songs -- it was a black musical. However, it was the first American-made show to be recorded during its original run (four days after the opening) by the nation's main classical-record label, Victor Red Seal by RCA Victor. This was not an original cast recording but used Metropolitan Opera singers for the album.In the photo section, there are two from this musical, five from 'Jubilee' and one from 'The Band Wagon.' Some of the stars of the Thirties Broadway musicals included Fred Astaire, Ginger Rogers, Ethel Merman, Sophie Tucker, Jimmy Durante, and Gene Kelly as one of five 'chorus boys' in 'Leave It to Me.'In the musicals such big bands as Glenn Miller, Jimmy Dorsey, Benny Goodman, and Gene Krupa were in the pit. Memorable songs to make a lasting impression were 'But Not For Me,' which came from Gershwin's score of 'Girl Crazy'; 'Will You Remember Me?' from 'Knickerbocker's Holiday' (Michael Feinstein has a marvelous version on one of his CDs); 'I Can Dream, Can't I?' and 'I'll Be Seeing You' from 'Right This Way' (1938); and 'It's De-Lovely' by Cole Porter in 'Red, Hot and Blue!'
The Gift. I would rank this book in the 10 most important I have read. His study of Gift giving throughout history and with different cultures changed my entire view of how we give and receive gifts
A moving first novel. Sturgeon was always very much a humane writer. This shows in this, his first novel. Even thought it's not listed as a "juvenile," it pretty much comes across as one. The hero is a little boy with abusive step-parents. He even gets his hand maimed. He ends up on the streets, where he joins a carnival with a circus sideshow. Toss in two Jewels from Space, with an intelligence that can't be understood by humans, and now Sturgeon's Dickensesque novel turns into science fiction. Not perfect by any means, but it's always been my favorite Sturgeon novel
An Imaginative Adventure Through Time. Doc Dollitle is a very good book it has a total adventure backlot.  I love his animals this story goes beyond the movie to further great adventures like what happens after he goes into the pink gient snail.  I loved this book and I'm sure you will too.  I recamend it for children eight and older to read.  I read it in the sixth grade.  Check out other great books like the BFG and a seperate peace
Must have for a good complete verterinarian. If you can only have one Internal Medicine book in your library this is it.  Very little not found in this book...Authors have made a great effort to be complete and it is well edited.  All other Internal Medicine books are superficial, but if you want to know the theory, current treatment/diagnosis, and current research possibilities buy this...it is great
The most profound book I've ever read. This book blew me away. Tolstoy explains the cause of conflicts between divergent theories of life, the intrinsic hypocrisy of life in modern society, the futility of force-based solutions, and the nature of man's search for personal truth. He proposes a radical change in social order based on Christ's Sermon on the Mount.Most people recommend you read the last chapter first, but I plowed right through the tedious beginning and found it relevant to my thoughts at the time.Perhaps I discovered this book at exactly the right time in my life, but my life will never be the same. I recommend this book to anyone who is seeking higher truth outside of organized religion or trying to reconcile science and religion.
a treasure. For me, "A Child's Christmas in Wales" is the single most beautiful piece of Christmas literature in the English language.And once you hear the author himself reading it, you will be forever enchanted. Dylan Thomas' deep humanity is expressed in every word, and in the spaces between them, in this masterpiece.D
I was surprised. This book was rather good.  I actually found some things local to me and I live in the middle of no where.  I liked this book.  Covered a lot of areas of the U.S. and was pretty well written.  I enjoyed this book
A must have for any Cthulhu Mythos lover. This book is a must have. As soon as I saw it on the shelf I knew it had to be good. It's perfect, no other book of it's kind save for the one creature stat book for the old Call of Cthulhu game. You won't be disapointed
Poor Customer Service. Absorbing book!My concern is the very poor customer service of Amazon.com. So far I have been unable to reach anyone at Amazon.com, so will use any venue I can to express my disappointment. I tell everyone I meet about Amazon.com's poor customer service and suggest they shop elsewhere.
me talk pretty one day... this is my first time reading sedaris... i'm about 3/4 of the way through the book now... and i have to say, this guy is funny. i was up reading this book late into the night, curled up on the sofa beneath a lamp, rocking back and forth, biting my lip, weeping tears of merriment, trying to stifle my laughter so as not to wake the neighbors.many of the essays are mildly amusing, some leave you wearing an involuntary grin, but when he catches you off guard with an unexpected turn of phrase, the result is devastating hilarity, and you are left with watery eyes, aching sides, and a bubble of snot on your nose... or at least i was.
Memory lane. EllynAnne Geisel's book, "Apron Chronicles" evoked all the scents and comforts of my 60's childhood, a time before microwave meals and premixed desserts. As I read through each story, I mentally returned to the home of my youth and happily basked in a time that was simpler, loving, and warm.  Each storyteller, as realisticly captured by photographer Kristina Loggia, looks like they paused long enough in their daily activities to recall and reflect on a simple piece of their past, and then returned to their tasks at hand.  I felt as if I had stopped by their homes for a short visit and was warmly welcomed much like an old acquaintance ...  perhaps it was the innate hospitality of the aprons. This is a book to peruse slowly much as you would Geisel's exhibit.  To hurry through would be to shortchange the nostalgic experience
Ann Martin's Inside Out - before Babysitters Club. I came across The Baby-Sitters Club #32 - The secret of Susan. That book is about a neighborhood girl with autism who goes to a special school. The author of that series, Ann Martin, mentioned at the back of the book that she had some personal experience with autistic kids and this is how she was able to discuss the topic in a book. It was also noted that before she created The Baby-Sitters Club series she wrote an earlier book entitled, Inside Out, also on the subject of a child with autism.Inside Out is written in the third person via an eleven-year old boy named Jonathan. He has a younger brother, James who at four years of age has autism and keeps the family up nightly with his screaming. Lizzie is the other sibling at eight years of age. There are nineteen chapters covering 152 pages for young readers and those adults interested in learning how autism affects an older sibling along with his friends on a daily basis. Comparing the two books by this same author I felt more connected with the characters in Inside Out. I preferred the writing style and felt it was an easier read.I was interested in the activities Jonathan and his friends pursued, the relationships between siblings and parents and how everyone handled their stress. It was very enlightening as a parent to boys to learn about behaviors and coping mechanisms, things I can relate to more than the other book centering on girls who offer babysitting services.A shopping trip with James was a nightmare and they tried to have someone home watching him so no one had to endure a scene. Once when Jonathan came home from school his Mother was crying after such a trip.There are conversations between Lizzie and Jonathan about their parents and they assume that their Dad works late so he can avoid James. They clean the house and prepare dinner often so their Mom can take a nap after a rough night being up with James. They always talk about James in front of him as if he were not there. There are times that James acts like a wild animal and scares the family.Inside Out shows the compassion for another sibling and the bonds that are formed when the family takes part in the therapies and schooling of the special child. This offers a glimpse into the family dynamics with an autistic child. The characters were developed and realistic. I felt happy reading about Jonathan and his growing devotion toward James.
I'm convinced. I'm convinced, but then I usually am! I read Graham Hancocks book Fingerprints of the Gods and was convinced as well! This book basically bashes Hanccock and similiar authors. Its always intresting to read another viewpoint. SOmething I enjoyed reading was the time Picket spent researching the people behind the ancient anscestors movement. There are thousands of books with this theme out there to choose from but I found this one to be especially intresting. It kind of goes against the grain. I had the updated version which explained why the world didn;t "end" at 2000 so that helped some of the natural sceptesicim that you may expirience! Would I recomend this book to my friends? Yes. It is entertaining and that is my main goal in reading any book.In addiiton you learn some intresting estoric history.
Is everybody happy?. The real job of the anthologist is not, of course, to assemble anthologies but to anger and annoy readers. Only census takers have more doors slammed in their innocent faces. That said, a few words in defense of this  excellent volume. Yes, there's plenty of second-tier or third-tier verse  here, and those in search of pure poetry (no rocks, no soda, shaken not  stirred) should probably save their pennies and buy the LOA volumes devoted  to Frost, Stevens, etc etc. But a book like this one does give a splendid  sense of cultural context. Sometimes the giants loom only larger when  they're stuck in a line-up with their diminutive peers. And some of those  lesser lights are actually quite talented, too. So unless you're truly  fixated on iambic quality control, you should find much to love, and even  more to like, in the capacious and paper-thin pages of APTTCV1
Excellent introduction to ray tracing. &quot;An Introduction to Ray Tracing&quot; is an excellent nuts and bolts summary of the science and practice of ray tracing. Easy to read source code examples are included, providing the programming-oriented reader with a good start on writing their own ray tracer. Glassner's easy to read style will also appeal to the less code-savvy. The book is useful in a classroom environment or self-directed stud
Leadership rules in a turbulent world. A worthwhile book on survival through good leadership
Examines Jewish Humor from every Angle. This is a very interesting and humorous book. Most of the greats that I am familiar with are represented here so you get a truly all encompassing across the board variety of wit. It takes sources of from the written word, plays, film, stand up comics, word of mouth jokes through various periods of history. It's all here or at least what can be held in one gigantic volume. A must have.
Harvey MacKay Writes Yet Another Terrific Book. Buy &quot;Pushing The Envelope&quot; today.  It is a great boo
Ah, old people... Just when you think your your spry old neighbor is the father you never had, he gets drunk and turns your cat into a zombie...Some people (Stephen King, for example) claim that Stephen King isn't exactly deep. Like many stories about the living dead, there's actually more going on than just moaning for brains -- not that I have a problem with moaning for brains, which is often the makings of great entertainment.The book gets on the borderline between human being and monster and just hangs out there, working it over and looking at it and poking at it until it barely makes sense and you're left wondering if you could even tell the difference anymore. THAT is scary. Pay attention to what he says about what Zelda became, and what the living and the dead might become -- how they feast on the living, if you will.My criticism is... If you set out to exume a body, refill the grave, and bury it again after midnight during daylight savings time, you won't finish before dawn, let alone have time for a quick nap. I don't care what the Wendigo whispered in your ear. I didn't see him holding a shovel
Love it!. Finally an organizing book that focuses on the real 'how to' of getting your home organized.  I have other books on this subject but, this is my favorite.  It makes it do-able room by room
"Druker thougths will live on for many decades to come". Management new paradigms, strategy, the change leader, information challenges, knowledge worker productivity, managing oneself, Druker proved himself more than capable in his definitions and unique challenge to managers. Rather of a retrospective of his past work "he set aside to wirte not the known past but the unknown future".Peter Drucker discusses the profound social and economic changes occurring today and considers how management--not government or free markets--should address these new realities in the workplace. "Management is Business Management in all kind of organizations". This book is easy to read. For most content may be wider than how we think management usually is. Druker wrote in his introduction " the advice in this book requires a reversal of what most people have thought about management for more than a century". Peter Drucker discusses how the new paradigms of management have change and will continue to change our basics assumptions and principles of management
AHEAD OF IT'S TIME. I SAW THE MOVIE A LONG TIME AGO WHEN I WAS A LITTLE GIRL, I READ THE BOOK 2 YEARS AGO AND IT WAS NOTHING LIKE THE MOVIE THE BOOK, WAS SO MUCH BETTER. I MEAN, I REALLY CAN'T EXPLAIN IT, BUT DANM, IT WAS GOOD. THIS IS A MUST READ, IT IS SO UNBELIEVEABLE, THE END OF IT WILL HAVE YOUR MOUTH DROPED WIDE OPEN (REALLY).IT IS DEFINATLY IN MY TOP 5
A Fabulous Friendship!. I came across this gentle book while shopping for gifts for my daughter's 6th birthday.  This is a book about friendship and that is a very important subject to kindergarteners.  I felt the author approached the subject in a beautiful and touching way, showing how friendship can endure through the many changes that life will bring.  I can't wait to read the book to my daughter.  I plan on buying more copies to give to my friends, too
Another Hit !!. I got this for my son when he was 1, the book is read nearly every nightwith Barnyard Dance. Needless to say it is about to fall apart. He will say each page right along with me. When you get to the end he points to each animal and makes their sounds.These books are very durable too. This book goes on all road trips and airplane flights.
Invisible yes, but not unreachable !. Phillip Yancey has become one of my favourite authors. This is because he is not afraid to ask tough questions, does not always provide answers, and is very open about his own upbringing, freely sharing his own struggles and deficiencies.In this book, he searches far and wide and suggests many things I had not considered before. God as artist ? ... God as lover ? ... and many more pictures that my own conservative upbringing never allowed. Well done Mr. Yancey !I look forward to my next read, a followup to this book.... and I heartily recommed any of Phillip's books, yes
Yes: Stevens and Ashbery. Yes, Graham's The Errancy is in the spirit of Stevens and Ashbery--perhaps even inheriting their spirits--and what's wrong with that?  This is my favorite book from a poet who has transformed American poetry--like Ashbery and Stevens before him--and has become in my mind the single greatest poet in the English language.  The book is a chore and a treat--I recommend it very highly
women  that are  abused. I was aware that woman are abused but not to the extent that this bookenlightned me.  It is a very real problem in todays world and should be addressed.  I can understand why Oprah picked this  for her book club
A Beautiful Story. I'm not sure how I missed this short novel (146 pages in the hardback edition) when it was published in 1984. I've never read a better story about a gay teenager. The narrator is Billy Connors, a sophomore in high school in the Bronx. He volunteers to work in the Eugene McCarthy presidential campaign because (1) he does not want to go to Vietnam and McCarthy was the peace candidate and (2) he has a crush on Al, the college student in charge of the local volunteer office. The novel is set in 1968 around the time when Robert Kennedy was killed, a horrible time in our nation's history. Though small in size, this novel-- novella, long short story, whatever-- will knock you off your feet. (I read it straight through.) Billy is a fantastic character, grappling with all the craziness associated with being a teenager as well as dealing-- very well-- with his emerging feelings for other boys. THE BOYS ON THE ROCK ought to be required reading in high school for all students, both straight and gay.No lesser writers than Edmund White, Richard Price and Russell Banks praised this book. Mr. Banks' prophecy has come true when he predicted that this novel "may well turn out to be a classic."Sadly, this novel will have to be Mr. Fox's TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD since he is deceased, having been stricken down in the first wave of AIDS cases.
Historically exciting, intriquing and romantic. I've read reviews regarding the follow-up to 'Princess of Fire', 'Knight of Fire' and was disappointed to find that many readers considered 'Knight of Fire' 'boring' and 'unexciting'.  However, 'Princess of Fire' opens with  a fierce battle later called the Battle of Hastings and the inevitable  capture of the king's daughter, Princess Fallon.  Hence begins the attempt  to bend or break the strong willed courageous princess, however,  sparks  flew between the then Lady Fallon and Count Alaric long before the Battle  of Hastings.  Shannon Drake/Heather Graham remains true to her nature in  capturing your attention with an exciting and gut wrenching opening and  then later leads you through a someone mediocre history of the hero and  heroine's entwined lives that eventually catapults at the Battle of  Hastings.  The heroine is considered to be so courageous and determined to  avenge her father's death,  rid her beloved country of the invading Normans  and restore the crown to an English head, that she is actually considered a  serious threat to William the Conqueror.  But alas, in the end, England is  ruled by the Norman conqueror and the princess is ruled by the conqueror of  her heart.  In all, I've rated this particular Shannon Drake novel a 'four  star'.  Particularly since this is one Shannon Drake novel that I would  actually purchase, especially after being disppointed with other Drake  novels
Good, could be better. "The Village That Vanished" is a story about the people of an African village who work together to avoid slavers that are coming their way, showing how faith and perserverence are rewarded.  The story is set among the "Yao" people but no information is given as to who the Yao people are or where they live or whether this is a story told in Africa.  The story seems to be set in East Africa (the slavers appear to be Arab, not European).  Some background information would be very useful.  The illustrations are excellent
The Usborne Book of World History. What a facinating book! The layout of this book is reader friendly for all ages (7-69 years old at our house)and levels of interest (casual learner to history buff). It's a great book to use as a reference for history or just to read. You can't go wrong with this book
Great book. A fantastic book, pure delight. Perfect from the first page to the last: consistent quality. A book one cannot leave aside
lacuna. I did not read all of the above reviews, but I agreed with most of what I did read and found the book to be cogent and satisfying in its arguments, if incomplete. Pretty dreadful story he tells; difficult to apportion blame, or to fashion a realistic solution. The only consolation I found (after walking around for a few days in a comatose-like state trying to digest all these frigthening observations) was that these 'doom-n-gloomers' are usually wrong. But like the boy who cried 'wolf,' maybe this time there really is something to worry about. Hard to know.Criticism: Prestowitz might have spent a bit more time on the corollary topic of immigration and labor. On p 206 for example he suggests employment in a 'non-outsourceable' type of trade: "Plumber, nurse, electrician . . ." This is an perfectly offhand, shallow and unrealistic appraisal of the changes in the US labor market. For the same reasons that Chinese manufacturing, or Indian services are 'good' for consumers, so too are the pitifully low labor rates for immigrant labor, and each new wave underbids the last. Now technically this is not 'outsourcing,' but the result is exactly the same. As manufacturing and service jobs vanish overseas, the cost of unskilled (and skilled) labor at home is being driven straight into the ground; the middle-class and the lower middle-class are being crushed.  As a good American, I would never wish to be associated with those who would deny an immigrant the opportunity for self-betterment. Nor in my wildest dreams would I have imagined myself on the side of protectionism.I wish that Prestowitz had spent a bit more time on this topic, as it is an issue which is obviously better suited for greater minds than mine.By the way, in case you missed my point: "--these are jobs that will remain safe." (p 206) Don't believe it.
Great, easy to read book on the history of New Netherland. This book is very easy to read, almost like a novel, yet, it contains highly detailed description of events that take place in 1602-1673.Book contains several maps, graphs, and charts to visually aid the reader.The major themes of the book are:- The West India Company- Territorial Commitment Establishment, 1623-1628- Anglo-Dutch Rivalry and Abandonment of the Company Monopoly- The People of New Netherland- New Netherland and the Amsterdam Merchants- Triumphs and Tragedies: New Netherland's Last Years.This is an excellent source of information for someone who wants to learn more about Dutch colonization of North America in the seventeenth century
What a guy, what a book. Bill is a true moderate, the kind who get to chat with our Dear Leader, who is well known for fielding tough questions from those not numbering among his cheerleaders. This proves he's a moderate, right?And, say what you will, Bill's done a great job of making his church-going followers forget about his sexual harassment of his secretary that cost him well into the six figures to make go away.Rush takes first place though, for cheerleading the drug 'war' while being an addict himself.If being able to hold contradicting thoughts in one's mind is a sign of intelligence, their fans are geniuses.If you love Bill, you'll love his book
A must-have book. The following book review was published in Horse & Rider magazine, November 2004.Title: Howell Equine Handbook of Tendon & Ligament InjuriesAuthor: Linda B. Schultz, DVM, PhDReviewed by: Karen E.N. Hayes, DVM, MSIf you find vet speak about tendon and ligament injuries to be clear as mud, this book is a must-have. In addition to being thorough, accurate, and concise, it's written in layman's language without being "dumbed down"-it's targeted for the well-informed, interested, and intelligent horse owner.Perhaps most importantly, if you read this book you'll understand not only how to partner with your veterinarian in treating tendon and ligament injuries that might afflict your horse, but also how to help your horse avoid these potentially career-ending mishaps by using proper warm-ups and conditioning, being mindful of the impact of various footings, and understanding how shoeing can support or threaten tendons and ligaments.Although the bulk of the book is aimed at explaining the various therapies, from cold-water "hydrotherapy" to surgery to alternative treatments, you'll come away with enough knowledge to carry on a spirited conversation with an equine orthopedics specialist without even breaking a sweat. This could come in handy if you're ever in a situation where two or three vets disagree on the best treatment for your horse's injury (and believe me, that's a common scenario).It's a surprisingly easy read, and the photographs and drawings really help to clarify this vital subject that usually causes even the staunchest horseman to get glassy-eyed.You won't find this caliber of information in most general horse-care books, and unless your horse never carries anything heavier than cowbirds on his back, its information you really can't afford to miss
From the Back Cover. The political and religious fervor among Muslims, symbolized by the Iranian Revolution, gives us an often perplexing picture of the politics of the Muslim world. What are the political beliefs of Muslims? What is meant by an "Islamic state"? Hamid Enayat answers these questions by interpreting and illuminating the major Islamic political ideas from Iran, Egypt, Lebanon, Syria, Iraq, Pakistan and India
Great expectations. As a future teacher of yoga I found idea of such book absolutely incredible.  I even had in mind of writing something like that myself.  Models are great in this book.  But, I wish it is organized more differently, in a way that each asana shows muscle involvement regarding to its intensity and role (agonist, antagonist, isometric support, and so on).  That way I would find the book extremely useful, as it would help me target my exercises with greater efficiency.
A lovely Christmas tale with an Australian flavour. Wombat Divine is an Australian Classic and in my opinion one of Mem Fox's best.   My family now own hundreds of childrens' picture books, but this was the first one I ever bought my son.  It still remains a firm favourite with us.  The illustrations are delightful, as is the story.  It's a must have for the Christmas book collection - something a little different and makes a great gift.  You can't help but fall in love with Wombat
Rodale's Illustrated Encyclopedia of Herbs. Book arrived in just a few days and in very good shape. Most pleased with the service
Excellent for the intermediate/advanced producer. This book cuts right to the heart of techniques that you can build off of to form your own tricks and styles. It really helps to reveal the added capabilities you can get out of your existing sequencer and FX along with inspiring some discovery
Raising children in an uncivilized world. Discipline teaches our children right from wrong and to care about doing right, to think of others before themselves. Too bad we can't raise the current generation of adults all over again. Hopefully today's parents, with the help of this book, will do better
Danged good. JorG, the little green alien, not only knows the contractor who built the danged universe, as the reader finds out in Cottondale Confirmation, oh-hellum yep, the Stubian green can tell a mean tune when he hears one. But now his interstellar beeper seems keen to keep him from one wedding he must attend. What a disaster.Eugen M. Bacon,Amazon Shorts Author, The Hybrid
Another great installment in the In Death series. Lt. Eve Dallas is catching killers once again in this installment of the In Death series.The story is great, with two identical murders of father and son body sculpters. It's up to Lt. Dallas - along with her amusing cop sidekicks and, of course, her hot husband, Roark, to find out whodunit. The book starts off great, but toward the end, begins to drag with so many details about cloning, illegal experiements and politics. The ending is a bit over-the-top (not giving away any details, kids) and so unrealistic that it took me a while to get through it - an unusual occurance for me. Still, this is a well-written read and certainly worth a turn of page
classic. Olga: I have the 1962 version and it's been back and forth to Italy with me numerous times. It's the clearest most brief summary i have seen.  The short 100 page small format book is a natural for those who like to pack light. Take it on the plane and refresh your memory on major verbs, key tenses, agreement patterns, whatever you need to review. Would work equally well as a reference of essential grammar for beginners working with other learning materials
Best reference on seed starting. This is a great reference book for gardeners who are interested in starting plants from seed rather than buying the same old stuff from their local garden centers each year. This best thing about this book is that it rates each plant on its degree of difficulty when it comes to growing that plant from seed. Unlike the seed catalogs which imply that all plants are easy to grow from seed, this book breaks it down into detailed instructions as to how to get the seeds to germinate and what conditions they require once germination takes place. It is a great reference when browsing through the seed catalogs as to which plants are worth trying to start from seed and those whose needs may be way too much time, money or environmentally demanding to even bother with
Junie is Awesome!!. Junie B. is definitely #1 for kid's books regardless of the one you pick! My daughter & I love reading these books & laughing together! We haven't actually read this book yet but I am sure this one will be no different - We have them all!!
One of the best books on this subject for kids of any age. I have a fairly sizeable collection of Titanic books, but until now I had nothing written and illustrated specifically for children. Ken Marschall is a consummate illustrator and his artwork in this book is stunning. One of the important things is that the story is about two real children - one in first class; one in steerage - who were actually on the Titanic. While, even for kids, there can be no happy ending to this story, the book follows the main characters' lives past the sinking and rescue, into adulthood, and till their deaths. The story is written with low-key emotion, and is more factual than overwhelmingly sad. The story of the Titanic is almost 100 years old but the lessons we learn from it today are as important as those learned back in 1912. It's an important true story, well worth purchasing to read with your kids
Best crime fiction of the year. Ghost in the Rainbow is a compulsive read. I couldn't put it down. Because of my own battles with alcoholism and substance abuse, the path the heroine takes touched me deeply and even helped me to confront some of my own demons. That I should be so spiritually and psychologically helped by a book of crime fiction illiustrates how deeply real is Ms. Woodruff's understanding of life.  After the vapid musings of many of the current bestsellers, Ghost in the Rainbow explores the extremes of human emotion with courage, humor and the rare sensibility of a Native American worldview. Without a doubt, one of the best novels of the year
true stories that you just have to finish. This is an objective look at some of the biggest mysteries in the horse world. Unlike many writers, the author doesn't slant for or against...he puts the facts there. What do you believe? Is Shergar alive? Was Pharlap the victim of a tragic error? Mysteries, history and horses in one book. Worth the time to read.
There are reasons this is a classic. I read this brilliant, disturbing novel twenty five years ago when I was in high school and liked it very much. I liked it even more this time. Lawrence captures the human experience with unparalleled fidelity and uncommon audacity. That which was shocking when he wrote it today is simply piercing and perceptive, and the book is gripping, fascinating, horrifying and finally, sadly, true.The movie is one of the best adaptations of a novel I know of, but still does not come close to the book itself. Very much worth reading at least once.Literature at its best and most compelling
Best cookbook/nutrition reference ever!. A comprehensive listing of super foods, their selection, storage, and preparation methods that include the best ways to preserve nutrients. I'm now hooked on crimini mushrooms, didn't know they could be so yummy! Plus it's easy to learn about and try new foods that some of us weren't necessarily raised on. A must-have for people interested in good nutrition
me talk pretty one day... this is my first time reading sedaris... i'm about 3/4 of the way through the book now... and i have to say, this guy is funny. i was up reading this book late into the night, curled up on the sofa beneath a lamp, rocking back and forth, biting my lip, weeping tears of merriment, trying to stifle my laughter so as not to wake the neighbors.many of the essays are mildly amusing, some leave you wearing an involuntary grin, but when he catches you off guard with an unexpected turn of phrase, the result is devastating hilarity, and you are left with watery eyes, aching sides, and a bubble of snot on your nose... or at least i was.
Convoluted and shades of Stephen King!. What a villain this book contains.  It starts a bit slow, but builds to crescendo.  You won't want to put it down until you've finished.  Be aware, there's lots of weird sex info in this book, but it's part of the story that makes it all the more obsessive.  This is the third book by Greg Iles that I've read and I've really enjoyed every one of them.  Like Stephen King, he has a bit of a twisted mind in story telling, which I just love.  The villain in this book seems so demonic as to be other-worldly.  Pick it up, you'll enjoy the trip
I thought this would be disappointing, I was wrong! Its rather nice. I wasn't that impressed with the idea behind this book, fashion as such doesn't really interest me, or only in a historical sense anyway. What has always had me wondering is why on Earth the French seem to have so much style and verve - seem to be the very heart of it both historically and in modern day - even the terms for the most stylish of wear haute couture, pret a porter and even elan are French after all. It is not just style they define, it is the essence of style. And it is not just fasion it is food and more -So I picked up this book to see if deJean could shed some light on it - I expected a quick once over, perhaps some fuzzing at the edges and a book designed to be read rather than giving any depth. And it is none of these things. It seems the French can also write with style.This is a wonderful quirky book, it certainly offers some convincing explanations for the French role in all things good, and deJean dates it back to the reign of seventeenth century Louis XIV who lived long and glamourously. His quest for things to make his life brighter, drier, and more beautiful may well have been the starting point for this ultimate role the French have now. The quest for things such as mirrors which were good, a method to keep himself dry when it rained (the umbrella), food, clothing, even paving on the streets to prevent getting covered in mud, deJean argues have all contributed to the way the French are now.I don't know if I am that wildly convinced that a king 350 years ago really had that great influence on the national psyche now, but what I did find was the detail and the information was compelling. I found myself reading this and enjoying it just for that. So much I didn't know about French history, so much in fasion and food I didn't know and thoroughly enjoyed learning about.A good read, easy page turner and while frivolous, tres bon
A Definitive History of Black Gospel Music. This book is a well-written history of black gospel.  I found the style very informative yet entertaining.  Robert Darden has pulled together many scattered resources into a great compilation that any history or music buff will enjoy reading.    Much of this information was previously inaccessible or unknown until Darden's hard work.  This was a book I really enjoyed reading.
Ah , but isn't he the luckiest of men.... It is March and in my 1st grade this means the reading of Tomie De Poala's fine collection of Irish tales, as we learn a bit o'Irish fun. Clovers, silkies, sheep sheering, poetry, lambs.....we are thinking of the coming of the greening of our CA hills as spring begins to warm our hearts. With the rainbows showing up to remind us of the magic of our earth...thoughts of pots of gold and leprechaun hordes too.Today my class at U Pick It Read Aloud time enjoyed learning of Blarney Stones and leprechauns and tiny wee folk that have a pot o gold and a few tricks up their tiny little sleeves. In the month of March along with great Irish stories, corned beef and cabbage and shamrock growing we always watch The Secret of Roan Innish and enjoy a little tale or two. An a bit of decaffeinated unadorned Irish coffee. This story is perfect for a good accented read. Jamie O'Rourke is without question the laziest man in all of Ireland. Thank goodness for his hardworking wife Eileen who, sadly, gets laid up in her bed forcing Jamie out to go see the village Priest to seek a blessing before he certainly dies of starvation.  He, himself, is a bit too lazy to do any work to save them, so of course he goes looking for help. What he finds is a leprechaun. He  negotiates a deal with the leprechaun he captures. Not to spoil the whole tale he grows through this magical trade the largest pratie ever to be seen and in the end of the tale solves his and his dear wife Eileen's troubles all with the confidences and luck of a true fool. My class loved the tale. In typical De Poala fashion there are a few twists and a kind of natural humor in watching this main character resist so completely any lesson learned. That Jamie he is a lazy fellow to the bone. Ah to be sure.I have several books on Ireland, pictorial, to show the children the look of the land which this book incorporates into the illustrations, stone walls, fields, rolling hills, village life. Very nice small-tale features my class recognized and enjoyed.  A very sweet re-aloud made even better by reading the second sequel, or follow-up tale of Jamie and the Pooka. I really enjoy this book each year and after several stories, and time developing information about Ireland, my class likes to write leprechaun tales. Just a bit of fun for the kiddies as we are listening to Celtic music, looking at the contributions to our culture from this fine island rich with musicians, artists, story tellers and believers.I recommend this with a tip of me hat. May you read with the luck of the Irish
This book helps take the hardship out of distance. Long distance relationships are the hardest relationship to survive.  I know...I have been in one!  Additionally, of all the couples I have interviewed who have been successfully married LONG past the seven year itch; they all stated the same thing...NO LONG separation.  This book helps take the hardship out of this problem and may have perhaps found at long last the solution to this epidemic of busy lives and hectic schedules that involve a lot of travel and time away from our loved ones
Once more- Nevermore. Poe is a poet of great intensity and music, of haunting rhythm and obsessive feeling. This collection contains the lyrics he is most known for including the title- piece, his most famous work, the haunting 'The Raven'. But the rhythms of loss and longing and lament which play such a great part in his invocation of ' Lenore' who he will see nevermore, are also present in his 'To Helen' and his 'Annabel Lee'. And there will be other memorable lines as "The glory that was Greece, the grandeur that was Rome " which will refrain in the reader's mind . Poe makes his readers sense an echo effect , and we hear and hear again his deep- beating lines.And with them there comes too a sense of deep disturbance, a disquiet that is at the heart of America's strangest and most hauntingly gloomy great poet.
The only book you need to buy or sell a business. If you are buying or selling a business, or just want to know the value of your company, this is the only book you need.  I read several others, but this covers everything they do and in more detail, plus it's all in one book.  The purchase agreements are excellent.  The book is very detailed.  After reading it you know exactly what to do.  But I did not find it boring or hard to follow at all
Great Look at Howard's Development as a Writer. As is pointed out by the editor of this volume, it's a mistake to view Kull -- as many people do -- as just a Conan prototype.  The Kull stories stand well on their own merit and the character is not just a primitive version of Conan.Still, I think it's clear that the Kull stories represent an earlier, less developed phase in Howard's meteoric writing career.  In these stories, we can see Howard's story telling mastery in an earlier stage of development than in the Conan stories.  It's noteworthy that Howard's first Conan story was based on one of his last -- and unsold -- Kull stories, "By this Axe, I Rule!"For anyone who loves Howard's work, the stories in this volume represent an essential stage in Howard's development as a writer and story-teller.  Also, Conan's Hyperborian world was quite literally built upon the ruins of Kull's Atlantean/Valusian world.  To really understand and appreciate Conan, you have to know Kull.Even if Conan had never been created though, it would still be worth the readers trouble to meet Kull.  These are superb stories and very important to the development of the American school of fantasy writing -- what would later become known as "Sword and Sorcery" writing
Good Sequel, Some Reservations. Shiloh Season is the second book in the Shiloh Trilogy. In this ongoing saga, 11-year-old Marty must face some of the consequences of past decisions, particularly the secret of how he managed to "buy" his beagle Shiloh from Judd Travers, his previous owner. Just when we thought Marty's fears about Shiloh's well-being were over, Judd begins to drink heavily and is displaying erratic behavior which causes Marty to once again fear for Shiloh's safety, as well as his own. Marty faces some difficult decisions again, as well as showing maturity as he wrestles with needing to protect Shiloh and wanting to find out if it's possible to teach kindness to someone who has never known it.While this sequel was very enjoyable, it somewhat lacked the page-turning intensity of its predecessor. In Shiloh, Naylor deftly managed to make all the characters alive and a meaningful addition to the book, but Shiloh Season didn't quite draw me in as well and the scenes with Shiloh himself almost seem superfluous. If you are a fan of Marty and Shiloh, then you will most likely enjoy this next part of the story. If you haven't read the first book, I would highly recommend reading it first and become a fan before reading this second book.Positive Elements: Though Marty's willingness to take risks in reaching out to Judd Travers stem from his desire to keep Shiloh safe, he learns compassion in the process and then attempts to teach it to Judd himself. Again, this book demonstrates to us an excellent work ethic and devotion to family. Marty may not always know what the right thing to do is, but his desire to do the right thing is refreshing.Negative Elements: As in the first book, there are scenes which may frighten or disturb some children, including the use of firearms. One of the main themes of the book deals with abusing alcohol, and I edited out some language as I read this book aloud to my children
Favorite Storyline of the Film. and most definitely my favorite out of the first 4 graphics novels of sin city. Dwight McCarthy is a dangerous and sexy man with a love that he will have always and never. The women of "Old Town" are the enforcers of their part of Sin City, with nothing but their wit and the pistol they're packing to protect themselves from the pimps and the mob. Their story is by far my favorite
Beautiful book. This book is topical and beautfully illustrated. It is an excellent book to introduce children to the war in Iraq in a nonpolitical way and to break some stereotypes: I appreciated the strong but caring Muslim woman and the men who helped her. Adults will enjoy reading this book with their children, too, because of the good story and the wonderful drawings. (I am a child psychology professor)
Jane Austen's Best Novel. In my opinion, this is Jane Austen's greatest book.  Anne Elliot is a beautifully written character, and Austen subtly conveys her strength of mind and depth of emotion with the best of her skills.  Many critics have declared that Austen's greatest talent was creating characters that stay in character without getting stagnant, and I think this novel is the best showcase for that talent.  Though often not as comical as some of her other works, this novel is a beautiful portrait of hopeless lovers, and the dialogue (always done well by Austen) is superb.  What makes this novel stand-out in my mind, is that though it includes somewhat less of the social satire than her other books (though it is of course still present), it creates a very honest portrait of family relations and how filial duty can not always inspire love, even in the best-mannered of individuals.For those wondering what exactly makes Austen a truly classic author, and not just a fun feminine writer, I suggest a close reading of Persuasion
Not just the content... Whats great about this book is not just the content, about which all other reviews have been raving anyway, but its paper, spiral binding and hard cover.The glossy paper makes it readable even if you shine a low-energy red light on it. The spiral-binding allows you to flip thru the pages easily while you hold the book folded in 360 degrees. And the hard-bound cover enables you to hold the book with one hand over your head while you shine the torch on the book with other hand and gaze at the stars above
Phillips' breaks down the walls of misunderstanding. The reader from San Diego obviously did not read the book.  Not only does Phillips separate taggers and gangbangers into different chapters, she delineates the underlying similarities in the reasoning and the form of the  graffiti of both taggers and gangsters.  She shows functional and material  sociological reasons for the graffiti of these little-understood  populations, while at the same time allowing us to clearly see her own  views on the subject.  She does not try to create a false objectivity.   Additionally, the book makes a good read--and especially interesting for  anyone living in Southern California
Highly Recommend. Think and Grow Rich is one of the most important self help books ever related to success and prosperity. The price of this edition is excellent, and this publisher has created an excellent edition of the original Think and Grow Rich book
The Theological Discourses of John Donne. Jeffrey Johnson, by means of a serious, erudite and documented work, portrays the religious writings of John Donne as texts fruit of a well-founded knowledge of Christian theology, in which the author  elaborates, rejects and innovates the discourses of religious dispute of  his days. To consider Donne as a full-fledged religious thinker with a  personal theological structuring of the Christian creed, is the first  pioneering step taken by Donne scholarship to propound a more compelling  understanding of his sermons and religious poetry. Johnson's methodology a'  la Skinner contextualizes the single thinker in his cultural matrix, and  thencewise proceeds to elucidate the ways in which he used and reacted the  religious thought of his time. This book, given the heavy theological  contents, is useful primarily for Renaissance scholars and students who  want to get a feel of the complexity and seriousness of Donne's sermons,  localizing them in their context, and perceiving them as answers to the   theological problematics of the time
Warm and wonderful. This book brought tears to my eyes the first time I read it.  It is warm and comforting.  A wonderful message for children that their mama will always be there no matter what..
The definitive book on the subject!. This engaging book describes some of the best research I've seen in the 30 years I've worked in the area of increasing the participation of girls and women in math, science and technology. Now folks, it's past time to put what we know into action! Read the book and get inspired
"This word damnation terrifies not him". Christopher Marlowe is awsone. What other Renaissance writer was a freakin' spy? I mean, I like Shakespeare's plays and all, but as a person he's boring unless he's being played by Joseph Fiennes. I often pit two historical figures against one another in my mind, and I wonder what would happen if these two fought.  If Shakespeare and Marlowe fought, Marlowe would bust out his super secret digital watch-that's secretly a laser-and he'd slice Shakespeare in half. Maybe `Speare would have a deadly quill like the Joker had in Batman, but a deadly quill versus a laser? I think we know who would win. I know the digital watch/laser is a bit silly because they didn't have digital watches back then, but at the very least he'd have an hourglass with a secret laser.Reading Dr. Faustus I realize what a shame it is Marlowe died so early. Marlowe's ability to combine drama and comedy was light years ahead of Shakespeare's. It wasn't until the second half of Shakespeare's career that he started writing dark comedies, but Marlowe was interjecting his humor with a dark twist right away with plays like Dr. Faustus and The Jew of Malta. If Marlowe hadn't dies so early (in a fight over who was going to pay the bill no less-freakin' cool!) then maybe there would have been two playwriting giants in London competing against one another. Just imagine the masterpieces that would have ensued. I bet they would have made King Lear look like A Comedy of Errors.This is the second time I've read Dr. Faustus, and I had forgotten how anti-Catholic it is. The story takes place mostly in Wittenberg, Germany where Martin Luther wrote his famous 95 theses. The location already sets up the tenuous relationship between Protestants and Catholics. This relationship, obviously biased against Catholics, is further represented in the good angel and bad angel that appear to Dr. Faustus several times. The good angel repeats over and over to Dr. Faustus that he can repent at any time and come back into good graces, while the bad angel keeps on telling him it's too late. The obvious analogy is that the good angel represents the Protestant idea of justification by faith. Not surprisingly, one of the groups of people who Marlowe is rumored to have spied on were Catholics intent on overthrowing what they saw as England's Protestant government. Furthermore, the first thing Dr. Faustus does when he makes his famous bargain is to play a practical joke on the Pope.Please, if you're Catholic don't let this turn you away from reading this beautifully written play. At times the mixture of slapstick comedy and high brow allusions are a bit uneven, but that was the nature of the beast back then. Marlowe had to play to the peasants as well as royalty.The trick Marlowe plays on the audience is even greater than the trick played on Faustus. Marlowe actually gets us to care about Faustus by the end of the play. This is either a trick to show us how close every one of us is to making a Faustian bargain, or it's a trick to show us how unfair these religious traditions were. After all, what did Faustus do that was so wrong? He goes into the deal with plans for making himself a despot, and ends up using all of his power to fetch grapes for debutants and summon Helen of Troy so that others may see her beauty. (Dr. Faustus has "phenominal cosmic power," and all he can manage is playing a few practical jokes and impressing people with out of season fruits.) He's never punished for his bad acts, but rather because of who he pledged his allegiance to. Over the course of twenty-four years Faustus has actually become a somewhat better person if only because he recognizes his sins. His greatest crimes are nothing more than playing practical jokes on peasants. He's not perfect, but he's also not deserving of eternal damnation.I see Dr. Faustus as a critique of religion. Others may find that it only reinforces their beliefs, and that's what makes the text so good. The Faustian bargain finds its way into literature time and again, but it means something different to each author; likewise, Dr. Faustus means something different to each reader
I thought it was pretty good. Actually, I rather enjoyed the book.  It didn't look as though Patzia is so concerned with making a strong position as he is with expressing a summary and the different positions on the topics he covers. The glossary looked helpful and I really appreciated the extensive end notes and annotated bibliographies included in them.  I thought there was a lot of good information here for someone wanting an introduction to the issues
Comedy of Manners - Two Editions Reviewed. The Way of the World, a classic example of comedy of manners, did not immediately appeal to me. My first reading was the Crofts Classic edition (published 1951, reprinted 1985), edited by Henry T. E. Perry. On the plus side the introduction illustrates how William Congreve adroitly uses dialogue to reveal much about the personalities of his characters. In addition, there is a valuable section titled The Argument of the Play, in which Perry summarizes events that occurred prior to the beginning of the play.The major drawback to the Crofts edition is that the stage directions are limited, sometimes making it difficult for me to recognize the intent of the dialogue. More than once I lost track of the shifting relationships, romantic and otherwise.However, my second reading - this time an edition published by Barron's Educational Series (1958) - proved more enjoyable, largely due to the plentiful stage directions and indications of expression. Pluses include a lengthy introduction by Vincent Hopper and Gerald Lahey, a 5-page note on staging by George Hersey, and illustrations by Fritz Kredel.Indications of expression - essentially guidance to actors on the proper delivery of the dialogue - are inserted in parenthesis as the dialogue switches from one character to another. Example stage directions include: "somewhat sourly recollecting the rebuff of the previous evening" and "using frankness as a bait to draw equal frankness from her companion" and "too preoccupied to pay serious attention".The Play:  The first three acts involve little action; the scenes focus on introducing and contrasting characters, highlighting witty dialogue, and slowly revealing details of prior events through casual references. Polite, formalized language disguises selfish motives, rivalries, deceit, and deviousness. The action - certain steps to overcome obstacles to a marriage - does not occur until the fourth act.The resolution in act five is not wholly unexpected, but may be unsettling to modern sensibilities: the marriage between Mirabell and Millamant proceeds only after both are assured that their financial situation will not be jeopardized. Love is a secondary concern. Similarly, the unpleasant situation of Mrs. Fainall - a marriage without any pretence of love - remains unchanged.It may not be easy to find a copy of the older Barron's edition, but it will be worth the effort. Better yet, try to find both the Barron's and Crodfts editions as they complement each other. I give The Way of the World a four-star ranking
a book that will keep you up all night. Like kids playing with fire, this is a story of two kids messing with things that should be touched. Harriet a twelve year-old girl grows up trying to figure out who killed her older brother when he was 6. Growing up in an environment where the subject never was mentioned, with her mom sister, aunts and her grandma Edie. Harriet is tired of the silence and sets her mind to find out who hanged her brother from the tree. She asked questions and got help from her friend Hely, a year younger.All the answers she gets lead her to Danny Ratliff who was present the day of the murder. Harriet starts medaling around the Ratliffs infamous for their life-style. Harriet decides that Danny must die, so Harriet and Hely plan of a way to accomplish the murder. Harriet messing with the wrong people brings her life at risk. This book will keep you up with Harriet's dangerous adventure and the events, but the bad thing about it is that it doesn't have the greatest ending, so read if you want to of find out what happens to Harriet.
THE BLUEBIRD MONITOR'S GUIDE. THIS BOOK IS A MUST FOR ANYONE WHO HAS A BLUEBIRD TRAIL OR IS CONSIDERING STARTING ONE IT HAS PARTICAL INFORMATION FROM THOSE WHO HAVE YEARS OF EXPERIENCE RUNNING A BLUEBIRD TRAIL ALL PHOTOS ARE IN COLOR AND THE BOOK COVERS ALL SUBJECTS CONCERNING BLUEBIRDS THE BEST BOOK ON BLUEBIRD TRAIL
Can there be a rave review of a group theory book?. This book has the best explanation of Clifford algebrathat I've ever seen.The coverage of dihedral, space groups, quaternions and even projectivediagrams is just very ,very good.He introduces "The Rodrigues programme" which isa very good angular approach to quaternionsthat actually predates Hamilton's quaternionsbut has been overlooked.He doesn't spare on word definitions and explanations.The index is fully operationaland definitions are for the most part complete and understandable.In other words he actually doesn't just pretend to teachgroup theory, he actually does!If you have always wondered about SU(2) and quaternions, this is the bookthat you "need" to read.Roger L. Bagula
Great book. This is a great book if one is interested in learning more about the world of LBO's and the dealings of wall street. If you read Den of Thieves and liked that one you'll definitely love this one
A fascinating read. I picked this book up at the airport, opened it on the plane and I couldn't put it down.  Edward Regis turns this topic into a narrative that is as interesting as a Tom Clancy novel.  The book is clearly well  researched, and is filled with wit, as well as with a rather disturbing  picture of our military development of biological weapons
A logical argument, and yet more troops are being sent now. Arnove's book lays out, in a pretty straight-forward manner (105 pages, not counting the foreword, afterword, appendix, acknowledgement, and notes) the case for pulling all U.S. troops out of Iraq immediately. I read a few other books about Iraq before reading this one, and I would suggest that to any reader, just so they have a frame of reference while reading it. Arnove tries to use well-known quotes and facts to support his argument, and this helps, but there is still so much information on such a complex issue, that I think it would be difficult to read this and fully comprehend it with no prior knowledge of Iraq.Arnove makes a very compelling case. What's sad is that he's using readily available information to make it, and yet we're now sending more troops to Iraq.I think the only fault of the book is expecting that it will drive people to action. Arnove isn't really presenting anything new, just laying all the facts out for us in a very clean, logical way, almost like he's writing his thesis. While this style might work if Arnove were a lawyer convicting Bush of war crimes, it just serves to further highlight how this administration works above the law and gets away with it. Even with this much clear evidence against the war it continues on
great book. Who doesnt love the Wind in the Willows? great book for children, I love it even now as a college student. I brought it with me and keep it on my bookshelf in my dorm room. The sweet little mole, the wise old badger, and of course, the silly and carefree toad-what charming characters! everyone must read this book at some point over the course of their lifetime, and will most likely chose to read it again soon after.
As One Dead is the best. Being a White wolf buff and a vampire fanatic, As One Dead was true to it  all. I found the book interesting, non-linear, and a real eye catcher. If  you love vampire books then you'll love this one. it has everything you  could possibly want from a vampire book
True to form. Man, I just love King George! I really couldn't tell you how many times I could read and re-read his Song of Fire and Ice series. This is a great filler while you are painfully waiting for the Feast.  The artwork is so well down in this "extended comic book."  Characters are introduced that are prequels to the future series. The names wIll definitely ring a bell, if you are familiar to the series. This was just a well done short story, full of sacrifice, back-stabbing, characters that are more than they appear.  Basically, everything you would expect from Mr. Martin, just in condensed form.  A MUST READ FOR MARTIN FANS
The South Beach Diet Works. THis book motivated me lose the weight I needed to lose due to health concerns.  Even though I was eating healthy meals, I continued to gain and was sure I couldn't lose weight.  I decided to try once more.  In Phase One I lost a pound a day and I continue to lose on Phase 2 & 3.  This diet is good for you, easy and gives great success.  The book was extremely helpful in explaining why the weight needs to come off and then planning meals to make that happen
Prince, not Princess. While the protagonist of Babette Cole's story may already be a prince, he still leads a Cinderella-like life in Prince Cinders.  The prince's mean older brothers boss him around until one day, a confused fairy tumbles into his life.  After being accidentally transformed into a gorilla and attempting to attend the "Rock'n Royal Bash," Prince Cinders finds himself returned to his former shape and face-to-face with an adoring Princess Lovelypenny.  In his hurry to escape, he leaves behind his trousers, which the princess uses to identify Prince Cinders, glass-slipper style.Cole's clever twist on this common fairytale is notable for several reasons.  From the story's many wonderful qualities, the quirky and bright illustrations emerge as the book's best feature.  The simple cartoon style drawings are attractive and fun.  Prince Cinders is a gangly, though loveable fellow, and the artwork does nothing but make the reader love him more.  The brilliant colors and composition choice make this storybook shine.  The simply written text is no less clever for its simplicity; the witty mishaps the fairy causes provide much enjoyment for children of all ages.  Also of interest is the alteration of the original plot.  While Cole mimics some elements of the typical Cinderella story, many additions create a fun tale.  Prince Cinders is an adorable book, certainly meriting inclusion into any children's library.
I love this Trouble!. One of the best aspects of this book was, when it ended, it was left open for a sequel!  Will Maggie open her mind to her obvious mystical talents?  Will she date either of the very attractive men in her life... the dark and mysterious man, or the light yet strong guy?  I was completely delighted with "The Trouble with Magic."  While it is "chick-lit-ish," it is a refreshing change of pace from all of the "cookie cutter" chick-lit books that are flooding the market right now.  The mystical aspects offer Alt's readers just the right twist to mix a main stream book with tons of suspense and a bit of spookiness.  I'm looking forward to the next installment of Maggie and magic.
Good Book. Considering that MONAD is a new shell and not many books are available in the market this book is a great introduction to MONAD. The author introduces the functionality with examples and he gives us details on how to learn more about the new features.The author assumes that you know the windows command line scripting and compares that with MONAD in some instances.Over all the book is great. I recommand this to anyone who wants to jump stat MONAD scripting
BEAUTIFUL!. I have been writing Japanese for years, and I started with the author's &quot;Let's Learn Hiragana&quot; and &quot;Let's Learn Katakana.&quot;  I loved both books, especially the Hiragana.  I learned Kanji from various sources, spent hundreds of dollars on books (literally), yet none of them were as beautifully written as this one.  If you want to learn the characters in depth, and want to really enjoy writing them (yes, it is artistic and even fun to do) and not just be flabbergasted and frustrated, this is the book to start with (or even switch over to).  I might get this book just to improve my handwriting
A good introduction to nanotech. This book was a relatively quick read.  It covers most of the basics  without burying the novice (like myself) in the wealth of details in some  of the more advanced books on the subject.Nanosystems and Engines of Creation are two great books for more on nanotechnology by Eric Drexler.Take a look at [...
Getting the Love You Want: A Guide for Couples. Awesome, down to earth. A must rea
Best Book Available on subject. The late Aryeh Kaplan was a Rabbi, scholar, and Kabbalist.  In addition to his valuable and readable commentaries on Sefer Yetzirah and Sefer Bahir, he wrote three books on meditation.  The other two are: "Meditation and Kabbalah" and "Meditation and the Bible."  From a practical perspective, "Jewish Meditation" is far and away the best, however, reading the other two provides one with a more inclusive, theoretical background and context within which to practice.  This volume is quite valuable and a contribution to both meditation per se and to Jewish spiritual practices.  It's rare to find an author who is both scholar and practitioner, so Kaplan's books on meditation and on Kabbalah are particularly valuable and accessible to the reader.  Of course, they are not introductory books--of which there are innumerable versions in bookstores.  It helps to have a solid background in the basics before tackling Kaplan's texts.  But it isn't essential.  Kaplan's texts are appropriate to both the serious student and the serious practitioner of meditation and of Kabbalah.  They also demonstrate to contemporary people that Judaism is more than just laws and books and that spiritual practices are, indeed, the heart of Judaism as they are with other religions and belief systems.  R. Kaplan's tragic death in an automobile accident was a great loss to Jewish understanding as well as, more generically, to Kabbalah, meditation, and modern spirituality
Just like the originals. I just got this book in the mail today and I love it already.  The pages are nice sized and the books are sturdy enough for years of enjoyment.  These are the stories I remember my Mother reading me as a child and I look forward to many hours of reading to my own children.  If they don't get worn out from lots of use they will be passed on to the next generation as well, just as our childhood books have been.  These are classic stories that will be loved for many generations
simplicity in form. For everyone who thinks they have creative ability.  This is simply the book to read.  This book is slowly but surely transforming and discipling me to become better at writing.  I only hope that a year from now I have made a decent and forthright attempt in using these skills.
Fascinating facts, and a really good read. It's hard to make something so filled with detailed facts read like a novel, but the author has done it. The Man Behind the DaVinci Code is a fascinating journey backstage in the creation of a book -- and a career.I was particularly interested to see inside the publishing world, as the author chronicles Brown's previous books and their misadventures in the complicated maze of big publishing houses. It makes me wonder how many other fine writers are out there waiting to find the right agent, editor and publisher to bring them to the world's attention.The book is well worth reading for its carefully researched look at the life and work of an author, but it's just as compelling for the new dimension it adds to Brown's books themselves. I will enjoy reading the rest of these even more, having read their "life histories.
A must read for anyone who wants to be in a relationship. I have been reading this book nonstop.  I was curious if it has helped others as much as it has helped me!  It looks like it has.This is a fantastic book, it not only has been helping my relationship with my husband without him knowing why, but I see so many of my friends relationship problems explained in front of my eyes!  Not only the explanations but how to fix things.Thank you for this book
History Forum, not a riview of. This is a history Forum and I like it!!!!Opinion 1.So, there is a lot of hate between Greeks and Turks, between Armenians and Turks, between Bulgars and Turks, between Rusians and Turks,  between Arabs and Turks. Also Turks today are anti Americans. But why? WHY?The Turks learn history from their "books". It is crazy,   if you read two national histories you will find a different interpretation for one historical event. I am writing some examples:a) Greeks have learnt in their books that at 1821 their ancestors made a revolution against the Turks. There were many revolutionary waves during the Turkish occupation etc.For the same period and events Turks have learnt that there was an illegal divulsion from Ottoman Empire.b) "Yenichars" are the most terrible event for Greeks and a good scholarship from Sultan to young Cristian boys for Turks.There is not a common sense here. If we read books like these, we will feel only hate.Opinion 2It is difficult for me to believe that there was not an Armenian Genocide, it is difficult for me to believe that Greeks or Armenians burnt Smyrna. The Turkish president said that these issues belongs to historians not to politicians. Let use the archieves and we will see...  Do you know about official Ottoman Archieves? If not imagine the official NAZI archieves about the holocaust. You can search a hole life and you will not find an evidence.Of course a Turk believes something else about the second opinion but probably he can understand the first one.I hope all of us Greeks, Armenians, Turks read history. It is good for our life to know about our roots. We can read history to learn the events, without forget anything but not to influence the present situation
Get what you pay for. There is a reason everyone gives this book 5 stars.
A fair question, great responses... Is scientific research winding down? Is what we can know scientifically coming to an end? At some point every scientist asks him/herself this question. It's a fair question for a journalist and a great one for access to so many scientists.I enjoyed the breadth of scientific scope here along with the conversational style. Truth be told, I am envious of Mr. Horgan's ability to spend time with all of these people. I appreciate being able to read both their and his thoughts on the premise of this book.Is science at an end? Never as long as there are folks around to ask the question and stimulate debate. I recommend this book wholeheartedly to everyone interested in contemporary science.
Great Book...Greater Footnotes. I absolutely enjoyed this book...but what I enjoyed even more than the book itself was the amazing resource of classic authors and texts through Gary Thomas' extensive footnotes...it is always a joy to find a book that sends you on a long and wonderful trail through the greatest thinkers/theologians of all time...a must read
Best Golf Book for Full Swing Today. Nick knows the golf swing inside and out. Get the book and keep working with it. You will get better. I can't wait for a short game book, Nick
Hi-Tech schmi-tech, I'm in investment banking and I use it. There is nothing more difficult or sensitive in my business than decision making. The chapter on the  &quot;decision tree&quot; alone, has made me a few million dollars.  I would say that's a pretty  good deal, and it had nothing to do with high technology
homage to hiv. Shilts' great book shows us how much of the AIDS related suffering of the last twenty years could so easily have been avoided. The book opens with the July 4th 1976 bicentennial celebration of American independence and closes with the death of Hollywood star Rock Hudson, whose passing garnered the necessary oxygen of publicity that all the thousands of previous AIDS casualties could not.In between, the book revolves around the hedonistic community of San Francisco's Castro Street area and brings us an amazing array of villains, victims and plain heroes. The villains include the bathhouse owners, who used America's First Amendment to keep their businesses open even as it was blatantly obvious that they were a major conduit for the spread of the virus; Dr. Bob Gallo of America's National Cancer Institute, who put his own prestige ahead of everything else, normal scientific and academic ethics included; and the Reagan administration, which did as little as politically possible to stem the burgeoning plague that blighted America during those years.Because the air bridges between Los Angeles, New York and San Francisco helped spread the virus at breakneck speed, Shilts also introduces us to Gaetan Dugas, the Canadian air line steward, who is credited with infecting many of America's earliest victims. Shilts paints him as half victim and half villain.  Dugas, he shows, went from being the pretty boy everybody in Castro Street wanted to bed to being the terminal AIDS case they all eventually feared.Rock Hudson, Liberace and other closet gays are likewise painted as half villains and half victims. Michael Foucault, the fashionable French philosopher, must rank with the vilest villains; he hid his diagnosis from everyone, even his devoted lover. So much for that pompous philosopher and philanderer!But even in the blighted world of AIDS, there were many heroes. These include the French scientists who discovered the HIV virus and, Gallo excepted, the American ones, who followed up all the early clues that eventually led to the discovery of the medications that can now tackle the illness. Many of these American heroes, Shilts shows, were penalized rather than praised by their universities for performing their singular services to mankind.The bathhouse chain owners, who were more interested in profiting from the unbridled orgies that gave them their profits than in stemming AIDS, were not the only amplifiers during the crucial early years. The blood banks, by refusing to screen blood, also contributed to the death of thousands of Americans. The Reagan administration's preoccupation with Central America and the Soviet Union was also a godsend to the virus.And, as the band played on, AIDS wormed its way through America's marginalized communities of hookers, hemophiliacs, heroin addicts, and Haitians. Gay activists, who tried to sound the alarm bells, were dismissed as sexual Nazis and theocrats by their confreres who wanted to party on in Castro Street's backroom bars and bathhouses, even though, as Shilts constantly reminds us, it meant almost certain death.Shilts has sent us a powerful message that we ignore at our peril. AIDS means that hedonists can expect to die sooner rather than later. The world's legions of drug shooting hookers will remain major amplifiers for AIDS, hepatitis and related illnesses as long as their addiction continues. So too will other marginalized and uneducated people. So too, of course, will people like Robert Gallo, who put his own narrow agenda ahead of humanity's.On the positive side, the book shows us that the villains are vastly outnumbered by the heroes, not the least of whom is Randy Shilts, who also finally succumbed to this great human calamity.
Excellent Book. A Success Plan for Creating and Consuming HumorHow to be Funny on Purpose, by Edgar E. Willis artfully blends content-rich information with an entertaining and motivating writing style.  His is a success plan that tells readers how to be creators of humor who can make a difference and consumers who can add richness, joy, and pleasure to their lives.  Willis shares a step-by-step program and confirms the fact that everyone can be an effective creator and consumer of humor.  His practical guidance, focus on the reader, emphasis on communication skills, and rich personal experiences, make this a one-of-a-kind book. By using examples from daily life, professionals, politicians, and his own experience, Willis shows readers how to capitalize on resources that surround them, how to adapt and adopt those resources, and how to use them effectively. Willis is truly a special writer with a message that must be read not just by every professional speaker, but by anyone who gives public speeches of any kind.Sheila M. Bethel, PhD., Author, Speaker
One of the greats of American literature. I hate to reiterate a common point made by many reviewers but I feel it's necessary to say (once again!) that the middle of the book was some hard reading.  It wasn't hard, vocabulary-wise, but because Dreiser went into *great* detail about Carrie and Hurstwood, separately and as a couple (among many other things) - so much so that it could have been its own novel.  It has the potential to lose people who are short on patience.  Perhaps five chapters could have been combined into two (if that!).Be that as it may, roughing it through the middle makes getting to the end feel as if you've accomplished the impossible, and your effort will be rewarded.The ending was unconventional, to say the least.  Not to give it away but if a potential reader believes that Dreiser tied things up quite nicely, think again!  Such an ending is a present-day writing teacher's nightmare.I must confess that as I was reading the book I was simultaneously checking out the reviews here on Amazon and was prepared to feel really sorry for Hurstwood.  From what I understand, Hurstwood's deterioration is the main attraction of the book (and of the movie adaptation made in the 1950s).  After seeing how he tricked Carrie into leaving Chicago with him - first going to Canada and then settling in New York, how he was a bigamist (throwing that in Carrie's face at the appropriate moment), and how utterly unprepared he was to fight his wife and live a new life in a new town, I wound up not feeling as sorry for Hurstwood as is expected to be.  His lack of motivation and the lies on which he built his life with Carrie were of his own doing and, in a sense, he got what he deserved in the end.Carrie, on the other hand, has been portrayed as this vixen who gladly used married men for her own gain and nothing could be farther from the truth.  She didn't even know Hurstwood was married until Drouet sprang that bit of trivia upon her (after he was informed by a maid of Carrie's frequent outings with Hurstwood).  Also, Drouet was not married (but they did live together as an unmarried couple in a day when that was unthinkable!).To me, Carrie is the most identifiable character here, not because she's the title character but because of her need to overcome a repetitive life full of drudgery, routine, and never making her ends meet.  This was summed up perfectly on Page 31 of this edition: "Unless Carrie submitted to a solemn round of industry and saw the need of hard work without longing for play, how was her coming to the city to profit (her sister and her husband)?"Carrie's attitude regarding work and her outlook on life is, on the surface, very frivolous and not at all of an adult:  "Carrie ... bent over her work.  She felt as though she could hardly endure such a life.  Her idea of work had been so entirely different" (Page 38).  She wanted more out of life than what the industrial 1890s had to offer, and anyone can identify with that sentiment (especially today in the hyper 21st Century.  What are supposed to be 9-5 office jobs turn out to be something we practically live with 24/7 and then you're fired (or "laid off"), without warning, for reasons that wouldn't make sense to a preschooler.  And, for our troubles, we die of cancer in the end.  Translation: Nothing much has changed in one hundred-plus years in this country).Carrie had advantages (like men wanting to take care of her) that others don't have (nor ever get) but, when the going got tough in New York City, she put her feet to the pavement and found work (something Hurstwood was always putting off).Whether one feels Carrie deserved her fame courtesy of hard work or through sheer luck (of being at the right place at the right time), Ames's thought sums up the reason for her success: "The world is always struggling to express itself ... Most people are not capable of voicing their feelings.  They depend upon others.  That is what genius is for.  One man expresses their desires for them in music; another one in poetry; another one in a play.  Sometimes nature does it in a face - it makes the face representative of all desire.  That's what has happened in your case" (Page 429).Did the good guy/gal win here?  That's up for debate.  One thing is for sure is that "Sister Carrie" is definitely not your conventional tale and is a fine representation of good American literature.One final note: It's worth checking out the scholarship at the beginning of Barnes and Noble Classics Editions (as well as other editions that offer the same).  While I find the overall scholarship to be biased majority of the time, it is, nonetheless, helpful and aids in your reading of the text.  - Donna Di Giacom
Excellent, unbiased, well-written piece of journalism and entertainment. My favorite chapter of this book was "Branding the Babies" that provided an historical summary of the methods and initiatives by the US Congress, the Reagan and Clinton administrations to solve the illegal immigration issue.  The writing style of this book is fluent, easy to read, no political agenda, just good unbiased, yet entertaining journalism.  Roberto Suro is brilliant with the English language and provides inside glimpses into the Latino community, including the gangs.
A practical book of NLP techniques. If I am being selfish like my past, I would not have written this review to let you know that this is such a great book for personal change. I changed instantly after following a couple of the exercises explained in the book.  After going through the exercise of &quot;Fast Phobia Method&quot; and &quot;Recoding Past Unpleasant Experiences&quot;, it helped me to regain much of my self-confidence back, which was results of an unpleasant past.  The book would not be an easy read for non-NLPers, but the authors did try very hard to explain the &quot;how's&quot; and &quot;why's&quot; of the exercises introduced in the book. More importantly, they picked those essential NLP techniques for life change, which makes the book invaluable. Although this is an NLP book from the eighties, IMHO, it sheds more lights than many of the more contemporary ones.  I fully recommend this book if you want to use NLP to improve yourself. My advice is to work through those exercises that fit you and reflect on the resulted changes
wanted more of the scot. I did enjoy the book i liked the time with Patrick Leslie but i wanted more of Logan thought he was a good character that got lost the end of the book was so hurried
Highly informative. Read this a few years ago. Recently reread it.One of the few books on this subject and one of the most informative.Nicely laid out.For those interested in this subject, this book is a must read. HIghly informative. Easy to read and understand.
great reference. this book is a great reference for home schoolingit is easy to read and very informative and inspiring.  I felt it was very honest in it's presentation as well.  Wonderful
Great Book and Intro to the Computer Repair Business!. IF you want a book heavy on accounting theory or how to repair some rare technical problem, this isn't it. If, however, you are looking for a book to help you tell if this is the correct business for you and perhaps how to start such an enterprise, it clearly is! Morris is grounded by his years of experience in the field and uses that experience to  explain what is different about the field. He does a great job explaining how to make the jump into the field a success! No one resource will prepare you to enter this business, but Morris' book made my start a roaring success!Dave Hayde
New and revised - The New Way To Sell. My casette tape case says "revised for the 90's" and this program is. You will hear some of the old and some of the new. Tracy is a master at consultative type selling and at the same time recommend time tested closing techniques that have been working for decades.Of course only real salespeople would know this. I also recommend the complete album from Nightingale-Conant by the same name by Brian Tracy
Among the creme of the creme of business books. This is one of the most insightful books I've ever come across.  The author is simply a genious.  Embracing the principles of this book may be the difference between developing a successful business or not
A chapter apiece for the ladies of Brewster Place. Gloria Naylor's book reads fast, just like life is lived on the little dead end street known as Brewster Place. Really a series of inter-connected short stories, it can easily be read a chapter at a time, cuz each character gets her own chapter. While not all the characters are thoroughly likeable, they all have plenty of redeeming qualities. Focusing not only on the women's trials and tribulations, Naylor also delves into the history and background that came before, contributing to each woman's present situation. These women, mostly abandoned or cast off by the men in their lives, struggle to make a sense of community from a handful of hopes and dreams
A most helpful and comprehensive book. I loved the easy-to-read style of the book. Loved it so much I've begun reading other books within the series of &quot;everything you need to know ...&quot; I'm a history major and I've learned a lot from the book about all the various asian immigrant groups that have arrived in the U.S. I've  read lots of other history books also, and although they confirm the  historical events and facts I got from this book, I found that those other  books are just much harder to get through. This book is intended on  purpose, it's clear, to be a popular type of book and has no pretense of  being some type of &quot;major research&quot; book. It's fun, it makes one  wants to learn more about history, and so one does. I think it's really  very worthwhile. I can read it on trains, in between classes even.  Recommend highly
starkly true. As I read each word and turned each page I remembered all the horrors of war. Of all the novels I have read there has not been one that more closely stated the everyday happenings, the fear, the funny, the sad, and most of all the feelings of what am I doing here. There are fifty some thousand names on a honored wall that were the heroes, but every man that served did so in good faith for his country.Most would do it again. Semper Fi to all
Delighted with this book. It's funny how some books end up getting used more than others. I'm not sure I would have predicted I'd have used this so much, but I've ended up making more cookies from this one little book than any other on my shelf (and there are many). I'm an ambitious baker, but when it comes to those night-before moments when I need to bake a batch of cookies for somewhere or someone, I'm more often than not a bit too tired. This is simply a very handy book and I've had lots of success with the recipes (although, looking back, almost 100% of my choices have been citrus-type cookies. I think the addition of bright flavors is what makes the dough taste like homemade). The lemon poppyseed tart is also quite good, very pretty and people were impressed (I put fresh blackberries on top--gorgeous).Thanks for a lovely, useful book
Very Knowledgeable Author. The author is obviously one of the experts in her field. I have found her books (and lectures) very insightful. She has a depth and breadth of knowledge that is thought provoking. I have seen some of her other work and enjoy the way she weaves core facts with light humor in her commentaries.
An Effective Guide to Stretching for Anyone!. Ultimate Flexibility, by Sang H. Kim, is a thorough, yet clear and practical guide on how to stretch effectively and enjoyably. This book was written primarily for the benefit of martial artists, but athletes and anyone who wants to improve their general health and fitness will find this book useful.Ultimate Flexibility provides the tools and motivation necessary to develop a successful stretching program that is customized to fit your unique goals, lifestyle, and capabilities.The author is comprehensive in his coverage of flexibility and stretching exercises. From identifying the key factors that affect flexibility...to explaining the various types of stretching...this book covers everything and covers it well.J. BarnesAuthor - Speed Training for Martial Art
Intense reading. This collection of interviews with Flanagan and his wife along with some of his creative work is a great tribute to a man who had so much to overcome and did it in a way that most of society could not understand.  It would have been easy for someone to give up or to become self focused, but Flanagan used his body and his mind to push himself, push his illness, and try to educate the rest of the world about his struggle and about kink.  A lot of what is written and shown will disturb you, it should distrub you, but you'll walk away thinking he was a very brave man
The father of medieval thinking. Aristotle was in fact a Macedonian by birth and had as one of his utmost desires to be accepted in Athens as a full-fledged citizen, something he never attained. To be or not a citizen at those times, was the determinant factor in the importance each one attained in the social structure. One has to keep in mind that all the political concepts that we inherited from the Greeks, got a different perspective at those times, where slavery was normally accepted and practised against the non-Greeks human beings. Aristotle was a disciple of Plato, whom he quotes many times in a derogatory manner, and he lived in Athens many years after years of tutorship of Philip and his son Alexander of Macedonia, to whom he did not mention a word of praise or reprimand in this book. What amazed most after reading this excelent book is the maturity the institutions had attained at his times, and the degree of accuracy and detail to which he devotes many chapters analysing the constitutions of many Greek states, Sparta included. One word of caution has to be addresed to the student of poltics: this is not a book about statecraft or the arts of governing people at 350 BC. All in all, the text seems to lose some strenght due to the impossibity of translating so rich a text and by the lack of precise terms for each and every situation there described. But, in the end, the reader  will get a glimpse of this very important period of western civilazation, specially if one has in mind that the heyday of Greece was gone and what lays ahead was the supremacy of Rome as world militar empire. To add interest to the reader, one has to keep in mind that the powerfull influence the aristotelian thought had in the medieval thinking
Much needed book!. Hi Ladies,Please read this book even if you do not want to.  If you know you should read it, but cannot get past that reader's block that is preventing you, ask God to prepare you in the right time to sit down and listen to what she has to say.  Pray these prayers, even if you know how to pray yourself.  It is good to pray together corporately, and even if we are not all praying at the same time, we are all praying the words Stormie put into this book at one time or another and are in agreement that we want our husbands to be spiritually healthy.  Your husband, as strong as he is, needs his wife to see him as one who is vulnerable to the enemy and in need of a defense partner.  He NEEEEEDs you to pray for him.  This is a great book to get you back into the habit of it!Kelly TownsendAuthorChrist Centered Childbirt
Makes a great gift. I am buying several copies of A Short Guide to a Happy Life and giving them as gifts to my graduating daughter and several of her close friends from high school.  For a little more than the cost of a greeting card that gets tossed after first examination, this poetic book of a mere fifty pages provides the perfect inspiration we all need to refer to from time to time. This tiny tome proves that you don't need a War-and-Peace-sized novel to deliver a message: "Get a life. A real life, not a manic pursuit of the next promotion, the bigger paycheck, the larger house. Do you think you'd care so much about those things if you developed an aneurysm one afternoon, or found a lump in your breast while in the shower?" (p. 16)Quindlen writes simply, succinctly and sweetly, and puts down in words what we all really truly know deep down, but need reminding of on occasion
First Time Jayne Ann Krentz. All in all this was a good read.  I never suspected the killer
If you read one book this year make it "Lonesome Dove". Like many of the other reviewers here have already stated, this is a book to be read by everyone!  I am not a reader of westerns but I loved this book.  After 800 pages I was never so sad to see a book end.  "Lonesome Dove" has a little of everything, drama, action, humor, and a few love stories to boot.  There are few books that have made me laugh or cry like this book did.  By the time your are done you will have new friends Woodrow, Pea Eye, Claire, Lorena, but especially Gus McCrea.  and you will also have some new villains particularly the frightening Blue Duck.  I can't recommend a book any more than this one
Solid Parker. While the reviews on this book go from one to five, it would appear the "ones" don't understand why anyone would like this book and the "fives" can't get enough Spenser.  As someone said this is a dumb book and not like the serious other mystery writers.  True.  And, that's why some of us read Spenser.  He's our man if we're ready for wisecracking, fast paced action with little need to get cerebral.As a mystery reader first and other genre next, I find that Parker usually gives me a break from the heavy writers like Wilson or Kerr.  In fact, that's the whole point. After reading a couple of Robert Wilson's books, I need to cleanse my palate with something that goes down easy, makes me laugh, maybe it's a little too watery but there's no calories, and I can finish it quickly and feel refreshed!If you don't like Spenser and his wisecracks, you're bereft of understanding the use of this type of dialogue in this type of story.  So, I'd advise you to go back to your old favs and let the rest of us enjoy the comedy with a little mystery thrown in for cause or is it the other way around?I agree that we'd like our PIs to be solitary and Spenser should be since he can't seem to clearly concentrate when there are boobs in the room and so many women in Parker's books appear flawless.  We know this is in Parker's head, cuz real life ain't that way!  But, we're taking a break from real life with Spenser, so we forgive a lot of shallowness and superficiality.We can't eat steak all the time without growing tried of it, so keep the juicy "cheesy" burgers coming Parker, I like the change-up
A wealth of gorgeous and practical suggestions for adding that special touch of vibrancy to their personal living space. The Decorating Idea Book offers the enterprising homeowner or apartment dweller a wealth of gorgeous and practical suggestions for adding that special touch of vibrancy to their personal living space. Full-color photographs on every page showcase the themes and coordination suggestions spelled out at length by the detailed text. Packed from cover to cover with innovative ideas for color, furniture, windows, walls, floors, ceilings, lighting, and storage, the Decorating Idea Book is an ideal resource for the "do-it-yourself" inclined who eschew paying out big money to professional decorators.
An invaluable tool for the Stirling Engine Designer. Allan Organ has written the most in-depth study of regenerators to date. The intense mathematical treatment is accompanied by graphs and tables that make understanding the inner workings of the regenerator fairly straight forward. Secondly, the book covers design by scaling in a very easily grasped manner that is interesting and useful to the engine designer as well as being interesting in it's own right. Thirdly the design process for a complete engine is worked through including stressing parts, sizing bearings and balancing . The book contains design drawings and dimensions from a selection of engines that is not available elsewhere. I have personally gotten a lot of inspiration from Allen's book and incorporated a few of his ideas into my own stirling engine design software
Theoretical universal AI. Solomonoff's famous inference model solves the inductive learning problem in a universal and provably very powerful way.  Many methods from statistics (maximum likelihood, maximum entropy, minimum description length...) can be shown to be special cases of the model described by Solomonoff.  However Solomonoff Induction has two significant shortcomings: Firstly it is not computable, and secondly it only deals with passive environments.  Although many problems can be formulated in terms of sequence prediction (for example categorisation), in AI in general an agent must be able to deal with an active environment where the agent's decisions affect the future state of the environment.In essence, the AIXI model, the main topic of this book, is an extension of Solomonoff Induction to this much more general space of active environments.  Although the model itself is very simple (it is really just Solomonoff's model with an expectimax tree added to examine the potential consequences of the agent's actions) the resulting analysis is now more difficult than in the passive case. While optimality can be show in certain senses, the powerful convergence bounds that Solomonoff induction has now appear to be difficult to establish.Like Solomonoff induction, AIXI also suffers from computability problems.  In the one of the final sections a modified version of AIXI is presented which is shown to be computable and optimal in some sense.  Practically this algorithm would be much too slow, but this is a clear step away from abstract models which can in theory be implemented.For anybody interested in universal theories of artificial intelligence this book is a must.  The presentation is quite technical in places and thus the reader should have some understanding of theoretical computer science, statistics and Kolmogorov complexity
Compelling. I came late to the Anne Heche party.  I loved her in Volcano (a schlocky movie) and only recently saw her in Six Days, Seven Nights which I surprisingly liked.  I have the hard-cover version of the book which has a different cover, and puts her in a more flattering light.Trained as a mental health professional, I must say I found the book well written from the perspective of a person recovering from the appalling abuse Anne suffered.  She is very candid and frank about the type of abuse she remembers.  Things get a lot more murky once she's famous and she basically glosses over Anne-n-Ellen.  That's too bad as that's why I bought the book at the bargain bin the bookstore.I must say she did a lot of kooky, goofy, potentially dangerous and desperate things.  I think she missed a lot of major points about her relationship with Ellen and how it related to her relationship to her mother, who is atrocious.  However, I will never look at Anne Heche the same way again, and I will always have empathy and support to give to her for her struggle which I'm sure is continuing up until this very day
A must for every educator. Every elementary school should have this book in the staff lounge for those "down" times when you need to see the humor in what is going on in and around the building
The most thorough analysis of the SAT and ETS to date. Mr. Owen operates on the Educational Testing Service--and its lackeys, the College Board--like a surgeon with a mission.  That mission is the truth:  ETS is a wolf in sheep's clothing.  The SAT--and aptitude testing in general--is a farce.  This is an object lesson that holds true to this day.  A must read for anyone considering taking the SAT.  (Or anyone PAYING for someone else to take it. Heads up, parents.
Great story. Great art. I normally avoid the cosmic/heaven-hell/angels-demons stuff like the plague, but the entire Preacher series got such good reviews, I bought the first one. Then the next 4, one-by-one. Then the last four, all at once. This series never gets bogged down in the major cosmic whatnot that seems to be the norm for some series. The characters are great, the storyline is great, and while the art isn't groundbreaking, it fits extremely well for the story.The only thing that would have made the series better, is if the main character was "Joseph Cohen," and the series was titled "Rebbe" (Rabbi). Everybody knows that yarmulkes and peyes are way cooler than a preacher's collar. Also, the fact that people like Kevin Smith and Penn Jillette write the forewords of this series gives a good indication of what kind of audience would enjoy this. Fantastic stuff
Spurgeon's Color Atlas of Large Animal Anatomy. I am a fourth year vet student and have found this book to be a great clinical reference book.  It is an especially useful tool for rectal palpation - an essential skill for any large animal practitioner to master.  I highly recommend Spurgeon's Atlas to anyone interested in large animal  anatomy
Eastern and Western medical wisdom. A collection of simple ways to improve the quality and quantity of your life, combining Eastern and Western medical wisdom
A godsend!. As a personal trainer and unfortunate lover of fast food (which I never eat but long for) this book was a godsend. The recipes are easy, and taste as close to the real thing as you are going to get. If your cooking skill ends with boiling water, then the recipes in this book may frustrate you, but to the average person, they are easy. I recommend this to anyone who loves fast food, but avoids it for the same reason I do...
Excellent read. This is a must-read for anyone considering home ownership.  I was able to learn many important things as well as pull together what I already knew.  In fact I nearly read the whole book the night I received it.  The book is also well written as the author is able to keep things flowing
Different Approach to Relationships. I used to think that if I just found the "perfect" way to do relationships, I would never get hurt or have my heart broken.Lewis counters that kind of thinking. Love is vulnerable, and you will get hurt, he says, and the only place you can fully escape from the "dangers and perturbations" of love is in Hell.This book helped me, and I hope it will help you, to break free from the mindset of seeking to avoid hurt in relationships, and replace it with a desire to truly love other people.We can never entirely avoid hurt or pain in relationships, but if we approach relationships with the mindset of avoiding pain, we will never experience the joy of true love.But I digress. Lewis explains it so much better than I ever could.This book's scope is not limited to one kind of relationship. It is the "Four Loves," after all. Four kinds of love...affection, friendship, eros, and charity.Lewis truly goes through the whole gammut of love. He covers what he calls the "likings and loves for the sub-human", simple affection for other people and family, the love that friends share, romantic love, and then God's love--the fullest expression of love.I think perhaps this is one of the best books on love and relationships (for the two are inexplicably bound up in each other) that I have ever read. I don't think you will be able to read this book without being changed
WAR ON THE HOME FRONT. The plot is very feasible considering the state of the world at present. Modern technology is advancing at such a rate that all the fancy gimmickry mentioned is feasible, however I don't fancy being in command of what can only be described as a one man tank!  I always enjoy his books
A Book Review of Tuck Everlasting by Tearinery Petersen. Tuck Everlasting by Natalie Babbitt. I thought this book was a beautifully written. Natalie talks about life and death. Tuck Everlasting is a book about everlasting life. It talks about the circle of life. Four people find water and they all drink it. Winnie meets Jesse. Winnie meets them all. She doesn't know how long she was there. A man came Mae hit him with a shotgun. Jesse came and gave Winnie the magical water. The man in the yellow suit is dead! Later Mae is out of jail. Will Winnie drink the water? The genre was fantasy, adventurous. The theme I liked was Winnie meeting Jesse. The theme I disliked was Mae going to jail and the man in the yellow suit trying to take Winnie away from Jesse. The one thing I thought was awesome was reading the book! I really love this book because it is romantic and enchanting book about love. Don't be afraid of death be afraid of the unlived life.
Fun Facts. My aunt (a teacher) gave this book to my son for last Christmas though barely 2.  He loves it!  What a great concept for a book!  It has simple graphics and a fun rhyme on the left side to help them remeber how to pronounce the bugs.  On the right it has interesting facts about them.  Each time we read it, we go through the rhyme and then sometimes spell it and/or learn a new fact about it.  I never try to read him the whole fact portion, just give him a morsel when he asks. It is easily still one of his favortie books to be read at night time and a book he likes to look through on his own
Interesting and original. This is the story of a graphic design class, except it really *is* a graphic design class. Our hero is enrolled in an art class at a state university, and the offerings are, at best, sleepy. Until Winter Sorbeck, graphic design teacher, strides into the narrative and wakes everyone up. The characterization of this charismatic, brutal teacher is no less than masterful, and also an interesting study in power and the dark sway of advertising ("you infect them with your obsessions").Chip Kidd has a sharp, sure way with language and tells the story of beleaguered art majors like no one has before. The only drawback is an inconclusive ending, a fizzled wreck that detracts from the rest of the story. Up until then, though, it's 5 stars
A1 material. really easy to read and understand, good use of plain english, it was even read by my boyfriend who is a bass player, and he learned a thing or two from it aswell, so its targeted at all level
It's A Keeper !. I wasn't sure that this was what I was looking for on my first pass through.  It didn't take long on my second time around to become thoroughly absorbed in each room.  The photography is great.  I've already been  inspired and thats just from looking at the pictures
This book tells it like it is!. This was a great read and the authors are to be commended for their research and honesty.  The women's organizations have become dishonest political organizations, bent on their own survival and which skew facts and figures in order to propagate the myth that women are still victims in our society in need of special protection.  Their organizations survival is dependent upon the success or failure of this myth and the book does a great job of exposing how these organizations twist and bend the truth to suit their own purposes.  The playing field has not only been leveled, it is tilting the other way!  I highly recommend this book for people who want to know the true facts regarding gender equality in this country
Great book. I really like this very simple to read and understand book. It is great for checking out what plants you want to plant.
Teaching Academic Esl Writing: Practical Techniques in Vocabulary and Grammar. I am vary satisfied with the quality of service and book condition. I received everything on time.I would rate this service as excellent.Thank you
Gazing into the mind's "I"?. Four centuries ago, Rene Descartes opined:  "I think, therefore I am."  In this one five word sentence he reduced all provable human phenomenon to the contours of one's imagination.In this book, Dan Dennett of Tufts University suggests that human awareness does not even extend to the limited contours proposed by Descartes.Instead of what he calls "Cartesian theatre" Dennett suggests that human cognition is nothing less than the accumulated evolutionary behavioral detritus of the millenia.  In other words we are not conscious sentient beings but rather the resultant "zombies" of evolution, sometimes fleeing sometimes fighting, sometimes feeding, sometimes mating but always in response to evolutionary imperative and never the result of anything more than the illusion of consciousness.In its own way, this book throws down the gauntlet to contemporary arrogance in much the same way Darwin did and Einstein did and Godel did, challenging easily held preconceptions and pointing us toward new inquiries and a new synthesis of reality.Those holding that Dennett is facile haven't actually read him; Those considering him repetitious or irrelevant haven't understood him; but interestingly enough, those disagreeing with him may nonetheless still be right
warm and fuzzy. I really enjoyed this book! As an Iranian, I loved getting a behind the scenes look at an Italian family and was struck by the universality of the experiences. This book, however, should come with a warning--the description of foods leaves the reader hankering for an Italian meal! Thank you Gina, for sharing your family and childhood with the rest of us
Good cop/murder story. The body of a beautiful woman is found, floating in Boston harbor, with the heart surgically removed. At first glance, it seems that a serial killer, christened Jack, by the press, has struck again, but lawyer Scott Finn and police detective Linda Flaherty are not so sure. What they can be sure of is that someone has gone to a lot of trouble to make it seem to be connected to the previous killings. The murdered woman was an old lover of Scott's which is why he's taking a personal interest, with his involvement increasing until he becomes a suspect in the case with incriminating clues left at his apartment. This is an intriguing story with connections to the underworld, huge business interests and lawyers looking to line their own pockets at everyone else's expense. Rather than the modern take on crime with intricate psychological motives, this has a lot of good old fashioned biffo, as was present in Mickey Spillane books and those of that genre, and I found it to be a very good read
How Is It Possible?!. How is it possible that after decades of writing vintage mysteries like "Dark Assassin: A Novel" - the great Anne Perry manages to make each more recent addition to her series (in this case, William Monk Novels) fresh, alive, and impossible to put down. One would think that by now, we've got William and Hester along with all the rest of her characters so "down" that these books would be excellent venues to substitute for sleeping aides to the chronic insomniac! But no. Ms. Perry will simply not allow it. Thank God...buy this book and all the rest. She is a keeper
Your Adolescent:  Emotional, Behavioral, and Cognitive Development from Early Adolescence Through the Teen Years by David Pruitt. After searching for years for more info about my son, I found much that was very beneficial in addressing his condition.  We've now been put in contact with an excellent center, where he will be properly diagnosed and have therapies offered to him
Whittaker strikes again!. The software community has been awaiting for a book like this.  It's a almost perfect intro to software security concepts.  Again, Whittaker keeps it low in pages and words.  In my opinion, the way books should be written (except ones purely theoretical).Once again Whittaker approachs is hands-on examples.  Even if some examples don't apply to modern software the idea behind you is to get you thinking.  I've applied the techniques in this book with extremely great results.
Lifesaver. I admit, at first I could feel my eyeballs melting from the pedantic aura that radiated from the Economy of Nature. The text followed a simple, formulaic method of teaching: each chapter began with a generalization, usually relating chapter concepts to a current issue, before dissecting the topic from the easiest to most difficult concepts. The material was essentially mathematical based on the graphs and equations normally associated with ecology, and the section on population growth is particularly helpful if you're a bit rocky with incorporating all the rates to calculate the net growth.It was boring, boring, boring, but it was concise and saved my arse on final exams. If you're taking intro bio, I would recommend this as supplementary reading. It's definitely not as wordy as the average bio textbook, but you'll learn loads more about ecology and the math involved isn't tricky. The formulas are explained well, so even if you find it challenging you'll get the hang of it in no time.
Practical models for Corporate Environmental Strategies. I bought this book while writing my under-graduation final project in "Corporate Environmental Strategies", which was later published in a Brazilian magazine called Industrial Ecology. The book changed the way I see environmentalism in a very important way: it made me stop discussing about the real state of the world and start worrying about improving it (in those times I had read 'The skeptical Environmentalist' by Bjorn Lomborg and 'The Ultimate Resource 2' by Julian Simon, which are great books in my opinion). I started to understand that the most important is not to define where we stand, but to make the world a better place.Graedel and Allenby propose practical and detailed strategies in order to 'green' the production process. They start the book with a really unbiased discussion about environmentalism and slowly provide the context for the introduction of environmental processes into the industrial world (full table of contents below). The text is written in a very clear and didactic way, and the technical terms are explained from A-Z.I strongly recommend this book for engineers, environmentalists, managers, biologists, and people who want to improve the world's environment.TABLE OF CONTENTS1. Humanity and Environment.2. The Industrial Ecology Concept.3. Technological Change and Evolving Risk.4. The Relevance of Biological Ecology to Technology.5. The Status of Resources.6. Society and Culture.7. Governments, Laws, and Economics.8. Industrial Product Design and Development.9. Industrial Process Design and Operation.10. Choosing Materials.11. Designing for Energy Efficiency.12. Product Delivery.13. Environmental Interactions During Product Use.14. Design For End of Life.15. An Introduction to Life-Cycle Assessment.16. The LCA Impact and Interpretation Stages.17. Streamlining the LCA Process.18. Using the Corporate Industrial Ecology Toolbox.19. Managing Industrial Ecology in the Corporation.20. Indicators and Metrics.21. Services, Technology, and Environment.22. Industrial Ecosystems.23. Metabolic and Resource Analysis.24. Systems Analysis, Models, and Scenario Development.25. Earth Systems Engineering and Management.26. The Future of Industrial Ecology.Appendix A: Electronic Solder Alternatives: A Detailed Case Study.Appendix B: Units of Measurement in Industrial Ecology.Glossary.Index.
Funny, Moving. A great memoir of Jesse Lee's Life.  The book is both funny and moving.  But in the end it seems rushed and like she just wants to end the book. All in all  I would highly recomend this book
A FEEL GOOD BOOK. This really is the best massage book I've ever read
The only Indian cook book that I use. After several failed attempts of making Indian food at home I bought a copy of Classic Indian Cooking.I was both surprised and delighted by the  results of the recipes that I have tried.The book explains everything in such an easy to understand way. In the other Indian cookbooks that I have tried either the ingredient list or the steps in the recipe itself seemed daunting. Each dish took a long time to compose. This is not the case with this book. I have found that I am able to put together several dishes and make a complete Indian meal.I am looking forward to trying many more of the recipe
It's for BEGINNERS. This is a book for those whose knowlege of 12 volt systems could be summed up as &quot;well, I know there's a battery in there somewhere!&quot;  If you already know how to use a multimeter, this book probably isn't for you.  Absolutely great for it's target audience, the rank newbie to boat electrical systems
Precise observation of nature. Published in 1987, this book contains page-length poems selected by the author.   You don't read these poems to get a story line, but rather a feeling of place.  With Ammons its the precise observation of nature  &quot;Bees stopped on the rock&quot;, or a &quot;Snow log&quot;.  There are  also mirrors of the self, &quot;of a life that did become&quot; in the poem  Easter morning.   In some ways, he is a modern Transcendentalist, looking  at nature, observing carefully, and looking even deeper.  I recommend this  book to anyone, and its a good introduction to Ammons
I actually became smarter after reading this book  ; ). The book offers a very broad and seemingly unrelated range of information.  You read, familiarize yourself with the theory of what is done in the field and afterwards it is very easy to apply the quite interesting information gotten from this book.  Inevitably, you would require some more practical (not necessarily detailed) information pertaining to more advanced projects.  In this case you will at least know what you are looking for and manage the time and project in a more professional manner
California Impressionism. Wonderful colors and plates. Inspirational to browse through or informative to read and digest. A good addition to any art library
Good Practical Advice. When I began this book, I found it elementary, having worked with a coach for 3 years and done a great deal of work in the area of personal development.  As I continued reading I began to &quot;get it&quot;.  The concept is that we all have the power to achieve our goals simplier than pursuing, by attracting.  Well worth the purchase for students of coaching and any one who wants to attain more with less effort
Clinton-Era Wake-Up Call. My only beef about this book is that I waited too long to purchase it.  It was written during the 2000 campaign, and meant as a tocsin for those times.  Who knows what a more powerful book the author could have produced after 9/11, increased government spending (by a Republican president!), and more of the same "political correctness" he writes about.Although I have not yet read it, I suspect he does so so in his second book, "Showdown," published in 2003.  He certainly spares neither Democrats or Republicans in "The Ten Things You Can't Say in America" (one of the "things you can't say" is that "there isn't a dime's worth of difference" between the two parties, a suspicion I've had ever since James Carville got engaged to Mary Matalin).  But "Ten Things" does suffer a tad from a lack of aging well, and a betting person might do well to invest in "Showdown", instead.As to Elder's philosophies,I find them well-reasoned and discussed.  While the first 2/3 of the book reads as an indictment to the "minority-focused" liberal, who might be shocked to see the sacred cows of affirmative action, multiculturalism, welfare, and others skewered by Mr. Elder's logic, the self-congratulating conservative might find themselves skewered themselves by the equally well-argued final third, which discusses abortion (Mr. Elder advocates access to it); legalization of drugs (he's for it); and the tendency of conservative politicians to want to legislate morality(he is against that, and muses at how that goes against the stated conservative goal to keep government out of our lives).I learned of "Ten Things" from a conservative publication, and expected it to simply trumpet my own values.  Instead, although I did learn better arguments for some of the things I believe, I did find myself challenged in areas often thought of as "liberal territory".  For these reasons I do recommend you listen to what Elder has to say, but be aware this book uses older, sometimes resolved arguments to help him do it.
Short but Sweet. Although not the longest of books, McKillip's The Changeling Sea will make a womderful addition to your bookshelf, as it has mine.McKillip's prose is as beautiful as ever, but considerably less dreamy, and a bit more straightforward. People who aren't used to McKillip would do well to start here; it makes a great introduction to her writing.Peri is, to say the least, likeable. I came to feel for her, and her troubles. I admire McKillip's ability to write believable, human characters. I can say this for Kir, Lyo, the woman who work at the inn, the king and the sea dragon as well. They're all loveable characters, although I liked Peri, Kir, and the sea dragon the most. Lyo  would have to be the ost comedic of the characters; I'll admit I laughed out loud a few times, which helped the story.So if you're like me, and anxiously waiting for Od Magic to come out, The Changeling Sea is definitley worthy of being read; I've got my McKillip fix for now. For newcomers, start here, and then move on to The Forgotten Beasts of Eld, Alphabet of Thorn, Ombria in Shadow....join ussss...=
A WONDERFUL BOOK. Relatively few works are likely to concretely impact the quality of our everyday life.  According to my opinion, and based on the experiment which I made of the practical tools described in this book, this one is one of them.Do not mislead you there, this work has nothing to do with the majority of the "doubtful" works devoted to breathing.In short, this remarkable book is a great classic, you will understand quickly why. I sincerely wish you to discover it soon.
Should be required for about 75% of us. A solution manual is a great thing to have in an undergraduate biochem class.All of the solutions are in the back section.The front of the book goes through each chapter and focuses on what the authors feel is most important.There are even suggested topics for discussion with your study group
On Cooking. This book is a huge help for anyone seeking more knowledge in the culinary arts area. It provides you with many tips on how to cook in high quanity. It also has many wonderful recipes!
A TRUE LEGEND NEVER DIES. I would just like to say that Tupac was a mentor to a alot of young people like myself. I have read every book that Tupac has written or an auto-biography.The words out of Tupac's mouth were definitely felt by all of his fans and successors. He had so much to say about alot of sensitive subjects that rarely ever get recognized... Therefore I am giving this and all his material five stars
This book is just what I needed. I've seen some bad reviews of this book, but those people must not have needed it as badly as I did. I found this book after working through my chronic yeast infection for a year.The authors make it relatively easy to start eliminating problem foods from your diet, working your way through the process as far as needed. I happen to be one of the 'bad' cases.  I can't even eat everything on the strictest level-- #4.The recipes are 'real', things that somebody with problems could eat.  Almost all the recipes are uncomplicated (only a few being detailed), many very easy, and straightforward.  Many could be considered 'fast food' if you have a crockpot or can handle leftovers remade. Many recipes help you understand how much of certain fresh herbs to use, too.This book is valuable for those who are serious about this topic.  I appreciate it very much
Excellent. I have to come to the defense of Martha Grimes on this book in view of the many detractors. Having read all of her Richard Jury mysteries I was glad to see a new one after what seemed like a long time. Jury is , of course up to his usual dark gloomy, melancholy ruminations, but, that is to be expected. It is for the excellent plots and characterization of  others in the story that keeps me coming back and in this book, Grimes has not let me down. Tho a little short on the Long Pid menagerie's appearance (Plant excepted) her portrayal of the adult interactions with children is superb! Loved every line of it and as a Grandpa I can attest to it's accuracy and entertainment value.Though dark in subject matter the outcome was especially satisfying and Jury's actions and "detecting" were again suberb. Contrary to some of Grime's Jury novels, this one left me feeling satisfied at the en
Zany illustrations accompanying whimsical poems. Siebold's zany illustrations accompany whimsical poems by Wilbur which combine plays on words with instructions about language. Kids receive some fun lessons on word usage along with some fun images representing the best of fantasy
A Wonderful Treat. There is something for everyone in O'Carroll's writing.  If you read and enjoyed "The Mammy" then don't wait another minute before reading "The Chisellers."O'Carrol writes another splendid narrative of the adventures of Agnes Browne and her children.  This book, like The Mammy, will cause you to laugh and will almost bring you to tears at other times.The only downside of this book is that it is over too quickly.  Thank goodness there is still another one in the series to read
Noteworthy English mystery. Peter Robinson's "A Dedicated Man" is a thoughtfully constructed murder mystery conducted by Chief Inspector Alan Banks.  Banks has fairly recently abandoned the hubbub of London to become situated with family in tow in the small Yorkshire hamlet of Eastvale.  His peaceful bucolic existence is shattered upon the discovery of a partially buried male corpse in the fields outside the neighboring village of Gratly.The victim is identified is ex-university professor Harry Steadman.  Steadman whose specialty was industrial archaeology retired from teaching after acquiring a large family inheritance and purchased a house in the countryside town of Gratly.  Steadman and his wife Emma had vacationed at the house he bought going back for about ten years.  The former owner's son Michael Ramsden now a publisher living in York was a frequent and regular companion of Steadman's in his forays around the countryside to explore local archaeologic sites.Banks with help from local authorities canvassed the local inhabitants trying to determine Steadman's habits and foibles to uncover the identity of the murderer.  Sally Lumb, an attractive 16 year old aspiring actress has taken a particular interest in the crime.  Dissatisfied with Banks' efforts she sets out to solve the mystery herself.  When during the course of the investigation Sally turns up missing the inquest gets elevated to a much more intense level.Banks persistently evaluates the scanty clues and probes the psyches of the local suspects until solves the mystery.  His solution is both believeable and not entirely unexpected.  The means that Banks uses to arrive at the solution are nicely construed by Robinso
So glad it found me!. I probably wouldn't have bought this had I known it was a short story collection but I'm SO glad I did.As with any short story collection, there are highlights and lowlights, but in this one there are very few lowlights and the vast majority of the stories are 4 and 5-star reads.Highly recommended.
Zillionaire's Bumpy Romantic Road Hit Home to Many!!. 1.8 years ago, I took a close look at Tom Perkins as I covered his plenary discussion at the BIO 2004 conference in San Francisco as a newspaper reporter. He was very charismatic and gracious, and even a word "Well..." exhibited how sexy he really was. At that time, I didn't really calculate his age, but was recently stunned to learn he is 74 when I read the book review of this book in the New York Times.Although he lives in a different material world from mine, his novel describing the main character Steven's struggle to find the right woman and the series of disappointments hit home. I was surprised to read his line "I am still looking for Jessie" in Acknowledgments.His acute observation towards Jessie, the executive producer of the reality TV, was very informative to me about what a charismatic man like Tom Perkins would look for in a life partner. Bravo to his friendship dedicating his book to Danielle Steel, an editor of the book and his "amicably" divorced ex-wife.
A great realistic overview. A very &quot;down-to-earth&quot; realistic overview of life with adult children in today's world and the challenges and victories we face together.  The first 35 pages don't contain a lot of &quot;meat&quot; so skip over it or hang in there for the best part.  Great suggestions,ideas, true stories, and loads of encouragement for both parents with struggling or &quot;successful kids.&quot; Some of my favorities: specific examples of how to talk to your kids that would be more effective and get good results such as the chapter &quot;Six Characteristics of a Nice No&quot;, another great chapter, &quot;Dumb Decisions&quot; (theirs) which weaves the Prodigal Son throughout, and the last two chapters which focus on reparenting the adult child and passing on the truth. This book is an easy-read and helpful no matter what your situation
For everyone who has ever had a product to sell... Pam Danziger has a clear understanding of the realities of today's marketplace and the trends for the future. She explains clearly and succinctly just how businesses can reap their share of the nearly 42% of spending Americans devote to discretionary items, backing it up with statistics and quotes from highly reliable sources.  Examples throughout the book include the good, the bad and the ugly in manufacturing and retailing today.  Far from merely promoting a simplistic &quot;feel good&quot; mentality, Danziger conveys an understanding of the various types of buyers, the justification they need to make their purchases, and how suppliers can deliver that message.  Her observations speak volumes:  &quot;The consumer's feelings often may have more to do with the act of purchasing than with the object.&quot;  This is a must-have marketing reference to read and re-read and then implement to reach your maximum sales potential
Monsters in the Museum. I happened to discover this book on a dusty old bookshelf in a basement. The plot sounded interesting, and I began reading it as an experiment.I was immediately swept away. Preston and Child have an elegant, descriptive writing style reminiscient of classic leiterature- even whern they're writing about a brain-eating monster attacking a S.W.A.T. team. The action is fluid and gripping, and the story itself is extremely suspenseful. The ending leaps right off the page and slaps you in the face.This book introduced me to Preston and Child, and I've since bought every single book these two have produced. Pick this one up- it's well worth the cash
A Great Translation. Jesse Byock's translation of the Vlsungasaga manages to be both faithful and readable (not as common a combination as you might think), and it strikes a nice balance in its use of only the most important footnotes (a little more than 100 over the course of the saga). These are usually etymological / onomastic in nature, which was very much to my liking. I would have preferred them to be actual footnotes rather than end notes, actually, but that's just a quibble about having to flip back and forth while reading. Not a big problem, really. The slim volume also packs a great deal of essential historical context into a small but excellent introduction. There's also a nice glossary of most of the proper nouns, and this connects the Anglicized spelling with the original Old Norse forms, which can be helpful for those readers unfamiliar with the orthography. A great edition of an Old Norse classic
Among Merton's Finest Books!. I commend New Directions for issuing a facsimile reprint of the original  of this valuable book.  Who would not say that here is a publishing company  of enduring and impeccable taste?  I have a copy of the original cloth  bound book- it is beautiful, and easily one of my top twenty favorite  books.  I believe this is the book that comes most surely from Merton the  poet.  His consideration of the Psalms is inspired; the language in this  book is as severe and ecstatic as are the Psalms themselves, and his  insight into their relevance is without peer.  The brevity of Merton's  exposition is part of its potency.  Nothing is wasted.  Like the Psalms  themselves, the veins of this book run deep in kingly rivers, announcing  the heart of God like a morning song.  Merton's interior acquisition of  that song is of epic intensity, yet simple as clean water.  I believe  &quot;Bread in the Wilderness&quot; surpasses even &quot;Seeds of  Contemplation&quot; in directness, common heart, and indeed artistic  beauty.  It's an indescribably beautiful book that moves, aches and rocks,  and leads one, ultimately, to the inmost core of revelation, which is,  after all, believability.  Merton's references to the Psalms can be traced  like a monk's thread throughout all of his writing, from the earliest books  up through the posthumously published Journals.  This book gives us a clear  understanding of how constantly faithful Thomas Merton remained not only to  the brilliant song of the Psalms themselves, but to the music of his own  exceeding heart.  And the woodcut Christ on the cover is so unfailingly  Cistercian!  This is a book that will live forever
Placing a value on knowledge. When Adam Smith was writing about economics back in 1776 he was right in that the basics of the economy was 'labor, capital and land.' At that time there was little  else. But since that time the technological advances that have been made are so huge that the old ideas of 'labor, capital and land' are inadequate.Consider, for instance, the value of Microsoft. What they really sell in the nature of a product is the arrangement of a bunch of bits of data. The operating system or the word processor has a reproduction cost of near zero compared to the selling price.The ability of the economics profession to value such developments has been slow to come about. This book, written by an economics columnist for the Boston Globe is a popularized treatment of some of the thinking that is taking place.A very interesting few pages here and there through out the book refer to the oil industry. It is interesting to consider what will happen to the whole economic world, both practical and theoretical as the price of oil increases over the coming years. Can this new concept of the value of knowledge predict what will happen
filing organization. Very motivating and easy to follow.  Lot's of good ideas.  I'm trying the system, and so far it's workin
funny, insightful, and an easy read... George Sessions Perry's Hold Autumn in Your Hand is a classic piece of Texas literature. He writes in a style that allows the reader to whiz through the pages, and makes you fall in love with the characters and their problems.Sam Tucker is a hardworking and decent tenant farmer during the Depression. He is trying to get his family out of the duldrums they have found themselves in the last few years. He finally gets some luck when he is allowed to farm a piece of land that has enough acreage to make a profit. With one neighbor helping him every step of the way and another trying to thwart his attempts to prosper, Sam is able to use his optimism and will power to succeed as a tenant farmer during the Depression.I loved the story pertaining to his neighbors cow, along with his quest to catch the giant fish (one hilarious and the other filled with mixed emotions). There are some classic characters riddled throughout Hold Autumn in Your Hand (the grandma for example) and some funny scenarios, which make this a must read for anyone. Everyone enjoy
Very Handy Review Grammar. This is a thorough review of intermediate Italian grammar.  The material is presented in tabular form for quick review, but is more comprehensive and detailed than the format would first suggest.  Also, Signora De Rome includes numerous subtleties not found in standard American beginning and intermediate Italian texts, which have been considerably dumbed down in recent years.  I had to study in Italy for a while to learn some of this stuff.  Wish I'd had Soluzioni then
Excuse Me Your Life Is Waithing: The Asthonishing  Power of Feelings. Well here it is, after many years of searching I found this book several years ago. This book  not only tells you HOW to change your life, but shows you how too. It does not matter what religion you are a part of   because it will not interfere. If you really wat to change your life.... Get this Book. I continually buy and give this book to people who are ready
The Perfect Read. I loved this book. Not just a book for horse people and racing fans, but a true human interest story. He dosen't leave out any of the glory or the agony a rider of his caliber endures. I felt like I was in the race myself, following his narration. Stevens dosen't pull any punches. It is a very honest and inspiring tale
Excellent for Discussion. This is a book that supplies more examples than just "what it is" when dealing with ethics. There is so much here that occurs in important decisions either we or our friends and relatives encounter regularly, that I recommend it to anyone who wants to have a dialogue with another person, or a group of people. It especially lends itself to group discussion. As a teacher, I borrowed from "Ethics for Everyone" to bring out something from each of my students in discussion--including the "quiet ones." It's not necessarily that it's a textbook; it was not written that way, but it can be a text or just good reading for thinking and kicking it around with your friends
A must read for all who plan to self publish. Written in his engaging yet informative style, Peter Bowerman's Well-Fed Self Publisher (WFSP) represents yet another generous gift to the writing community. The WFSP is not only a pleasure to read but sets forth in clear, step-by-step directions, the many small but important tasks that one must do, not just to self-publish a book (plenty of books on the how-to logistics of that), but to do it profitably. There's even a section at the end that has a time line to make sure you are on track with everything. It's a rare blend of compelling read and reference book--you won't have to waste your time or money on any other self-publishing book. Really.I also highly recommend the Biz-in-a-Box materials that accompany the book (available through his wellfedsp site). The price is about $20-$30 depending on how you buy them, but frankly, he's way undercharging for them. You'd have to pay a marketing person thousands to create the same.And if you write for a living and worry about making your mortgage payment, do yourself a favor and get his two other Well-Fed Writer books--today if possible.
the original classic text on glass fusing. Gil Reynolds is one of the best teachers of fused glass. He writes a clear and thorough text for the beginner, but this book also has very useful information for the more advanced glass fuser.  I consider it to be one of  the top three books on fusing
Much more of a book than I ever thought. My wife and I recently read this book to our young children.  Neither of us had ever read it as children.  Our children loved hearing the story of the "real" Bambi and were sad on the nights we were unable to read to them from it.  Bambi was written not just for children and when you understand the author was a Jew who fled Nazi persecution in early 20th Century Europe, it gives you a better understanding of, and appreciation for, the underlying tones. It should also be noted that this book was banned by the Nazis because the author's ancestry.  So you may enjoy reading a "banned" book, both for you and/or your child.  Our children loved the story.  Although some of the material is a little violent for very small children, our children were able to deal with it okay.  The story contains much more than just childrens themes, such as growing up and becoming independent.  It also has the theme of equality, and not ever thinking of oneself as inferior to others just because they might have more power than you or your group.  I am very grateful that my wife and I were able to read this to our children and share the experience with them.  I was also grateful to learn about the author and what he went through in his lifetime.  It is a book that you should most definitely consider sharing with your child/children
Phenomenal work which will challenge sophisticated readers. Cristina Peri Rossi's work is thought-provoking treatise on exile and isolation whose metaphor resonated with me. The language is sophisticated and engaging, while at the same time evocative of the sparseness and  detachedness at the novel's core. This is an impressive work which has  established the author as an important new voice, not only for those  interested in Latin American literature or women authors, but for anyone  interested in perspectives which push the envelope of the literary canon.  If you are interested in being challenged, read this boo
Long, Lugubrious Journey to Justice. Gerry Spence, self-described Wyoming "Country Lawyer," has a lot to teach - his book on OJ's criminal trial, "O.J. The Last Word: the Death of Justice" is the definitive work on that Circus, and his fictional Half-Moon and Empty Stars is Dead On.In Smoking Gun, his day by day play by play memoir of a murder trial, Gerry has set forth a sometimes brilliant bible on How to (or in the case of the State/prosecution - how Not to) Try a Case, Voir Dire (jury pickin') etc - but at times it is laborious wading through the chaff to get to the kernels at the heart of the wheat here.  In the end, Truth and Justice are one and won, justice prevails, truth triumphs, and everyone lives happily ever after - or not. /TundraVision, Amazon Reviewe
Awesome Book. This book was wonderful.  After I started reading it I could not put it down.  It was 5:00 in the morning and I still could not stop reading it.  I took my son to school then came back home and finished the book.  I missed a night of sleep because I could not stop reading it.  I recommend this book and any other book she had written
It will help to change my way to handle my people. This book help you to change or remain your way to handle your people.It is depends on the people talent to improve our way to react to any sisutations facing to daily business life. We will understand that each people have a different things in their talent.
Hopefully this book will find  many readers. Please let the "fundamentalists" of the three monoteistic religions (Moslims, Christians and Jews) read this book.YHVH, Jehova, Jahwe, Allah, the Europaens call it GOD - they are all the same when you see them under the monotheistic impression. What we call GOD today was formed from the characteristics of many other "gods" to give us a monotheistic point of view.   A character -  so schizophrenic-  as our fundamentalists are, who influence politics now.      Why are we fighting about the "true" religion? Kill each other in the name of this Warlord?It reminds us to the prayers before  battle.  The Christian priest/pastors/preachers, etc. were all praying before the fight. Poor Lord,  how could he handle that situation?  Whom would he help?  YHVH only helped the Israelites (he was their tribal Lord!)  They were not allowed to take lifes, but when he went to war as a leader they killed many thousands.  This is insane.To whom did the British, French, German, Russian soldiers pray?  To the warlord of the Old Testament?  Even Jesus could not help them, he was a Jewish man. And a wise man! His  message was de-formed by the apostle Saulus/Paulus to a kind of religion which we should not call Christianity. Call it Paulinism.Here now comes P. von Ward, and we really should take his thoughts serious.  Let us go away from narrow minded religous belief, which only brought crusades, wars and a kind of neurotic behavior.  We must discuss religion again. We must become free from that God Spell (read Freer)!It is time to understand how we became the species of homo sapiens sapiens. Thanks, but NO Thanks to our creators (Anunnaki et. al. ) They did not teach us, that they were not the transcendental gods. But we are still devoted to them - what a mess
Another Excellent Black and White Photography Book. The last of a three book series, this volume provides comprehensive instructions detailing the developing process.  Chapters on mounting and displaying photographs are at the books end completing the readers education.  This book written by Ansel Adams, made famous for his B&amp;W photographs, will disapoint any reader interested in the art of color photography.  This three book collection is a must for any B&amp;W photographer
Beautiful Book. This is a powerful and beautiful retelling of this story. This book is written in Spanish and in English and anyone interested in Latino storytelling will buy this book for their collection.  I also highly recommend DRUM, CHAVI, DRUM! by Cuban author, Mayra L. Dole, and TRINOS CHOICE, by Chicana author Diane Bertrand
A Beautifully Written and Inspiring Story. ..."I am working, Juanico," was his answer. "Working, by looking." I did not understand and so I held my tongue, thinking that this was what he meant me to do with his cryptic answer. But a week or more later, he spoke to me as if I had put my question but a moment before, answering, "When I sit and look at something I am feeling its shape, so that I shall have it in my fingers when I start to draw the outline. I am analyzing the colors, too. For example, do you see that piece of brocade on the chair? What color is it? "Blue," I answered promptly. "No, Juanico. There is a faint underlay of blue, but there is violet in that blue, the faintest touch of rose, and the highlights are red and bright green. Look again." It was magical, for suddenly I could see them, the other colors, just as he said. "The eye is complicated. It mixes the colors for you," explained Master. "The painter must unmix them and lay them on again shade by shade, and then the eye of the beholder takes over and mixes them again." "I should like to paint!" I cried out in my joy at this revelation...This is the book my 3rd and 4th grade students are reading. It is an inspiring story about relationships. Truth and fiction are intertwined...Velazquez is a famous Spanish painter, Juan de Pareja was a slave Velazquez inherited from his aunt's estate. The reader is taken on a profound journey through the 17th century, and introduced to many colorful and intriguing characters--characters who are very real in their familiar human qualities. The story is beautifully and vividly written. You can't help but come to love, appreciate, and admire Juan de Pareja and Diego Velazquez. Every sentence is full of rich language taking you step by step down a  path of adventure and discovery. The inspiration from this book has brought forth "oooh's" and "aaah's" as we look forward to viewing the paintings by Velazquez and Rubens at the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C.
The Analects of Patton. Axelrod gleans Patton's speeches and writings to distill what he believed to be Patton's philosophy of leadership. He also includes a few memoirs of Patton by those who knew him personally. Axelrod sets out each anecdote or saying in boldface and then gives a brief commentary on what he believes Patton meant by the statement. For the most part, the commentaries are superfluous. You could completely dispense with them except for the fact that they sometimes contain additional statements by and anecdotes about Patton.Patton emerges as a talented but flawed leader. Contrary to his reputation as &quot;Old Blood and Guts,&quot; he was a humane commander who truly cared for the welfare of his troops. His statement that he'd rather waste ammunition than lives pretty well sums it up.The book is well organized, entertaining, and informative on the subjects of both leadership and military history.
great book for kids. This book is derecated to kids on there frist day in the bus
The Journey of Man: A Genetic Odyssey. If you have ever questioned where Adam and Eve started and how planet  earth was populated this is a must read. Doctor Wells located the oldest Africans he could find,took blood samples, then using his DNA knowledge,  produced DNA markers. He continued this process around the world and by examining the DNA markers he could determine the path of primitive people and where they started. He produced a readable technical book that leaves the lay person with a clear understanding of where we started and where and when the first Adam and Eve left the trees and stood up on two feet.
Good Foundation. Rule One is a nice introduction to the Warren Buffet (Benjamin Graham) philosophy of investing, and is written in a way that is much more easily understood than Security Analysis and more to the point than any of the numerous "buffettology" type of books.Town talks a great deal about a company having a "moat", and gives the reader five metrics to examine when deciding whether a company's stock is worth purchasing.  The "moat" analogy didn't really work for me, but the principles behind it seem very sound.  If you're thinking about investing in a mature company, by all means do your homework and follow Town's rules.In addition to the "moat", Town runs through his price calculations several times so that the reader can get a handle on how to do it.  Town exaggerates when he claims that the work can be done in just a few minutes a week, but once you've done a few calculations and bookmark the websites where some of the numbers are available, the calculations are simple.  There is some judgement to be used when deciding what numbers to use, but it's pretty straightforward and incorporates a margin of safety element.If you are an individual investor who plays the stock market or even one who sticks to mutual funds, give the book a read.  At the very least, the cautious approach will probably prevent you from losing money
This is the story of the Clintons BEFORE 1993. The American people were forewarned long ago that this was no ordinary (if there could be such a description) political couple.  James B. Stewart delineates the machinations that typified the Clinton story throughout Bill Clinton's Arkansas governorship.  Now a lot of this is intertwined with the peculiarities of Arkansas society, where it seems everybody knows everybody else (no offense to many decent Arkansans; much of my family hails from there).  And this may be why Kenneth Starr was not able to find solid evidence of wrongdoing, although he obtained several convictions of Clinton associates.  Yet to many of us Whitewater was a real-estate deal a sitting state Attorney General and later Governor would not touch with a ten- or even a twenty-foot pole.  And that goes double for Castle Grande, cattle futures and Madison Guaranty Trust.  Under other circumstances an office holder would have put his or her assets into a blind trust.  This intrigue has continued into Bill Clinton's Presidency and beyond (White House coffees, stayovers in the Lincoln Bedroom, selling of sensitive technological information for campaign contributions, selling of pardons, the sneaking of antiques out of the White House, the financing of the Chappaqua house purchase and Hillary Rodham Clinton's registry with several department stores in the manner of an expectant bride--note that for her actual wedding in 1975, she bought her wedding dress off the rack at Dillard's the day before).  And those are just the FINANCIAL intrigues!
the worst naval disaster in US history. Compelling story of the USS Indianapolis, the ship that carried the atomic bomb to Tinian. On their way back from their mission, they are attacked by the Japanese, and the ship sinks. No one knows where they are, and they are not listed as being out--they are floating in the open sea, and fall prey to sharks, and in some cases, their own madness. Only 317 crew members were alive at the end of their five day ordeal.It's a book of courage, and a testament to the sailors. It's also a damming account of the ineptness of the US Navy in the worst naval disaster in US history
Maybe more pertinent now than when published. When this book was first published about six years ago, many reviewers on Amazon.com really ripped it up.  I'd be curious to see their opinions now that their impressive "retirement" portfolios are worth next to nothing and they're looking for work--that they can't find.It's a fine philosophy, but it depends on who the reader is.  Pollan isn't right about everything.  For example, he claims that non-cash gifts aren't subject to gift tax.  Not exactly.  And his ideas about getting to know the manager of your bank branch personally are quaint at best.  In my experience, bank branch managers last a few months at most.  I also don't understand his recommendation to lease instead of buy cars; leases are generally designed to rip people off.But, that said, the idea of not retiring, of working so you can have a life, is right on.  I suspect after the upheavals of the last few years, more people are likely to agree with him and see validity in his ideas.HOWEVER, like so many of these books, it's essentially an interesting ten-page essay expanded into a book.  If you think you're going to work at a job for 40 years, then spend a few years shuffling around the golf course waiting for death, buy it and read it.  If that scenario strikes you as a dead-end fantasy, you're probably already with the program
Laugh out Loud !. Another Rita Mae masterpiece.  Jutz &amp; Wheezie once again square off with dynamic and often hysterically funny exchanges.  The touching part is that their love for one another always shines through.  Cora continues with  her compelling wisdom, Ramelle with her gentleness and charm.  A must read  if you enjoyed Six of One and Bingo
Sweet little gift book. If you are looking for an (art-)historical study on Milagros, go for the excellent little book by Martha Egan (also available at Amazon.com). The short (6 pages) introduction on the history of Milagros in this book is based on the book by Martha Egan.This colourful, nicely presented book focuses on the role that (making) milagros could play in your own life (I find it a bit 'New Agey', but not too much). There are five chapters in this book, each divided into three parts (body, mind, spirit). Every chapter covers a part of our body:1. the head ('knowing is wisdom'),2. the heart ('how we love'),3. the hand ('your hands connect you to others'),4. the foot ('your feet support your journey through life'),5. the mouth ('our words are as good as our deeds').About half of its 95 pages are filled with full page Mexican style artwork. Small photographs of traditional Milagros are scattered throughout the text.In each chapter the author gives her view on the symbolical meaning a Milagro depicting this specific body part could have: its meaning for our body, for our mind, and for our spirit. She illustrates this with anecdotes from Mexican daily life: the 'mouth' chapter tells how a mother's offering mouth milagros to the Virgin Mary led to a cure of her son's deformed jaw (Yes! It is - after all- a book on miracles).The book ends with a chapter on how to make your own milagros. Another reviewer already expressed his (or was it her?) anger at the simplicity of the author's suggestions: cutting out a picture from a magazine and laminating it. If you really would like to make your own milagros, you will get enough ideas from the rest of the book. I believe this chapter was added just for those of us who are convinced (rightly so or not), that they have no creative talents whatsoever. So that even those among us who can barely hold a pair of scissors, can make their own little miracle workers.To sum it all up: there is not very much substance here. But it IS a cheerful, well-meaning little book on how to find hope and comfort in small things, and how to introduce some (home made) miracles into your life. I liked it. It will make a lovely gift for someone who could use some cheering-up, whether this will be a friend, or yourself.
Excellent political thriller set in another solar system. Traviss's background as a journalist and familiarity with the military adds authority to this depiction of Royal Marines and other humans interacting with four different sapient races. However, this doesn't mean this is typical military SF. There is tension, but little violence, at least by the humans. Also, as a previous reviewer noted, environmental issues are central to this series. Third in the series, this book maintains the first two books' uniformly high quality and continues the high drama of flawed individuals trying to do what's right. While the series reportedly will continue in other books, in this book it reaches a satisfying conclusion; and while reading the first two would make it easier to follow the action, Traviss gives enough backstory so that a newcomer can pick up the thread
An Enjoyable and Charming Read that has Earned its Place Among the Classics. When Professor von Hardwigg discovers an ancient parchment suggesting a journey to the center of the Earth is possible, he wastes no time dragooning his dubious nephew and ward, Harry, into an expedition, first to Iceland, and then into the Earth.  Harry, a young man, sees no good that can come of this expedition, but dutifully agrees.So begins one of the most beloved classics of science fiction ever published, Jules Verne's "A Journey to the Center of the Earth".  I'm hardly a Verne expert, but I've read many of his other classics.  "Journey" is unique among his work.  It's one of the few books to feature a first person narrator in the form of Harry.  Moreover, unlike his other books, "Journey" is less grounded in science and more interested in the fantastic.  Verne, through his various characters, slyly implores his readers' indulgence, reminding us that there is plenty about the center of the world we don't know.Verne was an author who dealt in archetypal characters.  From "20,000 Leagues Under the Seas" on, Verne generally concentrated on three types of characters as his protagonists:  the brilliant and calm professor; the professor's loyal apprentice, and; the non-scientific, cantankerous, pragmatic, but steadfast man of action.  Here, Verne mixes and matches these traits, making for a more interesting cast.  Hardwigg is a brilliant scientist, but he's also a ball of barely restrained emotion and energy, demanding his fellow travelers press on, perhaps beyond all reason.  The man of action, the Icelandic Hans, is loyal, but by no means cantankerous.  He simply does what must be done, and is unsteady in his loyalty.  Finally, Harry, rather than the unquestioning apprentice, is quite skeptical of this expedition.  Hardly steadfast, he proves to be quite cowardly and panics at inopportune times.  Thus, with these interesting characters in the mix, the plot of the novel proves frequently unpredictable.While the premise is fantastic, the action of the novel is far less concerned with monsters that might be found at the center of the earth than the more realistic, albeit more mundane, threats of natural disaster.  Rather than being chased by dinosaurs or hidden cave-men, our heroes must deal with being lost, the threat of starvation, underground lakes, exhaustion, and exposure.  Naturally, just as all hope seems lost for our heroes, fortune takes a hand.  Obviously, if Harry is narrating, they probably get out okay.  Still, there are some moments of true white knuckle tension, as Harry is lost in the caverns, or the trio finds itself on a raft with only a piece of jerky as their food-supply.Wisely, Verne lets the scientific explanations he used as the basis of his other novels go here.  He's less interested in giving his reader an education in the latest discovery, and concentrates instead on a great rip-roaring read.  Admittedly, the conventions of Victorian-era fiction don't always allow the book to rip or roar.  The first third of the book is actually dedicated to getting Harry and the Professor to Iceland and recruiting an expedition.  It's more of a travelogue than an adventure tale, which makes the book more realistic, although not consistently exciting.  Once our heroes are underground, however, the book takes off.In the grand scheme of things, "A Journey to the Center of the Earth" is probably not my favorite Verne book.  It lacks a remarkable character, like Captain Nemo.  It also lacks some of the sharper satire Verne brought to his other books, like "From the Earth to the Moon."  It doesn't quite have the pacing of "Around the World in 80 Days."  Nonetheless, it is an enjoyable and charming read, and certainly has earned its place among the classics.
Excellent!. This book is one of my favorites.. even though it's a pretty big book, I read it in one day because I couldn't stop to put it down!  Since then, I've read it 3 or 4 times.  I definitly reccomend this book, and I can't wait until the movie comes out
Good (pocket sized) Introduction to Cisco Routers. Very much an introductory book to both Cisco Routers and networking. If you want a toe in the water this is the book for you; also ideal for those in IT Management who are not in the technological front line. Priced OK, too
A Strangely Good Group of Stories. First off, the title of this book is a little misleading. Dark Delicacies is not a trip into fantastic eroticism, vampiric tales of obscene delight, or anything in the vein of goth. This book carries the name of a book shop, nothing more, that is known for carrying only horror books and other such things dealing with the occult, with Del Howison as the proprietor of this shop as well as co-editor of this book.After I learned as much, I found myself diving deep into the terror-tales in this book, and no book in recent years has opened up as good as this. Ray Bradbury's tale is an intricate, circling story that really introduces what can be expected from the other tales in this book. What is great about this book is that it covers all ranges of horror, from the hack-and-slash to the psychological, and most of them are successful in there attempts to elicit a chill. And, along with Ray Bradbury, there are quite a few high-powered writers contributing their talent to this book, including Clive Barker, Chelsea Quinn Yarbro, Ramsey Campbell, Nancy Holder, and Richard Matheson, and those are the ones I've heard of before. While I hesitate to say what some of the stories are about, I will say that of the 20 tales (I've read 15), I was only disappointed maybe twice. Not once did I feel exploited, though, which is something very important to me when I read horror. These stories are smart, as well as scary.Because of that reason, I have to recommend this book above all other short story collections this year that relates to horror or dark fantasy. Often, I pick up a best of collection and realize that only four or five of the tales actually appeal to my tastes. Not with this one. If you love old-fashioned horror written by some of the fields masters, then get Dark Delicacies
&quot;A Highly Polished Mind&quot;. Reflections presents for the reader the great range that Benjamin had as a writer, critic and occidentalist. This collection further demonstrates Benjamin's acute awareness of the literature  of his time, as evidenced by his essay on 'Surrealism', which is as fine a reflection on its themes as the manifestos of Andre Breton. Furthermore, his writings and conversations with Bertolt Brecht show Benjamin to be very close to the thinking of the author himself. Also included is his celebrated essay on Karl Kraus,&quot;the Jewish Swift of Vienna&quot;. But what I like most about this collection are the amorphisms and autobiographical sketches of 'Marseilles' and 'One-way Street'. In his images of Marseilles Benjamin creates an &quot;exegesis of the city&quot; that is as fine as any poet could offer; spellbinding, acute, and beautiful. As well, his wit and insight into social phenomena is detailed in 'One-Way Street', and also in the piece on Moscow, which lets the western reader experience a rare witnessing of the Russian city in the years after the Revolution in a way that recalls Dziga Vertov. Finally, the inclusion of several pieces of Benjamin's philosophical-theological speculations show that he was a man of great breath and wisedom, and further showcase the wide range of his highly polished mind
The Conservative's Bible. Kirk's book is supposedly the bible of Conservatives. Not neo-conservatives, but Conservatives. He sets up the long standing debate between the French, and Voltaie, and the English, using Burke as it's spokesman Supposedly Kirk would limit the vote, have a professional class of government officials, reduce if not eliminate most taxes, and let each individual strive for success. This is the basic mantra of classical conservatives, and is all well and good as far as it goes, but only a few of the many ever succeed this way. One of the surprises is how young Kirk was when this book was written; it's as if he had some inspiration for on high (probably not), or was cherry picking history (probably closer to the truth).After reading this book I had a better understanding of where the Conservatives are coming from, althohgh I still don't understand why an obscure Royalist politician from the 18th century should be their flag bearer. Royality as a form of government most likely will never occcur in the US, although we seem to flirt with it from time to time.Conservatives seem not admit of a meritotocracy, as we currently have in the US: they would rather rely on accidents of birth, cronyism and college organizations to select administrators, rather than people who have succeeded in other venues. A very informative, albeit frightening, book.
what I said to my 4 kids. I have read about 3 books a month for the last 30 years. Of all my reading, Respectful Parents Respectful Kids is by far the most comprehensive book on the subject. Each page is filled with things that I have said to my four children while raising them that I wish I had said differently. I, like all parents recognize that we make many mistakes and regret things we have said and done in raising our children. If I would have had this book as a primer for raising my children I could have been much more understanding and loving in the way I raised them. My deepest desire is for every parent, grandparent, teacher, child educator, day care employee to read, take in, and live this book. If five percent of those educating our children would come from the consciousness this book speaks to we would have world peace in the next generation of children
Not bad, but more of the same. The pace is good, the characters are not bad (though he has done better) but it just felt that I've "been there - done that" before with this book - Either John Grisham is getting a bit repetitive in his storytelling or I'm getting a bit bored of reading them!
A Stunning Reality. Although many people might question whether everything in this novel is true or not, it states on the front that it is a memoir, therefore that is how I thought of it while reading.  As far as I am concerned, everything but the names and some situations ("to protect individuals") is the truth, and since I have not been to Tehran, I would not know any different.  I found this book captivating in most every way from the detailed descriptions of the "girls" in the book club to the references to other novels such as The Great Gatsby.  Although I have not read all of the books Nafisi referenced in her memoir, I still understood her story and appreciated her sharing the private (or public) moments with her readers.  I was shocked when I read about some of the laws that women (and men) must obide by in Iran, and this book sparked my interest regarding the stunning ways of the country enough from the very beginning to encourage me to look even further into the culture.  Being a secondary education English major, I would suggest this book to anyone from the age of 13 on, with hopes that he or she would read it, appreciate it, and try to gain some knowledge on a very different culture than our own while recognizing the everyday freedoms we take for granted on a daily basis.
Elizabethan!. First time I read this book I considered it pretty much a bunch of sex scenes strung together with  philosophical ramblings.  Later I went back to it for another try, and I'm glad I did.  It's an incredible book.  It *feels* Elizabethan, not just in the language, not just in the historical accuracy, but in every detail of the characters' thought and sensibility that's typical of Burgess at the very top of his game.  It also makes amends (in plenty) for anyone who was disgusted by the attitude toward homosexuality portrayed in The Wanting Seed (in fact, remembering that Burgess had written this book was the only thing that kept me from flinging TWS across the room, well, that and the fact that it was a library book).  Readers interested in Marlowe will also find an insightful if maybe not totally groundbreakingly original view of his philosophy, life and plays and the relationship between them.
It helped me (a mortal) understand History as a science. If a book worth as much the ideas it can produce in readers' minds, then this is one of the best books I've ever read. Marvelous!  It provides a simple yet high quality assessment of the ideas behind science and how they  can be used in the study of History. A real breakthrough for anyone
Up to date, informed, and incredibly compassionate!. If you just want the latest research, go read the New England Journal of Medicine.  If you want the latest research PLUS experience, understanding, compassion, and answers to your most embarrassing questions, get this book!I heard the co-author, Francesca Coltrera, speak a few weeks ago. I was absolutely blown away by how lucid, informed, and compassionate this woman was. She didn't just present the book as a bible for people undergoing breast cancer treatment (though it is that). She talked about it as a a kind of lifeline--a source to go to for questions the doctors and nurses don't have the patience (or experience) to answer.I hope you don't need a book like this.  But if you do, this is the one to get
Excellent reading. Rachel is up to her old tricks again.  With her trusty sidekicks, this is sure to please any Harrison fan
They Did It All. It's an adventure story; it's amazing American history that has somehow escaped all the history books; it's a case history on leadership, bravery and foolishness. It is 1838, and six American sailing vessels set out on a four year voyage to chart the coast of Antarctica, Polynesia and the Amercian Pacific Northwest and collect specimens of the local flora and fauna.From dodging ice bergs for weeks on end off the coast of Antarctica (in the dark and during blinding snow storms ) to giving the cannibals in Fiji a lesson in payback, to climbing the 13,000 foot Mauno Loa volcano in Hawaii and dipping molten lava out of its caldera, to braving 30 foot seas trying to run the bar at the mouth of the Columbia River, these men will make you proud to be an American...and wonder where such men have gone.Read this book!
A Dr. Laura Avoider. I have avoided Dr. Laura, her books, and her radio program for many years, fearing she would say something about me I didn't want to recognize.  Ten Stupid Things did just that.  How sad it is that women have such low self-esteem(though Gangi in her book explains this more as the lack of self-love)that they feel they have to settle for whatever and, more importantly, whomever pays any attention to them. If we would think twice, look in the mirror and truly love the person looking back, maybe we could lower the count from 10 to 1 or 2
Good starting point. As someone else stated, this is a good starting point for getting acquainted with serial killers.  One other review says you can get all the same information on the internet by using a search engine.  That is true, you can probably get more information using a search engine, however there are serial killers in this book I never knew about and therefore could not find them via a search engine.  This covers killers from all over the world and spanning many generations.  It is a definite read for people who are new to researching serial killers and would like to have a good reference.  As we all know,  encyclopedias are just that, a reference.  So this is a beginning and a reference.  And once you find a subject in this book that draws your interest, you should then get a more detailed account to read.Overall, I rate this as a very good book with good basic information.  Yes, some things are out of date, but the Son of Sam is not one of them.  The Green River Killer is however, as Gary Leon Ridgeway is not even mentioned as a suspect.  However the book was last released in 2000 and the GRK was captured in 2002.
Audio Version Review. This review is only for the audio.  The narrator, Barbara Rosenblat, does a superb job in emphasis, nuance, expression, and consistency of character voices.  Her voice is also at a pitch that is easy to hear.  A true pleasure to listen to
Marvelous Adaption For Younger Readers. This review refers to The Great Illustrated Classic Edition(listed for ages 9-12) of "Frankenstein" by Mary ShelleyI had to surf the various editions of Frankenstein to find this one, which is wonderfully adapted for older kids by Malvina G. Vogel and illustrated by Pablo Marcus Studio. There were many editions to go through and if you are interested in this one make sure you are on the page with the ISBN of:0866119817 (Playmore Publishers June 1993). You can enter the number in the book search. The cover has a fiery orange background with Frankenstein running in a wooded area.Only available at this time from the outside merchants, you may want to check with them by e-mail, to make sure which edition they are selling. The customer reviews as well as the editorial reviews seemed to be all lumped together, the children's issues along with the adult editions.Malvina Vogel has done a fabulous adaption for younger readers to be able to enjoy this very frightening but most captivating classic. It is still the story we all love of Victor Frankenstein, who loved science and life. When a life of a loved one is lost, he vows to discover a way that no one will ever have to face the grief that death brings about. He works and studies furiously, to the point of obsession, until finally his labors prove it can be done. Invent life out of various body parts from corpses. But his creation turns out to be monstrous. A giant creature that seeks revenge on Victor for creating the hideous and terrifying being he has become. The path of the monster is covered with dead bodies, those of the people closest to Victor. Victor now has a new mission in life, to hunt the creature down and destroy him before the monster unleashes his vengeance on any more innocents.The monster is portrayed with feelings of hating himself for what he has done, and there are times, you may even feel a twinge of pity for him. The entire story unfolds wonderfully, and in a way, children will get caught up in, as Victor, near death and after chasing the monster through the iciest and coldest regions known to man, reveals for the first time to an explorer, also obsessed and risking lives, how his creation came to be. TThe books has fairly large print, excellent and somewhat scary illustrations with captions, on every other page.At nearly 240 pages it is a quick read and one that kids will be turning the pages enthusiastically. The school journal editorial here, say the illustrations are in color, however, in this edition they are black and white drawings. There is also a 2 page bio on Mary Shelley at the opening. I think the age group recommended here is pretty close(9-12), although 9 may be a little too young, just from a reading comprehension standpoint(Of course it depends on the child), and 12 may be a little young for a cut-off. I think even older kids, and even the parents reading with the child, will enjoy this adaption.A great gift book for your favorite reader...enjoy...Lauri
Modesty is Dignity. Wendy Shalit argues that modesty is a natural virtue that protects women from being treated as sex objects by men and therefore leading to a loss of their dignity. She blames many problems in society including anorexia nervosa, date rape, stalking and self-mulitation to the loss of modesty that has occurred with the sexual revolution. I was, however, disappointed with the large amount of quotes from such magazines as "Glamour" and "Seventeen."Wil Roese
VEILED WEB: the best of science fiction &amp; romantic suspense. Finally read VEILED WEB and it's just wonderful. The author did an incredible job showing the two religious and cultural heritages of Lucia and Rashid and then setting them in modern society, trying to respect and  understand one another's views.  I especially liked Zaki, the AI - his  transformation from (dare I say it?) spoilt egocentric child to an entity  with a conscience and world view was a lot of fun to read. He is charming  in his vulnerabilities, rather than weak and despicable - truly an  achievement! I would highly recommend this as a look at a culture clash and  how determination can overcome bias. The author deals with a lot of  concerns such as &quot;how do we know if a machine has a soul&quot; in a  sensitive and forthright manner without bogging down in technospeak
The Moon:  Myth and Image. The book I saw elsewhere before I bought this book was (as it turns out) the Cassell's edition, which has colour illustration.  This 4 Walls 8 Windows version only has black and white illustrations, though well printed.  I would have preferred the colour
"History is a string full of knots". In her debut novel, first published in 1985, Jeanette Winterson managed to achieve two important goals: one, to impress the reader with her autobiographical story, and two, to create her own style and voice, which she developed in her later works.At the level of the narrative, the reader is completely taken in by the life of an orphan girl raised in England of the 1960's by the strictly religious mother to be a preacher and a missionary. The world outside the church community, which, despite the presence of pastors, has a strong matriarchal feeling, and the men seems somehow obscure and dispensable, is for little Jeanette absolutely incomprehensible.As a child, she does not have a reason not to believe her mother... but growing up as an intelligent child with inquisitive mind, she begins to ask questions. First quietly, only in her mind, then more openly, when she encounters other reality (at school and in her town), and finally, confronted with her own sexuality which is unacceptable by (although, as it appears, not unknown to) her church, she decides to step out of her life as she knows it, go beyond her very limited experience and start afresh (very brave; I could not help thinking though that her being lesbian seemed to be an obstacle but in a way was helpful because it was the real push to struggle for her own identity; for a girl who would marry it would be probably less difficult to settle down quietly and stop asking questions, like it was for Melanie, Jeanette's first love in the novel). The oranges from the title become the symbol of the forced limitations...The book is full of general thoughts, and although there is no great philosophy, the discoveries of adolescence are put into great words. Winterson's voice sometimes sound incredibly bitter and she paints the characters with certain cruelty. Although the book if full of funny anecdotes, it is a sad kind of humor, I hope this was a catharsis to write it. The author admits that we create our own history and memories are what we remember and shape ourselves, therefore far from objective report of the past...Formally, the novel is divided into chapters bearing the titles of the initial books of the Old Testament. There are also many religious metaphors and similes throughout. Winterson uses simple, short sentences which gives the book the clarity. Interchanging with the main plot are short tales, which remind me of things I imagined and put on paper when I was a child... They are a great insight into the mind, fears and fantasies of a sensitive girl and look very real, although are obviously conceived at the same time as the whole novel (although it would be nice to think that Winterson incorporated her real childhood creations) as they run in parallel with the plot and are inseparable from it.I think that for anyone who wants to become familiar with Winterson's prose, this is the best place to start
Pill Technique!. Ken Blanchard &amp; Marc Muchnick shows the Business Managers at any level how to apply the Right Techniques for getting both results and commitment of their people especially when the pressures of performance rise high. The message is clear with the Pill Techniques that Leadership skills come with experience and is not an overnight success (a quick dose of pill formula don't work that heightens the leader's powers!) The book is in parable form of competition of two leaders with different management styles. A supporting, inspiring and motivating Leader can bring out the best with right ingredients of integrity, affirmation and partnership. There aren't quick solutions with pill technique but leadership skills require thoughtful implementations to encourage team spirits for successful results. Day to day workplace situation requires trust and respect and it is well spread a message by the authors to Leaders, as how to gain the team's confidence to derive positive and profitable results. The Book is great read and itself serve as power pill with right ingredients. A nice read &amp; well focused on leadership skills
A Generation Spanning Favorite. I discovered `Drummer Hoff' in a Scholastic book offer at school when I was six, and begged my parents to buy it for me. Like many little boys, I was enamored by soldiers, and would pour over the book again and again, entranced by the colorful European dress uniforms worn by the motley bunch of soldiers who were assembling, loading, and preparing to fire a cannon. Each one was distinctive, and I was particularly fond of Sergeant Chowder (who brought the powder), a gruff looking peg-legged fellow in a grenadiers hat, and Captain Bammer (who brought the rammer), a swashbuckling, eye-patch wearing chap. All of the illustrations were stunningly lined wood-cuts, brightly colored. I would try to draw soldiers who looked like those in the book, and learned all the words by heart.Jump forward thirty years. My first child was born, and though I hadn't looked at the book in over twenty-five years, I found myself chanting the words to my baby as I rocked him to sleep - I still remembered them perfectly! I retrieved `Drummer Hoff' from my parent's attic, and it has now become my two pre-school boy's favorite book. It is a cherished piece of my childhood that I am thrilled to be able to pass on to them.Other reviews here have mentioned the subtle anti-war message contained in this book, and I must agree. When the cannon fires, it is a two page spread KAHBAHBLOOOM, all done in hellish red with some dark purple and blue behind it. When you turn the next page, all of the sharply dressed, parade ground soldiers are gone, and the abandoned cannon that was their focus has become a dilapidated ruin in an overgrown meadow full of birds and butterflies. Though as a child  I could not clearly articulate the thoughts, I remember pondering what happened to the soldiers; why they had left the cannon there, and if they had perhaps been hurt when it was fired.. It was my first influence to suggest that war might be something other than romance and adventure. My young boys have already questioned me about these very things, which they too noticed. It is a fine, age appropriate way to begin to instill the values of peace in the hearts of little boys.Among all of the many wonderful books written for small children, this was, is, and ever shall be my very favorite.  It receives my highest recommendation.Theo Logos
Good Book. Should be added to your reading list. I don't get some of the negative reviews as the book never claims to cure or solve hairloss.  Its clearly someone's take and experience on the matter and its a damn good one.  You never read the stuff that this book talks about and it should be read by anyone who is looking seriously at this issue.  Folks who are looking for desperate, quick fixes are going to end up making some stupid and rash decisions. When weighing your options or just looking to enlighten yourself in healthy ways of dealing with your hairloss, this book should be a must on your list of reading
Good but too short. The material was good and interesting but too concise.  Not enough details
Red Star Rogue. It is the most astounding book I have ever read. It adds hundreds of details on 1 of Soviet Russia's submarines known as K-129 which sank in the Pacific near Hawaii in March 1968. After long searches by the Soviet fleet and much US investigation, the US sub USS Halibut secretly found and photo'd it about 3 miles deep later in 1968. In the early 1970s, the Glomar Explorer secretly raised most of the seriously damaged Soviet submarine. The media mentioned a bit of the mysterious news in the post-Watergate era of mid 1970s. A few years ago the book "Blind Man's Bluff" added many intriguing details to the mystery of the sinking of the Russian sub. "Red Star Rogue" provides numerous details that point to the likelihood that the Russian sub self-destructed during an attempted launch of one of its nuclear missiles about 350 miles northwest of Honolulu!!! This incredible (if true) event was apparently not sponsored by Brezhnev (the USSR Cold War leader of the day). Did Andropov or Suslov order it? One of the 1st folks to find evidence of the sinking were University of Hawaii folks. The book implies that a full accounting of what happened is long overdue (to say the least)!!! Photos of the wrecked Soviet sub are apparently still held by the CIA, and the book implies that careful exam of the ultra top secret pictures will show that the sub was destroyed when its nuclear missile blew up in the sub's launch tube. Somebody, the media, the government, or some of the people involved should come forward and tell the world what the hell happened in March 1968. In any case, President Johnson promptly ordered the development of an anti-missile defense system, and all presidents since have maintained the secrets about this possibly-barely-avoided armageddon. Criticism of the book seems to be strictly uninformed criticism of the book's brief speculation about the evil-doers' never-to-be-known motives; but I've seen no questioning of "the facts". There's a Yahoo Group on the subject
suberb!. A very well written book. Tried and true classic European and American recipes as well as others with a more exotic twist. Plenty of useful information and instruction on 'how to'.Braising is probably my favorite way to cook. If you do it right (and it's easy to do it right) you get the most succulent and satisfying meals with ease. A little bit of prep, bang it in the oven (or leave it slow simmer on the stovetop) and in 1 to 3 hours you've got a great meal.I've looked at the few books out there devoted to this subject and in my opinion hers is one of the best. Not only does she give you plenty of yummy recipes, she gives you plenty of info on the various ways to braise, cuts of meat and info on the types of containers (pots, etc.) one can use for braising and why you would use a particular container. She also gives tips on how to make a too deep covered dish into a braiser. (in braising, the more shallow the pot the better.)My only regret is I didn't buy this on Amazon. I paid full price. I was so pleased with the content when I browsed it in the book store I just had to get it right then and there
A Sweet Surprise. Laurell K. Hamilton's "Strange Candy" is a collection of 14 short stories, each with a brief introduction by the author. The short stories all contain fantastical creatures. There are mermen, wizards, wicked sorceresses, and even some Anita Blake that readers have not previously seen.Considering my recent disappointment with Hamilton's Anita Blake and Meredith Gentry series, I was pleasantly surprised by her short stories. I enjoyed every single one of them and found them to be well written and very entertaining.I would definitely recommend this book to anyone who likes supernatural short stories. I would also recommend it to the Hamilton fan who is feeling a bit disgruntled with her recent novels. "Strange Candy" is a breath of fresh air
classic 1950s with a twist. First things first, I'm still in the process of coming out...Secondly, I have been a bookworm ever since I can remember. I grew up reading the likes of Nancy Drew and Babysitter's Club (Ann M. Martin) and daydreaming about the heroines, wishing they weren't straight.I am so happy I found this book. I absolutely loved it. It was very descriptive, from the pizza place to her night watching the girls dance.I could not put it down until there were no more pages left to devour.The characters were strong & deliciously human.I wish I knew about this series when I was a teenager; I would have gladly snuck over to whatever side of town just to get to these books, hid them underneath my mattress with my diary...[...]
Touch A Dark Wolf. I loved it.  I can not wait until the next book.  I have read every book written by her and they are AWESOME!!!!!!!!!Thank you Jenni please write more
Superb Book. Some people may like to consider this book legalistic or even self-righteously written. I stongly disgree with them.In his book on courthsip, Joshua Harris prioritized principles over methods. He never mentioned how people should do certain courtship procedures in formula fashion. Instead, Josh wisely presented Christian principles involved in courtship. The focus upon these standards of Christian conduct make the book applicable to people of almost every age and every culture. The author does not boast about his experience but proposes an ideal to the Christian youth of today--an ideal all would do good to follow.This book is highly commendable. It is one of the very best among all Christian dating books I have ever encountered
A Must have!. The book I have is slightly different that what is offered here.  I have the 3rd edition of this book, which was printed in 1963.  At that time, this was all one volume, though quite a handful at over 1,000 pages.  The new two-volume edition has added the chapters covering the years since the Kennedy years including Watergate, the Burger Court and what must surely be a fascinating chapter on Judicial Review and Constitutionalism.If there is a book available anywhere that present the history and development of the Constitution in a unbiased manner, this book is it.  The authors simply present the facts and leave the reader to come to thier own conclusions.If you are a student or just want to learn about the Constitution, or need to research the history of the development of the Constitution and what the Courts have done to subvert it, this is a must have for your personal library.  My old 1963 volumes probably has more notes in the margins than any other book I own.  You will use it often and learn imensely from it.I anxiously await the opportunity to read the updated chapters in volume two.Monty Raineywww.juntosociety.co
A wonderful rendition of an enduring classic.,. An audio recording of Patrick Stewart's one-man rendition of Charles Dicken'sTimeless Classic. Stewart has adapted the text for his show and performsall the characters and necessary sound effects. It is wonderful example ofthe power of a good actor.The enduring story of "A Christmas Carol" involves Ebenezer Scrooge, a greedy grasping businessman, who is untouched by human emotion. Or so we think until he is visited one Christmas Eve by four sprits who show him the error of his ways. In the end a redeemed Scrooge resolves to keep the Christmas spirit all the days of his life and to be good to his fellow men.Stewart is able without the aid of costumes, scenery, special effects, orother actors, to bring this timeless tale to life. His vivid characterization of each person is all the more remarkable for the fact that the only tools he has are his voice and the listener's imagination.I enjoy his rendition more and more each passing year.
Miles takes a chance and succeeds; Good Queen Bess would approve. Miles is one of the giants of historical fiction. Her research is superb, and from that she spins tales with rich, multi-faceted characters, plot twists, and works in the English language as the same way that Michaelangelo worked in marbel. Bold, innovative, challenging without being pedantic or snobbish. And Miles' books aren't "chick lit" by any means. While they promote strong female characters (and why not?), her books can be enjoyed by men and women alike. Her brilliance shines through in all her books without dominating them. Miles left the comfort zone of her Guenevere and Isolde novels and was equal to the task. I, Elizabeth is for anyone--Elizabethan scholars will enjoy the conjecture, and "newbies" to Tudor England will learn much AND relish a great story. Highly recommended
Cosider a must-have. I rate this book very hight because it is a serious content / concept based book for not only the exam but to really make things clear that it covers.One drawback is that it does not cover it all and you might need the Krutz & Vines or Shon Haris book and interaction with the [...]. Still this would be a great buy because the questions at the end of the chapters are better quality than most of the books.I have now known a lot of people passing exam by only using this one book (disclaimer: some of them have had good experiance in InfoSec, which is expected).Importantly, email the author and get the errata of the book so that you don't run around trying to verify some of the errors the book has, though it could help doing all the additional research.Good Luck for the exam
One of my favorites. Others have said pretty much all that needs to be said, but I've read pretty much everything Heinlein has written, and this is definitely amoung my favorites
well written. this is a very easy book to read about one of our most interesting presidents.
Great, Entertaining, Colorful. My 2-1/2-year-old LOVES this book.  I took a chance and ordered it without reading much about it, but what a great find.  She wants it read to her at least a few times a week.  The pictures are delightful and the story is adorable.  The refrain, WHAT A SCARE, JESSE BEAR is so fun for a child to say every couple of pages, and gets him/her involved in the story
the Kill Artist. I have become a Daniel Silva fan and I enjoyed this book, but it was not one of those books that you feel like you can't put down/stay up all night types. His more recent books are better.
A Different Wodehouse Book. Someday I'd like to read a real biography of Wodehouse (as opposed to the dreadful &quot;fan&quot; bios out there) and find out what was happening to him around 1936 -- when he wrote the scathing, angry &quot;Laughing  Gas&quot; and this one. &quot;Summer Moonshine&quot; uses Wodehouse plot A:  boy-chases-girl-at-country-house. Yet strange feelings of hopelessness and  despair creep into it, and when boy loses girl there's a bitterness like in  no other Wodehouse novel. It's not bad, but you definitely get the sense  that, as the author himself might put it, something's up
Linda Goodman's Sun Signs. I've been looking for this book for many years. It has the most accurate desciption of the sun signs that I've ever seen. . Linda Goodman is amazing. I highly reccommend this book to anyone interested in astrology
A Pleasant Airport or Beach Book. James Robert Parish's "Fiasco" is an interesting read for anyone with a penchant for Hollywood film history.  But in it's review of some of the worst pictures ever made, he seems to be repeating himself - pictures fail only when they don't bring in the requisite amount of dollars.  Everything else is secondary to whether or not the film makes money - and not just a (relatively) small profit.  The movies have to make many, many times their cost to not be a failure.  That can be a pretty high hurdle.Ultimately, the causes are all the same: lack of studio or producer oversight; inflated star egos; unplanned for (and costly) over-time; bad press and reviews.Some of Hollywood's truly awful films are not reviewed here ("Heaven's Gate" being the primary example) and some that were arguably fair movies (just not big money makers) are.For example, "Cleopatra" is the opening chapter and sets the stage for all that follows.  You'll get no argument from me that "Cleopatra" was a trial to make.  However (in my humble opinion) the final result is a lush tale that fails only in the last third of the picture.  Given that, I had to laugh at one contemporary reviewer's comment that "[Elizabeth Taylor] screeches like a ward heeler's wife at a block party" in the last half of the film.  So true!Mr. Parish also refers to a number of vanity films that are made to promote the liberal political views of the actors involved ("The Chase", "The Wild Party" and "Reds" for example) but never explores the possibility that audiences go to movies to be entertained - not lectured to.  I know it's currently popular to criticize entertainers for using their platforms to promote their personal political views and I'm not trying to join that band wagon.  But it's fair to suggest that a movie made primarily to criticize traditional American mores' is not going to be a big hit with the vast majority of traditional Americans.Each chapter begins with a brief overview of the state of theater going, i.e., attendance numbers, ticket price, etc. and this is interesting in itself.  It also contains some few surprises.  For example, who knew that the song & dance numbers in "Ishtar" were intentionally bad?!  I just thought that was a natural by product of the fact that Beatty and Hoffman, while talented actors, are neither singers nor dancers.All-in-all, Mr. Parish's book is an entertaining read and fair accounting of some of the worst films ever made, though he offers little hope that studios, talent or corporate owners have learned anything in the way of lessons from their checkered past.  The book is certainly a breath of fresh air from the traditional Tinsel Town history that trumpets silver-screen successes and bypasses its flops
Great Collection. Great collection of success literature. I especially enjoyed Acres of Diamonds:Russell Conwell's book, "Acres of Diamonds" was developed from a speech he delivered to church congregations over 5,000 times. The proceeds he earned from this speech are reputed to have given him a fortune, which he used to found Temple University in Philadelphia."Acres of Diamonds" is the story of a successful farmer in India named Al Hafed. Hafed is tempted by the allure of wealth and sells his farm to search the world for diamonds. Years later he dies penniless, having not found diamonds. However, back home the man who purchased Hafed's farm accidentally discovers a huge field of diamonds on Hafed's former land.Conwell uses this story to illustrate that success often lies close at hand, if you are willing to open your eyes and mind to opportunity. Conwell further suggests that most people are "pygmies of their possible selves," rarely achieving the potential of their innate abilities or local opportunities. Conwell also discusses his basic philosophy of business and gives several rules, or suggestions, for budding entrepreneurs:1.	The seeds of fortune are close at hand. Stick with what you know, find your niche, and don't be swayed by the allure of "greener pastures."2.	Find out what people want, and fill that need. This sounds obvious, but many entrepreneurs start with a product or service, and then try to find a market for their product or service. Conwell advises finding the market first, then developing a product or service to meet that demand.3.	Make the best possible product and provide them to a large number of people."Acres of Diamonds" was first published in 1921. It is still valid today, and provides valuable lessons to anyone attempting to achieve financial success.You may also want to read "Think and Grow Rich" by Napoleon Hill and "The 17 Principles of Creating Wealth" by Phillip Collinsowrth.
Best described embroidery book ever!!. I bought this book after it was recommended to me at my crazy quilt guild meeting.  I have read it from cover to cover and it is by far the best crazy quilt book on embroidery stitches ever.  Carole explains hisory of crazy quilting and best of all the different stitch combinations are just wonderful.  If your like me and get hung up on the same old stitches and want to add on to stitches you have just done this is the best book.  I now use it as my main crazy quilt book for new stitching ideas.  I do wish it was spiral bound so it would lay flat in front of me when I use it........which is quite often.  Thanks Karen, Woodstown, N
SUPER!. My only objection to it is that it didn't follow the movie in some places. Example: there was never given any reason for the boy to be Superman's son
Short and sweet review. This is a great book.  I was given it in a pile and recently picked it up and then could not put it down.  Great characters, detail and story.  My wife stayed up until 3 in the morning to finish it.  Read this book if you get a chance
Fantastic. Quite an amazing book. I picked it up after seeing it on a book list of top influential books in Prague. I guess it is popular in its original Czech language. The main character being a Canadian from the then  communist, totalitarian regime - was quite an experience for myself, and  gave me some insight on how the other half lived ... the fact was like a  fairy tale, and the fiction was such truth
Ethics without foundations. Williams's main projects in "Ethics and the Limits of Philosophy" are (1) to argue against the idea that there is a rational foundation for ethics;(2) to argue that there is no adequate ethical theory, nor is there likely ever to be such a theory; and (3)to broaden the focus of moral philosophy from a focus on the role of obligation in life to a wider array of considerations that are relevant in deciding how one should live.The book has excellent discussions of and arguments against Aristotle's attempt to find a foundatoin for ethics in human nature (that is, in the idea that there is something about the function of a human life that makes an ethical life proper) and Kant's attempt to find a foundation for ethics in a bare committment to rationality.  Williams is convincing in arguing that in order for the claims of an ethical life to get a grip on an individual that individual must have some committment to ethics already.  It is possible for someone to be rational and unethical.  That does not imply, Williams points out, there are not reasons to be ethical.  Many people have good reasons to be ethical; it's just that we we would be wrong to criticize those unethical people as necessarily being irrational.Williams's discussions of truth in ethics and of relativism are less convincing but equally valuable.  Williams argues that evaluative statements that use "thick terms"--terms like "loyal," "murder," "cruel" that are evaluative like the terms "good" and "right" but can be applied with descriptive accuracy in a way that those more general terms cannot be applied--can be true.  But reflection on thick terms unseats them and they are replaced by nothing knew.  For example, in the modern Western world, the thick term "chaste" has become obsolete.  While it was once a term that could be used to make true and false moral statements, reflection upon sexuality has (for argument's sake) undermined our use of the term.  Because of the role reflection plays, people are unlikely to ever converge on ethical truths that correspond to reality the way that scientific/factual beliefs do.  Related to this is Williams's moderate ethical relativism: there are some terms used in distant (in space or time) societies that we recognize as evaluative, but that we cannot judge by the lights of our own set of evaluative concepts.I don't find Williams's views here convincing becuase I don't believe in his underlying Cartesian theory of truth.  And I don't buy his relativism because I think it's impossible not to evalute the way that other people or other cultures--even those of the distant past--evaluate.  One can't be neutral on how other people think and act.The book also has strong, lively and sophisticated critiques of consequentalism and contractarianisn.  Williams believes that neither is an adequate ethical theory because each theory is based on unrealistic views of what it means to be a real person in the world with real desires.  For example, contract-based views of ethics assume that people can shed their actual beliefs and desires and still deliberate about how to act.  But if one distances himself from his own desires and beliefs, based on what does this more abstract self deliberate?The book is leas interersting when Williams obsesses over the distortion that the exclusive emphasis on obligation in moral philosophy has wrought on moral thinking.  I think this was a big deal at the time the book was written, but for a non-philosopher reading it now, these concerns, largely confined to the last chapter, were a bit boring.Finally, I would recommend reading Williams's essay "Internal and External Reasons" in his collection "Moral Luck" to better understand his views on the relation between rationality and morality
Insightful and Thought-Provoking. This book is absolutely amazing.  I have 2 children with Asperger's and Temple Grandin's insight into why people with autism have certain behaviors was eye-opening.  It also gave me a whole new perspective on what thought processes may effect their ability to learn abstract things and socialize with others.  I would highly recommend this book to anyone.  Even if you don't personally know someone with autism it can certainly give you a first-hand look at how different people think differently
Good reference for getting started with OOP in PHP. I'll get this out of the way up front; I approached this book with a completely inaccurate perception of what it was going to give me. I would consider myself an intermediate to advanced php developer, and I was hoping this book would teach me awesome ways to use PHP5's OOP power to make my applications better, faster, and more attractive to women. That wasn't what this book does. This book introduces OOP, explains why it's useful, and goes through to develop several sample applications to demonstrate OOPs power, and more importantly how to use it.The books pretty thin weighing in at 216 pages, split up amongst 15 chapters. The first bit of the book concentrates on explaining what OOP is, why PHP needs it, and why you want it. It then moves on to explain why OOP sucked in PHP4, what works better in PHP5, and all the fancy new words you're going to need to memorize to use it (protected, private, etc.). It then moves on to develop a sample indexing application, adding in thumbnail generation as the book progresses. Later on more advanced topics like design patterns, interfaces and exceptions are introduced. Finally the book gives a brief introduction to SPL which was introduced in PHP5 and improved in PHP5.1.Overall I would recommend this book to beginner PHP developers, or intermediate developers who have not yet gotten their feet wet with OO
A nice ride. Once again I am amazed by the amount of controversy associated with a book addressing a religious subject.  I bought this to get a better feel for the Old Testament [operative word is "feel"].  As a Roman Catholic, the Old Testament is addressed in the first reading at Mass, but then brushed over for the most part in a cursory manner.  It is particularly confusing, hard to read, and difficult to understand in proper context, without some help.  In fact there are portions of the Old Testament that just seem cruel and ridiculous.  Davis's book helps to demonstrate that it was written by people, in a certain time and place, and within a historical milieu.  It may not maintain the historical accuracy some may like, but it is sufficient to be effective.It is just too simplistic to look to the Bible for all answers; as if it were some sort of statutory code, with the answers to all questions.   The search and answers for truth are never ending, and the Bible is a beginning.  I get more from Catholic writers who explore the Bible and the traditions of my religion relative to our world, than I do from the book itself.  Davis is throwing in his spin, as well as a pretty accurate assessment of the Bible in historical context, which I found quite helpful.Take it for what is worth, a spin in a convertible through the Bible.  A nice ride, but nothing more.
"Show me some love or I'll strangle you.". I'd never heard of J.P. Donleavy or his novel, THE GINGER MAN, until I got it into my head to read all the novels on the Modern Library's Top 100 Books list.  THE GINGER MAN is only ranked #99, but it's one of my personal favorites.The main character, Sebastian Dangerfield, is one of the most vile, detestable characters you'll ever read.  He has little in the way of redeeming qualities.  He claims to be a law student, but he fails to study or go to any classes.  Instead, he spends his time abusing his wife, fighting the urge to smother his daughter, and pawning what few possessions he has left.  When he runs out of his own things to pawn, he steals whatever he can get his hands on.  Any money he acquires is quickly spent at the pubs.  He stumbles around town in a drunken stupor seducing and abandoning women.  What he wants most in the world is for his rich father to die and leave him an inheritance.  He reminds me of a combination of Ignatius J. Reilly (from A CONFEDERACY OF DUNCES) and Sickboy (from TRAINSPOTTING).  He's essentially a hilarious scoundrel.Even though he's a loathsome character, Dangerfield's drunken misadventures make for enjoyable, highly amusing reading.  The kangaroo brawl toward the end of the book is one of the most comically absurd scenes I've ever read.  THE GINGER MAN is a wickedly funny novel that deserves its reputation as a modern classic.  It also deserves to be ranked higher than #99.
Excellent way to learn American History. I am a foreign student, and this is the first time that I study American History. The Seagull Edition of this book is great because it has all the written information and appendix from the regular volume and it costed less than half. Some people might miss the colored pictures, the maps or the extra margens to right notes, but this edition fitted my budget and i am enjoying it anyway.Regarding the content, the information is presented clearly and very complete
2003 Notable Book,  Association of Jewish Libraries!. This title was declared a 2003 Notable Book by the Association of Jewish Libraries!  Almost 200 children's books of Judaic content were reviewed during the year to find the best of the bunch.  Find out more at www.jewishlibraries.org
New entries, expanded descriptions. Parents' Guide to the Best Books for Children appears in its third revised, updated edition to provide the hundreds of new entries, expanded descriptions, and notes on related recommended children's books. Parents will find the organization by reading level lends to quick and easy consultation, while the indexes make it easy to match child to book subject
An excellent book. I enjoyed this book with all the tips on saving and handling money, however I believe that on should know more about investing.I agree with the other reviewers that this book is an outstanding essay for those who want to learn how to select stocks for a portfolio. Where we differ is that the typical investor he does not have the resources to build a properly diversified portfolio. In order to have adequate diversification you must assemble several hundred issues well beyond the resources of the average investor. Further one must have the time and skill to evaluate several thousand issues. There is a body of knowledge called Modern Portfolio that is deep in sophisticated statistics, utility theory and higher mathematics not easily comprehended by laymen. However executing these proven techniques is quite simple.I can offer a solution to this problem. I want to recommend for you a book titled How to Make Money in the Stock Market-Buy 2,500 different stocks for $1000 - Pay no Commission. This book is a must for those wanting to find out about indexing and exchange traded funds and why their use is a superior method for the small investor (and big one too). This book is an outstanding guide to personal investing. It will be useful to all investors from novices to highly the highly experienced. This book prepares the reader to approach investing from the standpoint of the underlying science. It is the antithesis of a 'get rich quick scheme'.All aspects of Modern Portfolio Theory and passive (index) investing are explained in a through and easily understood manner. The aspect I like most is that as well as a solid theoretical foundation the book is very practical and shows the reader how to create (and more importantly) and manage over time a successful portfolio. This is a great book- for the beginning investor, it's a great place to start and for the experienced investor there are many valuable suggestions. The book can be read in about an hour and understood by a 12 year old.It's a shame to think of how much money investors have lost "investing" in the stock market over the years. I wish I had read this little book years ago. The chapter on automatic investing recommends a number of portfolios that follow modern portfolio theory and adjust risk as you age without any effort on the part of the reader at all. Had this book been written years ago and had I followed its directions I would be rich today of that I am certain. Nevertheless I will pursue one of the portfolios recommended and stick to my chosen asset plan.
Richard Bernstein on Evil in the Post 9/11 World. This is a very necessary book.  It upends the simplistic desire to polarize everything: us vs. them, good vs, evil, the "coalition of the willing" vs. the "axis of evil."  And in doing so creates a much more complex awareness of evil in all its radical "otherness."  I liked this short book so much that I went on to read Bernstein's Radical Evil: A Philosophical Interrogation (2002) where he deals with issues more in depth with critical chapters on Freud, Nietzsche, Arendt. Schelling, Levinas, Kant, etc.  I particularly liked his lines:  "Interrogating evil is an ongoing, open-ended process"; "Evil is an excess that resists total comprehension"; "Evil resists all attempts to justify it; it resists theodicy"; and "The power of evil and the human propensity to commit evil deeds must not be underestimated.
Young Readers and THE WHIPPING BOY. THE WHIPPING BOY is a classic children's story, written at a level that second or third grade skilled readers can handle.  It moves along quickly.  Flieschman uses good word choices.  It provides an excellent opportunity for young readers to apply text-to-self and inference skills.  It deserves the Newbery Medal which it earned
Great camp fire stories. When we go camping we look for the best book to read during our campfires, one that makes you laugh and think...the stories written with accents that Dad (me) can do, like southern drwals and mountain slang, or foreign accents are the best, this one met that criteria with the mountain way of talken...we were in stiches the whole book, we were even told by other campers who over heard us, that they also enjoyed the stories. We checked this book out from the library, but I will get a copy to keep, it will be read over and over again
Contains some insight about Ben Hogan the man. Readers of "Afternoons with Mr. Hogan" will not come away with great revelations about the game of golf, but they will find out a little more about the mysterious and very private golf legend, Ben Hogan.  Written by Hogan's former "ball shagger", Jody Vasquez, "Afternoons..." is a short little book that is a one-afternoon read.  Vasquez relates many stories about his days retreiving Hogan's practice shots at Shady Oaks Country Club.  The reader will get a few snippets about Hogan's philosophy regarding the golf swing (including the famous Hogan "Swing Secret"), but will come away with a lot more information about Hogan the person.Well worth your time if you're a fan of the game or of Ben Hogan, "Afternoons with Mr. Hogan" is a innocuous look back at a young boy's chance encounter with one of the legends of the game and the positive impact that Hogan had on his life
I &lt;3 literarture class. i bet 10 bucks that half of the class is going to cut and paste one of these reviews. i probably will to.P.S. i here that this is a pretty good book, read it....or else
A Must Read. Zinn's history is a must read for every American who has any pretense of being educated.  The author cuts through the myhths and half truths that usually pass for legitimate history and offers a myriad of facts and insights that give a fuller and more complete picture of what American history is really all about
I wish ... had six stars. This books is off the charts! Ive been reading for a long time, and this book just encompasses so much for the African American experience. My favorite parts of each chapter are the anecdotes and sayings found at the end of each respectively. Purchase this book and pass it on other everyone you know who needs a laugh
LOVE THE RECIPES. After reading about this book, I decided to purchase it...though we are not dieting, we found a healthier way of eating.  The recipes are delicious! I don't know which we like the best, but the turkey with cranberry and prunes is a favorite.  We don't follow the diet, however, I always have a cold cereal, usually one of the cereals by Kashi..a mid-morning snack consists of a piece of fruit or yogurt..and then one of the dinner recipes.  We have not tried any of the desserts, as I usually have fruit topped with fat free yogurt. We have not had any sugary desserts in a month and don't miss them. We are eating healthier, without a lot of processed foods, or high cholesterol food.  Without the breads and sugar, my stomach has flattened, we have more energy and feel great.  Thank you Dr. Katz
Under Clancy's pen, Jack Ryan shows no fear!. I guess for not reading too much Clancy, this has to my favorite work of his. But can you just envision Tom sitting at his desk, pondering in his mind, "Hmm, what if... YES! This is it!" I'm wondering if a lot of people are asking the same question about this work, WHEN'S THE MOVIE DUE OUT?I loved the masterful way that Clancy crafted this together. When I read the prologue and saw there was bits and pieces of Marko Ramius, I was intrigued, and not disappointed.Clever penmanship, mixed in with some rough dialogue, and you get this. Yeah, the story is about a guy, Mikhail Filitov, code named "Cardinal". Yeah, you have US and USSR negotations. So what does that have to do with the price of coffee? Hey, read it and find out! Good stuff
I LIKE THIS BOOK. I LIKE THIS BOOK, ESPECIALLY WHEN CHRISTY LET'S TERI TAKE HER PLACE ON THE CHEERLEADING SQUAD. SHE IS SO NICE. BUT I THINK NEXT PROM SHE SHOULD GO WITH TODD. HER PARENTS WOULD SAY YES, THEY LOVE TODD, AND SO DOES DAVID. I  REALLY LIKE THIS BOOK
Great book from Heinline's good period. This is the story of a youth and his discovery of what his world is all about.  It is a similar to Tunnel in the Sky and Time for the Stars in style.  Originally penned in 1940s so it is in the author's best period.  As the other reviews have stated it covers a lost colony ship and the survivors.  It is not a long work, but it is great.  If you like Orphans of the Sky you may want to read "The World and Thorinn" by Damon Knight.  It is a similar concept and is also well done
I could not put this book down. This book was very down to earth.  Very interesting.  I loved reading every word of it.  Was sad and funny at the same time.  I remember a lot of the times that were talked about in the book and could relate to these in  my own life.  Very easy reading and never dull.  This was a very down to  earth book.  I learned alot about the Lewis family that I never knew.   Definately a book worth keeping
My Top Recommendation. Many people know of "Hoyle"-branded game rule books, but this book deserves much greater recognition and acclaim.  In addition to presenting one of the best modern collections of game rules, Mohr delves into the interesting histories behind the games.  (Did you know that croquet was once banned as an immoral sport?)  From board games to outdoor games to party games, Mohr clearly and entertainingly presents a delightful and diverse set of game entertainments for all ages.Other sources will, of course, present more comprehensive sets of rules for card games (www.pagat.com), dice games (Knizia's "Dice Games Properly Explained"), and other types of games.  From my full shelf of game rule books, this is the beautiful and balanced one I would recommend to a friend who is seeking their first.
perfect. I read this book and realized i could become an expert bomber.  After reading the first few pages, I learned a lot about bombs and fireworks
Zone System section. Anyone interested in an explanation of the zone system as it relates to the curves one finds in the data manufacturers such as Kodak, Fuji, Ilford,Agfa put out should take a look at this book.  The Zone System is  nicely explanined
Do you recognize this novels world?. This is a world were the majority of people spend their time unknowingly serving the rich who lead lives of affluent decadence. The commoners leader is a vision that doesn't actually exist and represents a minority that cares nothing for them.This is our world right now, and I must give P K Dick the credit he deserves for predicting this future. I love PK Dick and this is one of his most relevant works for today's society.
Enjoyed. This was a pretty decent story.  Mixing a little science fiction timetraveling, Turtledove makes an interesting story.  Obviously it is a little more far fetched than the recent Gettysburg, or his own alternate events series.  Though Amazon always packages this tale with How Few Remain, they are in fact two differant series.  How Few Remain is the first novel of a multipart alternate timeline series.  This story is self contained
SURPRSINGLY GOOD. Sometimes this series seems wussy but this particular book is absolutely great. You get to read about authors during their struggling years and times of doubt, and, it's all across the board in writer types.Enjoy
Wow. This book is incredible!  Great read for anyone who is interested in truth
This book has changed my life!. This is truly one of the most wonderful books I have ever read!  Being a person who has struggled with self-doubts, agonized over making decisions, questioned many of my choices, and worried about not doing everything absolutely perfectly, this book has been life-changing for me.  For many years, I have been very focused on self-improvement and have been in search of "the answers" and the "right" paths for me.  I have looked for these answers in hundreds of self-help books and many other places.  Thanks to Gail, I now truly understand and believe that the answers have been within me all this time!  Although I know that the work I've done in the past (including counseling, journaling, talking with friends/family, reading other books, etc.) has all helped me a great deal, it has always seemed that there was something missing-- I still felt lost and confused in many ways.  I truly believe this book was the missing piece!  Gail gives structure and clarification to some things that I (at least somewhat) knew but couldn't completely verbalize, understand, or incorporate in my life.  She has helped me to see that I just needed a little help and guidance in getting in touch with "the voice of my heart" and my "higher self," which I've now been able to do.  The timing of my finding this book absolutely amazes me, and I swear it powerfully changed and improved my life almost immediately.  I am now recommending it to everyone I know (both women and men)!  Gail is so completely open, honest, supportive, encouraging, helpful, and beautifully spiritual.  I like that it's not a religious book per se-- but spiritual, in a very gentle and loving way.  And I love that Gail not only explains the ideas and truths, but also gives journaling guidance, prayers, affirmations, and ideas for ceremonies to help the reader truly incorporate the ideas and truly change her/his life.  I am so thankful to Gail for sharing herself and her insights with the world.  Thanks to her book, I feel happier, more confident, more at peace, and more in touch with who I really am than ever before.  I highly recommend this book to all-- with all of my heart
Enjoyable by young and old alike!. The earth is surrounded by a sinister presence - a dark, foul fog that is the tool of an ultimate evil - whose ambition is to enslave the planet with the complete removal of free will. Three magical beings, Mrs Whatsit, Mrs Who and Mrs Which - witches, angels, demigods perhaps - appear to Margaret and Charles Wallace Murry and their friend, Calvin O'Keefe, to persuade them that it is their destiny to battle this evil on its own turf and to rescue Margaret and Charles Wallace's father. Dr Murry has been missing for some months and the kids learn that he has been captured by the evil while he was "tessering", traveling time and space in the course of his scientific research.While the writing is straightforward, well crafted and obviously aimed at a younger audience, "A Wrinkle in Time" is nonetheless a fast paced enjoyable tale of good vs evil that combines elements of science fiction, fantasy and magic even adult readers will flip through relentlessly. But there are lots of life lessons, issues and moral themes sprinkled throughout - low hanging fruit just waiting for the eager child, the observant questioning teen, the confused parent or thinking adult to pick and chew on, as it were - the coming of age realization that parents are not infallible; the cruelty of malicious gossip; God and evil; the awkwardness of romantic adolescent relationships; the potential destructiveness of pride or vanity; the marginalizing of people who are different; the enormous difficulties of selflessness; the understanding that all life's questions will not be answered; and more.While some readers criticize "A Wrinkle in Time" as being overtly moralist, I felt somewhat differently. It was clear to me that religion and, in particular, Christian symbolism was present but I felt that L'Engle let it sit quietly just beneath the surface and the story never became even remotely preachy.It is little wonder that "A Wrinkle in Time" has been elevated to the status of children's classic and continues to be enjoyed by adults and children alike more than 40 years after it was first published for a grateful reading world.Paul Weis
Quickly Learn Web Page Basics. This is the best 115 pages that I've read!  I didn't have the time to read a 500 page book on creating web pages with HTML 4 or Frontpage 2000.  So I bought this book because I could do the exercises in it quickly and it was  focused on tools that I already had with Windows98: Microsoft FrontPage  Express, Personal Web Server, and the Web Publishing Wizard.  After setting  up these tools, you'll be off and running learning about text placement,  backgrounds, graphics, multimedia, hyperlinks, and tables for an  &quot;Orchid Club&quot; home page.  And guess what, IT'S FUN, FAST AND  EASY.  By following the step by step instructions, you'll understand the  basic concepts of creating a web page of your own.  This book will take you  from creating a home page in FrontPage Express, all the way to publishing  your page on a Web Server.  But beware:  you will only be building a very  basic web page.  This book doesn't attempt to teach detailed HTML, the  language behind all web pages.  But you can learn HTML from various  Internet sites or other books if you are interested.  When you are done  with this book, you'll have enough knowledge to build your own personal  home page and put it on the Internet for everyone to see.  From here, you  could learn HTML to enhance your web page, or use products like Microsoft  FrontPage 2000 to design a more sophisticated web site
Fiction That Reads Like a Memoir. Ha Jin, War Trash: A Novel, New York: Pantheon Books, 2004.352 pagesISBN: 0-375-42276-5"War trash" refers to the human detritus of war, the throwaways, the men still living but accorded no honor, in spite of their performance as soldiers. This is the story of one among a number of these men, a Chinese soldier imprisoned in an American prisoner-of-war camp in Korea during the Korean War. His rare English language skills and the opportunities they afford him to interact with a wide range of inmates and officers as interpreter elevate him to a position unlikely for an otherwise ordinary soldier required to fight for the Communists in the Chinese infantry. Though not a Party member, he is nevertheless driven to return to the mainland at the close of the war in order to re-join his mother and fiance. Personally apolitical, he is caught between dissent and conformity, faced with the choice of repatriating in Red China where he will not be welcomed by the Party, or joining the Nationalists in Taiwan with no opportunity of seeing his mother and fiance again.The language is a bit stiff, but this helps the book read more like a memoir than a novel. Though most characters are fictional, events and specific details are not. Meticulous research and attention to detail in the descriptions of incidents of horror on the battlefield, in the camp hospital, and in the camp compounds, and a deep understanding of the political twists and deceptions that create the narrator's dilemma, lend the narrative a level of realism not frequently found in a work of fiction.Ha Jin is a native of China, educated in the U.S. and currently an English professor at Boston University, and an author of several novels and books of poetry and short stories. War Trash won for its author the PEN/Faulkner Award; Ha Jin has also won the National Book Award, the Asian American Literary Award, the Flannery O'Connor Award for Short Fiction, and the PEN/Hemingway Award. This is the first of his books I've read; I look forward to more.
Dinner with Two 18th Century Gourmets. DINNER WITH TWO 18TH C  GOURMETSA Book Reviewby Wilson G. Duprey / Gail UnzelmanBibliographer, novelist, and wine historian James Gabler has pro-duced another capital book.  An Evening with Benjamin Franklin and Thomas Jefferson-Dinner, Wine, and Conversation is a marvelous mix of biog-raphy, travel, American diplomatic his-tory, and wine history. The author has used a dream device to place a professor of American history, Jack Osborne-who is also a well-versed wine historian and connoisseur of wines-in the dining room of Thomas Jefferson's elegant mansion on the Champs-Elysees in Paris.  His fellow dinner guest is Benjamin Franklin.  Prof. Osborne is informed of the evening's menu and then asked to choose the wines for the dinner. Jack is familiar with the wines that Jefferson had acquired for his cellar and is honored with the request.  The wines and the menu:1783 Dorsey's Champagne		Aperitif1784 Meursault Goute d'Or		Normandy oysters1784 Montrachet	Spaghetti, tossed with olive oil, Parmesan cheese, and an-chovies1784 Haut Brion	Beef ? la mode, served with1784 Ch. Margaux	potatoes & two kinds of peasfrom Jefferson's garden1784 Ch. Yquem	Ice cream in puff pastry.The dinner produced lively conversation on into the night.One of the most interesting parts of this book is Thomas Jefferson's story-mostly in his own words taken from his voluminous papers, both archived and published. He tells about his 3? month trip through southern France and into northern Italy, over the icy Alps (part of the way by mule back), tasting wines and keeping meticulous  notes on the wines and their histories.  He canvassed the wines of Burgundy, the M?doc and Bordeaux, and everything in between, whether grand ch?teau or tiny vineyard.  He checked the composition of the soils, met the owners and asked about vineyard practices, and often ordered wines to his liking for his Parisian cellar and his cellar at Monticello. He of course met many of the wine merchants, some of whom he had dealt with for years. He soon learned that buying wine bottled at the vineyard provided more certainty of getting what he ordered, for there was much blending of wines by the merchants.  In Italy he learned of the wine Nebiule (today's Nebbiolo) among many others new to him. He was also able to smuggle out in his pockets some of the supposedly superior Piedmont rice to send home to a South Carolina friend-who planted it, and found Carolina's rice more to his liking.Throughout this journey Jefferson visited all the natural, architectural, and historical elements, including ruins, arenas, temples, and the famous Roman aqueduct near Nimes. Wherever he went he attended the plays, operas, and other local entertainments; he ate in fine restaurants, if possible, and tasted the local wines.  Like other travelers of the time, he suffered the indignities and barbarities of the taverns and hotels along the rural roads. But nonetheless, he enjoyed his time and received a first-hand glimpse of much of France and northern Italy.Jefferson made a wine tour through Germany as well, again tasting and taking copious notes while he experienced the fine wines of the Moselle, Johannis-berg, Hochheim, and Rudesheim.  In addition to buying German wines for his cellars at Paris and Monticello, he bought vine shoots that he planted in his Paris garden, intending to transplant them to Monticello.All through the evening, Professor Osborne im-parted current (21st century) information to Jefferson and Franklin about the vineyards in France, Italy and Germany, and let them know that many of the great vineyards of the 18th century were still producing superb wines.The professor asked many questions of his dinner companions. Their answers were straight forward, despite being asked often-intimate details of their lives, and those of their wives, children, friends, and enemies.Jefferson was born an aristocrat, a Virginia planter, with thousands of acres of productive land; he owned slaves, and was an important figure in the often volatile Virginia legislature. Jefferson considered his three most important legacies (1) the Declaration of Independence (helped write it, and signed it), (2) the American Constitution (helped create), and (3) the founding and development of the University of Virginia at Charlottesville.Franklin, on the other hand, was born in Boston and struggled to become a printer's apprentice at age fourteen. Eventually he arrived in Philadelphia and found success in the printing business. He went on to become postmaster, invent the Franklin stove and bifocal eye-glasses, do his electrical-lightning experiments, and become a first-class entrepreneur, able to retire at age 42.  In 1754, now aged 48, he began his long and illustrious career in public life.  He was appointed in 1776 as American minister to France, where he served until 1785 when he then asked Congress to allow him to retire so he could return home, now an elderly man.Jefferson succeeded him as minister. The two statesmen had been friends in Philadelphia at the time of the writing of the Declaration of Independence; Franklin enjoyed his new duty of introducing young Jefferson to the French ministry, intelligentsia, aristocratic and social circles-all vitally important in diplomatic relations. Jefferson stayed on at Paris as American minister until 1789, when he came back to the U.S. with his two daughters.  He intended to return to Paris; but he became involved in national politics, was elected President, and would never see France again.Conversation flowed during the evening.  It seems that a favorite topic was the lady friends of both men. Jefferson, a new widower when he arrived in Paris, told of only one emotional affair, with Maria Cosway the famous artist. Alas, it did not survive.  Franklin reminded the professor that he had married in Philadelphia, but his wife had a mortal fear of sea journeys and never joined him for his overseas assignments. Franklin's life in London suited him so well that he returned to Philadelphia only once, for two years.  When he returned to London, his loving wife carried on his business affairs at home until her death.  Franklin enjoyed the company of a fine lady friend, and named three: his London landlady, his neighbor in Passy, and the third was one of the most beautiful ladies in France (according to Abigail Adams).  None of the ladies succumbed to his amorous eye, but all were extremely attentive friends.We get a good picture of John Adams, the Massa-chusetts signer of the Declaration, and one time friend to Jefferson-they would become dire opponents in later presidential campaigns.  A 700-mile journey with Jefferson's close Virginia friend, James Madison, is taken through the Revolutionary battle fields in New York and surrounding areas.  Naval hero John Paul Jones  is newly introduced in coastal English waters, and the Marquis de Lafayette is revealed in cloak and dagger activities.Both Jefferson and Franklin speak long and well of George Washington, both as general and as President.  While in France, Jefferson was honored to send French wines to the capitol for Washington's table.  Later on Jefferson wrote a most informative letter to newly elected President Madison about the wines he should import for the White House, with names, dealers, agents, cost per bottle, and directions for bottling and shipping abroad. Among the wines Jefferson recommended was the famous Italian wine, Montepulciano from Tuscany.There are almost one hundred vignette photos scattered throughout the book-views of cities of France, Italy, Germany, England, Scotland, Ireland, and the United States, and portraits of individuals- all reflecting the late 18th century scene of Jefferson and Franklin.Following the elaborate and detailed bibliographic notes for the text, are a few extra bonuses: (1) the fascinating story about the bottle of Ch. Lafite 1787 with the embossed initials "Th.J." that sold for $156,450 at a New York auction; (2) recipes for Jefferson's Beef ? la Mode, Browned Flour, and Mushroom Catsup (all from a new cookbook, Dining at Monticello).In this fictional, but fact-based imaginative and fascinating journey, James Gabler provides a vivid portrait of Jefferson and Franklin as true gourmets, enjoying the finest of food and wine.  Jefferson's almost four-month tasting extravaganza through the vineyards of France and Italy surely classes him as the 18th century's wine connoisseur par excellence.  In a sense, the two gentlemen were the jet-setters of the eighteenth century!
Wow. Before I read this book, I was afraid to lead and would back off leads if I thought there was a chance I might fall.  I had led a couple 5.9s, and easier routes, on bolts.  Last week, I led a sustained 5.10d, last month I took my first lead fall on a 5.10c, and yesterday I led 5.10b as if it were 'no big deal.'  The Rock Warrior's Way has transformed my view of leading and of climbing in general, and has opened up a whole new world of climbing for me.  Thank you, Arno!!
Wing Ding. Col. Carlson told his story without a lot of hype.  He makes one feel like they are there.  It is a pleasure that I had the chance to serve in the Air Force with such men who gave so much. We of that War are leaving at a fast rate.  Such great stories are all that will be left too soon
Great book, makes you think long after reading it. Not as engrossing as the first two books of the tetrology, The Temple of Dawn meanders through Honda's life in his 50's, as he falls in love with the Princess of Thailand who, he suspects, is the reincarnation of Isao and Iunima, the protagonists of "Spring Snow" and "Runaway Horses".The book provides for deep reading, and with Mishima's wonderful descriptions and exploration of the mind, it is a book not to be missed.The story deals with the multilayered emotions of Rie (Honda's wife), Keiko (his neighbor), Makiko (Iunuma's romantic interest in Runaway Horses) and other characters.With Honda as the main character, the development of his thoughts on life and death are dealt with in detail, which may provide some moments of "skipping", if you're not into that kind of stuff.
Perfect book for High School Art Teacher. This is the perfect reference book for a high school art teacher. It covers the main artists for the time periods listed on the cover. Great pictures, artwork, and art history. The book is easy to read. It makes art history painless
a classic novel. a timeless novel about the rights of the individual and our own mortality
A good companion to the Blue Book. I've recommended this as a supplementary text for my legal writing classes for several years now.  Dworsky provides good additional commentary on the otherwise opaque rules of the BlueBook.  My only complaint is that he favors underlining over italics for case citations; my experience is that  most attorneys now prefer italics
The perfect puppy. A good reference book and easy reading.  Most information very helpful
THE OTHER SIDE OF LITERATURE. THE OTHER SIDE OF MIDNIGHT is silly, insipid and over the top. A mess of a book. But an enjoyable mess. So much so it is unputdownable. Sheldon never falters from his high-gloss, nonstop suspense formula and delivers the melodrama goods with panache and style. His unidimensional characters may go through every impossible situation known to man but, boy, are the chapters engrossing. His scenes are as tight as his heroines' perfect attributes. He may not have written the All-American novel, but he has winningly delivered a bubble gum treat worthy of any beach read seeker.-----Martin Boucher
Just What You're Looking For. This book is packed with ideas on how to design beautiful pillows and seat cushions.  It shows a wide variety of fabrics (cotton, organza, silk, etc), and explains how to use each type to its greatest advantage. The directions for measuring, cutting and sewing are clear and concise. Many clever and fresh design ideas. Inspiring
Totally NOT racist,; nicely brave about race-relations, I think people mean to say. Some of the reviews I have just read are rather misleading. "If you are a white male who is secretly racist this book will validate your feelings"? Uh-uh.I discovered this book when the Times put it on the top 100 list. It is a story of a Gen-Xer white male, working class, growing up during Detroit's decline. The main theme is the white flight and resignation whites feel about a mayor, Coleman Young, who is clearly paranoid and unprofessional at the very least.Clemens refuses to join in the race prejudice that is relatively easy and done on a low level, but when a legitimate anger towards a criminal (who raped his wife) comes up and he learns the attacker is black, he briefly feels tempted down that path. But he never does, basically forever pondering race relations and how to connect to black people beyond the Coleman Young--white flight--civil rights cliches everyone falls back on.Incidentally, there are a lot of funny scenes here, of Clemens growing up typically male and goofing off with his friends. Women are treated with respect, although face it, this is not a book about Clemens and women! Duh, obviously women are not centra characters much of the time, Detroit itself is. Also, there are lots of positive blacks--his coworkers at the parks deptartment, his coworkers at the city office, his ROOMMATE.Don't let someone's predictable need to race-bash keep you from reading yet another memoir trying to jump into the charged atmosphere of race and try to be evenhanded about things!
A Bound Classic. Freyfogle's volume is a little-known classic, a wide-ranging, thoughtful, even lyrical inquiry into the ways we see the land and understand our place in it. The book is hard to categorize, for it transcends all academic fields and conventional ways of thinking about environmental issues. Freyfogle's well-grounded premise is that our environmental problems are, at root, cultural ones, having to do with our over-reliance on liberal individualism in all its forms. Step by step, he encourages us to rethink our cultural presumptions, and urges us in a gentle, reflective way to imagine landscapes that healthier, for nature and people. At the center of his own vision is the idea of &quot;land health,&quot; which he proposes as an alternative to sustainable development and its alternatives. Some readers will conclude that he is too ambitious in calling for a reshaping of our dominant culture; others that he is too hesitant to assign blame to bad actors, rather than to society as a whole. But many will agree with the observation of historian Don Worster that &quot;among the many voices trying to articulate an environmental philosophy for our time, Eric Freyfogle is unsurpassed.&quot
Yet another alltime GREAT. This guy knew how to write about love, in all of it's phases, yet never or rarely descended into mawkishness. And a lot of his considerable output is classic. Buy it if you have to skip lunch for a week. If you've never read  Sturgeon before, you're in for a treat, language of a grace and power to  rival Bradbury and a way of moving along jauntily that compares with Henry  Kuttner (Lewis Padgett) and Alfred Bester
CAUTION!:  Dekker may contain adictive qualities. I first found Ted Dekker in Goodwill while I was hunting for games for my old school super nintendo (SNES). His book, BLINK, caught my eye and I did my 'Is it a good book?' test on it. I opened to the middle pages and read both and was entrapped.From that moment in Goodwill I havent been able to put Dekkers worlds out of my mind. And this series is no different. After I found and bought this book, I couldn't put it down until I finished the whole series, which I did in 5 days.BLACK:This story starts off in an incredible way. Hopefully without giving too much of the plot away I can tell you about it. We find a man named Thomas Hunter running for his life in the alleys of a city. The next chapter we stumble on a man who's lost all memories of self in a evil forest outrunning giant black bats.While initally confusing, BLACK sets the score for two of the most epic and historic events ever in TWO different realities, and Hunter is caught in BOTH. In one world a leathal airborne virus is about to wipe out the entire population of the planet and in the other, the threat of the Shakati (Black bats) rises and boils over boundaires. Follow Thomas as he tries to figure out why him and fight with him as he learns and struggles to be heard and to surive
The dimensional translation brought to life. Philosophers, scholars and other intellectuals have tried countless times to translate Lao Tzu's Tao Te Ching. There are so many translations and commentaries. However all of these other translations provide a linear comprehension of the Tao Te Ching. Linear meaning the knowledge derived is thought to be of ideological value. Reason being that all these philosophers, scholars and other intellectuals are not Masters of the Tao and hence they conject based on their inadequate level of realization. Hence providing the linear, incorrect and "missing the point" translation.Master Liao, being a Grandmaster of the Tao has given the dimensional and applicable translation of the Tao Te Ching. I'm a Taiji Gong practitioner and through my own meditative experiences I can understand and apply the Tao Te Ching as translated by Master Waysun Liao.If I may paraphrase to help others understand the Tao and the Te is analogous to "part and parcel of the whole" - Te being part and Tao being the whole. This dimensional aspect, that interaction of the Te and the Tao is what Master Liao elaborates on in Nine Nights with the Taoist Master.I highly recommend this book for anyone studying the Tao. I hope this book becomes widely known as a great translation for the Tao Te Ching because its standard is higher then intellectual.
Europes First Republic. This is the best history ever written about the Dutch Revolt - a series of upheavals from 1568 to 1648 - which led to the independent United Provinces. This was Europes first republic which survived until the French  Revolution
basic readable reference. This work is a self-conscious prcis of the current professional norms of political psychology which loosely presents itself as applying what is best known in psychology to political science. In many ways political psychology puts a human face on social political processes that addresses motives  as well as clusters of behavior needing explication that soft pedals reductive theory for more empirical observation quantified from many events and cultural circumstances. The essays in Handbook of Political Psychology serve to convey the general nature and range of the subject while also being a guide to the central issues and studies in the field. It belongs in every political science library
Knowledge. This reference, from A-Z, on the Masonic Order is excellent for those seeking apprenticeship or rather initiation into Freemasonry.  The reader will gain vast historical knowledge of the Fraternity; it's roots, rites, degrees, titles, and so forth.Granted that the book is aged and it's an Encyclopaedia, so it can get dull for some, I find it to be very helpful and it suits the purpose of those who are inclined.  Riddles?  Maybe..
May be the best book I've ever read. I know that sounds like hyperbole, but seriously.  He's just so very good at capturing a very wide variety of characters.  It starts out like "Things Fall Apart" or "Palace Walk" as a portrait of an unlikable man.  But it very quickly morphs into something much more complex and amazing as he widens the scope again and again to incorporate every one of the people in the Cancer Ward.  Truly it's hard to speak about exactly what he's doing.  But as a friend of mine said, even with that Nobel Prize, he's still underrated.
Lcsmith. This one's so interesting it's a bit scary goes to show you how much study has been done to control the heard, charts on death rates and the economy, birth rates, divorces on and on even how we like women to look during good times and bad.Nothing here on short term trading but the guys your trading against know what color your toothbrush is.And they do want your your childs college money just in case you don't really realize that yet.To be honest I haven't finished this yet but I did skim through it It's a long read ....Good book for presidential cycle holds.Debra is simply amazing what she must know
There is historical evidence... Note please that my rating should be discounted as I have not rated the book. However I can address two harsh criticisms of it by John J. Geyer "jgeyer1". In that review here at Amazon we read:" If a rampaging army storms through Canaan destroying city after city one would expect that the remains of those cities would show appropriate destruction layers and that the diplomatic archives of the surrounding countries would notice. There is nothing. "Actually there is a very much evidence of such destruction to be found in city after city in the Holy Land, albeit at layers not deemed appropriate for the commonly accepted historical era of Joshua's invasion.However a quick google search on "Lisa Liel" or "Lisa JAH" will lead you to her website at http://www.starways.net/lisa/Titled "Lisa's World", then click on "history", then "The Exodus in History" and scroll down to the chart of the Historical vs. the Biblical view of history of the Land of Israel".Immediately above that chart we read: "A simple redating of the archaeological periods in the Land of Israel brings the entire scope of biblical history into synchronization with the ancient historical record. Only time will tell whether more archaeologists will follow Cohen and Anati in their slowly dawning recognition of the historicity of the Bible".Pursuing the website in greater depth will quickly show you that the historical record is full of evidence, but again, that adjustment in dating mentioned is required.John J. Geyer "jgeyer1" also wrote this criticism: "For the bottom line, as the author acknowledges repeatedly, is that there is NO evidence confirming ANY part of the Exodus story."But if Lisa Liel's dating shift is done to bring the historical Caanan archaeological evidence into sync with the Biblical, then the same exact time shift shows at the appropriate era in the separate Egyptian historical record this datum: *Plague is throughout the land.Blood is everywhere.The river is blood.That is our water! That is our happiness! What shall we do in respect thereof? All is ruin!Trees are destroyed.No fruit or herbs are found...Forsooth, gates, columns and walls are consumed by fire.Forsooth, grain has perished on every side.The land is not light [dark].This authentic historical Egyptian record is of troubles plaguing that kingdom dated near the time of the first intermediate period of bloodshed and anarchy resulting from the collapse of the monarchy of the old Kingdom of Egypt. Lisa writes:"When the Bible tells us that Egypt would never be the same after the Exodus, it was no exaggeration. With invasions from all directions, virtually all subsequent kings of Egypt were of Ethiopian, Libyan or Asiatic descent. When Chazal tell us that King Solomon was able to marry Pharaoh's daughter despite the ban on marrying Egyptian converts until they have been Jewish for three generations because she was not of the original Egyptian nation, there is no reason to be surprised".* "A.H. Gardiner, Admonitions of an Egyptian Sage from a hieratic papyrus in Leiden (1909). Historians are almost unanimous in dating this papyrus to the very beginning of the Middle Kingdom. The events it describes, consequently, deal with the end of the Old Kingdom".
A Good Book But I Prefer Jack's Own. I bought this book before reading Jack's "Straight from the Gut". When I read this book I thought it was 5 stars and I re-read this book at least once looking for clues to help my own business. Then I read Jack's book and realized his was better. In any case this covers all the basic aspects of Jack's methods including the educational meetings at the GE "university", cleaning house, picking winning companies, eliminating small market share companies, and promoting top performers and eliminating underperformers. It shows how he is hands on.Good if you want to read two books on Jack Welch
Best on Buckminster. This is one of the best books on Buckminster's life and ideas.  Highly recommended, especially for entrepreneurs or futurists
Pulp Fiction in a Book. This book reminded me of the movie Pulp Fiction. It took a while to get into it, but boy, was I glad I stuck with it. The plot was a wee bit complicated but well written, and written in a way that made you want to stick with it. Different characters flew around the pages but eventually everything came together and made perfect sense. It was the type of book that when I'd finished, I placed it on my "read again" list
Entertaining, educational, and disturbingly accurate. This book contains espionage techniques that has shocked a former KGB major general with its accuracy, as he'd spent twenty years trying to figure out this stuff during the Cold War.  Each tactic and method--some amusing, others possibly illegal--such as how to determine leaks in your company, how to determine mail tampering, how to use cellphones as eavesdropping tools, and how to infiltrate your competitors' meetings all come with little true-life examples of similar tactics being used in the field.  As with similar books like the WORST-CASE SCENARIO series, DO NO TRY THIS AT HOME, and THE ACTION HERO(INE)'S HANDBOOKs, it's all for entertainment purposes only, but it does make for excellent research material
Awesome story that tugs at your heart. This is the best book that I have read in years! Though an emotional book to read, it takes you through the love story of the author and her husband, at the same time as it takes you through the terror and grief of losing him on 9/11. It brings home the heart of the losses of all from that day that should never be forgotten. I laughed at the same time I cried my eyes out, having to stop reading many times as I could no longer see the words through my tears. It makes you want to just hold her while she grieves, makes you want to do anything to make it better for her. Also, the unsung hero of this story, the story of the love between her and her sister who is a rock for her through this whole trying time. She is an unbelievably gifted writer that touches every corner of your heart. I would recommend this book to anyone. I will re-read this book again, just because it was so beautiful. You feel like a part of her life when you are done reading it. You want to be part of her life. It is the best book I have read in a very very long time.Probably ever.
Aron Gets It. In reading Aron's books, I feel fully comprehended, which has been a rarity in this life.  Her research let me know there are others like me, and I felt deeply heartened by the contents of this book.  I love, too, that she writes from a place she knows from the inside out, and that she and her husband have collaborated over the years on research about this very important aspect of being human.  I have purchased this book many times for friends
Beauty and Brains. This beautiful, comprehensive guide to Frogworld is candy for the eyes and food for the brain. And when you're done reading it, you may find it too beautiful to stick on a shelf. Ellin Beltz loves frogs, and it is impossible to read this rich book without catching her enthusiasm.Who can resist a chapter on Frogs in Myth and Culture that celebrates everything from the frog shaped amulets of Sumer and the Aztec toad goddess, right alongside the Budweiser frogs, Michigan J. Frog, and possibly the most famous frog ever, Kermit! Beltz makes it clear that frogs have always had an important place in human society
good book but a few things off..... I enjoyed reading this book thanks to the way it was descriptively written, like about stacey's father's day weekend in new york, and how they spent time at fire island where stacey, her dad and claudia are vacationing and where her boyfriend robert is vacationing at the same time there, but she keeps it a secret. Claudia seemed to be jealous of stacey spending too much time with robert though and kept questioning their friendship and they got into a fight. The baby sitters also came briefly for the trip and they made costumes for the fourth of july parade but it was a disaster and meanwhile stacey is getting all tangled up in her lies, but she's not the only one who lied, her dad was up to something too and keeping it from stacey. Maybe the book should have been called stacey and the big fat lies or something. I also enjoyed reading about claudia's beautiful photography of sandcastles she built and how she got some publicity for it on the little island.
Good Book. Pretty good for a new skydiver, i haven't finished the book yet, but there is a ton of info in this. I ALWAYS run anything i learn or read by my jump master and would recommend you do too before changing any of your emergency steps.buy the book, you'll be happy you did!RonAFF #
Que bueno. Que bueno la traduccion y el original... Neruda es lo mejor de los mejores. Un libro exquisito
Great Source to teach kids to crochet!. I used this book to teach my class to crochet last year.  It does only cover single crocet stiches and increasing and decreasing, but that is enough to introuce kids to this craft and give them a few projects to work on.  My class loved making the striped mufflers.  We got a lot of partial skiens  of yarn donated and this worked perfect to make the mufflers with.  Everyone's was unique and the kids, boys and girls alike, enjoyed wearing something they had made.
A delicate collection. I hope that I will be forgiven for saying that as much as I enjoyed this volume of Bishop's prose, I still don't find it as robust as her poetry.  While lovely, some of these entries were so slight I was afraid to breathe and break them.The book is divided into two halves-- a series of memories and a series of stories. I liked the memories section the best: particularly "The Country Mouse" and her memoir of Marianne Moore. Of the stories, I liked "Gwendolyn" the best-- a story about a dying little girl (which is not nearly as saccharine as it sounds from that description.)I enjoyed this book, I *think* I enjoyed it in its own right. But if I'm honest, I'm not sure how I would have felt about it had I not already loved Bishop's poems so much
Amusing Trivia. This book is an irreverent collection of interesting but mostly unimportant historical anecdotes.A sampling of stories that I enjoyed:The fork (at least as used for eating) was initially condemned as "the devil's pitchfork" by priests who thought people ought to eat with their hands.Witchcraft prosecutions were motivated at least in part by the desire of churches and civil authorities to get the property of the accused, until a legal change in 1630 prevented them from getting such property. Similar motivations for the inquisition, where property could be confiscated decades after the death of an alleged heretic how had owned it.He describes mail order porn in 1863.He has a photo of George Washington's dentures, made from human teeth (presumably taken from dead soldiers).The medieval church forbade doctors from dissecting human corpses to learn about anatomy and forbade surgery. Some of the other medical anecdotes suggest that there have been many times when patients would have been better off if the prohibition on surgery had lasted longer.Don't expect too much wisdom from these stories. One isolated place where he attempts a non-shallow analysis is when he asks "How did child labor start in America, and why was it widely tolerated"? Unfortunately, his attempts to analyze this merely consist of finding reports of child labor earlier than he thinks his readers expect. It doesn't occur to him to ask whether people could even afford to do without child labor before the industrial revolution
Great Prep for a Meeting with Lawyer and Acct. Some reviewers have mentioned the fact that this doesn't delve into specifics enough, and that all it does do is give you a list of questions to take with you to ask a real estate lawyer or an accountant.  While this is true, I feel that is not necessarily a negative.  No book should have pretend to have all the answers, especially when talking about real estate, where there are many variables that make each situation unique.  So yes, it does not give you definite answers, but it is valuable as a preparation tool and as examples of possibilities
Realistic battle scenes and strategies. This is a pretty exceptional book. There are three major strengths of the book from the perspective of Shaara's writing ability.First, Michael Shaara has the rare ability to describe battle scenes, including the horror and chaos, in a manner that makes these battles accessible and realistic and immediate to the reader. Very few writers have this gift. Tolstoy was able to capture the cat and mouse game between Napoleon and Czar Alexander the Great in War and Peace; Victor Hugo was able to capture the chaos of Waterloo in Les Miserables; Ian McEwan captures the sad retreat to Dunkirk in Atonement; Robert Graves captures trench warfare during World War I in Goodbye to All That; and Joseph Heller captures the absurdity of war in Catch 22. I would have to say that Michael Shaara comes very close to the writing skills of Tolstoy, Hugo, McEwan, Heller, and Graves in terms of describing the unfolding of battle.Second, Michael Shaara is a master at capturing the male or masculine mind. I do not mean to be stereotypical here but it is very much a man's book. I say this because Michael Shaara was able to capture male friendship, male envy and competition, male humor (which can be dark, sarcastic, and gross) and the manner in which males respond to a chain of command.Third, Shaara is superb at developing individual characters, exploring the internal dynamics that make them 'tick' and that lead them to take the actions and positions that they take under certain conditions, such as the stress of warfare. This aspect of the book was fascinating. The portrait of General Lee was fair and balanced. Lee was suffering from cardiovascular disease and was the retired head of West Point. As a military theoretician he was still under the influence of Napoleon Bonaparte's military theories. He wished to be well informed so as to make the best decisions and then to engage the enemy when he thought he had the advantage. He is usually contrasted with the Union General, McClellan who frustrated President Lincoln because of McClellan's continuous delays and preparations and avoidance of engagement with the enemy. However, General Lee failed to adjust his military strategy to the improvement in firearms technology. It is General Longstreet who is one of the two most interesting characters in the story for Longstreet recognized that improved firearm technology changed the equation in regard to battleground tactics. Longstreet's conceptions were not appreciated during the Civil War and unfortunately were not appreciated during World War I, when so many of Europe's young men died senseless deaths by charging machine guns.The character of Joshua Lawrence Chamberlain is a wonderful counterpoint to Longstreet. Longstreet is in constant mourning for his four children, all of whom died in one day of fever. Chamberlain on the other hand is pschologically very healthy, with the ability to respond to those around him with a healthy range of emotions. Longstreet was a military genius, but unfortunately a genius that was unrecognized as such because of the aura and mantle of sainthood that the South had conveyed onto General Lee. Chamberlain on the other hand was a college professor who was not trained to be a soldier but who was extremely pragmatic and resourceful.This is a very enjoyable book, full of history, well written.
Surprised by how fantastic this book is. When I saw that this book was written in 1976, I wasn't expecting much. Koontz is a great writer, but I figured this was just around the time period that he was still finding himself as a writer.What I discovered in this book was a style of writing that isn't common in any other Koontz book, which certainly isn't a bad thing. A lot of time, Koontz doesn't deviate far from a particular formula, but this book bears no resemblence to anything he has ever written, and it is a pleasant surprise.Highly recommended for those who need a break from reading Koontz's recent novels.
A modern-day classic. I believe that "Duck and Goose," released earlier this year, will one day enter the pantheon of classic children's picture books. It strikes just the right balance between humor and a gentle lesson about sharing and working together. Duck and Goose begin by squabbling over the soccer ball that they mistake for a large egg and end up dreamily making plans to raise their "baby" together. When a little bluebird blithely points out the obvious, Duck and Goose take their changed circumstances in stride. Duck and Goose's conversations will bring a chuckle even to the most jaded parent and the illustrations are lovely. Highly recommended by this children's lit snob.
The One & Only Review Book you need!. I bought the Kaplan book-- waste of money.  Heard about this book, bought it and it's all you need!  Fantastic book-- worth every penny
A children's classic. I grew up reading the Mrs. Piggle-Wiggle series. I loved every single story and I still remember them vividly. They may be a little dated but the lessons are still current and they are still very amusing
Good Diet for Life. While I must unfortunately agree with the person who wrote in another review that this diet could have been put out in a 12 page pamphlet, most diet books consist of 90% pep talk and 10% real diet information anyway.  I won't let that stop me from praising this book.Initially, a friend of mine recommended it as a possible way to lower my cholesterol - something which is obliquely suggested in the book, but which is not a major point of the diet.  At the time my physician had recommended that I go on medication for my cholesterol, which I desperately wanted to avoid.  After three months on this diet, my cholesterol dropped from 270 to 199, without medication; admittedly, I did some things simultaneously that went beyond the diet, such as drastically dropping my caffeine intake and eating whole grains instead of refined starches, but I do believe that the major benefit came from burning up all the excess fat that came from carbohydrates.The best part about this diet, though, is that after a day or two you don't feel hungry any more.  After being on this diet for six months, I sincerely believe that there is such a thing as carbohydrate addiction.  I also believe that this addiction has a bewildering array of side effects that we are not likely to recognize as being caused by excess carbohydrates in the system - things like hyperactiveness, lack of sleep, being hungry all the time, and depression.Needless to say, I lost weight - forty pounds.  The best part of that is that I wasn't really "obese", just "overweight", and now my weight is perfect for my height (5'10", 156 Lb).  That's good news for those people who are trying to get those last five or ten pounds off and can't quite manage it.I intend to keep with the diet, maybe for the rest of my life.  I'm used to it now, and I hardly notice it, which is another great feature of this diet.  I don't know if it will provide the same benefits for other people, but it was certainly what I needed
Excellent guide to natural remedies. An excellent natural healing reference book. Tons of cross references. So easy to follow. Beautiful clear layout. Covers just about everything. Tells how to do it yourself in many cases. Includes Ayurveda, chinese medicine, flower remedies, herbs, home remedies, aromatherapy, vitamin therapy and homeopathy
Mitzvah Chic deserves an A+. This book has been indespensible for me in planning my daughter'sBat Mitzvah.  It's very easy to read and the author will even email you if you have additional questions.  I highly recommend this book to anyone who is planning or will be planning a Bar or Bat Mitzvah.  It would also make a great addition to your temple's library
Packed With Knowledge!. Understand from the outset what The Power of Six Sigma is not. It is not really a story about two buddies who lunch together while they pursue management success - that's just the framework. It is not a book on how to implement Six Sigma - although it would prove a useful adjunct to any such program. Nor is it one of those books filled with consultant-ese whose primary function seems to be to advertise: "You need to hire me to help you to dispel the confusion that my book just generated." This is actually a very down-to-earth introduction to the quality enhancement strategy that is continuing to transform the corporate world. Frustrated onlookers may believe that practitioners keep the practical meaning of Six Sigma hidden, like some secret magic potion, but this powerful little book blows the lid off the caldron. Written as a lunchroom dialogue between friends, it's as user-friendly as it is insightful. We highly recommend this manual to anyone at any level involved, or becoming involved, with Six Sigma
Best Actuarial Book. Nothing else to say. The best book for actuarial mathematics. Also good for risk managers, in particular for operational risk
A laugh a minute. Fantastic, fantastic, fantastic. I bought this book to read on a flight from the UK to Australia and it had me laughing so loud I was quite an embarrassment! I'm not a 'chick lit' kind of girl but this was a real exception. As an author myself I really admire the talent it takes to write a book where almost every line makes you smile or laugh. Pure escapism, very charming and such good fun, and somehow it also manages to be a book which makes you take stock of what really counts in life. This should be compulsory reading for every workaholic - and certainly every lawyer. Enjoy
Does the field of intention love nature?. The Power of Intention is both inspiring and troubling. As an environmental and social activist who lives off of less the 10k per year, I was wondering as I read this book if I was holding in my hands what was once an Ancient Tree? Our Ancient Ancestors are being clear cut at an alarming rate in the Pacific Northwest. Most will go extinct in our lifetimes. Corporations continue to consolidate their political power in both mainstream parties: Democrat and Republican alike enact legislation on behalf of corporations that will open what is left of these ancient giants to clear-cutting. Stories will be told of these trees on day, perhaps even to our own grandchildren beginning with the words, "Once upon a time there was a great and majestic forest."Your Democratic and Republican representatives are now organizing the last Buffalo hunt. You can still have your voice be heard on behalf of these ancient trees before it is too late.On page 48 of his book Mr. Dyer makes the following observation, "Practice kindness toward the Earth by picking up a piece of litter that's on your path, or saying a silent prayer of gratitude for the existence of rain, the color of flowers, or even the paper you hold in your hand that was donated by a tree."  Sadly, Mr. Dyer's observation is confused. The paper we hold in our hands is produced by multi-national corporations on public lands administered by bureaucrats marching to one tune: politicians who accept large gratuities in the form of moneyed transactions so favorable legislation opens these national treasures to exploitation.This book review is offered as a creative challenge to Mr. Dyer to connect to the field of intention on behalf of non-sentient life. Hopefully, the field of intention extends the same beneficence to the astonishing field of nature, not in a fashion that promotes anthropocentrism and narcissism, but rather amplifies the web of life and its connections to human life so that a win-win situation is advocated rather than diminished.This begs the question: is the book worth the $24.95 I paid to read it? I suppose that if the field of intention can be tapped into for the benefit of our Earth Mother, my answer is yes! If, on the other hand, the spiritual principles are used only for generating prosperity for the self alone, then the $24.95 would be better spent planting a tree to help offset the expense of Mr. Dyer's next best seller.
Yay for wise women!. The world needs more wise women. I want all of these women to live in my house with me, and share all of their wisdom. You don't find better crones than these ones
Gogol classic. Gogol has the uncanny ability to write deep, beautiful and simultaneously hilarious stories. "Diary of a Madman and Other Stories" is a great example of Gogol's style of writing to anyone interested in a premier in Gogol's literary style.Caution: don't read this book at night when everyone is asleep; you'll wake them up as you laugh outloud
Walkenbach is the best. Just an echo of previous reviewers.  This is my third or fourth Walkenback Excel book - and they are all excellent.  He provides more not-obvious tips and tricks than any other author - that truly impact the efficiency and usability of your spreadsheets.  Great reference
Do we love across Time....or in spite of it?. As someone who finds the supernatural absolutely fascinating, I have always found Picoult's novels intriguing.  However, unlike some of her other works, this novel is a slow starter.  No less than 20 characters are introduced in the first few chapters of the book and it is sometimes tedious to remember who is who.  That being said, the characters finally begin to mesh and flow...the dross drains away and the pure gold of Picoult's writing talent emerges.As a hopeful romantic, I am drawn to the main character, Ross Wakeman, who has experienced love so profound it permeates to the bone.  Once love on that level is experienced, and then lost, life's orchestral crescendo fades into a single note of woeful desperation and despondency.  A suicide attempt seems the only answer...not once, not twice, but thrice.  The enthralling encounter that enables Ross to knit together the broken pieces of his life is central to the plot of the book, and every bit as exciting as the ghosts who also haunt the pages.  Ultimately, Ross learns the enigmatic truth that life isn't defined by the moment one dies, but by all the moments one truly lives."True love is like ghosts, which everybody talks about and few have ever seen."
Excellent. This book is a succinct summary of Deepak's Chopra's insightful understanding of the Cosmos and "Who I really am?".His writing sometimes mystifies me, but is always fascinating. Understood at a deeper level, I feel that Dr. Chopra has been able to put into words something awesome that we all sense deep down but need to be reminded of. There is something true here and I find his book liberating and wonderful. I never tire from reading and re-reading his marvelous perceptions.[...]
Fun Romp. Great romp through history and literature, definitely free-association. If you enjoy cigars, literature, movies, history, etc, this is a fun book to read. Enjoy in small bites, its pretty rich. Perhaps the experience is a bit like enjoying a cigar: smoke one now, savor it, but don't smoke through the entire box all at once
I couldn't put this book down!. This is an excellent and insightful book that should be required reading in high schools.  I have never been to Europe and must say that after reading While Europe Slept I have zero desire to go.  For years I have ranted about the scourge of "political correctness" to my friends and family and refuse to partake in it.  This book is a great illustration of how destruction PC is.  I wonder if Europe will wake up before it's too late?
Good Book. This book tells a legend about the gift of giving.  It is set in Mexico, close to Christmas time. All the families are preparing their gifts for the baby Jesus.  One family is making a special blanket for the baby, however the mother gets too sick and she cannot finish the beautiful blanket, so the family will have no gift to give on Christmas.  So the young daughter tries to finish the blanket but ruins it beyond repair, so she hides from the rest of the town's people and does not go to church on Christmas.  While everyone else is walking into church baring their gifts, the young girl watches from afar.  However while there she encounters an old lady who teaches her a valuable lesson.  The young girl learns that it is not the gift that you give but the thought that you have put into it, and the mere gesture of giving.  The author gets the point across about gift giving so well.  I came away from this book remembering and understand that it is truly the thought that counts and not the gift itself
A voice from the radio says "Read This Book!". White Noise is quite possibly the most enjoyable book I've ever read. Don DeLillo creates a humorous account of a middle-aged man (Jack Gladney) obsessed with death and its inevitability. In his writing, DeLillo suggests that Americans use consumerism as a way of warding of death, which is one of the novels running themes. The characters in the novel are oddly outrageous with their fanatic conversations about the recollection of trivial things like "Where were you the first time you brushed your teeth with your finger?" or "Where were you when James Dean died?" The dialogue throughout the novel is brilliant and at one point, a father-son conversation about rain coaxes the reader into questioning the validity of his or her own senses.   The novel also shows how people are infatuated by televised disastrous events. White Noise reads like a demented sitcom, full of dark comedy, and unique neurotic characters that keep you entertained and interested through its entirety. If you enjoy comical and creative writing, then read this book
Tasty backpack food for for less. Freezer Bag Cooking means that you can greatly reduce your pack weight, simplify your food preparation, but still eat great food for a whole lot less!Every backpacker should try it
BREATHTAKING ART. Owning all of the Boxed sets of the LOTR's trilogy I found myself utterly fascinated with the various documentaries on the discs about the making of the film.  Especially with the art designs..the paintings, storyboards, miniatures...Here are men who are supremely talented artists whose paintings and drawings would never been seen by most people were it not for the DVDs and books like this.  This is high art...Gorgeous and breathtaking and on a par if not surpassing the works of people like the Hildebrandt Brothers who have been long known for their paintings of Middle Earth.  Next to people like Alan Lee, the Hildebrandts work seems child-like in its intent.The painting of the Nazgul looking down like a vulture over the town of Bree, just waiting is marvelous.  The Nazgul, their wriath images revealed to a startled Frodo when he puts the ring on atop Weathertop, Treebeard, Shelob...the fantastic pencil drawings.  These films created literally thousands of masterpieces of fantasy art.  Just a fantastic book and at over 200 pages it's not some fluff marketing item, but a book for serious fans and collectors
A journey off the map. It is the year 1204, and Constantinople, the splendid capital of the Byzantine Empire, is being sacked and burned by the knights of the Fourth Crusade. Amid the carnage and confusion, one Baudolino saves a historian and high court official from certain death at the hands of the crusading warriors and proceeds to tell his own magical story.Born a simple peasant in northern Italy, Baudolino has two major gifts-a talent for learning languages and a skill in telling lies, and one great flaw - absolute cowardice in the face of armed conflict. When still a boy he meets a foreign commander in the woods, charming him with his quick wit and lively mind. The commander-who proves to be Emperor Frederick Barbarossa-adopts Baudolino and sends him to the university in Paris, where he makes a number of fearless, adventurous friends, including a talentless Poet, and a love-struck former assassin turned troubadour.Baudolino skill at lies has created not only the myth of the Holy Grail, but the Grail itself, caused a city to be raised from swampland, and generated the infamous love letters of Ablard and Hlose, actually the unsent love letters from Baudolino to the wife of Barbarossa, himself. Spurred by myths and their own reveries, this merry band sets out in search of Prester John, a legendary priest-king said to rule over a vast kingdom in the East-a phantasmagoric land of strange creatures with eyes on their shoulders and mouths on their stomachs, of eunuchs, unicorns, and lovely maidens. To aid him in his quest, he has a motley crew in tow, including the aforementioned Poet and troubadour, as well as an alchemist, Cabalist and assorted others.Fans of previous Eco works will immediately note that this is the first that does not claim to be, or revolve around, an authentic re-discovered manuscript of some sort. It's also not as scholarly, or esoterically heavy, as Rose, or Pendulum. However, it's clear Eco is having fun in writing this, and after all of the pedantic scholarship of the Rose and Pendulum, one has to feel Eco is entitled to his fun. Eco takes us off the map of the known world, to the mysterious East, where a Christian King awaits the return of the 12 magi to re-unite his Kingdom with the Christian West, where nature has been set upon her head, and where the map says, "Here there be dragons". While not among Eco's best, it's still a fun read, and shows Eco's humor amidst, and as complement to, his scholarship.
Satisfying read. A very romantic story. Somewhat graphic with quite of bit of swearing but in a low-key way. I read it and then read it again a few days later. Too long to read in one sitting. It made me cry
THE DEGUNKERS. The source of "gunk" is the way users use their Mac--not the machinery itself. But, a lot of Mac users don't think their machines have gunk. Author  Joli Ballew has done an outstanding job of putting together a book that shows you how to keep your Mac running at tip-top speed as long as possible and to make you more productive along the way.Ballew begins by helping you to determine whether your Mac is really gunked up. Next, the author introduces a proven 12-step program to degunking success--a program that can really and truly get your Mac performing like new again. Then, she explains how to get rid of- or degunking files that shouldn't be in your Mac. The author continues by showing you how to locate and get rid of unwanted applications, including beta applications, unnecessary programs and unnecessary Mac OS X applications. In addition, the author next covers Tiger's new Spotlight feature, including how you can use it to organize data and create Smart folders. She also focuses on getting you working more efficiently by personalizing what you access every day. The author next shows you how to degunk the Dashboard. Next, the author shows you how to degunk new features, so that they don't drive you crazy. Then, she shows you how to manage or eliminate your font gunk. Ballew continues with a discussion of how to degunk your iPod. Next, the author shows you how to prevent spam first, keep what you do get under control, and formulate a plan for reducing or eliminating spam altogether. Then, she covers e-mail housecleaning in more detail, and how to clean up and organize your legitimate mail with spam that gets through your defenses. In addition, Ballew continues by discussing how you can degunk the startup process and optimize the hard drive, so that your Mac runs as efficiently as possible. Next, she explores Software Update; as well as, available software upgrades. Then, she introduces you to the different types of hardware you can acquire to beef up your system. The author then shows you what tools are available to help you maintain your Mac and what tools can be used to search for, find, and fix errors with hard disks, permissions, and similar issues. She then shows you how important it is to secure your Mac and what built-in and third-party utilities and software are available to you. Next, she covers how to back up data, with emphasis on creating a backup strategy and sticking to it. Finally, she shows you how to get started with Automator.With the preceding in mind, the author has done an excellent job of showing you how to follow the basic steps outlined in this book on a regular basis, with the results of giving yourself an insurance policy and saving yourself from encountering aggravation down the road. So, the belief here is that degunking your Mac will make your time on your computer more efficient, more productive, and maybe even more enjoyable.
Your pre-teen MUST read this book. This book provides indispensible advice and education for the parent and pre-teen.  When I was entering adolescence, my parents gave me this book.  I cannot describe what a relief it was to learn that I wasn't weird and  that the feelings I was having and the stage I was entering were normal.    A must-read for all Christian families on the brink of the teenage years
Read this little story... the tale of tangle and mossy, two child like creatures on the adventure of the ages. alone - together - parting - re-uniting, until which is which becomes forgotten and un-threatening, and best; so unimportant. Simply, this is The Best Fairey Tale I have ever read.It is a classic.If you know anyone with fantasy and imagination, regardless of age, this whould be a most welcome gift....Addendum: To - "A Reader"It is difficult to respond to a question after the questioner has left the room. Who is Dr. Peter Kreeft and what makes his opinion so important to you? It is sad that such a beautiful and wonderful story is so assaulted by a need to find the incarnation of GOD himself within it. Not that he/she is not; but please, isn't that the "Bible's" role? I think you last three comments point to your problem; that is, you really want someone "to tell you" what this book really means. Suggestion: Perhaps if you read the story to a child or a very old person over the course of three or four day, you might find it much more appealing.....best regards.
Tedious, Voluminous, Intense. Having chewed and digested "Around the World in Eighty Days", "Five Weeks in a Balloon" and "Journey to the Centre of the Earth", I set out to devour another chef d'oeuvre of Verne [the often overlooked "true" father of science fiction] with much relish. Sure, "20,000 Leagues" seemed bigger than the others I'd read, but I thought it would be the classic excitement and drama of Verne all the way. Well, I was nearly right.Professor Arronax leaves a "normal" life in France for the US, taking his assistant with him, to investigate the matter that has taken all the attention of the "modern" or "known" world. Joined by the egotistic harpooner, Ned Land, they seek adventure, and they find it.Again, I see Verne's classic touch of the dramatic as the threesome find the monster - the Nautilus - or rather, as the Nautilus finds them. They awaken to an interminable adventure under the sea. The Professor is fascinated, or perhaps, intoxicated with the endless wealth of life in the sea and spends hours, days and months observing and recording. The tireless taxonomist takes in all the eye can see and with the help of his assistant, classifies it all. This is where the tedium began for me as the reader. Pages upon pages of pure taxonomy.The accounts of the undersea explorations in specially designed suits offers some relief. The enigmatic Captain Nemo is in charge; incidents and never accidents. Everything about him is shrouded in mystery - pondering on the life of Captain Nemo offers some useful distraction and provides the fuel to consume more and more pages.However, you can never miss Verne's climactic scenes, where he brings drama and suspense to their peak. The almighty Nautilus is trapped inside a huge mass of ice at the South Pole, and for the first time, Captain Nemo shows signs of worry, however subtle. Yet, he goes on with a steely determination. Things are looking very desperate, but as usual, the day is saved. However, I found myself following every detail, sharing all their fears, their toil, their despair. Their ecstasy was mine when the Nautilus broke free. I was totally drawn in......The irritable Ned Land sparks the fire of escape. He's sick and tired of submarine life as Nemo shows no signs of releasing his charges. The adventure ends with the escape of the threesome back to terra firma, or does it? I guess it continued with Captain Nemo and his longsuffering crew until his death, burying years of useful knowledge and resources under the sea. Or did he live forever?A highly challenging but rewarding read for the discerning reader or Verne fanatic
nice book for the collection. I really enjoyed this book as there is a wide range of recipes in varing styles.  There is also a good description of hop and yeast varieties.  My only complaint would be that there is sketchy recipe detail for the all grain brewer.  Clearly this book was written with the extract brewer in mind.  If you are an extract brewer and have your sights set on moving up to a partial mash then this book is a must have
Americans at the court of the Dalai Lama. Lost in Tibet is a rare kind of book, that gives more than it promises. It deals with an apparently remote and forgotten, or better not renowned episode of WWII. During a flight on "The Hump", the airway help provided by the USA to China, an aircraft carrying five not well acquainted militaries, gets lost in a storm and crashes in a remote Tibetan valley. With great difficulties and much suffering the five survive and are conducted to Lhasa. In 1943 Lhasa was exactly how we see it in Harrer's "Seven years in Tibet", a forbidden and xenophobic city, where only Englishmen and Chinese were accepted and tolerated (making exception only for Harrer and Aufschneider, which were Austrians). The arrival of the Americans is widely misinterpreted by the touchy Tibetans fearfull of Chinese invasion and they are object of a diplomatic upheaval.They are "guests" first of the Chinese and finally of the British delegation. After a long permanence the finally receive the permission to leave Lhasa and undertake a terrible journey back to India in the Tibetan winter on snowridden passes.The interest of the book lies naturally in the story, which for me was completely unknown, but expecially in how the authors make all the possibile connections with history and crossreference the whole episode to contemporary documents and successive interviews with the protagonists and their acquaintaces.We learn of the quality and entity of airway traffic on the Hump, together with political problems of Tibet in those years before Chinese occupation. We meet interesting people such as the Chinese Kung and the Englishman George Sheriff and his wife Betty with their love for himalayan flora. We understand the geography of the Tibetan plateau rivers.The book is deeply researched and a great amount of work lies behind its fast snappy prose. The journalistic cut is evident, and the most information is passed in the least number of words. At moments I had the impression of a TV special.Excellent and instructive read
An absorbing read... I bought this book because I like Kent Nerburn's writing (Neither Wolf Nor Dog) and I was looking for a book to take on vacation. Well, I didn't get to read it on vacation (too busy, you know how it goes), but I sat down with it the first Saturday morning after we returned home. I literally couldn't put the book down. I kept thinking, "I'll stop reading when I get sleepy or restless or bored with reading." It never happened. I finished the book late that evening. It's been a very long time since I've done that!I didn't know anything about Chief Joseph and I had to look up how to pronounce Nez Perce, but the story is so well written and the characters so balanced and well developed that it was as if I was a part of the story, watching the events unfold in front of me. My ignorance was probably an advantage because every time I'd put the book down, I'd come right back to it wanting to find out what was going to happen next.This is a wonderful book. I highly recommend it
My Opinion (C) (R) tm. The topic of this book is incredible. Hard to beleive it's gone this far. It boggles the mind.That said, I found large parts of the book to be repetitive, and didn't really give enough background/details on the various examples.  I would have liked some more finger pointing, but as it stands, I'll boycott Ralph Lauren-Polo for being a putz about the name!Recommended reading, but wish the writing was a bit better
The Bookman's Wake. My first experience with Dunning, who had been recommended by someone whose taste I respect. He was right - this is a well-written, interesting, engrossing and suspenseful book. Very enjoyable, and I will now read the rest of these mysteries
Richly Rewarding. Actually, I would give this book 4-1/2 stars.  Being a Nora-addict, I spend most of my reading time enjoying her many novels.  This story brought me back to the Dream Trilogy where the girls opened the shop "Pretenses."  Isadora Conroy is a young lady from a family of actors who decides that while acting is in her blood and enjoyable, she much rather run her antique shop. She and her sister partake on an buying trip, puchasing, unbeknownst to them, items that are a cover-up to several extremely valuable and very expensive original antiques, including an original Monet painting.  Enter Jeddiah Skimmerhorn, rich, good looking and an ex-captain of the police force who is trying to sort out his own tragic loss of his sister while on the job; this event being the cause of his resignation from the force.  Jed decides to leave the mansion he was raised in and go to a no-frills, comfortable apartment way of life where he plans on being able to live the life of a hermit.  Dora, happy with life and very much the extravert, happens to be the landlord of the apartment he rents and this is where our story takes off.  The characters are very entertaining and the story never lets your down.  Dora's family, mom, dad, sister and kids are a very enjoyable and entertaining group.  There is comedy, romance, intrigue and espionage.  "Hidden Riches" is certainly a story worthy of reading.
Possible Reserve of 265 billion barrels in Caspian Sea. Azerbaijan, Georgia, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Tajikstan, Turkmenistan, and Uzebekistan statistically have 18 to 35 billion in proven reserves and the possible reserves of 235 billion barrels and 236 to 337 trillion cubic feet of natural gas.  The Caspian Sea is appealing and the U.S is eager to reduce dependency on Persian Gulf oil.  Under Secretary Zienstat told the U.S Senate Subcommittee, "the Caspian Sea is potentially one of the worlds most important new energy producing regions".In 1997, oil production was 1.1 million barrels per day (mbd), by 2010 oil production is expected to 4.4 mbd, and by 2020 hitting 6 mbd.   Companies flocking to gain development rights in the Caspian Sea include: Amoco, Chevron, Exxon, Mobile, and British Petroleum.   Chevron invested $20 billion in a joint venture with the Kazakh government to develop the Tengiz oil field resulting in a firm known as Tengizchevroil and was later joined by Mobil who made a 25 percent purchase share in the consortium.   Caspian Pipeline Consortium (CPC) combined Tengizchevroil partners and Lukeoil of Russia to build a 900 mile oil pipeline costing $2.2 billion spanning from Tengiz to Novorossiysk.   Russia would like the oil to pass through their region to capture some of the immense wealth being generated from the Caspian sea oil transports.  The second pipeline spans from Baku in Azerbaijan to Supsa and was opened in 1999.U.S - Russia tensions will be the result of power struggles.  Russia's interest is to make sure a significant portion of Caspian Energy flows through Russian pipelines to the Black Sea and Europe.  Russia has put pressure on Azerbaijan and Kazakhstan to send a significant share of oil through southern Russia to Novorossiysk.  Tension in Chechnya and Dagestan from Muslim extremist revolts will destabilize oil through Russian regions.Washington wants to develop the Caspian Basin energy as an alternate to the Persian Gulf and ensure Caspian oil and gas travel to markets in the west without passing through Russia and Iran.  A new pipeline extending from Kazakhan and Turkmenstan to Azerbaijan under the Caspian Sea then to Georgia would meet these objectives.  Another pipeline from Azerbaijan to Bushehr in the Persian Gulf is blocked by an executive order issued by President Clinton not allowing over $40 million U.S businesses ventures with Iran.The U.S lacks a military presence in the region and a high intensity conflict is unlikely.  However, the U.S aid between 1998-2000 for Armenia, Azerbaijan, Georgia, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Tajikstan, Turkmenistan, and Uzbekistan reached $1.06 billion of which $175 million for reigional security, arms transfers, and military training.
More than I Bargained For. I was figuratively rubbing my hands together as I started this book - A Pulitzer Prize winner that would be a continuation of "Little Women".  Excellent writing I got, a pleasant story I did not.  Agreeing that pleasant stories are often only that, despair erupted when coming face-to-face with the double insanities of war and slavery.  I was a bit beaten up during the reading process and could not help but compare March's world to our own.  The Civil War soldiers, March included, idealized the struggle and convinced themselves that is was morally necessary to fight.  This quickly faded when they began to experience death, destruction and the senselessness of the war.  And the soldiers changed.  And the change was for the worst.  We can only hope that March, and the soldiers fighting around the world today, are able to come home physically, emotionally and spiritually.  I am not so sure
One of his best!. having read many of koontz's works, i have found this to be one of his best. i am biased, though, in that i appreciate koontz's use of psychology in his works. while many if not most of his writings could be classified as psychological thrillers, this work goes beyond in my opinion. koontz has done his research and depicts, in a very real way, the fear and debilitation that a psychological disorder can cause. that being said, this book is not recommended for those with a tendency toward anxiety or excessive fear. koontz's writing is very powerful and very real
No CD ROM and Nowhere to be Found on Net. Book is worth the price.  However, there in NO CD ROM included with the book, and the directions given at the front of the book regarding where to download the software is incorrect.  Neither the author's nor the publisher's websites offer the software for anyone except professors adopting the book.I am tempted to return the book just for that shabby attention to details
Still my favorite. When I was a child, the three big fantasy series in my world were Lord of the Rings, Chronicles of Narnia, and the Earthsea Trilogy. I loved them all, but the one that really moved me, that gave me wonderful dreams and nightmares, was Earthsea. I loved it deeply.Today I live in Japan, and the movie Gedo Senki, loosely based on the 3rd and 4th Earthsea books, was released last month. So I reread the original trilogy and I've started on the newer ones. They are still powerful, wonderful stories, and they only get better: the latter books are more mature and even more powerful, and LeGuin's skills in description and characterization have improved as well.There is an omnibus edition that includes the first four books under one cover, and I would recommend it over this edition, both for savings in cost, and because the omnibus has fewer typos
A good 4.  Above the middle; below the top. Quite a nice little book.  On rereading I rated it higher than the first time.
a &quot;must read&quot; for fans of the green mile. Sorry, I'm rating this book even though I've yet to read it. I've only just recently seen the movie, but I'm definitely buying the book. Stephen King's best work is not in the horror stories for which he is famous for. Don't get me wrong, I love the horror also.  His best work is in stories like &quot;Shawshank Redemption&quot; and &quot;The Green Mile&quot;. These are not horror stories. Though parts of the stories will horrify you and really make you think. They'll also make you laugh and ball your eyes out. Many people I've recommended &quot;The Green Mile&quot; to do not believe that Stephen King is the author. These are two stories that will touch you in a way that you will not believe possible.    The movie &quot;Shawshank Redemption&quot; is PHENOMENAL!  I'm really looking forward to reading this book
Tropical Saga. The character I found most interesting in the House of Blue Mangoes a three generational saga set in the extreme south of India, was the one who anchored middle section--Dr Daniel Dorai, a physician who makes a fortune from formulating a skin whitening cream. I thought that was an inspired idea that nails my native country's hypocrisy. But the novel is not a negative take on India,rather it's shot through with brilliantly described colours, smells and textures of a country that has never left me although I have spent twenty years in Vancouver. I try and read a fair amount of Indian fiction and this novel must rank with the best
A necessary companion. A "must have" for any serious Patrick O'Brian fan.  Very useful in answering all those questions that formulate in your mind as you are reading the books.  I had already read all the books when I bought this and now am enjoying the books all over again with this by my side
5 Quick Truths. 1. Entertainment, not resource. Provides insight into the uses of type, as well as a brief history of many different typefaces. Robert Bringhurst's "The Elements of Typography" (0881792063) is a better book for those in need of a resource.2. Aimed at a less experienced audience. Discusses type in relation to emotions, legibility, etc, though not in great depth. It does a great job of showing a beginner how important type is, showing a large number of examples of typefaces, and, possibly, inspiring them to look into the subject more thoroughly.3. The quote used in the title did not come from the authors, it came from F. Goudy in 1936. Also, most of the fonts mentioned in the book cannot be found in Adobe's font library, some are over 100 years old. The book is not trying to sell you anything.4. The book itself is a great example of what can be accomplished with type. It also contains many instances of type being used to great effect, while explaining how and why it works so well.5. As someone interested in type, you could do much worse than this book. However, its simple nature, though complete and well-constructed, whets the appetite more than actually satisfying it
Great facts and opinions about Japanese internment in the United States; everyone should read. Great facts and opinions about Japanese internment in the United States; everyone should rea
The most exciting book I've read this year. No, I'm not being sarcastic. I mean it. Big Year is full of laughs, twists and yes, some touching moments. I love bird watching  and road trips but the guys in Big Year are hard core competitors who operate on an entirely different plain than the novices.The book is so well written that you can almost see yourself sitting in the backseat of Sandy Komito's Skuamobile as he prowls down the highway looking for birds. In fact, it's so vivid that Big Year would actually make a darn good movie. While reading it I kept imagining James Cagney or Oscar Levant as Komito, Gregory Peck or Walter Pigeon as Al Levantin and a very young Jimmy Stewart as Greg Miller, the wonderful optimist who decides to do a Big Year on the cheap.The things these guys encounter while pursuing their passion such as  mountain lions, cowboys with potbellied pigs, the horrors of economy flight, crocodiles, frozen graves, and icy cold outhouses are the stuff of adventure novels with a good sized dollop of comedy thrown in.The Big year is fascinating, fun, and daydream inducing. I and most of the readers of the book will probably never get closer to a Big Year than vicariously through the book but after reading it I have started thinking that maybe, just maybe I could survive a one county Big Day.  I loved the book and even my non nature loving friends found themselves laughing out loud when I read sections of it to them.
Don't read it unless you want to ponder its meaning . .  for quite some time!. This was an attempt to find meaning in life, which so many authors, and others, have struggled with since we started walking on two feet.  Is there any change from one generation to another, or from one time to another, or from one place to another?  Camus believes not.  He doesn't see a moral advancement of humanity, but a stagnant slog through what chance puts in front of us.Reading this book, I had the feeling that I was going through the feelings of those poor souls in Oran.  I was sharing with them first denial, then anger, then acceptance, then resignation, and finally, joy.  If not joy, then at least relief.  But the plague can come again, on a whim.I imagine that the novel is a statement of the uncertainties that we find ourselves in all the time, and how little we can do about it.  There is no divine force guiding us, or anyone else,  We have to find our own way, whether it is through helping people, or not helping people, through what is considered legitimate, or what is illegitimate actions.  There are no moral statements in the book, just acceptance of the various forces acting upon us, through us, and by us.This book, through the various and opposing characters it paints trying to come to grips with this calamity, accomplishes its aim.  Be prepared to think about its meaning well after reading the last page.  Think about its relevance whenever external forces overpower us, as they do all the time, whether natural, or through the actions of mankind.
buy this book!!!. I love Dr and Martha Sears, this book has just about everything you need to know for birth-2 years.  It changed the way we parented our first.  I love it, you need it.  Teaches why attachment parenting really works (it really does).  We call it the "baby bible"
The End of Liberalism...And the Beginning of Common Sense. Theodore Lowi created quite a splash with this book when it first came out in 1969 (edition II came out a decade later). While there had been any number of crude and hysterical attempts at deriding the post-FDR American state, serious political scientists began taking up the challenge in the midst of the bewildering obscenities of LBJ's bungled Great Society, the escalation of the Vietnam War, and the intrigues of the Nixon White House. As both a period piece and a classic work of political science, Lowi's book has few rivals, save perhaps James Buchanan and Gordon Tullock's "The Calculus of Consent." He expertly and lucidly traces the evolution of American public philosophy, legislation and jurisprudence, and the policy outcomes they produced before, during, and after the founding of the "Second Republic." Lowi's version of this story is that rule of law (specific legislation of Congress delimited by the Constitution) has degenerated into interest-group liberalism (broad grants of power to the executive branch, which then create powerful agencies with ill-defined mandates and capabilities). The result is now that anyone with a perceived or real grievance mobilizes for government action, bilking the state of more money and resources, and adding powers to the executive branch and its deputies that skirt on unconstitutionality. This sobering development, Lowi makes clear, should pose serious problems for all political agendas, left right and center. He concludes with some modest recommendations for what he calls "juridical democracy," which essentially means a narrowing in scope and an increase in the specificity of the laws Congress passes and the President signs, bringing them more into line with the powers and limitations enumerated in the Constitution. Such proposals mirror those of Tullock and Buchanan, as well as those of Friedrich von Hayek. Despite these associations, this is not a conservative book; it is an earnest plea for sanity from one of our most thoughtful, iconoclastic and independent-minded political thinkers, urging us to consider the consequences of our government's excesses before it is too late. In a post-9/11 world of soaring budget deficits, rampant defense and entitlement spending, and mounting threats to civil liberties, Lowi's book is an urgently relevant reminder that no branch of government, nor any political party, should be above the law--even for the best of intentions.
For The Love Of The Game : My Story. In the book For The Love Of The Game. One thing that I learned about this book is that you should never give up and always keep on trying. Even if you are not good at something at first then you should not give up and keep on trying untill you get good at the thing. And that you should not just stick with one thing but, try other things. You might be good at it. And that things just do not come to you, you have to work at it. That is what I learned about the book.
Laugh-Out-Loud Funny... My copy came in the mail last night and I finally got around to taking at peak today at lunch. I have to confess, I'm only on page 37, but I was surprised to find myself laughing out loud in the restaurant and hesitating to put it down. The chapters are short and easy to read and Jenn's wit is refreshing. Belly Laughs is a nice break from the "informative" pregnancy reading that most of us find ourselves drowning in. Can't wait to finish
The diary of Anne frank. I think this is the best book I have ever read in my entire life. I give this book two thumbs up.The thing I like about this book is that it is a true story.You'll get very into the storybecause it makes you feel like if  you were her,Anne Franf in the hiding.You also learn how to get along with  people better.also lots of things you did not know before about life. I  would definnety recommend this book anyone because it helps you out a lot  in life.For kids,teeagers,parents,and elderly people also
Real Good Book. This book is very insightful and very well documented. You can tell the author is very pro-Kennedy, but it is still interesting to hear the story from someone on their side. Very easy to read also
Good Foundational Book!. I really like the way this book is presented.  It provides a really concise yet complete overview of the disabilities most commonly encountered.  I also like the pages in the back of each chapter that give teaching strategies in respect to the disability discussed. This is a great book for general educators looking for some information on disabilities and for those beginning to learn about special education.  This book gives a great foundation for all the other special education courses that follow it.  Great book
Beyond proposals: Successful business writing on a whole. I bought this book to help the small custom software firm that I work for improve the way we do business. I felt like we were losing way too many jobs and the more I thought about it, I felt our proposals may be the culprit. After reading this book, I realized that I was right. The great news is that this book is laid out very well and easy to apply immediately to the way you do business. I can't count the number of "a-ha" moments I had while reading this.It seems we tend to write proposals based on what we've seen of other proposals. And it turns out those other proposals weren't very good either. One of many useful elements of this book is the way it lays out exactly what sections a proposal should have and what order they should be in to be most persuasive.Lastly, what I took away from this book and the reason I recommend it is that it is just a very solid business writing primer as well. The structure for writing persuasively is worth the price of the book in and of itself. Highly recommend.
personal stories. I live on the edge of a town 6 miles from the Mexican border where it is not uncommon to see groups of "UDA's" running down the street to a safe house or piling into a coyote's car, and border patrol helicopters buzzing overhead. But this book gave personal insight into who some of these people actually are, how they survive here if they make it beyond the check points and a glimpse of the life they leave in Mexico and why. I could not put this book down and was glad Ted was able to tell the story to those of us who would not hear it otherwise. Very readable
Refreshing read. A really interesting and inspiring story, appropriate for people of all ages.  You won't be able to put it down
A bible !!. This book has really help me. It contains information about troubleshoting, installation, upgrade and more. Good graphics, easy to understand tables and easy to follow instructions
best backjack book ever. I have been collecting blackjack books for the past 25 years and this one is the best.Why? Beacause it introduces the simplest effective card counting system devised to date. The writing is clear , the instructions are precise  and above all the system is simple relative to others.Absorbing the material will take time but you will be well rewarded if you succeed. If you progressto &quot;full&quot; matrix indices ,buy James Grosjean s book Beyond Counting and  see if you want to lern soft doubling indices as wel
Searching for Ignatius. As she kicks off the ninth book in this series Lilian Jackson Braun reintroduces her readers to the resort town of Mooseville. This is where Jim Qwilleran was staying when he inherited millions or billions of dollars; he isn't sure which it is yet. Of course we know that wherever Qwilleran and his cats Koko and Yum Yum go there is going to be a mystery and although the mystery in this book develops slowly it is always there, lurking in the background. Like the other books in this series, the mystery here is light and almost incidental to the story but the depth and richness of the characters and setting more than make up for any lack of intrigue.This story really begins when Qwilleran and his pals return to the lakeside cabin in Mooseville and settle in for the summer. Almost immediately he has to call out a plumber and from there Qwilleran's trials continue and include leaky pipes, a mouse hole, a tornado and finally a body buried beneath the cabin. To make matters worse, Qwilleran decides to enlarge the cabin but finds that all of the licensed carpenters are busy working on local developments until the end of the season so he ends up hiring unlicensed carpenters who keep disappearing.Unlike some of the previous books in this series the clues as to what is going on and who is involved are clear and easily identifiable in this book. In some of the other books there have been no clues at all until the end but I figured this one out long before the book was over. I was mistaken about the motive however and would never have put two and two together if Koko had not forced Qwilleran and me to look at the evidence, which was setting in the cabin in a paper bag. It is a good thing that Koko made his move when he did for Qwilleran himself was a suspect in the murder of one Ignatius K. Small, a carpenter who could go to sleep while nailing shingles on a roof.For fans of this series Qwilleran's trip back to Mooseville will be a welcome change of pace and will allow long time fans to get reacquainted with the people and places of this resort town. Braun's rich writing style and her colorful characters are the core elements of the entire series and this book is no exception. No, this is not a hard core mystery but it is a fun and very enjoyable read
a treasure bag of wonderful japanese tales. For my money, everything that Royall Tyler touches turns to gold, and that is as true of &quot;Japanese Tales&quot; as it is of his more recent translation of &quot;The Tale of Genji.&quot;  In &quot;Japanese Tales,&quot;  he has assembled and artfully translated 220 stories published between the ninth and fourteenth centuries in Japan, stories that are often difficult if not impossible to find elsewhere in English.  For the most part, these are not the extended stories that we tend to call fairy tales in the West, and the book is not designed to provide reading material for children.  What it does provide is a very solid sampling of the types of tales the early Japanese used to provide moral guidance, explain how things came to be, and record historical moments. And if that were not enough, Tyler's outstanding introduction, 35 pages in length, provides a lucid understanding of life in Heian-period Japan and beliefs about everything from serpents and mountains to deities and demons.  This is simply a book you cannot afford to miss if your interests in Japan are those of either an enthusiastic amateur or a focused scholar
Textile Designs: Two Hundred Years... This book is crammed with designs in every conceivable category. It is a must for anyone studying textile or surface design
alternative history and suspense. another great book from Joan Aiken.  Wonderfully strong female lead and interesting alternative history
A picture could be worth a thousand sales. Not a review, but with this new book rising in sales and getting good reviews, can we see the cover???
Excellent Resource. Books on climbing technique have typically been incomplete in their coverage and lacking in illustrative detail.  John Long's &quot;How To Rock Climb&quot; series has made a quantum leap in these areas and are the current standard-bearers.  This book and its companion (More Climbing Anchors) show many possible anchor problems and discuss the pros and cons of several solutions for each.  By practicing the techniques presented, trad climbers can improve the integrity of their anchors
The Best Book on Drawing (theory)... Period. I'm now a professional illustrator and art director. But for 17 years... from adolescence on, I was a hobbyist... someone who just loved to draw. It was this book, INGENIOUSLY simple and straightforward in both it's presentation and elucidation of "how to see," which brought me from hobbyist, to professional. I learned more from reading this book than from thumbing through any of the other 50+ art-technique books in my collection (this is a book to be read... primarily text, not primarily illustrations). Get this book. If like me, you're self-taught... and you already know how to draw... and are looking to hit the next level, it's invaluable.
The Incidence of War. Although soundly invested in the critiques provided in each of the contributions to "The Costs of War: America's Phyrric Victories," I find the refusal by Mises intellectuals to entertain extending the franchise of soldiering to the ruling classes (and even, now, to the comfortable middle classes) by way of compulsory service a hollow defense.Mr. Stromberg (whose analysis here, as in his articles dating back many years, speaks truth to power most lucidly) himself has been heard dismissing the James Fallows assertion.  To paraphrase: that until the mothers of soldiers in comfortable white suburban towns are ringing the phones off-the-hook screaming at their Congressmen "YOU KILLED MY BOY!" the lives of Fallows' working-class "Chelsea boys" will continue to be defiled in the name of state sponsored phyrric misadventures as they are marched off to slaughter.What other than placing the incidence (costs) of warfare squarely in the laps of the decisionmaking class will stall the state-led rush to war?  Surely not the scorn of intellectuals.  Surely not the "mature restraint" shored up by our shuddering constitutional system, increasingly torn to shreds by means of "unitary executive" assertion.  Alas, surely not the thoroughly "professionalized" "all-volunteer" armed forces marshalled by unaccountable yes-man officers at the beck and call of revolving-door insider-intellectuals, presidents, congressmen, and captains of industry as they engage in the lapping up of  the "political means to wealth"--the overwhelming majority without any experience there
Spooky.  Entertaining.  Good read. I loved this book.  Hard to read it alone at night, especially if you are the only one in the house.  A great horror book!  Classic
Fast-paced, well-written mystery. If it is a mystery book readers want, Nancy Farmer has definately brought a whole new world of adventure for us. This excellent story stretches from the past, present, and future while managing to keep you on the edge of your seat.This story starts with three children escaping outside the boundaries of their guarded home to find rude monkies, people of the earth, vicious thieves, dishonest mothers, and MUCH more. Every step of this amazing journey comes as a satifing surprise and yet another clue to the main solution. Following the children's every step of the way are Africa's most unusual detectives...the EYE, EAR, and ARM all with phonomenal powers beyond imagination.Sooooo finally here is a match worthy enough for the Westing Game. Dare to read it at night
A great success!. Avery Cardoza writes another winner.  Not only is he a succesful gambler himself, I have used the techniques listed in this book to win real money! It explains the basics of poker, and gives you the rules for some of the  most popular games.  With this, it gives you several strategies, money  management techniques, and advice on what to do against what kind of  player.  This was a very usefull book, a must-have for any beginning poker  player
cross-over book of the year. Death can hardly be a reliable narrator. neither can Death be warm and fuzzy and heartbreakingly earnest. Death can hardly be a funny and loving narrator. that will not do, will it? but that is just what markus zusak's narrator does in his tender tale of growing up, loving books and finding oneself, all in the heartless world of nazi germany.Liesel Meminger, a 9 year old girl and her brother, 6 are sent by their mother to live with foster parents, but on the way tragedy strikes and the young boy dies, the mother lost but the young girl forges on, picking up the one thing lying next to her dying brother, a book. the first stolen book, by an illiterate young girl. At her new parents' place, a seemingly gruff brutish mother who adoringly calls her saukerl (swine) and a gentle accordion player, dreamer of a father, Liesel clings on to life, goes to a school and makes friends with the roguishly charming Rudi Steiner, a boy arrogant and stupid enough to apply coal allover his face in the midst of swirling Aryan pride and pretend to be Jesse Owens as he runs like the wind.Their blissfully innocent childhood is slowly threatened by the jingoistic bigotist nazis and he sudden arrival of a jew who must be hidden in liesel's basement. There are few unpredictable moments in the narrative, forewarned as we are by Death's announcements at the beginning of the chapter (he doesn't like twists and nasty surprises for they are cheap and vulgar), so right at the beginning of the chapter you will know who dies, lives and does what. Death knows that it is not what happens but how that makes a story.The Book Thief has its false moments, yes this book is a bit too melodramatic, a bit too doe-eyed. It is far too earnest a story but Liesel is an admirable heroine, one we will love and cherish. Death is the kind of narrator you will choose for your own biography, He is warm and tender and hates his job ("War is like a new boss, always expecting the impossible"). Liesel's parents are the kind of loving couple that we all wish we knew. Rudi is the friend we all want to be.But what it all comes down to is this: It's hard not to fall madly in love with a book that earnestly believes in the redemptive quality of books
provocative,funny journey through the Crazy Wisdom landscape. Romp with Wes through the world of clowns, jesters and fools while you unearth the paradox that is present in our daily lives. This irreverent look at the world from the mindsets and customs of both the Eastern and  Western world will make you laugh and realize that what you you will eat  for breakfast is the most important thing in the world.                                For those who enjoy seeing esoteric views of our world and enjoy  humourous examinations of our many follies, pick up your pack and join the  archetypes as you travel down the road
"It should be a movie". That was the exclamation of my 9 year old daughter when we were only halfway through the book.  (I read it aloud a chapter at a time.)  The story is riveting and completely held the attention of my little videophile.  This is an excellent companion to a study of the Middle Ages
Well written, easy to comprehend, necessary reading!. Thanks for bringing information to those with kids who are tired of mainstream treatments that only blanket their ailments!  This book gives, in such a wonderful and basic approach, natural remedies and great  preventative suggestions to keep kids healthy.  Dr. White and Sunny Mavor  have given us an invaluable tool to use on a daily basis.  Thanks
Enlightening. This book was very well written. Its gives another look into the life of being HIV Positive and makes you understand the emotional side of a person dealing with sickness and still have enought strength to love others.
Great Book. This book is an excellent book. It is a series of little stories about the founding fathers. Most of the stories occur during the constitutional convention. The author definitely did his research. He found things  that are not found in other books. For example the author writes about how the Quakers and Ben Franklin tried to introduce a resolution in the first congress to outlaw slavery. The author also highlights the divisions that did exist in this country and were not really solved until the civil war. If you want to view the founding fathers in a new light, like real people you should read this book.
A solid legal drama. Deadlock is an exciting legal thriller by one of the best Christian authors today, James Scott Bell.  In Deadlock, Bell tackles the hot button issue of abortion from the political and judicial point of view, pointing out just how divisive the issue is to our country.Millie Hollander is a Supreme Court Justice on the verge of being the chief justice when she is hit by a car.  This experience causes her to question her own beliefs in death, the afterlife and God.Meanwhile, Senator Levering from Oklahoma (you know this is fiction because there is no way a hard drinking, womanizing, Ted Kennady-esque Senator would ever come from Oklahoma) is assuring the democratic president that Hollander would continue to keep the tenious liberal/moderate majority on the court.Charlene Moore is taken on the national abortion lobby with a teenager as a client, alleging her client was warned of all the dangers of abortion before she had the procedure.Senator Levering, his seedy operative, Anne Deveraux as well as Hollander are all great characters who at one time or another have to reconcile their actions with their belief in God.This is a great legal novel with solid insights on how the Supreme Court operates.  It also has strong relationships at its core, and that is what makes it a good novel.  Bell doesn't solve the abortion crisis in this novel, but does make it apparent what he believes:  God is the only way to really solve the problem.
great book.  Recommend to any value investor.  A real hidden gem. Well written and a must read for anyone following the Buffett-Graham style of investing. This is not a "how to invest like Buffett" book but it does give a look at his life and character and offers hope that anyone can invest like Buffett.Checked-out from the library.  More money from investing
travelling Alaska. We just returned from a month of exploring Alaska and found this book very useful in planning.  It has a less commercial view, so we appreciated the suggested accommodations and reviews of things to see.  They were always right on target with the less commercial things highlighted.  Very useful.
Good use of Chinese, and Soviet archives... This book is an example of how the end of the Cold War has helped American history be less &quot;Americancentric&quot;. We think one thing, but along comes Chinese and Soviet sources that help us have a more balanced view of  the past. The book traces the relationship between the U.S., U.S.S.R. and  China from 1945-1972. It is well researched and well argued and for the  most part balanced.  I felt there could have been a little clearer  discussion of what lead up to the Nixon visit to China in 1972, It still  seemed to just happen. A must for those interested in the cold war, China  and Soviet communism and the such
Miss Ronning's 6th grade. I would rate this book 5 stars.Rosie's family received a letter and they are going to Chicago. The Columbian Exposition is going on. Rosie, her sister Lottie, and her brother Buster are about to get the biggest adventure of their lives.The reason i gave my book this rating was because it was filled with many unexpected surprises that i thought would never happen.I would recommend this book to many people because it is easy to understand and it is very exciting.I think you should read this book because it is very easy to get interested in and you can understand it very well
One of My Two favorite PC Books So Far. This book (along with Donna Kato's Art of Polymer Clay) is one of my two favorite books on polymer clay.  As a beginner, I want the basics along with options for future more difficult techniques.  I found that in this book with clear instructions that were beautifully photographed.  My primary focus is on beads.  I found most all techniques in this book can be applied to beads.
maximum ride is great. Best book in the series yet - Adults like it as much as the kid
A perfect interpretation of this well-loved song. In this fun-filled, flamboyant adaptation, a grandmother remembers riding red double-decker busses and singing this traditional song when she was a child.  She shares it with her grandchildren with such animated energy while they wait for their modern-day bus, that they all get carried away in the enthusiasm of the moment and their present bus passes them right on by!  This book made my toddler laugh out loud-a great accompaniment to the well-loved song
Excellent, thorough, simple. A great help to novice and intermediate DIYers.  The details of structures, materials, tools and techniques, described in both writing and photographs, are excellent
What you need to know, from A to Z. Covers all the important things that you had to learn as a film photographer. Lots of great ideas for getting the most out of a digital camera, like things that you had to pay Kodak for in the past. Calendars, cards, stationery, photos in data bases are but a few of the tips offered. To help you decide how to get the most of your pictures, a CD is included. It provides demos and trial versions of various image editing software and links to the product web sites
Fairy tales for adults. I'm a huge fan of Italo Calvino, but it is hard to describe exactly what quality makes his books so wonderful. In one sense, this book is two fables that read like adult fairy tales: a knight who inhabits or doesn't a suit of armor and a nobleman who is split into two distinct personalities. He also has a style of writing that is almost liquid and translucent - it absolutely glitters. I would add that the translation is superb. I highly recommend this book to anyone
The death of classics and classical education. Hanson and Heath describe in devastating detail the unfortunate turn to obscurity and irrelevance taken by the new generation of classics departments under the influence of postmodernist and radical leftist trends in the university. While similar problems afflict other areas in the liberal arts, the authors explain why it is particularly troubling in the case of classics, arguing passionately for the importance of understanding the ancient Greek and Roman heritage of Western civilization.One cannot help but agree with their critique, as well as with the basic recommendation of restoring knowledge of the classics to the average university student; however, the authors go too far in advising that the entire university curriculum be restructured around the classics, including the learning of Greek and Latin.Although Hanson and Heath are no doubt correct in insisting that the classics are best understood when read in their original languages, they can be understood well enough in translation. And while the authors are equally right that learning a difficult language like Greek helps one to develop a logical and disciplined mind, this objective would be accomplished as well through increased emphasis on mathematics, which would also have more practical dividends.On the whole, a very interesting book, though somewhat over the top, readily recommended to anyone interested in the direction university education is going
Thought Provoking --for both sides of your brain. A thought provoking and interesting perspective on the evolution and commoditzation of certain thinking styles.  Dan carries forward a message first clarified by C.P. Snow back in the 50's in his lecture "The Two Cultures and the Scientific Revolution:"  -- "Whole brain thinking" will create the greatest value and advances in the future..
VideoHound's Golden Movie Retriever. I am a public librarian, and I keep this wonderful guide next to the DVD collection.  Patrons love it!  I wish the publisher would add a "book-to-film" category, as we have public presentation rights for many of the movies in our collection.  It would be handy to have a reference tool for choosing books that our community could read, before we show the related films
He's got experience and it shows. Despite it making it sound so easy to win in the market, I liked the book. In my opinion the book belongs to the list of better ones on investment advice. Instead of launching into predictions on how the market will behave, or suggesting technology stocks for their fantastic futuristic stories, Lynch offers down to earth advice, though perhaps with down to earth language as well. He finds value in conventional businesses, and he clearly explains why. He asserts that amateurs can be as good or even better than investment professionals as long as they keep their eyes and ears open. One needs to try things (the products of the company whose stock you are interested in) out oneself in order to understand the products' values.As with any other book on investment the author states things that are downright wrong (why should short-selling be described: "it's more like borrowing with criminal intent"), but his exposition exudes a quality that can only come from having an abundance of experience. I also appreciated his honesty.Having said this much, what I really got out from the book: 1) one needs to classify stocks and set specific investment objectives for each of them prior to purchase, and 2) "do not pluck the flowers and water the weeds." To elaborate on the latter, I have been selling winners prematurely and waiting for laggards to bounce back to my purchase price in order to avoid loss. A common mistake most likely, but something that would have been left under the blind spot unless I'd seen it articulated
Good but ignores or barely touches upon some of their dirtiest secrets. Good stuff here on the Bush Family and their many shady dealings going back to the 1800's. I mean it really is amazing how interwoven this bunch is with so many of the worst elements of the worlds power brokers for over a 150 years. If this book has a weakness its, although it brings up many of the the nefarious deeds and dealings of the Bush crime family, that it barely touches on or completely ignores the worst of the worst that the Bushs have been linked to over the years. It also tries a bit too hard to try to draw a parrellell between the Bush gangsters and European royalty by making them into Americans version of a royal family. Still recomended reading though
A God Send!!!. Though I've seen Dr. Colbert on Pastor Hagee and Joyce Meyer shows. I really wasn't completly convinced he knew what he was talking about. I was completely prepared to dismiss him as "quackery" and the fringe element of "the Christian Right" until I actually bought "What Would Jesus Eat", and found out that everything he said was true.  Eating more vegetables does make you feel full longerThe Bible Cure for Weight Loss and Muscle Gain, is even better. Being an endomorph with a slow metabolysm my weight plateud for two years straight. It was when I read his book and bought the vitamins that he suggested the weight started comming off again.Taking a supplement of vitamins and minerals he suggested has gon a long way to nurrishing my body, and ceasing the intense cravings I was experiencing for carbohydrates.Colbert also points out how the body works and why sugars and starchs actually prevent weight loss. The example he gives of a woman who ate healthy but still couldn't loose weight because she was sucking on breath mints all day was mind blowing. Once she stopped the weight began to come off. It's amazing how something seeming so small can interfere with your wieght loss goals.You don't have to be a Christian or particularly relgious to get what Dr. Colbert suggests. His medical advice is spot on. There are a ton of diet books  out there. But I find that this one is the most simple and effective. You owe yourself or someone you know who is struggling with the battle of "The bulge" to get this book. It will help you or even save your life
WARS OF LIBERATION. The Soul of Battle compares three "campaigns", for lack of a better word, that in the author's mind have very similar characteristics.  While the timing of this book (it was written in 1999 and published initially in 2001) and the epilogue indicate that this book was written to either critique the limited war aims of the first Gulf War or to urge - in a rather abstract way - the liberation of the Iraqi people, it is a fantastic read that will long outlast the current war in Iraq. Mr. Hanson is viewed by many as an apologist for the Neo-cons, but that does not detract from his ability to create an interesting thesis, write a compelling narrative, and imply multiple levels of interpretation.  In short, this type of book is exactly what a classics or liberal arts education is supposed to be about.This book does a great service by introducing Epaminondas to the modern reader.  It seems a safe assumption that most moderately well educated Americans knew nothing about this man until Mr. Hanson published this book.  It also seems a reasonable assumption that Boeotian democracy has further lessons for the modern Americans.One of the interesting characteristics of all three "liberators" shared is the fact that, to a large extant, they waged war not only on the army of the enemy, but also his culture or soul.  One of the not so subtle points in Mr. Hanson's writings is that not all cultures are equal or morally equivalent.  Therefore, it is necessary from time to time to beat back the evil that men do by destroying the culture and support infrastructure that makes such evil thrive.  However, Mr. Hanson seems to argue that evil can be completely vanquished.  The ancient Greeks would say that evil is part of human nature and must be dealt with as necessary.  They would agree that one way to do so - perhaps the most effective, albeit horrifying, terrible, and costly way - is war.Another interesting fact is that people who are liberated did not, in statistically significant way, participate in the fighting that liberated them.  To be sure, the Union raised hundreds of thousands of black troops, Epaminondas left behind former Helots trained in war with walled cities, and there were many partisan groups in France, Germany, and Poland.  The latter country also had Jewish partisan groups that had fought from the first day of war until they were eventually disarmed by Soviet forces.  Yet the fact remains that none of these forces could have liberated themselves or been more than a nuisance on their own.  Therefore, these three conflicts are fundamentally different from revolutions where an outside entity intervened.Mr. Hanson is a bit unfair, perhaps, in his critique of Gen Eisenhower and Gen Bradley.  While Gen Patton was probably right that the Battle of the Bulge could have been exploited better, it is just as likely that well trained and disciplined German troops could have opened their lines and let Patton's striking force go past and then close the lines to block his fuel and ammo support.  This is something they did time and time again to Russian forces on the Eastern Front as the German forces declined in mobility and firepower.  Indeed, this is often the only effective tactic left to forces that either lost or never had the mobility required for modern warfare.In the end, this book is typical of Mr. Hanson's other works:  Highly readable, interesting thesis, and based on a solid grounding of history and traditional intellectual discourse.  This book is highly effective and worth reading
Mixed Bag of Beauty, Flowers, Myth and Pretentious Problems, Flaws. No, this isn't a perfect book series.  It can be weighed down by pretentious storylines and attempts to address serious issues. (ex. Weetzie's attempts to get a child cause major rifts worthy, for a while, of Oprah.  Dirk and Duck, one of the series most prominent couples, become a spring board for heavy subjects of bigotry and AIDS.)  Melodrama will sometimes take the place of real emotion.  Weetzie, the main character through out the first book at least, is mostly defined as an "original person" because of her part in a punk culture that will eventually become to mainstream.  Observations made in the series are often superficial.But despite these flaws, Dangerous Angels can be absolutely charming.  When I first read this series as a young teenager, I'd rarely encountered such beautifully written prose.  Allusions are made to the grit and glamour of L.A. in a single sentence.  Gentle fairy tales are blended seamlessly with the story's chaotic reality.  The observations of people and things might be too cutesy, but they're colored with more depth than the usual bestselling novel.True, the issues mentioned in the books are often too large to be addressed with such quirk, but Block allows enough ambiguity for each subject to prompt the reader to think a little.  Humanity bleeds through every character, no matter how silly they act or the mistakes they make.  Maybe even the superficial layers of the books deserve more consideration; it mostly takes place in California, after all.  How much more superficial can you get?The flaws of the books are outshone by their virtues.  However, to the wary reader, as disarmingly beautiful as Block's fictional world is, I suggest not only reading her works, but also those of other more classic and skilled writers.  The Weetzie Bat Series is gorgeous, but eventually, its reality is too narrow.  Remember to love and treasure these stories -- I do -- but like the love described in Dangerous Angels, they're not the only fish in the sea
Old heroes to learn about. It has been nearly fifty years since I read this book.  I had forgotten how much detail Butler placed in his research of the lives of the saints.  Although my mind has moved more towards agnosticism, it is of great interest for me to read how the Church appreciated the lives of some of its past members. I am now trying to read of the saints related to that day, but alas my schedule is too busy to read the entire selection
In Search of Lost Time 01 Way By Swanns. The 7th of March I found this book, ISBN:0713996048. Now it's the 12th and I've returned to buy the book,except I can't locate it on the site! What is going on? Where's the first volume in the set? I'm so frustrated by this. I waited for years for the new translation to be completed.Help me
Still a Great Introduction to Insects for Young People. Almost the first book on insects that I ever acquired was a hardbound edition of this little guide in the early 1950s.  Indeed, I wore out several copies before I graduated to Lutz's "Field Book of Insects" and later more up to date guides.  While a bit behind in modern systematics, this guide still has enchanting pictures, mostly the same ones I poured over during my childhood.  It was here I first caught the insect "bug" that eventually propelled me into a career in biological sciences. Zim's early "Golden Guide to Insects" was a magic carpet into the fantastic world of insects and I think that it must still be luring young people to at least appreciate the six-legged crowd. I know that the images in this book are still burned into my brain, especially that of the beautiful buckeye butterfly and the various horned scarab and carrion beetles.I highly recommend this book for children as a first insect book, but I sort of wish they had kept the original yellow cover!
A Middle East &quot;Black Like Me&quot;. Yoram Binur, an Israeli journalist fluent in Arabic from covering stories in the Arab areas of his country, decided to take on a fake identity as an Arab to get first-hand experience of the treatment Arabs receive from the  Israeli police and society. He was convincing enough to be singled out for  harassment and violence from the police, and he experienced subtle  discrimination from everyday Israelis. He learned to really feel the terror  Arabs in Israel feel every time an army vehicle approaches them, or even  passes by their house at night, knowing they could legally be brutalized at  any time for no reason. It was an eye-opening account from inside one of  the most complex political situations on earth, and Binur always kept it  personal and involving
Great book :). This is the first book by jeffery deaver that I've read and after reading it I had to go out and get more. It was a great read and deaver is such a good writer that it feels as if you are with amelia walking the crime scene with her. Just loved the book and would and have recomended it to a lot of people. Can't wait to read his new rhyme novel..
You can never go wrong with Mozart. This is a commonly used edition among members of the opera community. You really can't go wrong with it
success story. I wished I hadstarted a businesslong ago.My teachers in school made business sound so hard I was turned off.Thank you for changing my life forever.I just wished it waseasier to find more of these on tape
unparalleled toilet reading. I have a laptop with a wireless connection, yes, but taking it into the bathroom with me earns me creeped-out looks from my prude roommmate. So for the last years I've been reading the silly tidbits of McSweeney's.net respectably at my desk, and limiting my toilet reading to dull fare like Johann Aloys Schlosser's biography of Beethoven. Until at last "Created in Darkness..." came to the rescue. I can now read McSweeney's' great humor wherever I want to. The pieces in the book are reprints of stuff from the web site, all mostly very short and ideally suited for bathroom perusal.(McSweeney's has a sort of very-clever, distinctive kind of humorous but not sidesplitting writing that appeals to me terrifically. Check out mcsweeneys.net and see if you like that. If you do you will like this book. If not, consider buying it as a gift for a friend.)So yeah, problem solved. My roommate loves the book too so I don't even have to explain to him why I am laughing in the bathroom
It's Nora Roberts. I won't say that its one of the best she wrote as J.D. Robb I thought the first was alot better.But if its Nora Its good
A close look at the dark side of humanity. Theodore Dalrympe has spent much of his working life as a prison doctor,seeing the very worst of human nature, and this collection of essays discusses various aspects of British society, and society in other countries.  The conclusions that he reaches are mostly depressing, he sees British people as hoplelessly debased and vicious, coarsened by the permissive society, ignorant and un-educated,  with neither manners nor morals.Some of the essays in this collection are quite fascinating, there are two enthralling essays on Shakespeare which clearly show his 'relevence' to the times we live in, and a savage critique of Virginia Woolf.  'The Distopian Imagination' which discusses 'Brave New World' and '1984' is fascinating, and contains one of the most touching passages in the book.  Visiting North Korea, Dr Dalrymple  is surreptitiously approached by a young Korean:An electric moment: for in North Korea, unsupervised contact between a Korean and a foreigner is utterly unthinkable, as unthinkable as shouting "Down with Big Brother!""Do you speak English?" he asked me. "Yes" I replied."I am a student at the Foreign Languages Institute.  Reading Dickens and Shakespeare is the greatest, the only pleasure of my life."It was the most searing communication I have ever received in my life.  For him, Dickens and Shakespeare (which the regime permitted him to read with quite other ends in view) guaranteed the possibility not just of freedom but of truly human life itself.Inevitably, there is an essay on the death of Princess Diana, the public hysteria following her death is invariably pointed out as a sign of the deterioration of the British character.  However, the mourning at the death of Diana pales into complete insignificance when compared to the outbreak of public grief and hysteria on the death of Princess Charlotte, daughter of the Prince Regent (later King George IV), in 1817.  Compared to the lavish displays of public grief and mourning on that occasion, the mourning for Diana is quite a minor incident.  Mourning over the death of popular public characters is not a twentieth-century invention.One of the most ineresting essays in the book deals with the legalisation of drugs, something Dr Dalrymple is implacably opposed to.  Previously agnositc on the subject, I have to say that his arguments convinced me entirely that drugs should remain illegal.  That people will continue to take drugs even when they are illegal is not an argument for legalising them, any more than it is as he points out, a reason for legalising any other kind of criminal behaviour:"If the war against drugs is lost, then so are the wars against theft, speeding, incest, fraud, rape, murder, arson and illegal parking.  Few, if any, such wars are winnable.  so let us all do anything we choose."'The Uses of Corruption' contrast Italian society with British, and comes out firmly favourable on the side of the Italians.  The reason why Italian society is flourishing while British society is collapsing, is, Dr Dalrymple concludes, because of the corrupt nature of Italian beuraucracy.  Because the Italians know that their beuaracracy is corrupt, they do not rely on it to help them, and so remain self-sufficient and enterprsing, whereas the British, beleiveing their beauracracy to be benign, depend on it passively for everything.All of the essays in this collection are interesting, and most of them gave me a different perspective on whatever subject they discussed.  However, I have no first-hand experience of the worst of human nature, having lived all my life in mostly pleasant suburban areas rather than amid the bleak squalor of the inner cities, I have not seen as Dr Dalrymple has, the very worst that human beings are capable of.  Most of the people I know, including the much-demonised single mothers, are decent people leading decent lives, and trying to raise their children to be decent people too.  I retain a hope that society is not quite as squalid and irredeemably vile as Dr Dalrymple believes.The best line in the book is in the essay 'How-and How Not- to Love Manking' which is this:"The victory over cruelty is never final, but, like the maintenance of freedom, requires eternal vigilance."Reading this book induces depression, but also sharpens your vigilance.
Breakthrough Book!. Dianne Lancaster's wonderful book offers valuable insight and practical-step-by-step information about how to support the development and emotional well-being of a new generation of kids.These children are pushing us forward on a cultural learning curve. We are raising a generation of more finely attuned beings who feel more want more and who have more to contribute. Ms. Lancaster elucidates this phenomenon and explains why these children are unwilling and constitutionally unable to tolerate outworn models of communication and power that hurt.She shows how we can relate to them in ways that work for them, transforming anger and frustration to love and understanding. She also explains how we can learn to do this for ourselves, learning to recognize and address our own needs and anger, so that we don't respond to them automatically, in a triggered state.This book brings so much information, clarity and just plain truth to the subject that readers will want to savor it slowly, allowing the material to resonate and integrate.My experience in reading it was similar to first time reading works of Harville Hendrix, Catherine Ponder and Louise Hay: a sense of enlivenment, joyful recognition that I as a reader had been given a marvelous gift. This author's contributions are of the same caliber and teach us what we need to know right now for our kids and ourselves. I recommend it most highly.Kanta Bosniak, Director, The Alpha Learning institut
WOW.  This book is a must have. Count To Ten By Karen Rose will keep you on the edge of your seat till the very last page.Detective Mia Mitchell is back to work after being shot in the line of duty. She is still reeling from her partner Abe Reagan being seriously injured in the same shooting. On Mia's first day back she is temporarily assigned to work with Lt. Reed Solliday of the fire department. Seems some one is killing people then setting fire to their homes.  Reed and Mia form a partnership to bring down a killer but Mia finds her self attracted to Reed like no other man before.Reed Solliday isn't used to a partner like Mia, besides being aggressive and tough as nails, she is a knockout. Reed wasn't planning on having romantic thoughts when he agreed to work with the police department.As the killer targets grow daily, Reed and Mia rush to figure out who is next on the list. When the danger strikes close to them both, it makes them realize what they have found as a couple is worth fighting for.Karen Rose is a force to be reckoned with in the field of romantic suspense. The tension is riveting, each page brings the terror to a fever pitch. The romance between Reed and Mia is as compelling and moving as any book out there.  You feel like you know these people and can feel their joy and their sorrow.  Another Karen Rose book cannot come out soon enough for this reader. Kudos
REAL scientists confront creationists (as this book does so well). This book is an excellent resource that helps get to the bottom of the fallacious reasoning of the psuedo-science movement (the creationist movement in particular). Every chapter is well written and superbly informative. The authors are well accredited and right on target on the topics they address.The book deals with some very basic fallacies of the creationist movement (not necessarily attacking God-believers, but militant young earth creationists and other opposers of evolution). A lot has developed in the ID movement since the writing of this book. More resources are handy, but the material here is priceless and needed knowledge to any person who champions true, unadulterated science over the bad excuses that try and pass for it in this turbulent time when everyone is trying to bootleg nonsense into our colleges and public schools.(JH)www.ministerturnsatheist.or
Great source for grammar and punctuation information. I have used the Gregg Reference Manual for 20+ years and purchased this latest edition to keep up with changing trends in letter writing, etc.  Anytime I have a question about grammar and its correct use in a sentence, I can check the Gregg Reference Manual and find the answer I am seeking.  I would highly recommend this product for college students, writers, and anyone pursuing a career in the business world
Great Choice!. I ordered this book for two main reasons, one because it was written by David McCullough, and two because it was a collection of short stories for a little light reading of history.  Each story in the book is thoroughly riveting.  Not only did I enjoy all of the stories in the book, but reading "The Glory Days of Medora" prompted me to dig out "Mornings on Horseback" which I bought a while back and did not take the time to read.  After reading each of these "shorts", I now want to re-read the other McCullough books that I've already done and am also ready to go out and buy (or order through Amazon!) the rest of his books that I don't already own
An unfathomable America nightmare. Enter the cult of the salesman's society. A salesman needs to dream and lives in a completely fake smiling world when meeting his customers. Unluckily this alienation, because to smile on command is an alienation, can invade the salesman's private life and then life becomes a lie, becomes a solitude, becomes hell and blazes. Enter the cult of the urban sprawl. You may have had a nice house in the middle of some open space, but the city grows out and grows up and your house is soon surrounded by skyscrapers and sprawl and you live in a totally dehumanized and cold environment in which sunshine has become a vague recollection fading away with time. Enter the cult of the oedipian tragedy. The father is the dominating boss of the family, the bread winner, the meaning giver, the future designer and definer. The sons are zealots of the father and have to follow him in his tracks, or at least in what they think his tracks are, and trying to preserve his self-esteem and illusions by manipulating his ego as if it were a fragile fresh egg of some endangered bird species. One will accept the model and the other will find out all this is a lie, a fake, an illusion, but this latter will sink in some kind of maniacal depression that will leads him from one failure to another, from one intentional failing procedure to another, just to prove to himself and the world his father is great and he is nothing. And this will go till he finds the courage to look out and step away, once and for all, and become himself, finally free of the lie. Or, because there is always an alternative, till the father decides to step out of life, of his family's life, which will liberate the horizon and the perspective, though it will reveal marvellously how the mother had locked the father into that lie by killing his dreaming power and his enterprising spirit to having a house built, paying for the mortgage, footing the insurance bill and a few others like the refrigerator's, the car's and the washing machine's, etc. The mother (and here the play is extremely misogynistic) is the direct representative of the consumer's society that enslaves us to short-term needs and evacuates all imagination from this life, except when we manage to blow our tops and fly up into the sky of derangement. Enter the cult of private initiative seen as the only excape from this dictatorial ideology. There is always some wild country where you can go and become rich overnight. There is always some profession that can only be reached through hard work and heavy studying and in which only knowledge, competence and performance will count. There is always an outer and an inner frontier that the happy hardworking few will be able to cross and then to come back from enriched and empowered with a vision and a future. But woe to those who do not have that vision, who do not have that personal force, who do not have this special competence, who do not have this particular knowledge that gives them the opportunity to become the leaders of the world, their local world or the global world, or any stage in between these two extremes. What comes out of this play is that those who fail in this world only get what they deserve because they are failing themselves and the world by telling tall tales, by spreading lies, by not seeing that illusions are poisonous to the human mind. And yet how hard it is to be imaginative, competent, self-conscious and self-righteous, compassionate and humane, realistic and strong enough to know how to lie in order to save not one's public image but the truth. And by the way what is the truth in a society that considers the virtuality of an ever-evading potential to be more real than the material reality of an aim killed in our very act of reaching it ?Dr Jacques COULARDEAU, University Paris Dauphine & University Paris I Pantheon-Sorbonne
Full of valuable insights for managers and scholars alike. Galbraith has succeeded in filling the gap that he intended to fill in that specific area of management literature where organization theory and international business research interact. Although I was initially rather skeptical of the scholarly value of the book - since it appears to be particularly aimed at practitioners - I was pleasantly surprised at the wealth of novel theoretical insights that I was able to extract from it. Although it clearly builds on Galbraith's earlier work (for which he is renowned), it definitely adds something to the field. This book will leave those interested in international business (both practice and theory!) with an enhanced understanding of some of the organizational aspects of the multinational corporation that seem to me to be relatively underresearched
None Dare Call It Treason. Is our current administration intentionally lying?  Yes.  Fog Facts is about key data evaporating into obscurity.  Fog Facts is NOT a Right or Left wing propaganda book.  This is an anti-propaganda book.Professor Douglas Rushkoff recently published that the best way to help the masses see the Truth is to speak plainly.  Game on.  Beinhart has filled this bill.In Wag The Dog Beinhart taught me more about propaganda than I had learned from multiple other texts.  Fog Facts reveals the path that lead to our modern state of mass delusion.  So long as most Americans keep seeing "the other side" as responsible for corruption, our current media system is secure.  The greatest trick our media has pulled is the illusion of the two-party system.  Both sides are ignoring fundamental lies and unprecedented changes to our constitution.  The two-sides is two-faces of the same machine.  When humans are two-faced we don't trust them.Harry Blackstone used to walk a live elephant on stage and nobody would see him do that.  It appeared as magic.  Beinhart explains how crucial facts are lead on to the main stage of mass media without anybody seeming to notice.  Presto, the world has changed.  Media is not the magic by misdirection I was envisioning, it is a mass willingness to suspend disbelief.Thank you Larry for helping me better understand the mechanism.  However, I don't think you have gone far enough. Heads of media should be fired for misrepresenting the facts.  Those that forged data should be charged with treason.  Those that ordered the data be forged should be charged with crimes against humanity. But, as you point out, they changed the courts to preclude this possibility.If this book disappears without debate, it will simply be one more bit of evidence to show the fix is in
this book is a must have. I'm a Sociology major who got this book at the recommendation of one of my teachers.  It is a very helpful book though it would be nice if it included Parsons/Structural Functionalism as well
Some Very Good News. It was a very good book.  I like the characters because they are pretty and it is fun to hear their thoughts.  The characters have good ideas.  I also like books with pictures, they help me figure out what is going on in  the story and this book has several pictures. I really liked the Junie B.  Jones books and was looking for other books to read.  I finally found the  Cobble Street Cousins series and really enjoy them
All Night Runner. As an ultra runner myself I know Dean personally anmd have met him a few times.Having run myself for 19 eyears on every continent myself I certainly can nrelate to his stories.I am not i9nterested in finishinmg times but rather enjoy the experience being in nature.Dean, I think is opver doing iot a little andn maybe not too many people can relate to what he does on teh same level.However I think the book was well wtritten also the appeal and audience may have been somewaht limited.It espouses several good human qualities such as detemination, disciplene and endurance, all attribute sthat will benefit anybody throughout life.All in all, I think this is an excellent book, well written and certainly entertaining to read even if you are not a runner.
Written with humor and respect. What a fascinating approach to the great depth of Tolkien's wonderful world!  I grew up reading and rereading Lord of the Rings.  His works inspired me to a great love of the Histories and Mythologies of Great Britain.  But it has been many years since I have had the leisure to pour over his detailed histories, and indeed, some of the Lost and Unfinished Tales can be heavy reading.  Therefore, I was intrigued to find a quick reference book in the familiar "dummies" format.  And after reading through it, I am pleased to find any concerns that this might trivialize Tolkien's books were unfounded.  On the contrary, Mr. Harvey approaches these works with great knowledge and respect.  His observations are often informative and open more doors of ideas and learning.  Yet all of this is presented lightly with deceptive ease and humor.  Over all, a good companion book to add to my Tolkein and Lewis shelf
Of living in interesting times. Baudolino starts the book distressed, his right road lost. He has killed a man, a long-time friend, which is against his own morals that permit lying but forbid killing. He ends up describing this event, as well as his life's story, to a historian Master Niketas, his Virgil or shrink, looking to make sense of his whole life. A book later, Niketas, living up to the maxim "it's not what you know, it's whom you know", brings a blind wise man Paphnutius, who can see right through Baudolino's stories, solves the mystery of another murder and, to Baudolino's shock, points out that it was Baudolino himself who inadvertently killed another man, his adopted father Frederick, the Holy Roman Emperor. Horrified, Baudoloino then does some soul searching, finds god inside and, made whole with this knowledge, goes back into the world to settle some old debts.This is a nice wrapper around the chronicle of Baudolino's life blended with historic events, myths and religion in the 1100s. The kernel plot is quite engaging, especially since history is often more striking when served as a little bit of spice to somebody's personal story. History and Baudolino's biography are always vying for the primary spot. Baudolino spends most of the book working towards Frederick's glory, and with it - the glory of a Great European Empire. It is Baudolino, the pragmatic visionary, who suggests to Frederick the idea of independent universities, and with them - the idea of the freedom of thought, and it is he again who works on having Frederick's rule recognized by the Pope (a fake letter from Prester John and a fake Holy Grail notwithstanding). Perhaps, Baudolino embodies the author's own longing for a colorful and benevolent force working for the benefit of a greater and better Europe? In addition to giving Baudolino the leading role in some of the most important events of his time, Eco endows him with "all a man must know for a complete life: poverty, love, and war" (? O.Henry).Baudolino is, basically, a mensch. He may be somewhat of a schemer, but he does not have an evil bone in his body. It is perhaps a reflection of the author's belief in some general good that the history of the fairly rough and tumble 1100s is shown as a commentary to such a man
chicken soup for the mother and sons soul. What an inspiring book.  It brought up many fond childhood memories.  I sent one to my mom today.  I can't wait to see her response
A Monument to My Genius. Words cannot describe the impact this weighty volume has had on me.  From the moment I held it in my trembling hands, I was hooked. The rich, carefully crafted prose is a delight to the eye and the imagination.  Its author is undoubtedly a man of breath-taking vision who has reconstructed the 17th-century past with unique skills of research and analysis.  His character shines through in every page and the reader cannot help but conjure up in his or her mind a dazzling image of a dark tall handsome curator with beautifully slick and greased black hair, a whiff of moustache, and sparkling gold-rimmed glasses.  Every inch a man of learning.  I could go on - and I will
Excellent book on Ajax design strategies. This is an excellent theory and strategy book for AJAX. For the uninitiated, AJAX stands for Asynchronous Javascript and XML. In short, it's the technology behind Web 2.0. New data is fetched from the server and/or presented dynamically through client side Javascript that calls server side sources, commonly XML. Instead of refreshing the entire page, individual elements are changed based on user input and new data pulled from the server. The level of interaction and sophistication involved in using AJAX makes it a force to be reckoned with. Because of that, it's essential to have a book that covers the underpinnings of this technology.True to the title of this book, it is packed with good theoretical discussions of how AJAX works and good strategies for how to use AJAX. Knowing all of the tricks isn't worth much unless you can apply your knowledge in a meaningful way. An example of what I considered impressive was the material on caching strategies: AJAX has always struck me as being a high-transfer way to presenting information and instead this section makes AJAX into a means of saving traffic.Unlike other books on AJAX, this book covers design patterns for the technology. How do you divide data for distribution? Answer: Use the Content Chunking Patterns. How do you effectively maintain state or at least the impression of maintenance? Answer: the persistent communications pattern. How do you make all of the potential data available at the user's fingertips? Answer: the infinite data pattern. In the nine patterns presented the author explores much of theory, and that helps you strategize when it comes time to code your own applications. Each pattern has a dedicated chapter that first presents the intent of the pattern, then the motivation for using it in the context of AJAX, a list of possible applications of the design pattern, and associated design patterns. Next, the design pattern's architecture is explained  in the context of solving an actual problem. Finally, the implementation is shown via code and the user's interaction with various webpages. At the end of each pattern's chapter there are "highlights" of what has just been presented.Up to now concrete examples of using AJAX were copious and usable theory has been hard to come by, making this book a welcome volume. I know how to write Javascript, I know what XML is. What I needed to know was how to bring it all together using design patterns that make sense for AJAX. This book accomplished that. My one criticism is that the introductory material in chapters one and two seems a bit rushed, so absolute beginners might benefit by reading "Head Rush Ajax" first, which is an excellent yet more introductory text.I notice that Amazon does not show the table of contents, so I do that here:CHAPTER 1 Introduction to Ajax 1CHAPTER 2 The Nuts and Bolts of Ajax 19CHAPTER 3 Content Chunking Pattern 53CHAPTER 4 Cache Controller Pattern 79CHAPTER 5 Permutations Pattern 111CHAPTER 6 Decoupled Navigation Pattern 153CHAPTER 7 Representation Morphing Pattern 197CHAPTER 8 Persistent Communications Pattern 225CHAPTER 9 State Navigation Pattern 265CHAPTER 10 Infinite Data Pattern 303CHAPTER 11 REST-Based Model View Controller Pattern 33
Awesome!!  I loved this book!. To all of you who are bad-mouthing this book, stuff it.  It's not modern writing but if you read it to read it, not because you have a book report due, you'll like it.  I picked it up and could'nt put it down except for a breif exception where I thought my bladder would explode, but then I picked it back up again.  I would definitely rate this as a classic and, although some of it is a tad unrealistic, almost all of it is believable.  I would highly suggest that if you have a few spare hours, you should immeadietly pick it up and if not, wait for a weekend (or a better time) and then do it.  This book is Awesome
Excellent!. I love the characters in this book! I don't often reread by this author, but have to keep rereading this one!  Its that good
It will change your life!. I have read a lot of books about finances - This is the best one I've read!  Get it!  Live it
A must have for every woman!. I feel the biggest problem our culture has faced is the decline of the family. I realized after a deivorce that I had never been taught how to be a wife. The job has been underated and it shows in our current society. Even if you don't stay at home, it is a good idea to know what can be done to keep a house. I don't do it all, but I am working toward doing more and more of it until I am happy with my environment. So, if your job title is Wife, then this book will help you learn how to do it (at leaat the house part). It is a joy to live in a happy clean house
Informative and insightful read. this is a thought-provoking book about self-injury and healing. the book is well-written and very descriptive. many narratives are used in the text, and this helps to create a greater understanding of individual experiences and struggles. this is important because each of us experiences things in our own way. that perception then becomes reality for us. once that happens, we find ways to deal with the emotional intensity that this can create. for many, the coping mechanism of choice is self-injury. self-injury is very difficult for many people to understand--even those who self-mutilate often come to treatment without a real understanding of why they harm themselves. once you understand the chain of events, you can start to better understand the compulsive nature of this behavior, the way in which the self-injurer sees self-harm as the only alternative, the only way to obtain some relief from the present experience. one caveat--i disagree with the authors' depiction of self-mutilation as NOT a manifestation of addiction. in my work with patients who self-injure, it has become very clear to me that this behavior feels very compulsive and can become habitual. also, in line with the AA model of treating addiction, patients most often do better when they recognize the power that self-injury has over them and start to explore the origins of their psychological pain in an attempt to stop expressing this pain through self-harm. information on the SAFE Alternatives program is also very helpful. statistics regarding success and healing are very encouraging, and these authors clearly have a good thing going. another excellent read is marilee strong's book *a bright red scream: self-mutilation and the language of pain.
Rewarding.  Provides thought-provoking information. Architects of the Web helps you make sense of the big-picture changes wrought by the Web. Reid is a great story teller. His work gives you in-depth interviews that take you behind the scenes to learn how a few early Web innovators pioneered through this domain.  This book will intrigue new comers on the Net while true Netizens may find the information date
Nancy Drew for Adults. This is just one of those fun books...the heroine has no training other than the obligatory cop boyfriend.  The book is one of those great summer reads.  You can sit down and curl up with Cece and the wacky friends, family and acquaintances.  I read her first book ("I dreamed I married Perry Mason"...who could say no to that title?) and became thoroughly hooked.
Keeping it simple. How do you go about explaining something to your children that you have difficulty understanding yourself? Well Barklay and Eve make the process easier. This wonderful book describes the most complicated procedures in simple terms without talking down to children. I found the illustrations and story content charming and informative. Children will find the common hair loss of cancer a much less frightening process when they see the fun that Eve has with a wig. While dealing with cancer can't be made easier, Barklay and Eve can make explaining it easier
A life changing book. Meg isn't so happy when she has to share a room with her older sister Molly when her parents decide to move into a new house. Molly is the perfect teenager, beautiful, popular, and has a cute boyfriend. Meg is the complete opposite, she is shy, nerdy and thinks she is ugly.While living at their new house Meg makes friends with the eldery next door neighbor and teaches him her love of photography.Later on a hippy couple moves into the other empty house next to Meg and she is invited to take photos of the birth of their first baby.While this is going on, Molly becomes sick with the flu. She has major nose bleeds and is very sick. One night Molly is rushed to the hospital and Meg's life is turned upside down. Weeks later she learns that Molly is dying.This is such a sad and heartwarming book, with a very important lesson, no matter what life goes on.~~~Ka
Fun to share with others. The illustrations are delightful for this traditional story.  A great gift for any child or adult
What a great read!. This was my first book by Richards, recommended to me by a reading group. I love the way she incorporated the characters into one wonderful story. She made me wish Maisey was my mother, what a interesting life that would be. The ending was a total suprise
Full of adventure, will keep you reading!. I couldn't believe this story was written in the 13th century!  The structure read like a modern novel.  You won't be disappointed with the adventures that these characters get into.  It is also a nice insight into ancient Chinese thought about political legitimacy and virtue.  While very gory at times, this book really shows you how the ancient chinese thought.  The morals are also applicable to today
This is a must for little ones who love to draw. My son (eight years old) (very good artist) ate this book up.  He copied every page in just three days then he was mixing scenes.  His drawings took on a superb quality that he had not reached before.  The bonus is, he  practices his handwriting while learning interesting facts that are good to  know.  We'll be buying each edition for Christmas for him
Ground-breaking Scholarship in Queer Studies. Jose Munoz has written a book which breaks new ground in queer studies.  His analysis of queer, colored cultural productions is incisive and unapologetic.  A much needed addition to a field which pays lip service but  has yet to alter its strong hold on whiteness
many special effects. Adobe is striving mightily to make After Effects the dominant tool for editing animated images, much like Photoshop is the pre-eminent program for editing static images. Bolante shows here why AE has a far more challenging task.Even leaving aside competing tools, AE must handle video editing and audio editing. Here, it needs to synchronise two such tracks, in such ways as the ending of one triggering the start of another.The audio editing is somewhat rudimentary. Other programs that specialise in this have more sophisticated options. But, unsurprisingly,the video editing forms the major part of AE. Several chapters are devoted to it. Many video special effects come right out of the box. Like texturing surfaces, or applying a gradient wipe.Of course, many films will need text to be shown in the video. As expected, you get a panoply of font families to choose from. Along with effects like showing text along a contour that you define. Quite familiar to Photoshop users. But now redone in a broader context.To be sure, this is not a simple book. The complexity of film editing necessitates this. But you should find that most tasks described here are straightforward to do. Though realistically, if you're trying a technique for the first time, many iterations may be needed before you're satisfied
"Intimate Allies". I am a Pastor and I give this book as a gift to newleyweds.  I have found it to be very down-to-earth, not like some of the "how-to-stay-in-love" marriage manuals, but rather focused on serving together - looking at the larger world together - making your relationship strong by being accountable, etc.  I LOVE the "communal" focus, making marriage part of the network of society instead of just "me & you babe".  I like everything that Dan Allender writes.  Filled with insight and practical wisdom
An amazing book!. Marty Neumeier does it again! Like The Brand Gap, ZAG is destined to change the way we think about brands and their development. With an efficient, breezy style (and an eye for design), Neumeier offers a real gift to the world of business, marketing, and design. Buy this book. Read it. Live it. Your brand strategy (and your life) will never be the same
Best book available on the subject. This book is extremely well done and spells out the history of American involvement in the Pacific after 1898 much better than anything else on the market.   Although Miller's WAR PLAN ORANGE is also an interesting book,  but from the navy's point of view, I feel this one is much better done.    Highly recommend this work to anyone wanting background on the Pacific War
Now, there should be no excuse for those claiming a lack of good historical sources of the first voyage around the globe. For lovers of the non-fiction accounts of sacrifices made in pursuit of honor, riches and glory, this book should be a great find. Readers will be convinced beyond doubt of the struggles Magellan and his crew endured in their historic voyage.  Masterfully recreated from several historical resources, biographer Laurence Bergreen brings to life the cost of bearing the title of Discoverer. Resurrected in the story are the deviousness of the human character, the lust for currency greater than gold - the spices, the once undoubted might of the former Spanish armada and the terrible cost for it all - the loss of human life.Carefully constructed story coupled with an excellent writing, this should be on the reading list of every reader dreaming of the voyages of the glorious past.- by Simon Cleveland
Worth Reading After The Other Boleyn Girl. I have to give Philippa Gregory a big THANK YOU! for approaching this story from a different perspective from The Other Boleyn Girl.  It delves into the lives of those in poverty without straying far from the lavish lifestyles of English royalty and wealth.  Again I was attached to the characters and their struggles while learning much about the time period and historical events.  There were a few very alluring relationships between the narrator and the men she encounters creating a whirlwind of emotions for the reader but in the end, I was very pleased with the romantic outcome of the book.  So if you are deciding whether or not you'd like to read this after having read The Other Boleyn Girl, I greatly encourage you to do so, you won't regret it
I feel better about myself and my life!. Joan Borysenko is a class act! In this inspiring discussion of various ways to connect with one's own sense of the divine, she so gracefully finds the common ground shared by different approaches to spirituality that it's hard to believe that disagreements about religion are at the heart of so many troubles in the world today. If only more people would listen to this program!I consider myself fairly well traveled seeker in the spiritual realm, but I learned a lot about myself and my husband when we played it in the car on a long drive. Although the program is six CDs long (for less than $20!!), listening to it took up even more driving time, because we kept pausing the CD to discuss the points she was making. That's my idea of a good audio program!
A lovely knitting book of baby afghans. Macomber's 11 patterns for baby afghans is lovely! The recommended yarns are easily obtainable and affordable. The variety of afghans can be for babies, toddlers and could easily be altered for adults. I gave it 4 stars because the patterns were a little difficult to follow because of the formatting on the page and the lack of charts - the one I am working on could have been easier to follow if it had a chart - I had to retype the pattern to make it easier to follow. Do not let this discourage you from purchasing the book - just an observation and recommendation for future books
good effort. All components are there the story is good, the mystery is good too, but, all together it is slightly below the tops of the series
What Can You Do With 10 Black Dots?. In fact, quite a bit can be done with a big dot.  I gave my son and daughter some large dots and we had fun experimenting with what we could make out of them.However, art is not my reason for giving a thumbs up to this book.  I like its math side.For toddlers there is counting.  And for older children (I would say preschool age) there is an chart at the end of the book which shows dots and numbers from 1 to 5 on the first page and 6 to 10 on the next two  pages (only 5 dots fit per page).  Having the numbers and dots shown in this manner is a marvelous way to let little ones see the `ladder' shape of the number pyramid.  And an opportunity to point out how moving up or down the stairs is equivalent to addition and subtraction.We like this book.  It has a cute concept that is appealing to young children.   (Toddler to Preschool)4 Stars for being of mathematical as well as artistic interest
How so much could go wrong. The title of this book refers to the Congo River of Africa.  This great river became famous in Western minds in the 1800s with the journeys of Dr. Livingstone.  Later, it would be the setting of The Heart of Darkness.  Doctors and scientists in the heart of darkness indeed as The River explains in its long, well-documented, exhaustive tale of secretive, unregulated medical research.  This book's author interviews hundreds of individuals involved in this process, goes over countless documents, and from it, pieces together the following story.After WWII there was a race to find a vaccine for polio that could be administered orally.  Numerous groups of scientists from around the world took part in this race; the prize being fame, fortune, and patents galore.  In public, these teams agreed to perform all their research in Western countries, document everything, and only conduct tests on adults who had signed written consent forms.  In reality, many of these teams flocked to the Africa Congo to perform large-scale tests on unwitting and unknowing human populations, often without oversight by the press or medical institutions.  These groups would inject various African primates with polio, extract serum from the infected primates, and using this serum to make experimental vaccines which would then be given to the local human populations.This book contends that by this process, HIV was accidentally transmitted from certain monkeys into humans.  The author provides numerous pieces of evidence in proof of this theory.  First, the very same villages in the Congo where HIV was first discovered also happened to be the very same villages in which the polio tests were performed.  Second, HIV was diagnosed in these villages 10 - 20 years after the polio tests were performed.  Third, none of the other currently existing theories can explain how a primate virus passed into the human population, and spread so quickly, over a period of 4 decades, given that the two populations of monkeys and humans had coexisted in the same habitat since the dawn of man without any such transmission.  Fourth, during public hearings in the 1950s, the various teams presented their oral vaccines to the world scientific community.  One team found an unknown immunodeficiency virus in one of the samples provided by another team.  Hmmm, an unknown immunodeficiency virus... sounds like HIV to me...  Fifth, the scientists that conducted these trials in the Congo are unwilling to release their samples and scientific data for public scrutiny, even though all the patents and honors have already been distributed...Overall, this is a very good book.  Even if you do not believe the author's theory, I still highly recommend it for the author covers a lot of aspects of the medical field that one might not necessarily learn in school or in the newspapers.  These include making and testing vaccines, animal testing, human testing, obtaining funding for medical research, scientific protocol, relationships between the medical community and governments, medical reporting, competition in the medical community, statistical sampling, and epidimiology.
Inspirational. I thought the book was very inspirational, with many many many examples of Carson's rule-breaking design. Definately a must own for those with a fresh and adventurous take on design. However, this book is not for designers who cling to 'the grid' like a baby blanket or those who tremble at the idea of pushing the limits of visual communication
Better Than The First One. This was much better than the first book. I enjoyed reading it a lot. This book follows Marcy to a summer camp called Camp Seriendipity. It tells about her romance troubles and a little bit of her insecurity. This book had some humor, some drama, and romance too. I recomend it to anyone 11 years and older. It was fun to read
An Entertaining Guide to the Mistooks of Our Time. This book is an entertaining and informative look of some of the major fiascoes of American popular history. I have witnessed or at least heard about the majority of the mistakes displayed here. For example, I remember seeing the John Hancock Tower partially covered in plywood on childhood trips to Boston (although the book doesn't mention this, I believe that the surviving panes of glass went to Building #19, a locally famous salvage/overstock store here in the Boston area, for sale for the uses described by the authors). The authors do a good job in filling out the facts behind the fiascoes (I didn't realize that I wasn't the only one who couldn't stand Clippy). As a previous reviewer stated, the one problem that I did have with the book is a lack of a photo section, as items such as paper dresses, the Dodge LaFemme, the rockin' Tacoma Narrows Bridge & Flying Cars need to be seen. I also didn't care too much for the "receipe" section that ended each chapter. Despite this, I do recommend this book to be added to your own Dynamic File of Trivia.
A very exciting book worth reading again and again. This book is good because the author goes into great detail and is very hard to put down.  The author has written many other good books.  Some are The Bluebird and the Sparrow and So Long a Stranger.   I recommed this book to everyone interesting in readin
Best Bible Ever!!. I really love this bible!  It is so cool to be able to check a passage written in four translations, all on the same page!!  I used to carry my traditional bible translation (NIV study) and The Message version around all the time to compare verses (I often find the Message speaks to me at a deeper level than other translations), and it was cumbersome.  Now I just use this one bible most of the time, and use my old study bible occasionally.  The book is well constructed, and the font size is not as small as I thought it would be.  Parallel bibles are a great idea, and this is the best one I have found
A favorite book!. Let's be honest....Don't we as parents dread reading some books to our kids?? (If you are like me, some end up 'disappearing' after a while!) Well, this is one book that I enjoyed reading as much as my dds enjoyed listening to it!  The pictures on each page draw you in, and the dialog is fun to read! (I had fun changing my voice around according to the animal on each page!) Though my dds are almost teenagers, we still can't part with this book
Good enough. Few works of fiction, particularly those marketed to the masses, will result in the perfect combination of suspense, believability, grammatical compositon, language, wit, historical accuracy, plot and character development.  And neither does "High Country".  But it had enough of what was necessary to create a more than readable book.  Maybe a bit heavy on the near death experiences but all in all, good enough
Masterpiece of illustrated history. This book is overflowing with beautiful maps, fascinating photos and insightful descriptions. I find Nicolle's Historical Atlas of the Islamic World to be one of the best introductions to the history of the Muslim world. The layout is astounding, and puts much pricier atlases, even the Oxford Atlas of World History, to shame.One should note that this is not just a history of the Muslim religion, but a broad description of the history and culture of Muslim countries, covering Spain, Africa, Central Asia, Southeast Asia and of course the Middle East.Mr. Nicolle's approach to Islam combines sympathy and neutrality. He is obviously one of the most eminent authorities on the Muslim world
A Tragic upbringing. What is more intriguing in the novel is not only how the protagonist was a product of her society's objectification of women, but how she was brought up to be that way. Wharton exposes not only the frivolous society of her time, she exposes the tragedy of women who were raise without any sense of self-preservation and self-reliance. Lily Bart cannot live in a world deprived of opulence, and must be mercenary to attain what she desires most. Wharton's work is perceived as lengthy at times; however What the reader must realize throughout the story is that Wharton was alluding against her own society's upbringing of women
A REVIES OF A GRAMMAR FOR BIBLICAL HEBREW BY SEOW. I have found this book to be the most helpful of any Hebrew grammar that I  have so rar purchased.  Seow's introduction and continued use of morphology  have opened a new world to me in the study and translation of ancient  Hebrew texts
Autism to the Nth Degree!. Although I was never a fan of the science fiction/fantasy genres, I loved this book.  The young wizards were appealing characters who reside in very real Nassau County New York communities.  Each wizard is introduced to readers, so people who have not read the previous works in this series won't feel like they have to play catch up to understand the flow of the story.Kit, the wizard who is featured most prominently in this book discovers his beloved dog Ponch has some wizardlike properties.  Boy and dog are able to communicate in ways they had never previously been able to do.  Nita, another young wizard in their midst is still grieving over the death of her mother, whose life was prolonged thanks to Nita's magical prowess.Enter Darryl.  A boy with severe autism, Darryl faces severe communication challenges and is enrolled in a self-contained program in a local Nassau County School.  Kit finds himself in the mind of this child, whose speech is limited at best, sporadic at worst.  He discovers Darryl mulls things over from different perspectives; changes his mind frequently; is highly imaginative as his mental imagery will attest to.  Along with this information, Kit learns of the dark powers of the challenging forces of the Lone Power who threatens their very safety.Darryl has prescient dreams; this is a characteristic many of Stephen King's characters have.  Darryl's autism is presented in a plausible and sympathetic fashion; although this book does not purport to be any kind of a diagnostic tool, it is delightful to see a wizard with autism and to see autism portrayed in a very different genre.Kudos to Duane for presenting autism in a logical and accurate fashion.  This book is beautifully and brilliantly written to include autism in a very different context.  I really like the way Kit's mother provided him with reading materials about autism and described it as best she could.  I thought it was a lovely act of grace on her part to allow Kit to take a day off from school so he could study autism with the idea of helping Darryl
Beautiful sweet story. This book is even shaped like a tree, long and narrow.  My 3 year old son loves it.  I loved it as a child.  The book presents the beauty of trees.  Very simple but important.  A must for any parent who wants to teach his or  her child empathy, beauty, spirituality and the beauty of nature.  Highly  recommended
Dickens is wonderful. I first read Charles Dickens my junior year of high school and I have loved him ever since.  His characters are thoughtful and the stories are great
Overall, an interesting read. The premise of this book is captivating, and I read it almost immediately after seeing Dr. Zimbardo on the Daily Show, where I learned of it. The first 2/3rds of this book are fascinating, particularly the account of the Stanford Prison Experiment and subsequent experiments regarding the human capacity for evil. I greatly admire Zimbardo, but the book is not what I expected.The first 66% of the book is psychological, and it seems to me that the last 33% is more historical and political. I started to lose interest during the analysis of Abu Ghraib because it was just repeating the concepts we had learned earlier in the book, and was no longer new and intriguing. The book was just way too long, period, to cover the same themes - deindividuization, dehumanization, etc., etc. I wanted more from this book than it delivered, but it was still worth reading
Healing The Earth. Another good lesson. Wisdom creates Knowlege which leads to Understanding which can create the awareness that is needed to survive on a planetary scale. This is an awesome read to share with as many people as possible. Creates a good "thinking space".Rates right up there with "Mother Earth Spirituality" but leads one into deeper thought and awareness.
A great attempt to see what cannot be seen. How do we find the origins of anything?  In mythology and folklore, there have been attempts to use language and the narratives themselves to recreate the origins.  Others attempt to apply pyschological theory to explain the commonness of &quot;man's mythic past&quot; -- &quot;man&quot; here a term purposely chosen to reflect the patriarchical veil that most studies have processed the world through.  Marcel Detienne does some of these things in his search for the origins of Greek mythology -- the term &quot;mythology&quot; is used as a general word and does not reflect later attempts to classify and identify different type of narratives.  While I may not agree with all of his statements and the translation leaves a bit ot be desired (as all translations due I might add), I am very pleased as a historian to say that Detienne has no problem saying flat out &quot;we may never know&quot; the origins of Greek mythology.  This may leave many readers at a loss if the book was chosen to give all the answers but it is a far more realistic approach that attempts to create what can never be uncovered and to understand what has no record
Even Better than Chicka, Chicka, Boom Boom!. My first-grader loves this book! He had read Chicka, Chicka Boom Boom in kindergarten, so it was nice to find a book one step up in sophistication, which Chicka, Chicka, 1, 2, 3 is.The sequel has a more developed plot and has a lovely and sad repeating line.. Chicka, Chicka, 1, 2, 3, wil there be a place for me?  from little zero.But in the end, zero is the hero as he saves the day from the "Buzzing close, bumble bees!"  Then a valuable math lesson is taught, as children learn elemenatary place value-- 0 with 10 becomes 100 and completes the number climb to the top of the beautiful apple tree!This book is destined to become a classic..
No better introduction to Scripture study for Catholics. Scott Hahn has done it again!  Through a collection of challenging and fascinating essays on biblical matters, he has prepared our minds and hearts to be open to the Holy Spirit at work in the life-giving Word of God. At Vatican II, the Council Fathers called for a greater access to Sacred Scripture for all the Christian faithful  They exhorted all of us to learn &quot;the surpassing knowledge of Jesus Christ&quot; (Phil. 3:8), through the study of Sacred Scripture.  I can think of no better introduction to this study than Scott Hahn's Scripture Matters: Essays on Reading the Bible from the Heart of the Church
A fantastic book for the beginning mathematics teacher. The author's focus is on college teaching, but is also readily applicalbe to high school or other secondary teaching.  Chapters include fundamentals such as how to lecture and other pedagogical ideas, to extremely practical items such as writing and grading tests and tutoring.  Many ideas are presented for immediate adapting/absorbing into your own teaching framework.  Being a high school calculus teacher, I was entertained by the glimpse this book provides of a college or university teaching situation.  This book is readily available from the American Mathematical Society at ams.org
A great book for cat lovers and also cat haters. If your cat has annoying or endearing behaviors then you may see some of them in this great book.  The simple folk art illustrations of a cat giving you a "butt salute" or of drinking from a toilet (Perrier anyone?) or of covering your head while you are trying to sleep will make you laugh out loud.  A great gift for anyone with a cat.  I particularly liked the page with the cat knocking off christmas tree ornaments, which happened in our house one year.  I have never had one gnaw on my toes, but I always kept them covered around my cat
A STUNNING PORTRAIT OF A GREAT ARTIST AT WORK. Jerome Robbins is brought to vivid life in this amazing and stunning pictorial biography.  Using hundreds of rare, fascinating, never-before-seen photographs; Robbins' personal journals; Robbins' own words about work; combined with Conrad's insightful narrative, this book shines a light on the man behind the image and takes us inside his working process and his daily life. He was obviously a very private man who shielded his personal life, but Conrad takes us behind the austere public image. Because of her longstanding relationship with Robbins, Conrad was given access to previously unseen early childhood  and early dance photographs and Robbins' own drawings and writings.  Any creative person in any field will be grateful for the descriptions of his unique working methods. Conrad doesn't gloss over his disappointments or personal failures - the story behind his firing from the film of West Side Story is fascinating - but she chooses to concentrate on illuminating his artistic process and bringing the man to life, with all his quirks, his humor, his fierce dedication to work -- and the great personal sacrifices he made for that work.  Don't miss out on a wonderful and original reading experience!  I loved it... an absolute treasure
Yet another treatise by Jones. I won't go into great detail as other reviewers have already done that.  I will say that if you haven't read Jone's other book, The Art of War in the Western World, you should.  In this book on the Civil War, Jones discusses the war by applying all the concepts and strategies he describes in The Art of War.  In fact, the appendix in this book appears to have been lifted from the previous book.  No matter.  In the book he succinctly disects the causation and effects that bore on both sides and the resulting outcome.  A well written and scholarly book looking at the war from a different perspective.  It could be a textbook
absolutely wonderful. I've had this book for three years and it is really terrific. So many new ideas and great recipes. This has really opened my world and gotten me to expand my vegetarian diet.  Great writing, easy to read, really love this book. I turn to this book every week. Get it
Finally. Finally there is someone who is writng about being a parent without being dipsy deweyed. Judith Newman has incredible, sharp, honest humor that will offend sanctimonious people and will cause those of us who love the truth to rejoice.  Her stories of motherhood are brutal and touching.  Her evaluation of her existence is harsh but never ceases to impress me.  Finally someone is not telling me to have a baby at 54 and find Nirvana, Judith is making me laugh and be wary and I thank her for it
A Model of Life in Love with Food and Cooking. Buy It!. Jamie Oliver's first book, `The Naked Chef' was published shortly after his success with the short run BBC series of the same name, when Jamie looks to be not much more than 20. While it was easy to understand the quality of his fourth American publication, `Jamie's Kitchen', it is a little surprising to encounter the quality in his very first book, until you read of his culinary apprenticeship under both Antonio Carluccio and Gennaro Contaldo (of the Neal Street restaurant) and Rose Gray and Ruth Rodgers (of the River Caf) in London plus a journeyman's stint with a major restaurant in Paris. Young chefs do not get stints with these venues without some serious abilities above and beyond their three years at the Westminster Catering College. His working to Carluccio certainly explains his love of fresh ingredients. His visits to the local greengrocer and other markets are not a TV gimmick. A `Gourmet' magazine writer was visiting the London open air markets collecting information for a story when they ran into our boy Jamie, off camera, doing exactly the kind of ingredients collecting he does at the beginning of each of his TV shows. I also understand the background of his simple approach to food after having reviewed three cookbooks from the River Caf duo Gray and Rodgers. This first book was done not long after he left their service and in many ways it reads like another Gray / Rodgers effort, except that our Jamie has added a few good touches of his own to enhance the material.As the flyleaf clearly explains, the `Naked' moniker refers to the style of food preparation practiced and promulgated by Monsieur Oliver and not a comment on his attire while cooking. Be very clear about the fact that this is not the same as fast or even easy, however most of Jamie's recipes are relatively easy for a moderately talented home cook. `Naked' primarily means dishes which are prepared from ingredients which are as close as possible to the soil, the sea, and the pasture. And, it means that the food is prepared with a minimum of fuss and measuring. Jamie firmly believes in the maxim that good cooking is acquiring the very best ingredients and doing as little as possible to muck them up.The first indication that this book is not about fast is when Jamie gives us two recipes for homemade pasta and goes on to give many, many recipes which use this homemade fare, with the full expectation that you will take the time to make these yourself. True to his River Caf roots, there are many good pasta dishes in this book. The homemade ravioli and tortellini recipes alone may be worth the price of admission. The seafood recipes are a close second in their simplicity and appeal to the mind's taste buds.The chapter on meat, poultry, and game broadens Jamie's horizon to include pork and lamb dishes inspired by American, British, and North African cuisines. There are four variations on roast leg of lamb, a real boon to lamb lovers like myself. Roasted chicken and duck get a turn in Jamie's oven as well. Jamie returns to his Italian inspiration at the end of meats with a rather elaborate meatball recipe that includes just about every spice in the Italian pantry plus the usual bread, egg, cheese, and mustard for mortar. This recipe is a perfect example of where Jamie may be overlooking some finer details for the sake of simplicity. The meat is simply `meat for grinding or bought ground meat'. There is no suggestion of beef and pork and veal mixtures. The simplification goes further in suggesting that unground meat can be made ready by giving it a whizz in the food processor. My favorite foodie nerd Alton Brown gives detailed instructions for grinding meat in a food processor, as a heavy finger on the `On' button can easily turn your choice chuck into choice mush.The chapter on vegetables covers a lot of familiar Mediterranean territory, but it also branches out to the Orient for a stir-fry recipe and a vegetable tempura. Jamie really dips into his love of the Mediterranean cuisine by devoting an entire chapter to legumes. I would expect a true Brit to talk up potatoes, but not our Jamie. And, he will have nothing to do with canned beans. All recipes in this and other chapters call for beans soaked overnight. This fits the `cheap and easy, but not necessarily quick' theme of the book. The stars in this chapter include cranberry beans, chickpeas, yellow split peas, green lentils, black-eyed peas, lima beans and cannellini beans.Another paean to the Mediterranean is the next chapter on risotto and couscous. I'm really surprised to find that Jamie's favorite risotto recipe includes both rice and beans; however, a little reflection reminds me that this is simply another marriage of foods which have been complementing one another for centuries. The couscous recipes touch the high points with two hot dishes and a salad.Jamie's chapter on bread is another sign that his style is all about simplicity and not speed. His basic recipe is pure Italian, using classic Italian techniques and durum semolina flour. I have done Oliver bread recipes with great success, so I heartily recommend his contributions to everyday bread baking. For a relatively small book, the variety of bread recipes is really impressive. Compared to the bread chapter, the dessert chapter is rather short and sweet, focusing on conventional English and Italian standards.Jamie Oliver is not giving us quick cooking. He is not even aping River Caf works and giving us good, simple Italian cooking. Jamie Oliver is promoting a lifestyle based on good cooking from basic ingredients.Jamie's recipes may be a bit too simply stated for a complete novice, but I am ready to sign up for his view of home cooking with naked ingredients. How about you?
Excellent treatment. This book while short does an exellent job.Shea's writing is clear and concise.He presents both biblical and historical evidence that fully supports his position.I would strongly reccomend this book to any one who wants to either defend or fully understand the Catholic position
Re-playing the Indian wars?. Father John O'Mallory, the "Indian priest" at the Wind River Reservation, got a phone call from his Episcopal colleague at the other side of the res.  Father Nathan has received a message meant for Father John, which seems to indicate some old wars are heating up again.  In 1874, Shoshone warriors massacred Arapaho in the Bates Battle.  Now, 125 years later those left of the Arapaho have peacefully co-existed with the Shoshone at Wind River.  But all that might come to an end, as Father John decodes the message and finds the bodies of slain Shoshone at the site of the Arapaho massacre.In the meantime, Vicky Holden trying to devote her law practice to the big issues of her tribe, currently working on documents related to the reintroduction of the wolf.  But she keeps being sucked back into representation of a young trouble-maker she's represented on DUI, assault, and burglary charges.  But this time, he might go down for the murders.And Father John and Vicky both have other problems.  Father John's new assistant fears he'll never earn the same respect as the older priest.  Vicky's new law partner worries that she'll contunue to represent the lowlife, draining all her energy away from the big projects.  And just what is the relationship between Father John and Vicky?Margaret Coel has given us another terrific mystery that keeps us guessing until the end, set among the peoples and places her readers have come to love.  Highly recommended
A Gentle Guide to Expanded Awareness. This is a wonderful book which helps you expand your awareness. Using the tools of meditation, a psychic journal, grounding, auras, chakras, spiritual guides, and many other things, the author helps you along 'the psychic pathway.'Clearly written, with very useful exercises, she nudges you along gently, rather than overwhelming you with psychic mumbo jumbo. In fact, at the  beginning of the book she tires to dispel preconceived notions that psychics are weird or charletons, and she does indeed convince you she is the real thing by her genuineness and honesty.I was particularly helped by her teaching that we have the intuition and insight to make our own judgements and should not give away our power to others (be unduly influenced by family and friends). We must take responsibility for our own lives and not expect others to take care of us.Sonia shows us that by working diligently, but at our own pace, we can indeed greatly expand our awareness.
Philip Hall likes me, I reckon maybe. I thought the book Philip hall likes me I Reckon maybe, Was the best book i've read this year.Why, well i really like the character Beth, she doesn't quite use proper languae .Beth uses the words yall an reckon and she is very facinating to read about .She likes a boy name philip hall.gets 3 dogs but has to give them up because she has a nose cold.but somethig else happpens in the book but your going to have to get the book an read for yourself
A comedy of great proportions. I don't know why I never knew about A Confederacy of Dunces when it was first published. But I just listened to it as an audiobook, and it was one of the most enjoyable books I've experienced in years.  The book is an impressive character study and commentary on New Orleans and the world in general in the early 1960's. Everyone of the characters in this story is so lifelike and beautifully crafted so that you feel these are people you know, not just characters in a book. The dialogue is pure genius.The protagonist, Ignatius J. Reilly, is hilarious as the big, intellectual slob who is always criticizing and pontificating at everyone from his mother to the people who are trying to buy hot dogs from him on the street. The Jones character is superb:  the super-wise and wisecracking, cynical down-and-out black man.  I loved them all:  Ignatius, his mother Irene, Mr. and Mrs. Levy, Patrolman Mancuso, Lana Lee, Darlene, Miss Annie.  Well, maybe not Myrna Minkoff and Miss Trixie so much.  But they all had a role to play. I simply didn't want the book to end; it was like losing your new-found friends.This is a book you don't want to miss.  Read it or better yet, buy it as the audiobook read by Barrett Whitener. You are in for a rare treat
A timely plea for restored intent. Contrary to the views espoused by the previous reviewer, Come to the Table is a felicitous call to imbue our time of communing around the "Lord's Table" with all that it was intended.Whilst I take issue with much of gallantknights review, in my assessment he correctly notes several things:* It is indeed a scholarly presentation, but it is far from unreadable and quite engaging at times* Much of Dr Hicks' points are indeed based on Old Testament precedent, and rightly so. Hicks' ably brings to bear the covenental symbolism Jesus purposefully  gives the Lord's Supper. From its relationship to the passover in particular, to the relationship between altar sacrifice and the ensuing table fellowship this book offers much insight into the desire of God for communion with and among His people.* Hicks' historical survey of meals in both the Old and the New Testaments is a highlight of the book and provides the structure for most of it. His exegesis of pertinent passages is accurate, as noted, but the discerning reader will struggle to find examples of ignoring context, inspite of gallantknight's warnings. I find it strange that he would list Hicks' treatment of Acts 2:46 as an example of denying context, when the author's exposition of this verse was based solely on the immediate context. Those who would deny a reference to the Lord's Supper in that particular verse must wrest it from the text to disallow the clear flow of thought and terminology found in verse 42.In this book Hicks' unapologetically  presents an image of the Lord's supper that stands in stark dissonance to the practice of most contemporary traditions. This in several ways is a brave move for someone with a heritage in the Restoration Movement, as it invites(?!) criticism like that from gallantknights. Motives impugned and monikers like "change-agent" cast... (What on earth is "change-agent language"???? It must have been too subtle for me to pick up!)The strength of this book lies not so much in uniqueness, (more and more scholars acknowledge the early practice of a fellowship-meal Lord's Supper) but in its call for a thorough rethink of firstly the theological foundation of the LS, it's purpose, and how that is reflected in our modern practice, if it is at all.Come to the Table is not without its weaknesses. Dr Hicks, I think, was quite aware of most of them when he penned the preface and detailed its purpose. Some more groundwork for the practice of the early church could have been detailed, but where that was light Hick's leaves a healthy bibliography for further study
Baby Nicky counts to ten . . and catnaps to lullabies. On behalf of the jazz cats in our home (a quartet), Baby Nicky deserves snuggles and pets for showing little ones how much fun counting to ten can be when it's lively and colorful. Nicky's sleek black coat and inquisitive yellow eyes look very cool with the lavender, pink, and aqua color scheme. His "mom" Carol Friedman helps him encourage kids to practice those numbers many times over through her irresistible book that's just their size. Baby Nicky meows, plays, jumps, peeps, hides, rides, slides, leads everyone into a circle to sing, steps out and swings, hops to the top, jams and be bops, skips, runs, and claps. And then, he's ready for a catnap to his favorite CD, Nicky's Jazz Lullabies (also available on Amazon). He and his young friends can drift off to warm and soothing ballads, musical nursery rhymes, and children's songs by some of the finest jazz artists ever. Baby Cat Nicky 123 lays all-important groundwork for Nicky the Jazz Cat's later learning adventures with some terrific jazz mentors, leading to his own success as a multi-instrumentalist and singer. After all, music is all about counting! This is a really innovative, well-woven concept for little ones, with delightful artwork, text, and music!It's purr-fect in every way!Warren (Chet, Lily, Maynard, and Ginger's dad)
An excellent read!!!. This was a very good book. When Jessica goes to visit her friends debt ridden inn in the Carribean, she is delighted to be there. But when her friend is found murdered{by a razor of course}, Her beautiful vacation is ruined. When she starts her own investigation, She turns up a side of the Carribean you never want to see, the dark side. That is a common trait with Jess, get snooping and find the dark side of people. But any-way, the only problem with this book is that it becomes obivous who commited the crime in the last five chapters. Even though, this still a great book
A must read for logically-challenged Liberals!. Unfortunately, the public school system of America has eradicated all courses relative to developing a student's ability to reason, and reason well.  Rhetoric,and the 'Socratic Method' were essential parts of a collegiate student's curriculum in medieval Europe, and the universities of America would not be remiss in re-introducing this dynamic type of verbal intercourse today
Reading Angel. Not a bad read for the dedicated Angel fan. I really enjoyed it. Some of the articles were a bit of a heavy read but entertaining. Worth reading
this is the best book in this area. I am certainly recommend to any body who is involved with basic design education in communication desig
An entertaining book. The book's too short, but it's good and has some really funny stuff.  Perhaps we can look forward to Volume 2 in the near future
Could have been broader. Nicely done.  It is difficullt to find good books that teach the virtues of faith without being heavy handed.  I would have liked a few more faith stories from non-Christian traditions.  My seven year old is enjoying it
Amazing taste!No dairy No more problem!. I really like to bake but since I developed allergy to dairy I was stumped. Then I read a recipe online at Yoga Journal written by Costigan and tried it. Simple to make, simply the best   cookie I ever ate (ginger orange crisps.) SO I bought the book and have been baking my way happily though it. The cornbread is amazing, the carrot cake the best, and the chocolate is the best I ever ate, dairy free or not.  Easy to follow recipes, easy to make, tips on how to work with natural ingredients and where to find them.  I am happy, my grilfriend is happy as I am the baker and cook and so are the friends who received this book from me for Xmas
A Must-Have, Inspiring  Resource!. When a friend gave me "Spiritual Literacy," I had no idea what a treasure I was holding in my hands.  I love this book so much, I have gifted many copies to other friends, and it is among my top favorite spiritual books in my permanent nightstand collection. No matter your religious faith, one cannot help but be deeply moved, inspired, enlightened and comforted by reading one short story or "reading" after another, being reminded that the sacred truly is in the every day and the ordinary. Every page is a full of the gifts of wisdom and pleasure.  "Spiritual Literacy" is a book I'll read and cherish throughout my entire life.  And, I'll continue to gift it to as many people as I can.  That's how wonderful it is
The binding's breaking . . . but this has nothing to do with the quality of the bookbinding, but rather the quality of the book itself.The New York Times Cook Book was one of the first cookbooks I owned. By now it has lost its bright purple cover, the outside has a few spots from over-zealous cooking aka the splat and sizzle method of cooking, and the binding shows wear-and-tear. I have the updated Joy of Cooking, but it doesn't compare to this classic.My book automatically opens to the picadillo recipe, which is just one of many recipes in this book that opened the door for me to other cuisines. From it, I discovered new ways to cook pasta and learned that there was life beyond spaghetti with meat sauce. Classic American recipes are covered as well so that you can cook the foods that you grew up on.The recipes are direct, not convoluted. You will not be spending hours in the kitchen on a single recipe it takes your family five minutes to consume. To steal the title from another book: it puts the joy back in cooking.This is the first book I turn to when I'm stumped for something to prepare for dinner and it seldom lets me down. When I'm looking for a gift for a young person setting up a new home, this is one I consider
I chose this book as a required reading for my seminar. I like this book because it is very interesting and informative. I began  reading it for pleasure, but by the time I was half way finished, I was  sure of its serious nature and had decided to adopt it as a required  reading in the seminar that I teach on the economic impact of  globalization.  The author succeeds in presenting the right mix of theory  and history with sufficient analysis. It is well researched and very well  organized. It should prove as interesting to the general reader as it is  informative for the academics. However, its treatment of classical  economists is far superior to the section dealing with contemporary  writeres on free trade. Hopefully, in the second edition the author will  remedy this shortcomeing
a great account. After seeing how  many reviews "Angela's Ashes" have, I was hesitating if I should add my own. At the end, I decided to do so, without reading the other reviews. Maybe I will repeat things already said, but I wanted to express my opinion because this book deserves all the good words it gets.Memoir is an increasingly popular type of prose - essentially, everyone feels they can write a memoir. And this is true, of course. The difficult thing, which not just anyone can achieve, is writing a good memoir, which would stand out of the crowd. Frank McCourt succeeded in this respect."Angela's Ashes" describe the the author's memories from his earliest years until he is nineteen. His family is central to the book, which starts when his parents, Angela and Malachy, meet, they live in Brooklyn, where Frank, his brother Malachy, the twins and the sister are born. Then it follows the family through the deaths of several children, the return to Ireland, the fight with objective difficulties as well as the personal faults, Frank's illnesses, observations, the life of the street children and poor people in Limerick, Frank's school years during the World War II, until his travel back to America. The family is, in a way, a typical Irish family with a curse of alcoholism hanging over it, with the history of Ireland present at every moment, with the respect for Irish tradition and Catholic church, with poverty and daily struggle. But despite the accurate descriptions of the shortcomings of his parents, and a great dose of bitterness and criticism, McCourt manages to show his affection towards them and leave the reader without doubt as to his love for both of them. The insights into the society, system and life of the community are very accurate and sharp as well.The book, written from a position of the child growing up, which is reflected in the language and imagery, evokes powerful emotions. So strong, that it brigs tears to the eyes and leaves the reader in wonder. There is, however, a fair share of humor especially later in the book, so everything is well balanced yet natural.The Pullitzer prize was, in this case, deserved. I heartily recommend "Angela's Ashes" and will definitely read (and review) "'Tis".
Excellent book, AND door stop. This book is really useful to have on hand, but it is HUGE for a nutshell book. I realize that they need every page to document the code it is just makes it hard to keep this book on the desk.  Over all I think the book could have used more examples on how to make the method calls rather than showing the methods and what they do.  Over all if you need a book that documents most of the java libraries this is an excellent choice, but don't expect to pick up this book if you have no programming experience and learn how to call these methods
People you really need to chill. Out all these reviews i read many people gave this book a bad review you really need to chill! Seroisly its just a book and I found it exciting and through every chapter it was  intresting. Like I can understand that she took Emily's horn and all and she had no control of herslef when she was in the spell!It was basically about the mages having a rock concert to benifent ravenswood and kara has booked two bands but one of the bands dont show up. This jhonny conrad knows alot about the mages and hangs around kara alot and doesnt seem so good. Later the mages banish him in a portal.the only thing that bugged me was when she took Emily's horn and how betraying she was to her friends so next time in the rest of the series I hope she won't be like that.
I'm workin' toward this house... Except, mine will be on the Indiana or Illinois coast of Lake Michigan.  I love Rachel Ashwell's frugal, classy style.  She gives you a truck load of inspiration and understands empowering people to design, no matter if they are wealthy or shopping in ritzy alleys or at estate sales for goods.  The results create sentimental elegance. If nothing else, you learn the power of white paint and good hard do it yourselfing.  This book takes you there and Rachel does an excellent job of pulling you into her home.  She leaves nothing out and the photographer deserves enormous credit.  Buy it or check it out at the library today
The twilight of an empire ends with the thunder of guns. Focusing on just two climactic years, 1913 - 1914, Frederic Morton recreates Vienna in all its splendor during the last days of the Austro-Hungarian Empire. The vibrant social, intellectual, and cultural life of Vienna is examined within the context of the seething nationalism of the Balkans, the Machiavellian intrigue among the political rulers of the European nations and Russia, and the human frailties of the seemingly larger-than-life national leaders, which assure that the twilight of the empire will eventually be overtaken by darkness.Rigorously selective in his choice of detail, Morton brings to life the varied activities of a broad cross-section of Viennese society, and reproduces the intellectual milieu which eventually leads to the rise of some of the most influential leaders of the twentieth century--Trotsky, Stalin, Adler, Freud, Jung, Lenin, Hitler, Tito, and a host of others, all of whom are part of Vienna life.Morton's seriousness of purpose and his scholarship are undeniable, yet his primary contribution here, it seems to me, is his ability to make historical personages come to life, to make the reader feel that they were real, breathing humans with both virtues and frailties, and not the cardboard characters one finds so often in history books. Vienna, as we see it here, has a real heart, albeit one that beats in 3/4 time.From the masquerades and balls held by all classes of society, to the revolutionary movements, innumerable newspapers and pamphlets, lively coffee houses, and seemingly endless games of political maneuvering, one feels the ferment and activity which must lead, eventually, to change. The liveliness of the city, as depicted here, is a visual and intellectual contrast to the formality and frailty of Emperor Franz Josef, making the twilight of his empire understandable and its demise inevitable. Even the empire's demise is stylish, however. According to Morton: As "The World War [came] to the city by the Danube, [it came] dressed as a ball. Tra-la...Hurrah!"  Mary Whipple
Great Reference!. This was an excellent reference for all levels of investors (new, novice &amp; seasoned). Even if you use a property manager to assist with your home(s), this book is an excellent tool. It creates a lot of tips and creative techniques. Especially, when screening tenants. As the Mr. Landlord states in his materials, make sure to check your state's laws to verify if changes to the certain forms are necessary. Once again this is excellent. Depending on how serious you are in this area of real estate you may want to order his CD of forms, in addition to this book
Excellent learning tool. Ferling does a good job in depicting the way of life for U.S. office-oriented colonists/citizens in the 1700's.  The relationship Adams and Jefferson had was also well described.  I felt the author had some bias but the book is still a "must read" for parities interested in the early U.S.,mannerisms of politicians at that time, and important personal/party battles
Deja Vu For Chandler Fans, Excellent for All. Chandler fans reading this book for the first time will have many "deja vu" moments. The book contains four of the twenty short stories written by Chandler in the 1930s that were warm ups for the seven novels that followed. Chandler wrote detective mystery stories, and became famous for seven novels and a number of Hollywood screen plays, mostly about crime and private detectives in the "film noir" genre of Hollywood black and white films, or what is called LA "pulp fiction". Far from being an ordinary writer of cheap crime stories, Chandler became one of America's best writers from the mid 20th century.Chandler was a Los Angeles accountant turned writer and he developed his own careful writing style. He started by first analysing other works, such as articles in the Black Mask mystery magazine. He used those stories plus local newspaper crime articles for plot ideas. He would set some of his stories in the fictional ocean side town of Bay City which is really Santa Monica, or set his stories in west Los Angeles, or other parts of southern California. He lived in Santa Monica after being fired from his oil executive job for drinking in the 1930s. He detested the place and moved into LA proper when he became wealthy as a screenplay writer in the early 1940s while working at Paramount. In the late 1940s he moved to La Jolla, just north of San Diego. Chandler started with short fiction pieces in the 1930s and then graduated to novels in 1938-39. From the early novels he was hired to write screen plays and eventually he wrote or created 59 works including stories, screenplays, and novels. His novels with the private Detective Phillip Marlowe brought him fame including the Bogart-Bacall movie The Big Sleep.This book contains four short stories each about 50 to 60 pages long from the 1930s. These are a warm ups to his seven novels and screenplays that followed. There are plot elements and prose that are almost a duplicate of some of the later novels. For example, the second story Finger Man has scenes and references that are almost directly inserted into The Big Sleep (1939) and Farwewell, My Lovely (1940). For Chandler lovers like myself, it is like eating chocolates to go back and be able to read these early works. Also Chandler has a four page introduction where he makes a number of comments on his writing style and philosophy at the front of the book. Trouble is my Business is the first of the four short stories.His career did not take off until after he had written three or four novels and started to do screenplays in the mid-1940s. He was lucky in that he was able to write the screenplays and make a lot of money. He became famous for the screenplays, but simultaneously, he rose to further fame by the growth in popularity of paperback books in the 1940s. As a result, millions of his Philip Marlowe detective novels were sold and after just a few years he had moved from a run down flat in Santa Monica to a large house with an ocean view beside the Kellog family in La Jolla. He is now recognised as one of America's best writers from the 1930s through 1940s era. If you get a chance, have a look at the movie Double Indemnity, where Chandler co-wrote the screenplay with Billy Wilder at Paramount - his first attempt at this type of writing - and he and Wilder were nominated for an Oscar but they did not win. I think that is an excellent film, and it is generally regarded as one of the best films of the period.His technique was to pull old stories apart, then change them, then re-write them as short stories, and then take that work and extend it, modify it again a second or third time or even more, and finally put together complete novels. He would take six months to write a short story - as found in the present collection, while some other mystery writers wrote a complete novel in a week - by dictation. He was not big on plots, but more of a craftsman on the individual scenes and the prose, especially descriptions of the people. He said that it took him two years to write a short description of a person getting up from a table and walking out of a room. So there is a high level of refinement and a certain style that he was able to develop as a result of this writing process. This technique is not new. Shakespeare himself used this technique in virtually every play, taking old myths, stories, and historical accounts such as King Lear. He would break them apart, change them, and make new works with new twists, turns, and addnew characters; his last play The Tempest is his thought to be his only completely original play. Chandler used to joke that if Shakespeare was alive, he would be a Hollywood writer. Chandler is a little more obvious in that some of the prose in the seven novels are almost lifted from the early works - in part because Chandler wrote only one half page increments at a time, and kept those half page writings on file to use as source materials for later works. His aim was to make each segment as complate as possible, but some of his early short stories are similar to and have almost identical names to the full novels.In any case, this is a book that is not to be missed by Chandler fans and it is simply excellent for anyone else
An important work. Lillian Faderman has written some of the best works on the lesbian experience throughout the ages, and &quot;Odd Girls and Twilight Lovers&quot; is no exception. She covers every facet of the subculture from the turn of the 20th century to the present day with impeccable scholarship, and her writing is engaging and highly readable. She examines everything from 1950's butch/femme, 70's lesbian feminism, and the resurgence of trendy &quot;lipstick lesbians&quot; with equal attention. This book is a must-have for every queer library, and is an important contribution to the cause of lesbian visiblity
Legal Terms Defined in Everyday Language. This book defines legal terms in easily understood English.  In some cases, it gives an example of a situation to which the legal term might apply in order to help illustrate the meaning.  It would be a very useful addition to anyone's reference library
"I haven't laughed so much over anything since the hogs ate my kid brother.". When a Continental Detective Agency operative arrives in Personville, he little realizes what he's walking into. His employer turns up dead, before the op can even meet with him, so he starts looking into the death. It seems that the deceased, crusading newspaper publisher Donald Willsson, wanted to see Personville (Poisonville, as it's known to anyone familiar with the crooked town) cleaned up. There's two ways to clean up a town, you can go Don Willsson's way, and try to handle everything all legally and above board - and that got him killed. Or, you can turn the bad guys against each other, and let them clean up each other. This Continental op is no push over, and when he wants a job done, he wants it done thoroughly. So before he knows it, he's up to his neck in murder and mayhem!I love detective stories, and read them all the time. But, Dashiell Hammett is not your everyday mystery writer; he's the originator of the hardboiled detective story. Sherlock Holmes? Hercule Poirot? Jessica Fletcher? Forget it, those birds wouldn't last ten minutes in Poisonville!This is a great story of murder without conscience, and violence without compunction. This story was first published in 1929, and it is a great story. I love the characters, and the way that they interact. But, even better is the dialogue, including the quote above!Overall, I think that this is a great story. If you like tough, two-fisted crime fiction, then this is the book for you. It's a great book by the king of his genre!
Raymond at Ashley River El. I gave this book five stars because I think the illustrations are interesting.My favorite letter is F which stands for Fabrosauraus. I like it because it is well illustrated even though Ralph does not know what dinosaurs looked like.I like learning the dinosaur's names.Jerry Pallotta did a good job getting facts. The only bad part is having to pronounce the names.   I also think T should be for T-rex so all the T-rex fans out there
Yea!  Good Book!. I really liked this book.  It was funny and well-written and all those things that you like in a book.  However, all of the reviews I read of this book said that Mary Anne was to blame, but I think Dawn was a little, too.  What I mean is, she wasn't very sympathetic to Mary Anne. Poor Mary Anne was moving into a brand-new house with a new family-a whole new lifestyle. And even though she had wanted to live with Dawn and wanted their parents to marry, any big change is hard.  I wish Dawn had seen that.  Oh, well. GREAT book!  Perfect for a funny read
Great Biker Techniques. These street riding skills will make you a better rider by explaining how to let science work for you.  Have fun and hit the streets
Great Information for Online promotion. Hi. I am a REALTOR in the FL keys with 3 web sites. I found the information in this book very helpful. It pointed out very specific ways to promote a site and also provided good sources for backup.It is hard to find material these days like this that really point out ways to promote yourself online that really work
My all time favorite book!. Though the book was written in 1974, but it seems it is written in 90s. The notation, proofs and typesetting are quite update. The cross refrences are excellent. The theorems are given in quite the genearlity way, though  not boring, the proves are very exact, for example mentioning where the  axiom of choice is used ETC. This is a book i can not imagine how the  writer started to write it. It is very consistant!!
The Founding Brothers by Joseph Ellis. This work sheds light on our Founding Fathers by discussing earlyhistorical events in more detail. For instance, Benjamin Franklintried to force Congress to confront slavery- head on. Our earlylawmakers were at a loss to figure out how slaves would be integrated into the economy and the broader society once freed.Alexander Hamilton foresaw a scenario; wherein, the federalgovernment would triumph over the states.Alternatively, the Union itself could dissolve into fractious parties- each with a parochial self interest to uphold.The 1790 census counted 3.1MM whites and a total of 3.9MM people.President George Washington pre-announced his retirement on9-19-1796 in the American Daily Advertiser. In his Farewell,President Washington believed that individual interests should besubordinated to further a much greater common cause.Essentially, President Washington's support for the Jay Treatymade him unelectable in 1796. Jefferson was critized for failingto prepare for the War of 1812. This book has a wealth ofknowledge on our early history and civics. It will be an important enhancement to American History texts everywhere
Reflections in a Golden Eye Review. The main character in this story is Private Ellgae Williams.  It is set in an Army Post.  Private Ellgae Williams is a shy but determined young man.  He is very dedicated to the army and his assigned work.  Even when not on duty the private likes to hang around the post.  The antagonists in this story are Captain Penderton and his wife.  Captain Penderton is a very hostile man.  He comes off as a strong man, but in reality he is very weak.  He is a coward in many ways, he never stood up for himself especially to his wife.  Mrs. Penderton isn't a modest person at all.  She is the strong person in the family and takes advantage of that in every way.  She is the kind of person that runs around on her spouse and doesn't even think twice about it. Carson McCullers used flashbacks in this book as well as metaphors.  She portrayed real problems that happen in real life.  McCullers did a very good job on this piece of work.  The way she described the characters, I could picture each one, vividly.  McCullers did a very good job at proving that the world was not only all about the "American Dream" and the people's goals toward that, but also the ones that rebelled and were not afraid to do the unusual.   If you like books with twists and turns from the usual plots then you will enjoy this book as much as I did
Online Dating Story. Ok, this book was difficult for me to rate.  I loved the book itself...it's a great read and gives tons of good advice if you're looking to meet someone online.However, I took the book's advice and ended up meeting someone online (so it DOES work).  I met this guy on a site called catch27.com, and he seemed really awesome when I chatted with him online and talked with him on the phone.  BUT, when we met in person, he was terrible!  Rude, loud, and obnoxious...the date was just aweful!Now I understand that this was just one experience, but it's made me question the idea of meeting people online - you can never be sure of what you're going to get.  So, while the book is a wonderful and interesting read, make sure you're really ready to meet someone online before you take any of its advice
O'Rourke mocks at - just about everything. In this book O'Rourke is his usual savagely funny self as he gives his views on politics, welfare, medicare, republicans, democrats, the Clintons, Monica Lewinsky and life in general.  He is particulalry funny when demolishing Hillary Clinton's book 'It Takes a Village' and another bizarre book, apparently a handbook of politically correct language (this book sounded so totally weird, I wasn't sure that he didn't invent it as a joke).  His piece about India is particlarly good, nobody else writes about foreign parts as well as O'Rourke.  Occasionaly I found myself getting irritated, as when he gets all Michael Moore-ish about women, going on about how intelligent, efficient, competent, and generally more adult and better than men they are.  I hate this.  Not being at all efficient, competent and adult myself, I find myself deeply loathing Mrs O'Rourke and all thoise other smartallick women who are so different from me.  He's at it again later in the book when he's on about women being wonderful with children etc.  Crikey, all these female paragons he seems to know make me tired. And it startles me a bit to find that he doesn't believe that Elian's father had any right to have his son returned to him, as a father himself I would have expected him to be more sympathetic to father's rights. However, in general this is a very funny book (his comparisons between Venice, Italy, and Venice, Las Vegas, had me in stitches, likewise his experiments with wine-tasting).His most profound comment in the book is &quot;the difference between having one child and having two, is like the difference between keeping a dog and running a zoo&quot;  That is SO true. And his wife is probably not as tiresome in real life as she seems to be in this book.  Very funny
Best Non-required reading. The book arrived in a timely manner and was just as advertised.  I also really enjoyed reading it
A trip with Led Zep. Amazing pics, rich and in deep text. It's a trip back in time to meet the band and follow them across the time.Some pictures (fitting 2 pages) say more than 1,000 words.It's complete, very well printed and perfect sized.Every Led Zeppelin fan (or not) will find a very nice reading (mainly with Zep songs playing background...)
A fascinating book and great fun to read. Over 200 pages of diverse types of puzzles, divided into chapters of similar types of questions, with a humorous, lengthy and explicit solution to each. The author's claim that one need have no more than school certificate mathematical knowledge to be able to tackle these problems is totally beyond me. Apart from a few simple problems at the beginning they get progressively more and more complicated.That being so, the clear and detailed explanations might well be sufficient for anyone with even a modicum of ability to think logically. I personally was unable to understand the vast majority of the problems or their explanations, but don't let that put you off. I was a mathematical failure at school, and probably not who this book was intended for.Nevertheless, I loved the book immensely and would absolutely and wholeheartedly recommend it. It also contains excursions into all kinds of diverse topics, and especially, a lengthy and fascinating history of the arithmetical, astronomical and religious considerations that make up the calculation of the date of Easter.Delightful and mind-expanding, thoroughly recommended
a must for any fanatic. that's exactly what stewart o'nan and steven king are.   fanatics.   there are some criticisms out there that stewart's sections of the book are childish/mud-slinging.   that's true, sure.   but there's no denying that o'nan is a fanatic and has all his heart into the sox.   all of it.   batting practice, autographs collecting various memorbilia.   he follows the sox the same way a child does.   there's something to be said regarding that, and perhaps that's why baseball is america's part time.   men and children alike enjoy it on the same level.   stewarts accounts are analytical regarding each games highlights and lowlights.i found steven king's writing to be less clinical and more insightful/artistic.   personally, i related to steven's sections better because i don't try to get to every game possible yet watch it on TV like it's religious evangelism.i only recommend this book to a certain type of person.   one who loves the red sox or one who loves the pure sport of baseball.   reading this book for me was re-living the entire 2004 sox season.   it was particularly fun when i got to games in the book in which i was in attendance.   and like the baseball season, there are dog days of this book.   reading through at points it feels like the marathon that one baseball season is.   as a sox fan, reading this book, the payoff is so much fun reliving
worth a look. This book is definitely full of stereotypes and sweeping generalizations.  However, that does not negate the value of this study.  There is a lot of useful information about controlling and understanding crowd behavior here
Absolutely MUST READ for EVERY PERSON in first world!! MUST!. This is my #1 book recommendation!  Mind-blowing! Expose on the corrupt,  IMF/WorldBank/Ex-Im/multinational corporation/defence industry led ABUSE of environment and indiginous peoples world-wide.  A MUST! for every single person in US and Europe, First World
Excellent description of angels. This book thoroughly covers all the levels of angels and what they do. Leaves no unanswered questions
Still the best. This is the definitive collection of non sleight-of-hand (you don't have to be quick with your hands) card tricks. I bought my first paperback copy in 1974 when I was still a schoolboy. Some of the tricks are easy but astounding, such that I've memorised two of them and have amazed my friends over the years until now. Since then, there hasn't been any other card trick manual that can beat this one, to the best of my knowledge
Classic, must have for DC fans and even those that are not. Great story, even better art by a true master. The art by George Perez is truly fantastic. No need to go into the story since most reviews will give you that, just know that if youre a DC fan or just want to read a great story with great art then read "Crisis
Diane Grindol has done it again!. Diane Grindol has done it again!  Another great book with great information that everyone who lives with a parrot should have in their book collection.  In easy to understand language, Diane explains Dr. Irene Pepperberg's model/rival technique for teaching parrots.  This book isn't just for people that want to teach their bird to talk, its for every parrot owner
A good introduction to Darwin and animal rights. I read this a year and a half ago in Vicenza, Italy. It is an excellent introduction to Darwin and animal rights. Rachels makes you feel that he knows his history of whatever he writes about. His book on Euthanasia is  also good
This is a keeper. This is a book that will withstand all time.  This was one of my favorite books to read to my son when he was just a baby.  He's now 24.  I purchased another copy as a gift for my 9 month old newphew.  It's a wonderful way of telling your son that you love him forever unconditionally.  It's a must have or must give book for all babies
Fabulously Entertaining Romantic Comedy. This is one of the most entertaining books I've ever read. Especially if like me, you are a New York theatre fan. It starts off a little clumsily, but once it catches some momentum, it hurtles forward with sharply drawn scenes that will often make you laugh out loud, sometimes just from the sheer cleverness of the writing. There's more than a little wisdom in Bram's story about love and relationships in contemporary New York. A very satisfying tale of people finding their ways to each other. Highly recommended. And the "Ian McKellen" character is terrifically funny.
Finding and Buying Your Place in the Country. This is a must read for the professional and novice country real estate buyer. We purchased Finding and Buying Your Place in the Country in 1974 and have used it as our source of valuable information since then.  Though the cover is now a bit tattered and dated, the book has a prominent place on our bookshelf. It was this book that caused us to look realistically at a piece of property and to put emotion aside.  We can honestly say that the book saved us from making purchasing mistakes that would have been financially devastating back when we had very little money.  This had to do with investigating access to landlocked property. It looked like a good deal until we found we couldn't legally get to the property without going through a lengthy and costly court fight. We have purchased over 50 pieces of rural property and have used the book as a primer for each purchase. The book's contents prompt us to think out of the box and to question those things that seem to be appropriate on their face, but may have underlying problems.  We suppose it's time to buy the newest revision, however, we have scrawled notes on the pages of the old book and that provides a 30-year history of the deals we have completed.  It would be like getting rid of an old friend.  Final note- we were prompted to take that step of living a life rather than making a living after reading the book for the first time. It gave us the confidence that 20-year olds typically lack. Thanks to the Scher's for making our lives better. We wake up every morning to the sounds of a waterfall in the stream that meanders down to our own private lake. Our dreams came true due, in no small part, to Finding and Buying Your Place in the Country
A Must-Read Book for Parents & Children. I actually purchased "The Children's Book of Heroes" to give as a gift, but decided to go ahead & read it before passing it on - and I have to say that I'm really glad I did!  This is a beautifully written & illustrated book that includes various poems & short stories about many different kinds of heroes - from knights to mother's & everything in between.Overall, I would highly recommend "The Children's Book of Heroes" to all parents & children.  It serves as a wonderful reminder of the importance of keeping your word, helping other's, being brave, and much, much more.
Desert Dessert. A great mystery or thriller is really about something else. Here Swain explores the mysteries of fatherhood from cradle to adulthood within the context of another primer on casino crime and the War against Terror.Jerry, Tony's son, has gone to Vegas to learn how to count cards at a shadowy school for cheats. Nick surmises that Tony's purpose was not only to help teach Jerry how to catch cheaters but to see how well he was able to resist the temptations of cheating. By all objective standards Jerry can't, falling in with a couple of Middle-Eastern card counters with more than larceny on their minds.Tony arrives in Vegas to teach three casino operators about a new Palm Pocket-like device called a Deadlock that can dramatically change the odds in the bettor's favor. Once there he becomes wrapped up in a new love interest as well as failing fortunes of Nick, whose Acropolis casino is rapidly heading for the dustbin of history. When Jerry's companions attract the attention of the FBI, the usually fast paced Swain slips into hyper drive. Then the tale rockets along to a thrilling climax in the desert suburbs.This series may well be the most important new arrival since Michael Connelly and Harry Bosch made their debut. It's pure pleasure from start to finish.
Murr on. Faced with impossible relativism, falsehood, the impossibly of truth, what can our reaction be? To laugh: the ludic as an alternative to the despair of nihilism. The discourse is hilarious, and at key moments when the action is most intense, and the characters are being most lead astray from their purposes, they are overcome by a hilarity and a hysteria which incapacitates them, and often the reader too...Read more from Murr on The Lectern:[...
My favorite part.... Tom Watson has surely created a fantastic book that will help the memory of one of the most successful tv sitcoms ever carry on. Seeing and reading all the unknown tidbits on some of my favorite epsidoes of I Love Lucy is  just grand!  Every I Love Lucy fan should own this book. What a great way  to make sure the memory of I Love Lucy and a wonderful actress, Lucille  Ball, stay with us as years go by! Take a ride through many all too funny  faces of Lucy
And research turns to wonder... I'm a rower in high school on the west coast, and you don't really hear much about rowing over here, since it's mostly an east coast sport. So when my history teacher started going over Thomas Eakins and showed a clip about him from a documentary with some examples of his rowing paintings, my attention was immediately captures. I decided to do my term paper on him, but I expected it to be a long and tedious process, judging from the book I got from the library (which looked plain, boring, and old), so I put it off 'till the last minute. I just picked up the book an hour ago for the first time and just got online to see if they had any copies of it ..., since it proved to be well-written and interesting (so you don't space out so much in the middle of paragraphs like I tend to), and because it led me to think about things that are important parts of learning and art and life, but nobody ever talks about. This book proved to be insightful and fascinating, and after only one chapter, I'm hooked on the subject! And to think I was dreading reading it
Does What It Promises. I HIGHLY recommend this book!!!I'm on Week 11 of the "Learn to Run 10K Walk/Run Program" and I couldn't be more pleased with the results. Before this book, I'd never run (willingly) or even remotely saw myself running in a race. In gym class I was always the last to finish the mile run, because I had to walk 60% of it. Now, with the help of this book, I'm scheduled to run a 10K at the end of Week 13, and I definitely feel like I'll be ready. To my great surprise, I've actually become a real runner! I can hardly believe it.This program is great, because it starts you off very slowly, leaving you always feeling like you could do more. You feel encouraged, because you're not wheezing and gasping for breath at the end of each workout, and you look forward to the next one because they are very do-able. The program ramps up at a couple spots, which was daunting to think about before-hand, but which wasn't that bad once I was out there doing the workouts.The key is to follow the program like it's a script. Don't deviate from it, and by all means, don't try to do more than is prescribed. The program, if followed religiously, will have you running a 10K in 13 weeks, with no injuries.Things you will need: two stopwatches (or else an ipod music playlist that's pre-timed to match the run/walk intervals); decent running shoes. That's it. Now get out there and start on the road to the new you
Life Application Bible. Wonderful Bible!  Lots of useful information!  Written in a language that is easy to understand.  I bought this for a new Christian and she thought it was easy to use and understand.  I would highly recommend this Bible.  It is very practical and has many helps to guide you in applying the passages to your life.
break through pain. the techniques let me move beyond the suffering by fully opening to the intensity of my fibromyalgia.
strong fourteenth century historical fiction. At twelve French Princess Isabella marries King Edward II of England.  As she matures, she agrees with the assessment of Parliament that her spouse is weak and easily manipulated even by a relatively young female though his preference is male.  When Parliament demands the monarch share the throne with the Earl of Winchester, Edward is ready to acquiesce, but Isabella objects.  She assumes her homosexually inclined pathetic (at least in her mind) husband is willing to co-rule because he is attracted to the Earl's offspring, Hugh.Tired of her husband's failures, Isabella through her lady-in-waiting Gwenith meets Welshman Baron Owain de Rhys who in turn introduces her to Lord Roger Mortimer held in the London Tower.  With the help of Owain and Gwenith, who hates Edward for slaughtering her family, she begins seeing the prisoner for sex and intrigue until she smuggles him out of the Tower and country to France where they complete their plot to overthrow Edward and place her son on the throne by 1326.Edith Felber provides a strong fourteenth century historical fiction tale that is filled with political intrigue but also has a somewhat biographical feel to the novel and a secondary romantic subplot (between the plotters) to anchor the fine story line.  Fans of the author, if they recognize that Ms. Felber is historical romance writer Edith Layton will appreciate this well written tale of the QUEEN OF SHADOWS whose son became Edward III.Harriet Klausner
Plain everyday wanting to write. I'm your plain everyday wanting to be writer. I found, 'On Writing' to be one of the best books I've read. Mr. King writes of his childhood and life in the first part of this book, then in the second half gives advice on how to write, which I have highlighted and marked up something awful. I was one of those teenagers he talks about in his book, that failed English in high school, and thought I was dumb, because of it. I did write as a child, only for myself, not like Mr. King who wrote for Dave's Rag. I loved the parts that spoke of his and his brothers dreams, escapades, or just having fun growing up. It brought back memories of me and my brother. I've read a few books by King, but I find I loved this one the most. I'm one of the older crowd, five years older then Mr. King. I wish he would write more books on plain everyday life, as he lived with his brother and mother, for me and others out there who don't want to read murder, mystery, etc. I'm not saying I didn't like Misery, because I did. I guess now in my elder years I'm just looking for a little less anxiety. I guess I'm what you call "old" and want to think of the world as a loving place and nothing more. I know I'm just dreaming about loving your neighbor, but I "do" believe that people are out there to love one another. I tried my hand at self publishing a book named, "Fears Flutterby", maybe if Mr. King reads this he can give me some tips.
A SW Basics Must Have!. This book is more comprehensive than any I've ever come across. Moving from Boston a few months back-- my partner has already exclaimed, &quot;You cook like you've lived here all your life!&quot; Good, solid recipes, no hype. Bene
Any Ved Mehta book is wonderful, this is not his best. Ved Mehta is my favorite writer. I've bought nearly all his books, even old ones out of print that I've found through Amazon.  Ved Mehta's endearing personality and superb writing style make an irresistable  combination.  Having said that, I must also say that Remembering Mr.  Shawn's New Yorker is the Mehta book I like least. It is the latest volume  in Ved Mehta's autobiography, but it reveals too little about Mr. Mehta and  redundantly much about Mr. Shawn. It tells more about the New Yorker than I  really care to know, although I have been a New Yorker fan for years.  Perhaps this book simply lacks the editorial guidance Mr. Shawn gave to  Mehta's previous books. On the other hand, an unexpected gift I found in  Remembering Mr. Shawn's New Yorker is an explanation of the background  behind other Mehta books written while Mehta was on the New Yorker staff. I  do recommend that all Mehta and New Yorker fans read this book, but don't  set your expectations too high
Turner's "Frontier Thesis" Unfiltered. This is a very useful collection of ten essays by University of Wisconsin/Harvard University historian Frederick Jackson Turner written through out his career. Edited and introduced by John Mack Faragher, this book is a very fine entre point to the thought of Turner. The first of the essays published here is Turner's seminal work, "The Significance of the Frontier in American History," an essay that defined a whole field of research. Read at the 1893 annual meeting of the American Historical Association in Chicago, this paper has exerted an enormously powerful force on the historiography of the United States, in no small measure because of its powerful statement of American exceptionalism. Turner took as his cue an observation in the 1890 U.S. census that the American frontier had for the first time closed. He noted, "Up to our own day American history has been in a large degree the history of the colonization of the Great West. The existence of an area of free land, its continuous recession, and the advance of American settlement westward explain American development."Turner insisted that the frontier made Americans American, gave the nation its democratic character, and ensured the virtues of self-reliance, community, egalitarianism, and the promise of justice. He noted that cheap or even free land provided a "safety valve" that protected the nation against uprisings of the poverty-stricken and malcontented. The frontier also produced a people with "coarseness and strength...acuteness and inquisitiveness, that practical and inventive turn of mind...[full of] restless and nervous energy...that buoyancy and exuberance which comes with freedom." It gave the people of the United States, in essence, virtually every positive quality they have ever possessed.Despite criticisms, through at least the 1950s vision of the frontier reigned supreme as an underlying definer of American character. It conjured up an image of self-reliant Americans moving westward in sweeping waves of discovery, exploration, conquest, and settlement of an "untamed wilderness." And in the process of movement, the Europeans who settled North America became an indigenous American people. In Turner's characterization, the frontier concept has always carried with it the ideals of optimism, democracy, and meritocracy. It also summoned in the popular mind a wide range of vivid and memorable tales of heroism, each a morally justified step toward the modern democratic state. The popular conception of "westering" and the settlement of the American continent by Europeans has been a powerful metaphor for the uniqueness of America in the twentieth century.As explained in Faragher's introduction, in the latter half of the twentieth century historians increasingly questioned Turner's frontier ideal, arguing that it reduced the complexity of events to a relatively static morality play, avoided matters that challenged or contradicted the myth, viewed Americans moving westward as inherently good and their opponents as evil, and ignored the cultural context of westward migration. They determined that Turner's "Frontier Thesis" was excessively ethnocentric, nationalistic, and somewhat jingoistic. His rhetoric excluded more than it covered, moreover, failing to do justice to diverse western people and events.In addition to the title essay, this excellent collection of the essays of Frederick Jackson Turner includes such articles as "Social Forces in American History," "The Western and American Ideals," and "The Significance of Sections in American History."This is an indispensable source for the thinking of Frederick Jackson Turner and his influence on thinking about the history of the American West
An outstanding historical business doccumentary. Explore the personalities, events, deals, and ordeals, that Coke has endured over the years.  From the morphene adicted doctor who created the tonic to the modern day financial and brand building wizards, this book  covers Coke in a way no other book does.  The author, Mark Pendergrast, has  many ties to Atlanta, and some of the historic figures in the book.  This  history combined with his research in to the company provies for a  fantastic, presumably 100% factual doccumentary, chronicaling the history  of one of the worlds most well nown companies
Great for a beginner like me. This cookbook is great!  It has all the information you will need if you are just starting to enjoy cooking like I am.  From the different cuts of meat to measurements, it has all the info you need.  Highly suggested!!
Piercy knocks me over. Piercy writes poetry that will touch all of your emotions.  Beprepared to get angry, laugh out loud, and maybe cry.  Writing aboutevery aspect of life, we learn about her love of nature, writing, herintimates, and her cats.  The only thing better than Piercy's collections of poetry is hearing her read her work aloud.  This collection is a gift to her readers
Fascinating Connection between Thought and Health. Why do spontaneous remissions occur? Why do you feel terrible when depressed? What is actually controlling your health? Why do you feel so good when "in love" or when you feel loved?In this groundbreaking lecture Bruce H. Lipton, Ph.D. explores the reason why our beliefs influence our health. Can changing your mind change the way your body responds to illness? He also explores epigenetics, the gap between quantum mechanics and biology, the chemistry of stress, the healing force of love, the immune system and a variety of emotional states.If you watched "What the `Bleep' do We Know" and you had more questions, Dr. Bruce H. Lipton provides a deeper understanding of the fascinating connection between how we think and the state of our health. On this three CD set he explores:The Central Dogma of BiologyThe Human Genome ProjectProteins and the Nature of LifeThe 3 Sources of Biological DysfunctionThe Function of the Cell MembraneHow the Cell Controls BehaviorHow Perception Influences BehaviorLove and FearPerception and the Immune SystemConscious and Subconscious behaviorsThe Importance of Fetal EnvironmentChildhood Brain DevelopmentChanging your Subconscious ProgrammingFreeing Yourself from the PastIt only takes a few observations in your own life to convince you that love heals and fear and hate destroy. Look at how you feel when experiencing a variety of emotions, take notes or write a journal. Soon, you will start to desire much more peace, love and emotional connection as you realize you can literally destroy yourself "physically" with negative thoughts. We need the right foods, nutrients and supplements too, but learning to think positively helps to balance out all your efforts."The New Biology of Belief" is one of the next steps in human understanding where we take full charge of our health by learning how to think in ways that encourage health. This empowering 3-CD set captures a variety of spiritual and medical ideas and condenses them into a workable theory for advanced health and well-being.Highly Recommended!~The Rebecca Review
Pretty Good. This was a good read Koontz's vesion of the contiunation of The Frankenstein Classic Book 3 is not due out till the end of 2007 that is a disapointment He has The Odd Series as well that he is writing this guy those not have writers bloc
GREAT BOOK~. If ur looking for a G-R-E-A-T book to read thats scandalous, sexy, and sarcastically funny... then this is it! I couldnt put the book down until I finished it! I felt like I was in it struggling with the main character as she told me her latest gossip. Best book I've read in a long time, but I'm also a young women who wished she could be as confident and sexy as the main character! You have to read it... even if it is the "pool book" to read as u get a nice tan
A good ADJUNCT to Orgo. Just like Chemistry for Dummies, this text covers all of first semester Orgo 1, scratches the surface of the beginning of semester two, and thats it.Of course, its not going to cover everything, or it would be a textbook, but it covers the 'need to know' topics, and explains them well.This is a great adjunct to the text and course.  To be honest, it really didn't make any sense until I had taken the course and learned what I was reading.This has great information that your prof. may have left out, And/Or it usually has a different way of explaining something, which may help or enforce what you've already learned.For example:  The Diels Alder reactions... in my Orgo class, we had a 1/2 page section on it in our notes, did 1 'practice problem', and were told to, "make sure you know this for the test".  This book definately saved me here, with a thourough explanation of how, why, what to do, etc. I fully understood the reaction (I read it before class , but none of it made any sence, but going to class turns on the 'light bulb' and reading it before class is a great way to make learning orgo I much easier).There are a few other adjuncts out there that may help, the standard deviants 3 vhs set, "the deep fried world of organic chemistry" may be helpful.Have fun in class
Excellent. I just finished reading Friedman's book and feel it is a must read for anyone interested in understanding the rapid changes effecting our world
A Good Kids Book. Hop on Pop is a cute and funny book that any kid would love. Allmost every word in this book rhymes and I like how they put two words like red ted ted is red and then swich it around. it has alot of little words in it like ned, red, pat, sat and so on. This book is the best book to by for kids that are starting to read
Must read for sales managers with new sales people. If you are developing fresh talent, then you need to have this book. I have used this in countless lesson plans when teaching my people the fundamentals of selling. This is as close to "required reading" as you will find.Gitomer is the ultimate sales guru because he keeps things simple. He doesn't teach how to sell, he teaches you how to show value so people will buy.Bible is for beginners in many ways so if you've been around the block enough to know the way, skip this one and grab one of his Red books or the Patterson Principles. They are for the more experienced sales professional
legends. i was giving this book as a gift from a dear friend and was so overwhelmed with joy after reading i just had to write a review this is a book that honored so  many great woman. it will leave you with the feelin that you can accomplish everything in life you ever dreamed of, this is a book for ever booklover library.
A historical treasure. I teach fire history and I found the book to be an invaluable resource highlighting one of Americas worst tragedies. I would highly recommend it for both those with a passion for history and for fire buffs
Iverson is tough. I respect how Hard Allen Iverson the Player plays.I also Respect Allen Iverson the Person for what He has had to overcome.though He plays in a Very Tough Profession nothing Compares to His Upbringing&Surroundings&the many things He has Endured&gone through.The Man is Tough On&Off the Court
A truly unforgettable visual presentation of a sad event in American history. Earthquake Days: The 1906 San Francisco Earthquake & Fire in 3-D is an impressive photographic spectacle about the historic San Francisco Earthquake and is quite like no other treatment of the subject. The vintage black-and-white photographs have been treated so that they appear in 3-D with the aid of the accompanying viewer! The photographs are quite vivid to the naked eye as well, and the accompanying text by California-born historian David Burkhart recounts the historical debacle captured in the tragic images. In addition to the photographs of the city's devastation, Earthquake Days includes vintage newspaper clippings, sketches, cartoons, and the like concerning the disaster. A truly unforgettable visual presentation of a sad event in American history.
Best choice EVER for Holiday Gift Giving, Bar/Bat Mitzvah, etc... You found it !!! The absolute perfect gift for everyone on your list. Alotta bang for your buck. You could knock a ganglian cyst from here to tomorrow with this baby. Beautifully bound, this is one hefty book filled with stunning images and brilliant writing. Bar Mitzvah Disco would be the star goody in a 'Member of the Tribe Gift Basket' consisting of this book, the latest issue of Heeb Magazine, the LeeVees Hanukkah Rocks CD and of course The Hebrew Hammer DVD. Support Jewish Indie Pop Culture and order yours now!!!
World Championship History. I greatly enjoyed the book!  I found the year by year history of the world championship of no limit holdem facinating.  Benny Binion created a fantastic event!  It's wonderful to see how the event has grown over time from just a one table event, to probably 1000 players this year.  If you are looking for playing advice go elsewhere.  There are many other great how to play books available, but if you love poker and are interested in the history of it's biggest event then you will enjoy this
Forget Pluralism, says Mills; America is ruled by Elites. C. Wright Mills' landmark book from 1956 posits that the major decisions in America are made by a unified "power elite" rather a multiplicity of competing groups or citizens. The "power elite" are the top leaders of the major economic, political, and military organizations - the President & cabinet, senators, top lawyers, CEOs, business moguls, bankers & financiers, admirals, and so on.  They tend to share a common outlook, privileged upbringing, and similar values. They also tend to be conservative, practical men with good judgment, rather than men of ideas.These leaders move move easily between society's top command posts as economics, politics and the militiary become more interdependent. For example, Charles Wilson, president of General Motors, famously said, "What's good for the country is good for General Motors, and vice versa," He eventually became the secretary of the Department of Defense. It's this kind of mobility, along with the shared outlook of leaders in top posts, that creates a single-minded military-industrial-political complex -- not some kind of intentional conspiracy.The masses, in Mills' view, have little power and influence over decision-making.  They are passive spectators who take little independent action to directly influence policies, beyond voting occasionally. Furthermore, the elites can influence and manipulate the masses through public relations, propaganda, and irrational appeals via the mass media.Overall, this book was clearly argued and well written. Then, as now, its thesis chafes against the spirit of egalitarianism, pluralism and democracy in America. Also, some might go on to argue that since this book was published in 1956, things have changed -- consider the civil rights movement or ERA, both of which weren't initiated by the elites. Yet parts of Mill's analysis have stood the test of time. Presidents and Senators still tend to be much richer than the average American. Corporate CEOs and Generals move into and out of government (consider Dick Cheney, Colin Powel).  Citizens & workers don't get to vote directly on whether to invade a country, or to close a factory.Mills' book is certainly a famous one that every sociologist (armchair or otherwise) should read. So if you're interested in the structure of power in America, this book should be on your reading list.
Thought Provoking: A Germ's Point of View. Arno Karlen's attempt to chronicle the successes and failures of man's quest to survive in a world in which he is constantly battling with disease, results in an engaging and fairly easy to read book.  The author explains how man and microbes share the environments they have lived in throughout history on all parts of this planet.  This symbiotic coexistence has resulted in mutation, adaptation and even the destruction of sometimes man, sometimes microbe, and even sometimes both!  The author succeeds in  engaging the attention of the reader and keeping his or her interest from page to page. 	The author's method of presenting the challenges faced by many people in this world throughout history, and leading us up to the modern era, succeeds in engaging the reader from the very first chapter.  The opening account of the incipient yet monumental role that disease has played throughout the history of mankind, rivets the reader's attention.  He presents an account of the struggle for existence by not only the human race, but also by the millions of tiny organisms whose existence naturally pits them  against that of the existence of man.  Additionally, Mr. Karlen does a fairly decent job of explaining to the reader why certain microbes survived in what would appear to be "harsh" environments, while others succumbed to the elements in relatively mild ones.  He then leads the reader through the modern onslaught of infectious diseases such as tuberculosis, malaria and HIV\AIDS, and chronicles how man has fared in his fight against disease.  This helps the reader to understand the historical context of these events and how these tiny organisms essentially "shaped" the outcomes of  many significant events in world history. 	The author presents his main argument first by effectively painting a frightening  picture of today's reality of man's fight with microbes, followed by a detailed chronology of the historical battles between organism, the environment, and man.  The author then skillfully concludes with an implicit warning to us, which leaves a lasting effect of wondering when and where the next onslaught of infectious disease will appear.  The fact that the overall health of the world's population has improved over the past several centuries is cause for guarded optimism.  However, the author presents many examples throughout history where Mother Nature, sensing an imbalance between her natural resources and the inhabitants of this planet, has "leveled the playing field" by introducing an infectious disease that has resulted in a massive "die off" of humans (The Great Plague, Cholera Pandemics, etc). 	The author utilizes his expertise in pharmacology and biology to explain to the reader how researchers have been able to determine how people in the past lived and died.  Using such techniques as carbon dating and examining the human remains of mummified individuals, we have been able to determine that man's earliest ancestors had a life span of about forty, and suffered a harsh life riddled with hunting accidents and disease.  We have also learned how the lifestyle, diet and environment served as determinants of whether man would survive in a certain region or not.  Much has been learned from the refuse piles and discarded wastes that our ancestors left behind!   The old adage, which comes to mind, is "One man's garbage is another's treasure"!  Mr. Karlen explains this quite well and gives the reader avid examples. 	Man and Microbes is not only a "must" read for all health professionals and those aspiring to become one, but it is also for everyone who has the slightest bit of interest in the interaction between man and his environment.  The insights and perspectives that the author elicits in the reader cause one to truly catch what he terms "the medical school student disease": a subtle realization of how vulnerable we really are in our environment!  This is a fundamental book, which serves to educate not only the health professional, but the general public as well.  He does an excellent job in describing to the reader how vulnerable we currently are to the spread of influenza, or other infectious disease which we would be wholly susceptible to.  His use of historical events to forewarn us of the dangers we as a population currently face, is quite effective. A potential weakness of this book lies in the author's use of technical  terms and medical "jargon".  Although this reader understood his presentation, in the field of medicine infectious disease study it is very difficult to avoid highly technical terms and concepts.  His description of some of the disease pathologies in humans and animals and how they have evolved and adapted to their changing environments, was at times, entirely too difficult to comprehend.  Unless one already possesses a rudimentary knowledge of human anatomy and disease pathology, a reader may have to re-read certain sections for clarity, and even visit a medical dictionary to gain a better appreciation for what the author is try to communicate.  This book's main strength comes from its detail-rich accounting of those historical events in world epidemiological history such as the Black Death of the early 14th Century, the numerous Cholera Pandemics that have swept across the world, and the HIV/AIDS pandemic, which is currently wreaking havoc in places such as Sub-Saharan Africa, Asia and Latin America. Mr. Karlen appears to be an absolute subject matter expert in the field, and one who has "walked the walk" and not just "talked the talk."  He does an absolutely superb job in capturing the reader's attention and instilling in him the knowledge acquired through years of experience.  I highly recommend this book to anyone even remotely interested in the area of infectious disease, our environment, and challenges facing mankind in the future
CollegeHumor Loved it, Me Too!. Streeter and Sarah of CollegeHumor, both who I adore, said they loved this book, that it was the best dating book, I saw in the editorial, saw I read it.  They were right!  As they always are.  It is very funny and also very helpful, with lots of good advice.  You should especially read it if you are in college or even just in that age range
Best book on the subject that I've read. If you're looking for true insight into the development of Hong Kong cinema, be sure to check out this informative yet entertaining work. While some other books on HK cinema are all flash and recommend the same few titles over and over, this book looks far beyond the surface. I found myself reaching to re-read sections over and over after viewing different films, wanting to refresh my memory on the stories behing their directors, stars, and genres as a whole.Definitely recommended for those seriously interested in improving their appreciation of Hong Kong cinema
Awesome. Without question, the very best book I ever read.  You can not but it down nor can you stop thinking about it.  This is a POWERFUL book. You will be moved and your foundation shaken but your life will be richer.  This is a must read
Wodehouse at his best. This is a great, funny book.  It may be my favorite Jeeves & Wooster story
This is the most entertaining book I've read in a while. All I have to say is that i regret the fact that this is my first Jeffery Deaver book because this book is so fun and entertaining that I'm sold on Deaver and am looking to read the rest of his books. I read this book in two sittings because I simply could not put it down because I was so involved and really wanted/needed to know what was next. This story isn't about the reader trying to figure out who the antagonist is (you actually learn is identity pretty early) but is instead about the mind/computer games the good guys play with the bad guys and who will be one step ahead, and are they really ahead, or far behind? There are so many twists and turns in this book that you'll read it just as quickly as I did. I'm officially a Deaver fan now, and I recommend you pick up this book
IF ON AN AUTUMN DAY A TRAVELLER ... More than any other work, this mordantly funny satire reminded me of Italo Cavino's IF ON A WINTER'S NIGHT A TRAVELLER, which I read over 20 years ago and still resonates in me even more than things I've read more recently.  The episodic incidents, now ending now beginning, seemingly random but knitted together and well worth the effort.  The incredible visual sequencesm the MEMENTO-like jumps and "gaps," the easily recognizable characterizations and the befuddlement of the central character kept me reading and made me reluctant to close this book once I had finished
An exceptionally good find. In doing research on life in the United States and events leading to World War II, I stumbled upon this book.  The details and the varied information in this book leaves me thinking that Mr. Perrett's work is a marvelous achievement. I was between 8 and 12 during World War II, and no work I have seen better covers these war years on the homefront
Invaluable Resource. The author's approach to explaining the JavaScript technology is so versatile that both experienced and novice programmers alike will almost certainly appreciate this definitive guide
a radiant book to treasure and to share. Go out at once and buy this book for any animal lover who believes in the warm and giving spiritual life of their pets...which includes almost every animal lover you know. Jean Houston's remarkable life as teacher, mystic and cultural anthropologist has been shared since her early childhood by several sensitive dogs. She writes of each one with rapture. It is an intimate and sweet book, and deeply wise. I predict it will make its way steadily and surely through the book world and will be a favorite gift this season and those to come
I wish it would have been required in 1986!!!!. Being a non-traditional student, I needed this years ago.  This would have uncovered the mystery of College for me as a teenager and explained so much that College courses just do not offer to Freshmen. I will hand this down to my children and encourage any parent to purchase it for all High School Seniors
This book was very comforting in a time of extreme stress. Anyone who's ever moved can tell you that packing the boxes is only the tip of the iceberg.  I made a point of reading this book when my stress levels reached their peak --- and somehow it calmed me.  It seems every  fear I had about relocating to another area was discussed in a rational and  helpful manner.  The author had ideas on everything from helping your  children adjust to their new school to how to involve yourself in your new  community.  I found this book very helpful and would recommend this to  everyone
Goog book. I used this book for my Statics class and it has been one the best books I have read in college. Bedford & Fowler were able to make the subject easy to understand for any student without any immediate need for a calculus background.  The book teaches you all the fundamentals of Statics in a simple way and goes into a good variety of problems for the user to solve at the end of each section. My only complaint would probably lie in the Moment of Inertia chapter.  It gave good examples on how to find moment of inertia but failed to tell you its use.  I would still recommend this book as a class textbook
Not my favorite. This isn't her best work but even second best from Perry is better than most mystery authors.  I enjoyed it but was able to put it down which is usually not the case with her books
A Funfilled Journey through Rome. This was, in my opinion, one of the best Marcus Didius adventures.  Marcus's relationship with his father adds great humor to an already wonderful story
Great Advice for a Bad Situation. My mother is currently going thru chemotherapy and this book is incredibly helpful. Nancy Bruning, the author, is herself a breast cancer survivor and went thru chemotherapy."Coping With Chemotherapy" covers every physical symptom I have had to look up as well as the emotional aspects of cancer and chemo.  In the beginning of the book Bruning also provides information on the "basics" of how cancer and chemo work...WITHOUT using too much jargon.  And because Bruning has been thru this HERSELF, you know she's not blowing smoke up your butt.  Bottom line?  If you or a loved one are currently getting chemo or trying to find out about some options, this book is a refreshingly honest and caring help
Entertaining but beware this advice. This book was like Madonna's famous photographic book of 1992 when it hit the shelves in the 1960's. This is Brown's manifesto on the liberal lifestyle which was spawned in that era. Reader beware ... choices and actions have consequence ... and ponder very carefully before being Cosmopolitan long after the expiration date. Living it up does NOT mean reckless behavior. Values are personal but when one woman's values cause her to act in ways that impose the boundaries onto another (ie - affairs with married men) it is as much an imposition as bible thumping over others' heads. People are free to do what they want but if they go down a certain road they have no right to take unwilling others down the path with them. Although now dated and updated with Sex and the City - ask yourself if you really want to be wild your whole life. Retiring one lifestyle for something stable is a rather good thing when the time is right. Helen Gurley Brown has done alot of good for women pursuing careers, enjouing the single life, and having an identity ... but too much too long has a cost. Do you really want to be like Brown and her counterpart Hefner ... 80 years old and taking hormones in some attempt at youth?
I love the solution. This seems to be the least science-oriented of Verne's work.  The focus is on winning the bet, and all Fogg wants to do is complete the journey.  This of course leaves Passepartout dealing with all the complications they encounter.  I won't spoil the ending- but it's clever and memorable.
The art of historical fiction. Faced with a long and dreary winter?  'Empire' may be just the antidote.  Gore Vidal's 1987 epic makes for educational, if sometimes tedious, fireside reading.  'Empire' is a tough one to plow through in one sitting, let alone one month, but in the end it rewards the reader with an informative narration of turn-of-the-century America.  The fourth in Vidal's five-part series, 'Empire' features both historical and fictitious characters, who share the plot in equal dollops throughout the novel.  A cursory knowledge of early 20th-century American history -- McKinley, Roosevelt, Hay, etc. -- enhances the reading experience.  But even without this knowledge, the book is well worth the read.  The closing dialogue alone justifies the effort
A romp through food taboos. This book is an informal exploration of food taboos, from apples to potatoes, pig flesh to human flesh.  The book is organized into chapters featuring the seven deadly sins: lust, gluttony, pride, sloth, greed, blasphemy, and anger.  Each chapter is comprised of short informative articles related to the relevant sinful theme that describe the social history of a food taboo.  For example, in the chapter called "Lust," we learn how the apple came to be associated with Eve's forbidden fruit in the Garden of Eden.  Allen points out that apples were hardly common Middle Eastern fruit during Biblical times.  They were, however, sacred to the Celts, and when Christians came into Celtic territory, they demonized the sacred fruit of the Celts by translating the Biblical word for the forbidden fruit, one whose botanical identify is not known for sure, as "apple."  Allen states: "The Celts had associated apples with the glorious wisdom from the sun.  By the time the Christians were done, scholars had assigned it to `the jurisdiction of Venus' and lust."  Each chapter also includes several recipes featuring the foods under description. Some of the recipes are historical rather than in contemporary usage, but virtual all have been updated for modern kitchens and cooks.  Sources are cited in extensive textual endnotes.  There is also a bibliography and index.Taboos of all kinds are often closely related with religious beliefs.  Allen describes some common religious taboos relating to food, such as Jewish and Muslim avoidance of pork, and Hindu extreme reverence for cattle.  One interesting point that Allen makes is that Christ was blatant in his practice of disregarding Jewish food laws, establishing a religion that is remarkably free of food taboos.  Allen pokes fun at our modern diet practices, but he also makes some serious points, noting that "convenience foods are so unpleasant they make even work look good.  They're also immensely profitable for the corporations who produce them...American workers now pay more money for worse food so they can hurry back to jobs they hate."  In his conclusion, Allen observes "The point is that these archaic food taboos and rules, however preposterous and evil they may have at times been, also deepened our lives by imbuing our most common social gathering with meaning."Occasionally, Allen plays fast and loose with details.  For example, he has European peasants munching Macintoshes, but the Macintosh variety of apples was developed only in 1870 in New England.  He also misses some major taboos- -of course in a book of this nature, we can't expect him to cover everything related to the topic.  But when he describes garlic and religious injunctions against it, he never mentions avoidance by some Hindus of garlic and onions on the grounds that they are "intoxicating" or "over-stimulating".  Such an omission is surprising, given the other information he provides both about Indian traditions and garlic.  Allen's style of writing is informal--he writes to entertain as well as inform, making the book appeal to general readers rather than academic food historians.  Since this is a book about breaking taboos, readers shouldn't be too taken aback at the kinds of topics Allen choose to delve into, but they might not want to consider this a read-aloud book for the whole family if small children are to participate.
A fun way to really learn Adobe Premiere Elements. All of the effects in this book are interesting, and each is laid out in an easy to read fashion. First shown for each effect is a list of files you will need from the CD laid out in a box entitled "MEDIA". Next is a table with complexity, skill level, and materials labeling the rows. Within the row, what applies to this effect is labeled in bold print. Next is a box labeled "What You'll Do". This is a broad overview of the steps you will take to create the effect. This is followed by a few paragraphs of introduction that talk about the effect. The rest of the pages on each particular effect go into details on each step in the "What You'll Do" box. All the instructions are heavily illustrated with screenshots of the application so you can easily follow along. The final entry for each effect involves an image that shows what your film should look like if you performed the steps correctly. The effects mentioned are quite interesting and are as follows, with a chapter dedicated to each one:Chapter 1. The See-Through Title Effect - The film is given a title, and you can see a scaled version of the underlying film coloring the title.Chapter 2. The Retro Title Effect - Gives the opening and closing titles a 60's look.Chapter 3. The Star Wars Opening Sequence Effect - Gives opening credits that scroll like they did in Star Wars.Chapter 4. The Passing of Time Effect - Emulate the passing in time by deleting frames and using "dissolves".Chapter 5. The Fast Times Effect - Shows the world rushing by your subject as he or she moves in normal time, thereby communicating a world of information about the character and story.Chapter 6. The Reverse Action Effect - Film motion goes in reverse.Chapter 7. The Pencil Sketch Effect - Your film looks like it was sketched with a pencil, like Photoshop.Chapter 8. The Watercolor Painting Effect - Make the film appear as painted by watercolor, like Photoshop.Chapter 9. The Faded Film Effect - Use dust, scratches, and faded color to make your film look old.Chapter 10. The Nightly News Effect - Adds titles, graphics, and logos to make your film look like a newscast.Chapter 11. The "24" Effect - The picture-in-picture effect popular on the show "24".Chapter 12. The Beam Me Up Effect - Simulates the transporter effect popular on Star Trek.Chapter 13. The Night Vision Effect - Makes your film look like it's being viewed through night-vision goggles.Chapter 14. The Hidden Identity Effect - "Pixelizes" certain areas on the screen to hide the identities of people as is done on crime shows.Chapter 15. The Bleeping Effect - A pure sound effect that puts a bleeping sound where speech should be.Chapter 16. The Enchanted Elf Effect - Shows you how to shrink and add color to someone and place them in a video so they appear to be an elf of some kind.Chapter 17. The Friendly Ghost Effect - Change opacity and other features to give a character the appearance of a ghost.Chapter 18. The Multiple You Effect - Placing multiples of the same individual in the same frame so that they can interact with one another in a natural fashion.Chapter 19. The Super Hero Effect - Gives a character in your film the appearance of flying around like Superman.Chapter 20. The Around the World Effect -  How to use Premiere Elements to brighten your traveller and help match the actor to the background clip. Useful if the sun is shining from the west in your background travel clip but the narrator has the sun coming from the opposite direction.This is a very easy to follow book that deals not only with just artistic effects, but common problems a filmmaker might run across. In fact, by learning how to execute these effects, you'll learn skills that will translate well into your other editing projects that have no apparent special effects purpose to them. This is because while these effects projects take advantage of color and sound techniques for "slight of hand" effects, they utilize the same techniques that you would use to correct the colors in an oversaturated video clip, or to get the colors to match in two clips that were shot under different lighting conditions. By following the instructions in this book, you'll learn to think about timing, splitting clips, matching audio to video, syncing clips, and other concepts that until now you might not have given much thought to. These projects will teach you about Premiere Elements in a way that no other book can while having a good bit of fun along the way. I highly recommend it to anyone interested in using Adobe Premiere Elements for film editing.
I Love This. This is a Lovecraft-ish book of the dead. The absinthe, etc. were used by Aleister Crowley. Konstantinos is the new Aleister Crowley. What I like about KOnstantinos is their isn't a rigid caste system. It is intended for the solitary practitioner. I just joined a local coven a couple days ago and they were accepting of me that I followed the dark side.
A great cocktail book!. Very professional mixologists who have an honest and organic approach to cocktails. There is a real discussion of the principals of ingredients and blending. IMHO this is as enjoyable in its own way as Degroff's "The Craft of the Cocktail."
Dear Patti...Thank YOU!!!!. Patti LaBelle's recipes are WONDERFUL!!! THANK YOU PATTI for taking the time out of your busy life to share this HEALTHY cook book with us. Your "Chicken Cacciatore" is a mouth watering dish!!! We love your cook book..your recipes..(of course we love ALL OF YOUR MUSIC)...and we Love You!! I would recommend this cook book to everyone. What a tasty collection of healthful eating!!! Patti has WOWED me once again!!
One of the best books on motivation. There are many things that make this book great.1) It is short and readable.2) It illustrates the very essense of success A NON STOP WILL TO SUCCEED AT WHATEVER YOU SET YOUR HEART TO DO.3) The characters are very believable.4) If you can't understand it, that's your first step to success, get a dictionary
Research Material. Not for the faint hearted. Readers can expect to suffer through numerous footnotes, and liberal sprinklings of quotes in Greek, Latin, French and German. That is not to say that the author has done a poor job. The content is very informative, just slow reading.The author has provided a well put together, bien tenu, history of piracy in the Mediterranean from ancient times to the formation of the Roman empire, first century A.D. based upon the writings of semi-contemporary authors and ancient authors, such as Xenophon, Cicero, Plutarch and such. The content was originally published in 1924 by the Liverpool University Press. The two maps attached to the end of the text are very helpful at finding the many locations cited by the author.Bottom line, be prepared for a non-trivial read.P-
For Stillman fans who just can't get enough!. Until I read the above reviews, I never even realized that this book might be meant for university courses! The writing is so fresh and fun and accessible that I'd just assumed it was for Stillman fans like me who, after watching each of his films multiple times, still crave more! Until Stillman comes out with a new film, books about the old films will just have to suffice, I suppose. This is a very readable book. If you, like me, just can't get enough of Whit Stillman, you'll enjoy this book. The only reason I gave it 4 stars instead of 5 is that I really disagree with some of the authors on some points; some of the reasoning seems a bit forced. Example: Audrey decided to accompany Cynthia to Rick van Sloneker's for the express purpose of seeing if Tom would come rescue her??!! Give me a break. Still, overall it's a great read if you've seen all the films
Great Great Book!. I finally had a chance to really read this whole book, and I must say that DeDe Wilson gives very detailed instructions for every recipe and technique that she uses.  I also tried out some of the recipes, and they worked perfect.  Though I did find that she got some of her recipes from &quot;The Cake Bible&quot;, which I also purchased, DeDe Wilson's book is a lot more &quot;attractive&quot; to read.  Although the designs are in no way as fancy as those in other wedding cake books, I love the detailed recipes in this one.  Most cake book authors just want to show you how skillful and how artistic they are, but DeDe Wilson really wants to teach you how she does it.  Great Book
A Classic Romance. I'm a real sucker for Victorian-age novels, so, of course, I picked this one up. I absolutely loved it. The story follows Jane Eyre, a poor girl with a crummy childhood, through her stay with the cruel Reed children, to a poor, hard boarding school where she was taught, and through her life as a governess. She teaches a young French girl, and gradually falls in love with the master of the house, but the love is that sort of "forbidden love." Jane struggles with this love and her low position in life. It's a classic, beautiful romance novel, full of love, and the complications in love. I've read many Victorian romance novels, but this one tops them all. I loved it. And my mother read it when she was younger and loved too- just goes to show how good literature never dies. If you enjoy a good quality book, read this- it's a wonderful romance novel that doesn't take an eternity to read. What's not to love? :
Do yourself a favor and read this book. Hi all,if your like me, you know a thing or two about diets.  Also, if your like me, you've heard this wacky idea about how to lose weight without dieting.  I have read so many books about non dieting, but never was really able to do it.  I honestly believe that, for me, the thoughts and ideas outlined in this book is what I always needed to hear.Linda Moran has a way or writing that is genius in it's simplicity.  She never talks down to the reader, and yet still finds a way to challenge old beliefs, somehow making you internalize it even more.maybe if we disfunctional eaters can learn even one or two things from this book, we can finally begin to heal ourselves from the bonds that have held us back for so long.  I for one, am finally begining to see a light at the end of the tunnel, and even am learning to embrace the tunnel itself.  thanks for this wonderful book
Excerpt from the book and an interview with the writer!. This book is amazing. If anyone wants to read an interview with the writer, done by Glen J. Russell (see above) and an excerpt from the book, please visit: http://www.chictribute.com/glens/texts/text06de.htm
OMG is this funny. When I first discovered The Onion two years ago, I literally woke up with sore abdominal muscles.  Not from too many situps, from laughing out loud so hard at the most finely tuned news satire to come along in decades.  "Our Dumb Century" features the Onion's classic satire newspapers for highlighted dates throughout the 20th century.  Headlines include (October 29, 1919) "Teddy Roosevelt Allows Three Others to be Carved into Mountain,"  (November 21, 1943) "Loose Lips Sink Ship," and (January 21, 1993) "New President Feels Nation's Pain, Breasts." (The same date has "Tipper Gore Jerks Arrhythmically at Inagural Ball.")  And that's just the headlines.  The articles take the concepts and run.  Not always even, not always hilarious, but there's something worth laughing out loud at on every page.If you like to laugh, read The Onion
Classic Liberalism at its best. An all-time favorite of mine, Capitalism & Freedom creates a framework of classic liberalism and argues forcefully in favor of free-markets and decentralization over the expansion of government involvement in economic and social affairs.  Friedman builds his argument from the ground up by identifying coercion as the State's distinguishing feature over all other societal organizations.  From the (classic) liberal's perspective, this aspect shapes the relationship between citizen and government, and strictly limits the appropriateness of State involvement in society, particularly with regard to well-intentioned programs and policy.Friedman uses this foundation to build a case for limited government in economic matters, citing in particular the consequences of monetary and fiscal policy abuse.  In an exceptionally apt comparison, Friedman argues that the same rationale that limits government interference with free speech should likewise apply to government interference in the economy: namely, that constraints be applied to monetary and fiscal policy to limit the potential for government to do harm in its pursuit of doing good.  Friedman gives numerous examples in which government officials, exercising carte-blanche economic authority, have further aggravated economic crises by applying a case-by-case standardh to different economic scenarios.Having clearly laid out his political philosophy, Friedman builds his case for free-markets, detailing control measures intrinsic of a laissez-faire economy.  From floating exchange rates to voucher-funded schooling, union contracts to charity, Friedman argues that the free-market harnesses the productive potential of millions of individuals and corporations, reconciling their preferences in a competitive process far more efficiently than any collective body.   Throughout the book, Friedman debunks popular myths, disputes misunderstandings, and challenges the conventional wisdom prevalent among intellectuals and social elites of his day and ours.The book's only drawback is its age and somewhat antiquated writing style that would certainly make it difficult for some readers to fully understand (particularly those who are victims of public school "education").  Friedman references several examples that would have been more easily recognized in the 1960s, but will not be immediately familiar to younger readers.  Still, this brilliant work presents the core principles of laissez-faire capitalism and classic liberalism in a relatively clear manner, and is a must-read for anyone studying the dynamics of free-markets and free societies
It isn't Cat in the Hat but... This book is good but, for an adult maybe not as good as some of the others with a stronger storyline.  This is mostly a book of Rhyming.  However, having said that, my daughter (age 1.5) likes the book and loves to look at the pictures.  They are great illustrations to look through and pick out things like "Where are his eyes?  Can you find his feet?"  The rhymes are also fun and interesting combinations
A Must Know For All Who Desire To Vote!. Aristotle's constitutional theory is the most important aspect of this book.  Every high school world history should become familiar with the 6 forms of government that Aristotle identifies, and every college poli-sci student should commit Aristotle's analysis into their core knowledge.Of course Aristotle lived in a time when social norms were different.  Much of what he writes applies to a different age, but the constitutional theory of government remains a timeless set of observations -- especially important in our times
One of King's best. I'm sure lot's of other people have written vast amounts on the plot of this book, so I'll try and keep it brief. For people who loved The Shawshank Redemption, King returns to writing a story about prison in the 30's. Only this time it's the death row prison, where inmates have short stays.  A truly compelling story from page to page. Originally it was a serial novel, split into 6 parts. The parts are in the complete novel and while sometimes there is backtracking and reiterating it does not lessen the book's qualitites.  What you have here is King writing as only he does. His ability to take the odd/supernatural and mix it with rich characters and interesting plots, is why he is such an acclaimed and loved author. I'm sure many people have seen the film version of this book and while it is one of the most faithful to his work, I still think that reading the book would be better. I read many books a year and it's rare that one can actually make me tear up, but The Green Mile made me do just that. You will not be disapointed if you read this
The First Remote. I cannot tell you how much I liked this book when I read it, under identical circumstances you will be pleased you did.It reminds me of my da and his inventiveness, best  my research indicates he was the first person to invent the remote control for television. Part one of his invention, not because this was his first innovation but just because this is how I chose to place this innovation in the review...Part one was a long electrical cord with an on off switch spliced to it so he could lean over the side of the bed and he could click the switch and like magic the TV would come to life or if he felt like clicking it again it would go black crackling and popping while it cooled.Part two of his innovation I was able to be a part of, whenever he needed to change the channels he would yell my name with great enthusiasm...Boy! Boy! come here quick, I would snap to life and run to his room with great anticipation look at him and say whaaat? He would reply "could you change over to channel 6 ? hold on, hold on, now try 13  hmmm. go back to 8"....Thanks... Well I would leave frustrated and determined not to fall for that one again, but within an hour Boy! Boy! come here hurry! I would run upstairs and say "whaaat"? "could you change the TV over to Channel 6".Boy:"But Da I'm studying for my drivers license test, I don't want to flunk"Da: " try 13 again"...Why this books evokes these memories is a mystery but so are a lot of things.
This is an outstanding book!. I strongly suggest this book to anyone who wants to change their life.  This book is so much more than any other self-help book you could get, because it helps you identify your patterns, and positively change them.
So orginal it's hilarious!. &quot;Why not write a cartoon book that doesn't bother with a main character and where each joke is totally different from the next?!&quot; That must have been similar to what Gary asked himself when starting to write his hilarious comic books. Every joke is truly different from the next one! And every joke is refreshingly original! Each joke comes from a thoughtful, clever and of course playful mind
Fabulous Cultural Analysis with Wide Implications. Spiral Dynamics possesses a childish charm that is typically absent in any study of such intellectual depth. At the core, Spiral Dynamics is a heirarchical (holarchical) evolution of values, motivations and drives. These are WIDELY applicable in business, sociology, anthropology, politics, and foreign policy.The initial theorems were concocted by the late Clare Graves, and his two predecessors Beck and Cowan have not only adapted these profound analyses to a broader (non-academic) audience, but have added a unique flavor of their own.Now I have friends who have been mildly exposed to Spiral Dynamics, and they're immediately put off by the color scheme, with a puritanical disgust for anything with such an "unintellectual" resemblance. On top of that, the kiddie analogies even make the reader feel quite... well, admittedly juvenile at times. But the beautiful thing is, these are SERIOUS and PROFOUND discoveries with WIDE implications (as been shown by Beck and Cowan's social and cultural work around the planet); these simplistic representations of such dynamic and deep material helps the student understand the points and quickly push to deeper and more pertinent questions. For instance, instead of saying "The membership-driven meme, desiring conformity and sociocentric awareness," it's much easier to say "The Blue Meme."On top of that, the book leaves an open-end with the mathematical structure of the spiral which has interesting implications as far as patterns of evolution are concerned (in whatever medium they occur).Enough of the mumbo-jumbo, highly recommended.
Beauty and the Beast romantic fantasy. A nurse at the cutting edge of medicine at the Sno-Med Clinic in Manhattan, Erin Morgan loved working there as her employer Dr. Cinatas provided miracle cures for cancer.  That is until she realized that the main ingredient consisted of poor people that Dr. Cinatas murdered to treat his wealthy patients.  Knowing he is so well regarded and needing time until she can figure out what to do next, Erin flees New York City to hide in the Tennessee Mountains.  However, preoccupied and paranoid, Erin hits a wolf on the remote mountain road before crashing off to the side.  When she regains consciousness she finds a naked hunk lying like a trophy across the hood of her car.Jared Hunter feels battered from the run in with Erin's car.  However, he finds the pain vanishes when the nurturing Erin touches his injuries, soothing the savage beast inside him.  He desires her like he never has anyone before though he has lived as a shapeshifter for centuries.  When Dr. Cinatas arrives to kill Erin, Jared knows he must risk all to keep the woman he loves safe from the malevolent medicine man, but wonders who will keep her safe from himTOUCH A DARK WOLF is a fabulous Beauty and the Beast romantic fantasy starring two amiable protagonists, who need each other; though the hero is in denial out of fear he will harm his beloved.  The action-packed story line is fast-paced even before the caricaturist villain arrives and remains gripping as readers meet the St. Giles paranormal environs who add depth to the plot.  Still evil doctor, psychic shrink, shapeshifting human-beasts, and amoral demons aside, it is the relationship between the lead couple willing to die for their soulmate that makes for a strong outstanding mystical thriller.Harriet Klausner
Great book. I loved this book. I found it extremely interesting and very hard to put down at times. I would recomend it strongly. It's a creative portrayal of what goes on behind the scenes in 16th century England.
Drew me in!. Long having toyed with the idea of retiring in the south of France, my interest was piqued when friends told me about this book.  They were ready to lend me their copy, but seeing that this was a topic close to heart, i.e. the buying of a house in Southern Europe, I decided to go out and buy it.  Admittedly, the narrative started off slowly for me.  However, once Mayes started to recount the tale of actively looking for a house, and ultimately finding one, I was hooked.  Since I am a bit of food-lover, the recipes were of interest as well.  In all, I read the book in two sittings, it's that interesting once you get going.  If I could proffer some criticism, I would point out that the book has little insight for those hoping to find a true cultural observation.  The author and her boyfriend deal with the locals in various capacities, from notary to carpenter, but they befriend too few to really get at the heart of the real Tuscans.  Of course, given that friendships in Europe develop at glacier speeds this is normal.  Nonetheless, my hope is that all the years spent in Italy Mayes will be able to address this lacuna in her next book...the one I picked up today.  All in all, Under the Tuscan Sun is an eloquent, worth-while story about a fascinating part of the world
Author's response to Reviewer from Fair Oaks,CA. "Rugg's Recommendations on the Colleges" is the best selling book in the country for giving the student "a starter list of quality departments at quality colleges". This is the focus of the book. If one is looking for "college descriptions",you go a college book that focuses on college descriptions, not a book that focuses on college majors.In the 25 years that my book has been available, very few days have gone by that a customer has not told us that the book is "extremely useful." If one reads the four page introduction, one will note that "schools should be added to the student's list by his/her counselor, from the counselor's own knowledge of the student, and knowledge of other colleges that might fit (match) the student.                     Fred Rugg, Autho
True North Confirms Harrison's Reputation. First let me say, Jim Harrison is the best &quot;literary&quot; writer working today. I formed that opinion based on some of his earlier work(Farmer, A Good Day To Die), and so had high expectations for True North. I wasn't disappointed.The novel follows the quest of the protagonist, David Burkett, as he tries to come to terms with the evil done by his father to others, and to the land he loves. David finds more ambiguities than answers, though, and the clear sense of right and wrong that drives him begins to erode.David's complex relationships with his family and to the natural world, as shaded by the past, are expertly explored. This is Harrison in top form
Solid, not spectacular, entry from Douglas Preston. While, not as much of a page-turner as "The Codex", "Tyrannosaur Canyon" is a good read that will appeal to the fans of Preston and Child.  Reuniting Tom And Sally Broadbent (from "The Codex") was a welcome decision for this reviewer.  Both characters are well-drawn and interesting.The plot takes off when Tom stumbles upon a dying prospector who hands him a small notebook filled with coded figures.  The prospector asked Tom to give the notebook to "Robbie".  The next 300+ pages are filled with Tom's attempt to return the notebook while at the same time tying to solve the mystery left behind by the prospector.Spectacular scenery and interesting gadgets abound in this book.  Preston even manages to mix in a little government conspiracy and a "black ops"  group in the quick-moving plot.Through not necessarily a memorable novel, fans of the genre' and of Preston and Child will no doubt want to add "Tyrannosaur Canyon" to their "must read" list
The best source for understanding causes of heart disease. The lipoprotein story is a hard one to tell to the public, but Dr. Superko does an extraordinary job. He tells us in plain English just why the national obsession with cholesterol has misguided us, and how the superior insights provided by lipoprotein testing uncovers hidden heart disease risk far more effectively.He peppers his well-written book with gripping stories of real people who have had life-saving information provided through lipoprotein testing.I've personally met Dr. Superko, and I find his book to be as engaging as he is in real life. If you or a loved one evenly remotely suspect that heart disease could be in your future, Dr. Superko's book is the authoritative resource to turn to.
DON'T START DICKENS HERE - BUT READ IT. I must agree with a number of other reviewers here...don't start your reading of Dickens with this one, but once you start, you need to add this one to your list.  This is not one of Dickens' most noted works, but it is one that needs to be read to understand the authors evolution as a writer.  I had the pleasure (?) of first reading this one in a volume, years ago, which was printed in the late 1800s and which was printed for mass distribution.  Fine print, two columns per page, printing all the way to the page edge...you get the picture.  That was years ago...I am too old to even see the print now, much less read it, but it was worth it at the time and is certainly worth it now that I can afford a nicer copy.  The work can be criticized, with some justification, for being a bit wordy, but for my taste, that is one of the charms of the novel.  It certainly fits the times and the style of the times.  Recommend this one be added to your list when again you get into the Dickens thing.
Mr. SportsTelevision Meets Mr. Boxing. Mr. Kindred is a wonderful storyteller in this very readable dual biography of two controversial men: Muhammad Ali and Howard Cosell. Like "Beyond Glory" -2005- by David Margolick (which tells another story of a white man and a black man linked by history in the 1930's), "Sound and Fury" is a history of a later era, the chaotic 1960's, and a history of two outsiders. Mr. Margolick makes clear that their relationship was less of a friendship and more of a partnership -- the two of them never hung out socially but each saw the other as a genius in their domain who could further their respective careers. This book is a wonderful introduction to their lives for any reader who was born after the time when Muhammad Ali and Howard Cosell had already come and gone, and as a reminder to those of us who were there
Useful, but less dense than the previous volumes. I quite liked BM4. If you've not read the previous volumes, I would highly recommend them. Especially volumes I and II of the Black Medicine series are a great help for any serious martial arts or self-defense student. As for volume 4: it is less densely packed than the previous volumes. While the amount of information you are getting for the price of the book is relatively less, it's still certainly worth the price. On the other hand, as the author explains in the introduction, &quot;the information in this book is much more quickly put to use&quot;. This is true: where the previous volumes required more self-study, this one is basically a &quot;How-to&quot; manual to Mashiro's tricks of the trade
All businesses should be run this way!. I was enthralled with this book--it's refreshing, entertaining, and a wonderful tale of how one can operate a business with ethics, making a lot of money and doing a lot of good. I love the freewheeling atmosphere he creates in his workplace - there are pictures of barefoot employees in relaxed positions working on computers. Patagonia hires people who actually use the products involved in adventure sports--rock climbing, surfing, etc. Their flex time is really flex time--Chouinard says you don't plan to go surfing next Tuesday at 2:00 - you go surfing when the surf is up! A great read, with an environmental message for all of us that will spur you to action
Simply the best intro into Java / OO you are going to get. More than that, after more than 20 years in IT, this is also the best IT text book I have ever read, end of story.  I had done a 5-day Java course some months before I read the book, and found it a real slog.  Just as the authors claim, the syntax first approach which was used in the course, was as confusing as hell for all of us old COBOL mainframers there.Although you may find BlueJ is not without its bugs, the concept behind it, of visually displaying objects, and not emphasizing the Java Main method, is truly inspired (get the book if you dont know what I mean)!One thing: make sure you get the 2nd ed of this book, I found some annoying quirks in the 1st first edition, that the authors have cleaned up here(eg, you had to trawl thru their website to get some of the install instructions).
Groundbreaking. This is one of the few craps books that tells you how to chart the numbers and shows actual sessions. People think the numbers are random, but the author shows you how to take advantage of streaks by charting the trends.
How a book report opened up a new world. I had to read this book for a book report...well actually it was a art college project to read and illustrate it. The more I got into the book the more I saw the characters so easily come alive in my imagination. I felt sad, elated and almost annoyed at these characters...they were conveyed so well by the late Bruce Chatwin. I want to read more of his books, this has been the perfect introduction to the rest of his written work
Scholarly Work. This was the second book I read on the Civil War, following James McPherson's excellent `Battle Cry of Freedom'. I was led to read it because of my interest in the strange reversal of fortune of the Republican Party amongst African Americans. Why did the party of Lincoln, and more importantly The Radicals, gain less than 10% of the Black vote in 2000? Actually this book doesn't really answer that question, what it does explore (in some detail) is the origins of the Republican Party. That is why I have referred to it as a `Scholarly Work', the quality of Foner's research is formidable and together with William Geinapp's similar book provide a indispensable guide, not just to the historical events, but as the title suggests - to the underlying ideology that tied some very diverse politicians together. Furthermore in a key chapter (`The Republican Critique of the South') Foner analyses the root of those beliefs
A first rate little book. Ought to be must reading not only for car guys but aircraft maintenance students, homebuilders, and for electronics hobbyists as well. Even if you aren't going to become as skilled as Mr. Fournier it helps to know what can and can't be done and what is involved, so you can intelligently talk to fabricators
Very Important & Good Read. Dr. Anatoly Fomenko is at the forefront of the "New Chronology" but this work is still original style & tone, very informative & detailed & quotes Dr. Fomenko lightly even though it's part of the New Chronology Club.History as most know & understand is a sham & scam as far as I'm concerned, there has always been contoversial information that is sidestepped & swept under the rug, it's about time researchers come out & challenge Academia as well as religious institution's established History & Chronology. Too much financial profiteering as well as Life & Death decisions were made with foolish, ignorant & propagandic logic. For society to go forward & evolve it's important to understands it's history correctly. Even if these "New Chronology" books are partially true the implications are profound. So educators, civil authorities & students of history need to read these books.
Beautiful. This book was just a beautiful story.  The imagery of the chinese wedding customs of the time and the horrific descriptions of foot binding were amazing.  The connection between the main characters and their need for love in a world in which women were considered worthless was powerful.This is a must read
Wonderful!. The world lost a real gem of a writer when Stan Berenstain passed on November 29.  Together, Berenstain and his wife, Jan, and eventually their two sons, created books featuring lovable but flawed characters who tackle just about every real issue that faces families.This book is a great example.  Almost all parents are familiar with the difficulty that kids have in learning and practicing good manners, and often have a tough time in teaching kids how to be polite.  One of the best things about this book is that it's not just the kids who are the naughty ones, Papa Bear has some rudeness problems, and even Mama Bear succumbs to an issue at one point.  It's great for kids to learn that manners are a lifelong skill that will always take a little bit of practice.  This book is a wonderful place to start
Brilliant work, though not really for the general reader. A landmark in Vaughan Williams criticism.  The book handles questions both of intellectual milieu (Frogley's essay on English musical identity relates it to a wider movement) and of Vaughan Williams's musical art.  The essay  on VW's use of rhythm is outstanding, thoroughly refuting the picture of  him as some musical bumpkin, but essays of this type require some  familiarity with the nuts and bolts of music as well as the ability to read  it.  The book well rewards the effort it requires.  This has become a  favorite book, one that I reread
I love a combination of Jorge's books. I've read 3 of Jorge Cruise's books and found something I was looking for in each of them.  8 Minutes in the Morning book -- pros: love the exercises,  cons: hate the eating card system.  8 Minutes for Real Shapes, Real Sizes book -- pros: love his enthusiasm, journaling ideas, goal setting and how he addresses emotional eating, system for controlling portions is very easy to follow, cons: exercises are too easy overall.  The 3-Hour Diet -- pros: love the science behind eating every 3 hours, cons: in reality, it's hard to stick to a 3 hour schedule, exercise plan is nearly non-existent in this book.   While each book has it's strong and weak points, overall, Jorge's ideas do work.  In the course of 3 months, I lost 30 pounds.  Real Shapes/Sizes provided the motivation and portion control, 8 minutes provided the exercise routine and The 3 hour plan kept me for eating too often.
Like Father, Like Son. For over 3 decades James Herriot's "All Creatures Great and Small" serieshas delighted millions all over the world. Sadly James Herriot aka Alf Wight passed away in the mid 1990's after a long battle with prostate cancer. Alf was approached about having his "biography" published but declined the offer. However he did mention to his son Jim "If someone were to write my biography I would want it to be you." After much soul searching Jim Wight began writing his father's biography eight months after his father's passing. The final product is brillant, a masterpiece. Jim possesses the same ability to communicate with you in a personal way on paper as his father Alf did. This is a must for every James Herriot fan
A million little pieces. I read this book on a cruise ship with its own casino.  Naturally I was hooked, and knocked it out in a couple of days.  I've never read a Mezrich epic before (either fiction or non-) and didn't really spend much time trying to break the story down until well after I was finished.A lot of the goings-on seem too good to be true.  The bulk of the book recounts Semyon Dukach's adventures on the MIT blackjack teams of the 1990s.  Although Semyon is said to be about 21 at the time, and about 33 at the time of writing (approximately 2004), he remembers watching the Ali-Liston title fight of February 1965, which is either an impossibility, or a tip that Dukach isn't precisely who the author thinks he is.Other happenings seem deliberately stilted.  Many of the details about weather and wardrobe -- recalled by Dukach for the author a decade after the fact -- simply have to be embellished.  Mezrich tells us up front that names and identities were changed, and it would probably destroy the story's spell to tell us how much was either made up or "improved" over the reality.  On the other hand, you can generally accept that this is not fiction, without casting aspersions about James Frey upon the author.The core of the book is a mathematical system for maximizing blackjack winnings, and being able to predict what cards are coming out of the shoe if the dealer uses certain shuffling techniques (alas, the casino on my cruise ship did not use them).  Mezrich himself visits MIT for one of the book's investigative chapters, and shows us that cracking blackjack science is par for the course for the school that invented radar and hacking.Knowledge and application of these techniques allows Dukach and his (presumably fictionalized) cohorts to win a lot of money -- which they improbably store in cash in laundry baskets, office desks, and abandoned buildings.  Where the IRS fits into all this is never disclosed.  Other facts -- such as the plane crash Dukach survived, and the investigative techniques of the various casinos described -- don't seem to have been researched by the author, although he does hire an escort girl for an interview, and closes that chapter with a wink and a nod to the reader.The bottom line, of course, is that Mezrich writes breezily and tantalizingly.  The chapters and casinos fly by, with chases and escapes and, eventually, some love scenes.  I'd love to believe that this story is mostly true.  What's indisputable is that Dukach is, if nothing else, a master salesman and a great story spinner
Succeeding in Music: a Business Handbook... This is an exceptional and inspiring book!  I would recommend it to anyone who wishes to gain valuable insite into how to plan for success in the music business.   It is  money well spent
You'll never look at Vagas the same way again!. Beating the odds in Vegas is much harder than I thought. Leave it to a group of MIT braniacs to figure it out. This story is incredible; so much deeper than the "card counting" I expected. Their system was incdedibly elaborate. This is not a book you can read on your flight to LV and hope to gain an advantage. This is about a system that was years in the making. I"m facinated by how successfully this system worked - to the tune of millions in winnings.
Nice to Meet You... I think... I liked this book, and I think you should get it - but watch out - there's a big surprise waiting!Finding Jesus, Discovering Self is a buffet table sort of a book, a collection of Bible stories about Jesus, first person stories from the authors, poems and quotes from writers famous and otherwise, and directions to help the reader reflect, react and respond to the ideas presented in the stories. Ok so far, the bible stories are familiar, the personal reflections engaging and interesting, the poems and quotes enlightening and easy to read. It's like a long dinner table conversation with those smart, compassionate, well read friends you always wished you could spend more time with. There's a magic bookshelf that pops out the perfect quote, the poem, the literary example at just the right time.As the evening goes on, though, something a little disturbing starts to happen. The talk turns to you (me!) and the friends start to tell their stories in a more intimate way, revealing not just the easy morals or the funny parts, but how they fell short, were disappointed, didn't act right, learned a hard lesson the hard way. Something about the way they tell their story makes it impossible for you to stay silent, and you find yourself talking, thinking, feeling in ways you hadn't expected. It gets tougher - the friends use challenging words like "imagine it differently...", "ask yourself what the other person is feeling.." or "name your unfinished business."Caren Goldman is a friend, and in the interest of full disclosure, when I read this book I could imagine her at our dinner table, telling these stories, running to the bookshelf for the Rilke poem that put the idea just right, fixing me with that look when I'm less than honest with myself.Bill Dols I've never met, but I know things about him from these stories, and I've let him sit at my dinner table, too. Both Caren and Bill present Jesus in a new way, too - not the Gospel of Certainty but the Gospel of Questions - love embodied in the unanswered far more than the answers. These old, familiar stories that Jesus told or that were told about Jesus are presented like a familiar stone, or a picture we've seen forever. They ask us to turn it a little, hold it in a different light, look from closer in. I read the Good Samaritan story, then they asked me to imagine that I was the priest who walked on by, or the robbers who stripped and beat him! Their questions for reflection take the story all the way home... "look around you", "Who do you pass by every day". They quote the Talmud, Milan Kundera and poet Derek Wolcott.I get up from the banquet, the dinner conversation, the engagement that this book invites a little tired. It's not an easy self-help affirmation, this book. It's hard. The Jesus I thought I knew is different from the one I meet in this book. So is the "self." This book asks us to look at the beauty, the ease, the love - but also the anger, the selfishness, the disappointment. Smell the flowers, of course, but smell the funk too, acknowledge the rest of the picture, live with the tough questions.It's not easy - I stopped a couple of times. I thought, "I don't really need this," and "I don't really have time, and " I'm not sure what they believe and if they believe the way I do". In the end, I found it immensely helpful, a powerful experience. Living the questions raised in this way - the questions about Jesus, the questions about myself - is a better way to live. It's like the way I feel getting up from that dinner table - challenged, alive, full, energized - and ready for more!Caren says that it's her hope that "the questions...will ...remain a welcome signpost on your journey to healing and wholeness." Bill says it's "exchanging the insatiable search for meaning in the Bible for the opportunity to read sacred narratives as life's drama around and within me." Around the middle of the book there's a little TS Eliot poem that summarizes the genius of this book for me."We shall not cease from explorationAnd the end of all our exploringWill be to arrive where we startedAnd know the place for the first time."
Provocative and fresh. This is a book with a dual mission.  Though it certainly addresses itself to the French-American artist Louise Bourgeois's mysterious and beautiful &quot;Spider&quot; series of sculptures, it is just as much about the &quot;experiencing&quot; of artworks in real space and time.  But Mieke Bal goes beyond the phenomenological and explores the way in which viewers bring their own sense of history, memory and culture to bear upon the object being viewed/experienced.  For Bal, in this particular instance, it is Bernini that haunts the sculptures under scrutiny.  And her case in convincing.  The book is short, and exquisitely produced in full color
Ideas returning to favor. The ideas in this book are returning to favor -- this time possibly based on serious research
An excellent reference. With a clarity of presentation and personal anecdotes, Bernhard Suess masterfully presents techniques and information quite useful to both amateur and skilled photographers.  There was a wealth of information  presented in this book which significantly improved both my compositional  and printing skills.  Amidst a plethora of books available on the subject,  I feel that Suess makes an exceptional effort to make the topic as  accessible as possible.  There is a minimum of technical jargon that is not  explained, which should appeal to the neophyte, and there are several  tricks and techniques that would appeal to the more experienced  photographer.  I highly recommend this book
Miss Julia Does It Again. As usual, it's a quick and enjoyable read when Miss Julia and her friends are involved.  Please keep them coming
Hospital Sketches. This book was in great condition. The shipping was very quick just like promised
Important Useful Information. This book has lots of tips and tricks that have made me feel more confident about my own safety at home especially. I learned that bad situations can be avoided if you are conscious of your environment. I gave the book to my teenage daughter so she can learn to become aware and be better able to take care of herself. The book is easy to read and understand, and give lots of stories that show how the techniques work. I really recommend this, especially for women
For those ready to take responsibility for their relationships... I disagree with the reviewer who stated:"The author suggests that emotionally abused women are a certain type, as if they set themselves up for the abuse and/or are drawn to it. If you believe that rape victims are somewhat responsible when violated because of the way they dressed or behaved, then you may be able to get past the first few pages of this book, otherwise, this book is not for you.Emotional abuse can and does happen to women who experienced no form of abuse whatsoever in their childhood. These women can be intelligent, attractive, and self-assured. Often the abuse is so undetected, a form of brainwashing, that who they are actually changes over time so that those qualities are not as prevalent. The woman is not at fault for the abuse, despite her own interpersonal weaknesses, she is not the cause."The reason why I disagree with the commentary above is because this book is for those who have a PATTERN of ending up in abusive relationships. End up in one abusive relationship, shame on that person. End up in a series of abusive relationships and one really could benefit from exploring why she is so drawn to the same type of individual (abuser!) repeatedly.If you feel compelled to compare emotional abuse to rape then one could ask, "If you walked down a particular alley and were raped, certainly that would not be your fault. But would you keep walking down that same alley time and again, knowing that a rapist was awaiting you at the other end?" The fact is that most abusive partners exhibit what are called 'red flag warnings' early enough into the union so that a woman who is astute to these, and who knows how to set firm boundaries, can oftentimes spare herself the grief of being abused yet again. At the least, she can extricate herself from the relationship ASAP once she recognizes that she is being abused.Therefore, the pervasive message of this book is NOT that women are to blame for being abused, but that with awareness they have a CHOICE as to whether or not to go down that same alley again. They can decide who they get involved with/remain involved with and why. This is an empowering message; a lot more so than telling women, "You are completely powerless when it comes to your relationships. No matter what you think, choose, say, or do if you are going to be a victim of abuse, you are going to be a victim of abuse. Accept it." Yikes!There are different stages of recovery for targets of emotional abuse. One of the earlier stages often enough being to `blame' others for their own issues, choices, and the predicaments they find themselves in once they realize they are being abused and are, understandably, quite angry and defensive about this. Whereas, the conclusive stage of recovery is one of self-responsibility; whereupon the now former target of emotional abuse takes back her power by taking responsibility for her own issues, choices, and the predicaments she finds herself in from hereon in. This book, and an exceptional one at that, is for those who are ready to be more responsible and break the pattern of emotionally abusive relationships in their lives!
Terrific collection of Freud material for any Undergraduate. I think this is a terrific compilation of Freud material that would be helpful to any psychology student pursuing psychoanalysis and a search for knowledge in the subject of psychology.  The author does a tremendous job  of picking the most important works of Freud and putting them in a proper  reading order for the less experienced student. I think that the author  should be commended for his work in translating and interpreting this  material, and I would recomend this to anyone, no matter what the cost! I  think this may be the best and most valuable set of books you could ever  buy
A crticial and needed examination of La Leche League. DeJagger Ward explores the history of La Leche League and uncovers the Catholic theology roots within its philosophy of mother-baby togetherness.  As a former La Leche League leader herself, DeJagger Ward offers a unique inside-look into an organization that empowers women to breastfeed.  The best chapter is chapter 8, &quot;Asking Hard Questions&quot; where DeJagger probes and critically offers analysis of the areas where La Leche League needs to grow and improve if it is to continue to reach out to all women.  DeJagger also points out areas where La Leche League philosophy may marginalize some women, particularly in its philosophy and how it functions.  Highly recommended to all involved in La Leche League as a book to use in measuring how the group is or is not meeting the needs of all women.  A good read for anybody who would like to understand the politics of breastfeeding within American culture and learn how La Leche League works in helping the mother-baby breastfeeding dyad.  Dejagger's analysis of women's roles, family structure and gender issues in family paradigms are supurb.  Includes interviews with La Leche League founders and women involved in the politics of breastfeeding.  Well referenced.  La Leche League may find some parts of this book controversial. An excellent analysis of La Leche League from a feminist basepoint
Not much hope. It would have been a gigantic undertaking to write Howard W. French's kind of book about all of Africa. Africa is, after all, a large continent with the greatest diversity in species, ecosystems, peoples, languages and histories.  French does not attempt such a challenge.  His primary focus is the part of Africa that he knows best, Central Africa, and its complex history since independence.  While he draws some general conclusions for Africa, resulting from the colonial carving up of the continent, his concern are the events in "the heart of Africa".  Given the common misconception that Africa can be regarded as one unitary region, the title "A Continent for the Taking" strikes me as somewhat unsuitable and the subtitle as misleading. Only a few chapters relate French's travels in other countries, all in West Africa, and almost all struggling with their own post-colonial catastrophes such as Sierra Leone and Liberia.  One notable exception is Mali where recent history has demonstrated that democratic development is possible despite political, environmental challenges and severe poverty of the vast majority of the population. Here, French finds some of hope among the tragedies.French feels privileged for his position given his personal background and family connections in and to the region. As West Africa representative for the New York Times between 1994 and 1998, he traveled extensively in the region. The book records one major political crisis after another: most of those happened to occur in Zaire in the last years of Mobutu's reign.French complements his current affairs coverage with reflections on the impacts of colonial history and political power play during the Cold War.  While he places the responsibility of much of the ongoing crisis in the region at the feet of the former colonial powers, especially Belgian's King Leopold, his outspoken critique is particularly poignant regarding the US and its philosophy of "African Solutions for African Problems".  Supporting authoritarian strongmen and dictators, he argues, has been more important for American foreign policy than promoting nascent democracy and the protection of human rights. Despite the known brutality and rampant frauds of Mobutu's regime, he was only dropped from the list of "acceptable" African leaders when another equally ruthless strongman, Laurent Kabila, stood at the gates of Kinshasa, the capital.  French was also a close and disparaging observer of the US welcome for Kabila as the new president.French writes with great empathy and passion for the peoples living in Central Africa, the two Congos, one of them the former Zaire, as well as the displaced refugees from Rwanda. They are the real victims of the regimes and the continuing power plays by western governments.  These are more interested, he suggests, in the exploitation of rich natural resources, oil, diamonds and metals, than in good governance and democratic participation by the population. For example, French follows groups of desperate Hutu refugees from one camp to another exposing the participation of the Rwandan army (post genocide) in massacres and violence against the refugees and related tribal groups in Eastern Zaire.  He laments the Rwandan government's continuing profound involvement with the events in Zaire/Congo and explores the reasons why the US administration failed to intervene.He interleaves his investigative reporting of events with descriptions of his  encounters with many individuals, whether opposition leaders, artists, Hutu refugees or just plain village folk suffering from the fighting in their surroundings.  His direct approach invites the reader to follow his travels into remote areas of the lush rainforests or the wide ranging savanna. He focuses our attention on the individuals he meets and their circumstances.  Reflecting their perspectives on local events, he lets them convey their views directly in dialogue with him.It is somewhat disappointing that an important book like French's, published in 2004, stops in 1998 when he left his position in the region.  One can appreciate his frustration and sense his exhaustion from four years of crisscrossing the difficult terrain.  Nevertheless, the reader would have greatly benefited from and expected some kind of epilogue on the various events still unfolding when he described them. Also, for those not that familiar with the contemporary history of Central Africa, a summary of historical chronology would have assisted in placing the events described more comprehensively. [Friederike Knabe, Ottawa Canada
This will cheer you up!. I received this book as a gift a few years ago to cheer me up.Well, it did just that!  I have always enjoyed Calvin and Hobbes, even as a grown up you can't really pass up Calvin and Hobbes, you know!?  I just remember laughing and laughing at how cute and funny this book is.  I still have it and refer to it at times when I need a good laugh.  Laughter is the best medicine.  It does not matter how old you are!  It's good to be a kid at heart!
Fascinating, Provocative, Evocative. I knew nothing of Freemasonry before reading this book; I can't even remember what prompted me to read it in the first place. But no matter, because it is a fascinating piece of archaeological mystery writing. The authors seek to discover the origin of masonic ritual; and along the way the reader learns about the birth of middle eastern civilization with the Sumerians, the nature of king-making in ancient Egypt, the origin of the Jewish people, a very alternative (and provocative) description of the nature of Jesus's ministry, and the construction of what has become Christianity by the earliest Roman Christians. This book does not seem to be meant to promote freemasonry, so you won't be pummeled with masonic text. The function of the masonic text and ritual in this book is to tie together aspects of mid-eastern history and archaeology (and relevant portions of Celtic British Isles history) in a unique way
Private Life. I'm not an engineer and I enjoyed Astro Turf enormously.  Please note the subtitle:  The Private Life of Rocket Science.  The private life is there along with the technology and fascinating in terms of JPL's history and completely accessible for the lay person.  The references to Sci-Fi movies and Ms Lord's father (himself a rocket scientist) give the reader a rich picture of the birth of space exploration right up to the Mars Landing.
Witty!. This book is hilarious at times, I mean, it teaches economics well also. But the best part is the dry, witty humor characteristic of Perloff himself...took a seminar with the guy, he ruleeeez, with a "z.
Very Informative!. Great book, helped me understand a lot of things. So many examples and facts, gave me so much insight. I recommend this book to any & every woman out there. I wish I would have read this book 10 years ago!Thank you to the author for taking the time to write this, it was the most useful book I have ever read
SHEER JOY. I CAN'T RECALL READING A MORE INSPIRATIONAL BOOK.  IT SEEMS THAT NO MATTER WHAT LIFE HANDED HER, LINDA RICHMAN FOUND A WAY TO FIND HUMOR IN HER SITUATION. HER ATTITUDE TOWARDS LIFE'S HARDSHIPS HANDED ME A ROADMAP THAT I HAVE USED AS A GUIDE.  I'VE BOUGHT SEVERAL COPIES AS GIFTS FOR FRIENDS.  I'D RATHER LAUGH IS FUNNY, TENDER AND WELL WRITTEN.  BRAVO MS. RICHMAN.  I HOPE THERE ARE MORE BOOKS ON THE WAY
Excellent Christian resource on parenting teens. The Five Love Languages for Teenagers by Gary Chapman is a book every parent needs to own.  I'll admit, I went looking for a quick fix with this book.  The other Love Languages books have a quiz in the back to help you identify your language, and that's right where I went with this book: to the back.  I was disappointed to find no quiz in this book, but Chapman explains that teenagers would be quick to figure out how to manipulate the system if they knew that we were trying to figure them out.  The book discusses the five love languages as broken down in Chapman's other books in this series, but directs them specifically at how teenagers are affected by them.  I learned so much from this book about how to talk to my kids and that both of my teens are quality time people.  During the course of reading this book, I've seen a change in my daughter already.  She's spent more time talking to me, because I've spent more time listening to her.  This is a book I will purchase for my own bookshelf and continue the practices in it for the next 17 years (until my three-year-old turns 20).
Solid little thing about drugs and their devistation. My mother has introduced numerous authors to me, and I am glad that she has. She has introduced to me to classics, to modern day litature, and some crud books. I learned what to pick from her. I know what to read. When she introduced this book to me, I had no prior knowledge about the author, James Frey. For all I knew, it was a "drug" book. After my mother had finished it, She gave it to me to read. I was skeptical about it. I felt that I could not read it, because it didn't sound intresting. It was a story of a man that defines rock bottom. He wakes up on a plane, covered in body fluids, and has a hole in his cheek which he has no recollection of getting it. He is then taken to a rehababilitation facility, where he detoxs and thinks about life. He then meets love and finds himself there. It is a uplifting story.Prior to finishing or during the course of my reading it. I found that there were accusations of lying in the story. I was flabbergasted by it. I didn't understand why he would make up stuff in the book, but I got over it and understood that it was a solid story and had solid writing. I felt that the people that blasted it for being fabricated probably read some or none at all of the story. They were probably understandbly upset at his success with the book. I am not blasting them, but they need to open their eyes and read what is in front of them.Frey's writing stylye is highly unorodox for a writer. He doesn't write in paragraphs or is highly detailed. He just is honest and to the point. He doesn't hold back when he writes. Some people might find the story annoying, but I find it original and it helps showcase the conversations which usually are in "" but not the case in this book. It kind of reminds me of ee cummings and his poetry, but Frey doesn't do the random placement of punctuation. He does get his point, his mood, and his feelings across though.The conteversy of the book has severly damaged Frey's reputation as a Author. He probably is spit on by the other authors for the fabrications. This society is totally obessed with bringing out ONE key aspect of a person or thing and blowing the whole thing out of poportion. Frey is a solid author that deserves another chance. He possibly has helped millons of people with his book get through whatever they were struggling through. It is a inspiring book, that is, if you take off the goggles thrown on by the conteversy and read the book.
Overall, the best. Various study Bibles have different strengths and weaknesses. I would have to gives this Bible the best all-around award.Its study notes aren't as dry as dust with no indication of what a particular Bible verse means to you. This bible is excellent at spelling out what a particular verse means to your daily life.  This Bible also has the best introductions to books of the Bible, quite extensive. It's outlines, too, are very detailed. It has the best theological articles. Many are quite long, but expressed in easy to understand language. And all of the notes and articles are written as if one person was speaking to another. It breaks down the complicated.But, this Bible doesn't have the best leather, though it's good enough. It doesn't have the largest type. though it is readable. It doesn't have the best paper, though it is adequate. And while it is jam-packed with notes on verse meanings and theological articles, it is relatively easy to handle.My review is based on my comparisons with the Macarthur Study Bible, the Zonderban NIV Study Bible, the Nelson Study Bible, the KJV Study Bible, the Life Application Study Bible, and a few others.
Readable introduction. This study has many of the earmarks of a Ph. D. dissertation--muted claims and qualifiers, allusions to the Frankfort School, periodic summaries--but it's a lucid, jargon-free beginning of a conversation that's long overdue.  Many great American texts (literary as well as cinematic) have been excluded from academic canons and college reading lists on the grounds that they don't belong in the ironic, modernist tradition.  By showing that melodrama is modernity's child, not its antithesis, Singer invites us to pay serious attention to texts whose only crime may be full disclosure of meaning and undeniable influencing of the witness
reflecting on carville. This book deserves a more intensive review than this, but it also deserves to be read,so I will at least share some random reflections on it.  Carville is the name of a small community in south Louisiana.  It is also a euphemism for the location of the hospital that for more than 100 years treated  patients with leprosy (preferably called Hansen's  disease.)  As such Carville was a place of mystery and curiosity.  Marcia Gaudet's new book of                                            recollections takes the mystery out of the place and shows it to be the home of   an intensely courageous group of people, stigmatized for their condition but never defeated.  The book which has much to offer to the scholar and the lay reader alike records the memories of trauma and grief that Hansen's  disease patients endured.  But the book does not stop with trauma.  It relates the formation and growth of a community with its own traditions (escaping through the hole in the fence),            celebrations (Mardi Gras) and tall tales.  For anyone with even a casual interest in the lives of people in intensely painful situations the book is an inspiration and a must read.
What a great and most interesting writer. Eliot Weinberger has done a real service to the world of literature by selecting, and translating these pieces. They show the range of interest, the incredible ability to make inventive creative cross- connections of one of Modern Literature's true masters, Borges.Borges covers worlds in his writing, worlds of Literature , worlds of the Argentinean society he and some of his ancestors grew up in, worlds given in a universal encycopediac reading, which seems to cover all continents and all cultures.Borges greatest work is considered to be his ' Ficciones'. But his signature is present in all , in a single page of a book- review or a philosphical meditation.For him worlds mingle and combine, and are retranslated in such a way as to reappear as Literature.He also in this work reveals himself to be a decent and courageous opponent of Fascism.He confounds and surprises us at times with these strange mixings of things, but the poetic and parable- like element is so strong in this work that it engages us, and forces us to question our own small pictures of reality.What a great and interesting writer. What a pleasure to have this work to enrich our minds with
A masterpiece!. &quot;Electronic Day Trading to Win&quot; is a masterpiece!!  A must-read for anyone seriously considering a career in day trading.  Bob Baird and Craig McBurney, the authors, explain the process in such a clear, straightforward manner that the average layperson with no background can easily understand the material, from concept to execution.  I would guess that even professionals in the field could benefit from this book
Forensic Pathology 2nd Edition. The book was excellent. It was very informative and really help me in my work here at the United Nations Mission in Liberia as CIVPOL Forensic Pathologist.Servillano B. Ritualo M.D. FPSP,CF
Great book!. Wonderful pictures and great engine exploration photos. Well done
Truly enjoyable. I loved the entire book...My favorite story is when Bernard's father goes through a "fictitious phase" of marriage
Best book on raw for Beauty AND Health. Tonya's down to earth story telling of compelling journey not only to the USA but also to raw and live foods is one of the best books on the raw or live foods lifestyle. She combines a beautiful inspirational story with excellent tips and advice for making the transition to Raw yourself.Raw is a complete lifestyle change, but Tonya makes it easy, understandable and POSSIBLE to do. She teaches you to cultivate your natural beauty, your birthright, in clear, easy to understand language.She is inspiring, knowledgeable, and gives you the impression that she genuinely cares for your success as you, too, transition to the most beautiful you that you can be...RAW.She explores, discusses and finally blows wide open many common misconceptions on Beauty, nutrition and healthy eating in an intelligent, no nonsense and entertaining manner.Her recipes are excellent...food selections, shopping tips and resource lists are healthful and helpful.It's not just about the diet and Tonya makes that clear...this is a lifestyle and she explores the other avenues of  that as well...with discussions on style, hair care, exercise, behavior...the total mind/body package...With "Your Right To Be Beautiful"...beauty is MORE than skin deep. With Tonya, you have all the tools to claim that right.How do I know?Last year I was mistaken for being in my early forties, BUT....a few days ago...someone mistook me for my 17 year old daughter; AGAIN...I am 37.These days....according to a popular online health and lifestyle survey, I am 23 years old, physiologically and lifestyle speaking...Ageing is not a fact of life, in "Your Right To Be Beautiful," Tonya teaches what the facts really are...."We can all be beautful."
Ethiopia and the Dergue. My family spent 23 months in Ethiopia during my active duty military service, in a home just a block off the road from His Imperial Majesty's (Haile Selassie I) palace and the Bole airport in Addis Ababa. That was from February of 1970 until January of 1972. The American community was concerned about the stability of the government there when the Emperor would eventually  go the way of all mankind. HIM HSI died after we left, probably suffocated by the new rulers after the Dergue took over the country . Many of us wondered what has happened during the intervening years.  This book tells the story from the memories of one student who lived and suffered through those perilous times.  It's very interesting to anyone who ever lived there, and appears authentic
A great little book. Djilas' first hand account of events, keen observations and great writing style combine to give you much more insight about communism and Stalin than you would expect from a book this size. Don't miss it
Supremely Soulful. Pretty much an autodidact at poetry (thus having utterly no pretense to credentials with which to browbeat those with different views) I've come to regard Emily as one of the very best poets of all time and, among other things, one of the very best of Christian theologians. Notwithstanding what various far better credentialed experts have pronounced to the contrary, Emily was indeed a Christian, though quite solitary, mystical, and hardly conventional. Take for example (J) 823:Not that We did, shall be the testWhen Act and Will are doneBut what Our Lord infers We wouldHad We diviner been --Is this not an exquisite (and ultra-polysemic) four line sermon on discipleship, grace, incarnation, and judgment/salvation?Very few have written of the soul as profoundly, beautifully,and economically as Emily. Plato would have marvelled at this girl.Whoever first referred to her as a "nun" described her much better than many moderns who seem preoccupied with her secret loves and lovers, sexual preferences, etc. See No. 817 for example.To decode Emily, I bought the Noah Webster 1823 American English Dictionary. It along with the Bible, the poetry of George Herbert, and the classical writers and philosophers are, for me, essential to filling in the various matrices of meaning that are her poems. Even then, many poems remain obscure and one must fortuitously discover tidbits from history, (then) current events, etc. to occasionally render them comprehensible. Understanding Emily could take a lifetime of work and pleasure.This edition is great because it is essentially faithful to how Emily actually recorded her poems. With her, as everyone knows, the seemingly eccentric punctuation, capital letters, and other quirks are significant
READ THIS BOOK!. I sincerely wish that everyone would read &quot;Quantum Leaps&quot;. If so there would be a &quot;Quantum Leap&quot; in individual and universal consciousness. She explains new scientific technology in a clear and easily  understandable way. Her examples and explanations are excellent and clearly  point out the necessity for a change in consciousness from the old  Newtonian mechanistic to the world of today's Quantum Physics. This book is  simplistic enough to be read by someone unfamiliar with current technology  and it is also able to captivate the mind and imagination most erudite.     Warning - pleased be advised that you may find yourself buying copies for  your friends and stopping strangers on the street telling them to read this  book
This is the best book I've read short of the REGULAR Bible. To put it bluntly, this book has EVERYTHING you could POSSIBLY need in it. It has combinations of vitamins and supplements for everything from how to get rid of jet lag, to what dieters should take, to the particular health needs of your pet dog or cat. If you read all the way through it, I'm relatively sure that you'll never come across a situation that you won't know what to take to help yourself out. And in my mind, that's what makes this book worth every single page it's printed on
a must read book for all children and grown ups too!. I am 27 years old and today I read Understood Betsy for the first time, because it has never been published in Turkey as a Children's Classic, what a loss! That book made me smile with happiness and lift my spirit up. Every little girl and boy must read it.And parents should read with them as well. It will take you a travel in the timeline to nearly 100 years ago to a farm in Vermont, and to adorable lives of American farmers, you will definately love this book and finish reading with a smile
Very Inspirational. I read this book shortly after my daughter was born 14 weeks (approx. 100 days) premature last April. The stories Dr. Remen recounts in her books were very inspirational and helped my husband and me to be there for our daughter during her 3 month stay in the NICU. I found it hard, on some days, to cope with my daughter's condition as it rollercoastered from not so bad to absolutely horrifying and reading the stories really helped put perspective in what we were going through. I honestly don't think I would've survived being a NICU mom without having read this book
Thought-provoking account of a diverse field of research. Douglas Hofstadter is best known for his seminal work 'Godel, Escher, Bach' (1981), but not much was known about the work he carried out at the University of Indiana. This work collects a number of research papers from the 80s, thus offering a glimpse into the continuation of the work that was carried out with the help of the 'fluid concepts'-group. Hofstadter writes well, which means that the accounts of the projects that were undertaken are exciting, thought-provoking, and intruiging. I'm not entirely happy about the theoretical background to some of the work, maybe Hofstadter tries too deliberately to maintain things at a simple level. Still, if you're at all interested in the state of the art in AI research, this is a book you may not want to miss
New Approach To Spending Habits. I could see myself and other members of my family and friends in the book as I read and within 2 minutes had gotten a pencil to underline passages. This is a new and innovative approach to why we handle money in the way we do.  I think this will help us spend more wisely in the futur
I didn't expect myself to cry, but I did... I had already watched the very similar movie "A Walk to Remember" (and did not cry) but even so, I went on to read the book "Love Story". I did not expect myself to cry, as I knew of the plot and even the ending. But, Erich Segal writes the book in such a casual and condensed way that packs up all the emotion engrossing the reader's mind. He makes the reader both laugh and cry. This is truly a wonderful book and I'd recommend it to anyone up for an absorbing "love story"
Not preachy but really interesting in so many ways.... What really caught my attention was the fact the author shows over and over how 'we' so often eat, even if the stuff we are eating is stale popcorn or food that on second thought we wouldn't even feed to a stray starving dog.  That food for 'us' is often more emotional than nutritional or helpful. After reading the book I find myself stopping before I reach for something to eat, asking myself if I am actually hungry and if so, if what I am about to eat is worth my time.  I even find that I am planning meals better, so I get as much bang from them as possible.  I also found the authors research on what men and women see as comfort foods, interesting.  Guess I am more male minded since I also like soup.  This is a book one will probably pick up and re read and glean new information from.  Not preachy at all, but full of wise information and fun to boot
A delight to read!. What a beautifully written, perfectly executed book! I loved how Messud intertwined each generation's family history into the present history of the teen girl narrator, Sagesse. The sins of the father will visit upon the son, indeed....or in this case, the granddaughter. Messud's command of language is impressive and her prose is so lyrical and magical---perhaps a bit too lyrical for a 15-year old Algerian girl---but that is a minor point. The book itself is perfectly paced and exquisite. I highly recommend it
Now  he is not just a face on the dollar. At the end of the book I felt that I gained an idea of what Washington was really like. For me Mr. Ellis did bring stone to life. But also, unexpectedly, I found a little bit of comfort in reading this history in this time of war and trouble. Washington made a lot of mistakes, lost most of the battles but won the war anyway.
Rotten but loveable. Of all the books that I read to my son when he was young, "Rotten Ralph" was one of my--and his--favorites.  The artwork is incredible--very kinetic and colorful, a combination of Keith Haring and Outsider Art.  The story is written with great wit, and one can sympahize with the poor heroine trying to get her unruly cat to behave--kind of like she's the parent and Ralph's the child.  Yeah, Ralph's behavior is really rotten, but Sarah loves him anyway.  Sound familiar?  Like Maurice Sendak's "Where the Wild Things Are," "Rotten Ralph" project a child's fears to an imaginary realm where they can be dealt with safely.  It's a great piece of children's literature
Very good book. This book is very interesting. It looks to clutter from  the psychology point of view. I really recommend it.
interesting. Being that I spent some summers in Harlem with my Aunt and I have been there for the layman religous forum at that same Chock Full of Nuts I think the pamphet hits its mark but it is very important to understand that this was extracted out of the Authors 3 part volume.  Now those volumes are a must read if this book has interest you
If you have heard the words "It's Malignant" buy this book fast!. When a woman hears the words, "You have breast cancer" the next thing that should happen is that someone hands her a copy of this book. I bought this beautifully inspirational book as soon as I was diagnosed with breast cancer. Before I ever started learning about the disease or the treatments I needed to hear from women who had survived, and that is what this book is all about. My first question when I was diagnosed was "Am I going to die?" UPLIFT was the best medicine for me in the early days of diagnosis. I read every page within two days of my diagnosis, and only then was I able to face the challenge ahead of me. The stories of strength and courage infused me with a passion and energy to survive at a time when all I could see was darkness. This book is priceless. If you buy one inspirational book about dealing with breast cancer, make sure this is it, whether it's for yourself or for someone you know who has just been told, "It's malignant.
Guts, Glory and Real History. Broadsides is perfect for history buffs and for fans of Patrick O'Brian's Aubrey/Maturin novels, which are set in the same period. This is popular history in the Barbara Tuchman (Guns of August) manner: thoroughly researched by an expert who also has a fine sense of narrative drama (even the occasional footnotes are enjoyable): It's fun to read. It's &lt;thrilling&gt; to read.     The Age of Fighting Sail is conventionally put at about 160 years; author Miller has confined himself to the last quarter or so, and with good reason. The shorter time span narrows his focus and lets him richly detail on a period that needs detailed coverage. After all, at this time Britain was frequently in conflict with the US, then Bonaparte, then all of the countries that deserted the British cause to join Boney--or later deserted Boney to join Britain. Only details can reduce the confusion.    Here's an example of the value of detail: Most Americans learn in basic history class that Washington and Cornwallis somehow found themselves at Yorktown together, where Cornwallis just threw in the towel and--bang!--just like that the American Revolution ended. Miller shows that Cornwallis, hunting for glory, exhausted him army in a series of useless victories, fought too far inland for the Royal Navy to support or supply him, and then had to run to Yorktown in hope of being evacuated by the British fleet. But the French fleet got there first (by pure luck) and the Royal Navy's failure to trounce it was a perfect example of hidebound, backward tactics that took no risks but gained no glory. The over-cautious British admiral had protected his career and reputation but, as another historian put it, &quot;He had merely lost Amnerica.&quot;    As the American Revolution ends and the French begins, Miller shows British seapower on the cusp of change, at last moving away from risk-averse tactics under the urging of a generation of more daring commanders: Pellew, Howe, Collingwood, Jervis and the immortal, incomparable Nelson. Many of their battles were as exciting in fact as they are in the movies.    There's excellent material on the faltering beginnings of the American navy too, which (for example) Thomas Jefferson was mightily in favor of until, as president, he decided he didn't want to pay for it.    The cast of characters is superb: the British fighters mentioned above and scheming Boney, of course, but also the usual crew of addlepates and blockheads in the Admiralty; Captain Bligh (not the sadist he's been painted as); hilariously inept French and Spanish admirals; even worse British generals (except for the miraculous Arthur Wellesley--later the Duke of Wellington); and the odd, cross-grained collection of self-interested citizen-patriots of the American Revolution.     Nathan is especially good at distinguishing between naval combat and seapower; with brisk, incisive strokes he shows how all those blockades and sinking ships affected alliances and strategy. O'Brian fans will especially appreciate this because it will enable them to re-read the entire Aubrey/Maturin series with greater grasp of the period and the issues.--Bill Marsan
Excellent Book for those looking for hope. I read this book several years ago and it has been  very importan not only in my personal growth as well as being a book I highly recommend for my clients.  Borysenko's ability to write in a profound meaning manner, while  not resorting to technical language.. makes this and other books by her  accessible for laymen.  If you would like to find a light out of the  &quot;dark nights of the soul&quot;, this is the book to read
Newbies beware!. If this is your first Suzanne Brockmann novel, STOP! The "Troubleshooters" series is best read in sequence.  The characters are reappearing and their stories build through out the books.  Understanding the history of the storyline is most significant in "Gone Too Far" which explains the discrepancy in the previous reviews.I always appreciate the characterization which Ms. Brockmann utilizes in her stories.  She is a superb story teller who teases her readers with bits and pieces of stories about old and new characters.  This makes her series a pleasure to read for those who have traveled with her along her journey... but can be frustrating and confusing to others who come in during the middle of things.After reading the entire series in a frenzied month or two, I personally hope to read more about Sam and Alyssa in the future.
McElligot's Pool. I think this book is very good because it shows all the posibilaties that you can find in McElligot's Pool... from a short fish to a fish that is many times as big as a whale that it makes a whale look like a tiny sardine! I also think that this is an amazing book because it makes you think that a lake, pond, or pool may be connected to the sea and that you can get any type of fish from the gulf coast or anywhere. I would recomend this book to anyone because it is really creative, imaginative, and entertaininG
Full of Laughs!. I LOVED this book! Dot Frank has become one of my favorite authors in the past few years, after I read "Sullivan's Island". I laughed out loud so much I even surprised myself! Not only can the woman write comedy, but she is able to make her characters seem like real people you would know. So, if you like to read and laugh at the same time, read Dot Frank! Oh, and the recipes that come with her other novels are some of the best!
Great and with taste!. I got really really [excited] browsing this book!! There are real photos but the book is not nasty or raunchy and might serve to spice up your sex life
The sprawl-buster's decoder book. Dolores Hayden's intriguing book visually decodes fifty-one examples of bad building in the landscape and the use of aerial photography to do this was a good idea, sprawl by its nature stretches off into the horizon but when seen at ground-level could seem pretty ordinary.  Some of the differences though, especially with domestic dwellings, seem a bit arbitrary, there are seven examples of housing shown which, to me, don't seem that different.  With commercial sprawl it is easy to understand the visual differences, from 'Rural slammer' (Soledad) to 'Tank farm' (part of the port of Houston)Though the book is primarily visual, with seventy-five well chosen aerial photos used to illustrate the categories, I thought the essay on the first ten pages was first class in explaining the reasons behind sprawl, basically the fault of those folk in Washington allowing commercial interests to favor suburban white populations and male-headed households during the last few decades. The back of the book has a useful bibliography, list of websites and index.Jim Wark's aerial photos were used by the author to carefully explain the categories and you can see several hundred other examples of his work in 'America' (ISBN 8854400033).  If you like aerial photos have a look at Alex MacLean's book 'Designs on the Land' (ISBN 0500284148) with over four hundred stunning color photos of what is happening commercially on the ground.Though a large number of Americans live in the sprawl environment (and by choice, too) it is worth remembering that over ninety percent of the US is still open land.  This fascinating book is a useful visual guide to how bad things can get.
The BOOK for Telecommunications. This should be a mandatory book for anyone working in the telecommunications industry. Not only is it comprehensive, but the explanations are direct, easily understood and sometimes humorous. Anyone who uses "oxymoron" in an explanation gets my vote
Do yourself a favor and read this book. I was hooked upon reading the opening paragraph: "When I walk into a bookstore, any bookstore, first thing in the morning, I'm flooded with a sense of hushed excitement...books of facts and truths, books newly written and those first read centuries before, books of great relevance and of absolute banality...standing in the middle of this confluence, I can't help but feel the possibility of the universe unfolding a little, once upon a time."He goes on to share not only his love of books, his personal history with books (we find out the 'one' that transformed him from a person who read because it was required into one of us, a book addict), but also the actual history of books - clay tablets to papyrus to paper, printing, booksellers over the centuries - in a fascinating manner.And he makes one of the greatest book addict statements ever:"I am promiscuous when it comes to bookstores".If that statement is true for you, you should read this book
Everything but UFOs... This book is like an episode of Deadwood run through the Looney Tunes blender. It's a horror movie, a jailbreak, an addictive page-turning literary ambush--Southern/Western Gothic meets Grand Guignol. Great stuff.
Fantastic Shakespeare Resource. This is a fantastic Shakespeare Resource for the everyday person who is interested in knowing more. Spread out clearly with plenty of pictures and interesting facts - this book is a joy to flick through and offers easy to find information.Really, really good
An excellent resource. This book provides an excellent guide for moving from theory to practice!  Each frame of reference is clearly delineated and the application to practice section of each frame of reference demonstrates how it can be used.  It is a critical resource for providing theory based interventions.  Good background information is provided for becoming a good, well rounded pediatric practitioner
Profound Observations. The art of Virginia Woolf gathers in this small yet profoundly moving observation of the cycle of life.  A garden in July becomes a canvas upon which Woolf paints a new and haunting picture of her intricate perspective.  Flowers seem more like immense stained glass windows from the vantage point of the snail making its way through a flower bed.  Minute clips of towering passersby illustrate the human experience where so much is anything but what it appears to be on the surface.  The flower bed magically transforms through the hypnotic prose becoming an endless landscape of challenge, yet more importantly a sacred cathedral wherein the vulnerable snail, a methaphor for the individual, carefully negotiates life inside the surrounding looming beauty.  This story crys to be read out loud, and when it is, it shines and verifies the genius of its conception
Score one for concept-attainment lessons!. I constantly struggle to clearly present the abstract concept of the parts of speech.  Heller's Language Series is a wonderful help in this task.  The illustrations are beautiful, the rhyming instructional/example-filled poetry is fun to read, and the book could be used with a wide variety of ages!  Thank you Ruth Heller
Daughters of the River Huong. DAUGHTERS OF THE RIVER HUONG: A Vietnamese royal concubine and her descendants by Uyen Nicole DuongISBN 1-928928-16-I, U.S.:RavensYard Publishing, Ltd, Trade paperback,  271 pp.SRP $17.95Uyn Nicole D??ng's "Daughters of the River H??ng: A Vietnamese royal concubine & her descendants" is a historical work that I've just discovered and feel compelled to say is among the ranks of great contemporary epic novels. If it weren't for the fictionalized aspect of this true-to-life love story, it could well be an interestingly humanist, thoroughly researched female study that delves into a century of tumultuous history in Vi?t Nam: from French colonial time to the revolutionary struggle for independence to today's socialist cum capitalist society.Hers is a refreshing voice adding to our understanding of the Vietnam conflict.While good writers transcend their geographical origins with the universality of the human condition, their literary style depends in large measure on the skillful hand of translators. D??ng's original English work faces no such barrier; her poetic prose stands on its own.Yet, few of the current Vietnamese American writers have lived through the period that they have written about, nor have the breadth of their novels reached the historical scope or touched the height of human emotion as this work.What separates it from her earlier contemporaries, such as B?o Ninh's "The Sorrow of War" and D??ng Thu H??ng's "Paradise of the Blind," is her novel's mass appeal. What we have here is the making of a movie that spans four generations and three continents, from present-day Manhattan to ancient Hu? to romantic Paris, to Texas, and back to Si Gn.The book, from RavensYard Publishing, progresses from the French empire in Vi?t Nam to the dying days of colonialism, when descendants of royal concubine Huy?n Phi began to take roots in the mystical Violet City of Hu?, to the American involvement and its untimely debacle.At the center of the action, the main character transforms from a humble paddle girl on the river H??ng to matriarch of her bloodline.The novel's early plot reminds us of "The Year of Living Dangerously" and "The Killing Fields," in which brave and endearing foreign reporters stay back to witness the fall of the city, as it changes hands, as well as to see the plight of the people. In this case, Christopher Sanders, an American journalist with a major news network from New York, is the hero who saved the beautiful and virginal Vietnamese Lolita from an uncertain fate and brought her to his country.The tale of survival is told from several women's point of views, all inexorably connected to the uncrowned empress Huy?n Phi and her extinct kingdom of Champa.Multigenerational as the saga maybe, the heroine shines as the thread that links all her descendants' trials and tribulation and helps make sense of their complex history. No doubt, the scholarly and methodical training of the author's law background helped her to structure her work, with the result being a systematic, albeit cinematic, presentation of nuances and themes.I cannot help but think of this story as autobiographical, given the parallel in the author's life and the beautiful and hopeless romantic Si (or Mi Uyn) as the novel's heroine. So much so that readers of the Occident camp may want to claim her (the heroine, not the author) as their own given her unabashed and persistent love for her French Romeo (Andre Foucault) and her wish to rejoin her benign American husband (Christopher Sanders)."Why did you come to me in New York City? You owed me no obligation...""Because," I (Si) whispered, "I wanted to know with certainty I had boarded the plane." Somewhere I still heard the angry roaring sound of the last helicopter atop the U.S. Embassy... Standing in the heart of the new Saigon I began to rediscover my feelings for Andre, persistent and haunting since childhood... He was the only one outside of the culture who understood the bond between my soul and those of all the women in my bloodline."Perhaps her book, through its first person narrative, would speak directly to those secret fantasy and dark yearnings, while readers of the Asian camp may wonder why - except for an ephemeral treatment of emperor Thu?n Thnh - other Asian male characters take such minor and roles in her book.Yet the appeal is precisely that transcendental need for empathy which reaches across cultural and geographical boundaries in spite of its nationalist fervor that's steep in folklore. This universal theme of love and loss, of eternal waiting, of heroic female struggles becomes the cry, wailing out for human connection in our war-weary world.Nguyen-Khoa Thai An
A Must Read for CEO's. I have been a coach and counselor to CEO's for much of my adult life.  When you think of integrity, you first think of being honest or truthful.  Henry Cloud takes integrity to a whole new level.  He makes you think about the term in new ways!  You think about not only being productive, but also about transforming your productivity to a whole new level of leadership.  Integrity will challenge any CEO reader to a new level of thoughtfulness, depth, and results.  I highly recommend the book for any CEO or aspiring leader.Doug WilsonCEONext Solutions, Inc.
Good pointers for those just starting out....... Being a recent college graduate, you look for good advice from a reliable source.  Mr. Dietl has a solid background of success under his belt from his days as a New York City Detective.  So it would only seem that his success would carry on to the private sector.  The book includes networking tips for various situations you may find yourself in.  I would definitely recommend it for people like me as well as people who have been in the business world for years.
Bill Moggridge's Masterpiece. I made the mistake of opening the Amazon box yesterday.  It contained Bill Moggridge's brand new 766 page book Designing Interactions. I have several talks to prepare and a bunch of other stuff to do, but I forgot all about them once I started reading the book. Bill has been at ground zero of the design thinking movement for 30+ years, starting has own industrial engineering firm years and then joined David Kelley, Mike Nuttall to form IDEO, as what was then the first full service design firm, and has now broadened to become an innovation firm that helps companies develop innovative products, processes, customer experiences and organizational designs.  I've known Bill for about a decade and have always been touched by both his grace and brilliance, and range of skills -- and they are all on display in this beautiful book. Bill is perhaps best known as the designer of the Grid, the first laptop computer in 1981, but that is just one of the many, many designs he has contributed to.This book --using interviews with many of the most influential and important people and their stories in the product design and innovation world over the past 30 years or so --  demonstrates what design thinking is and how great people do it.  Read it, studying it, talk about it. I've read a lot of books on creativity and design, I've try to study it, teach it, apply it myself, but while there is a lot of good stuff out there, this is the masterpiece, the top of the pops.If you are going to read one book on how to do creative work in the real world, this is it.  The 700 images, the stories, the writing are all relentlessly beautiful and instructive.Not only that, the process that Bill used to create the book also is an example of the design thinking and action at its best -- the process and the product demonstrate why Bill is known as one of the most skilled designers in the world (and I mean both technically and socially skilled). I had heard about the book a bit from Bill, as I was amazed to hear that he was -- with help from key people at IDEO and his social network -- producing  everything in the book himself, writing all the words, doing all the interviews with 40 or so designers and innovators who are the main focus of the book -- everyone from Doug Englebart (inventor of the computer mouse) to Google's Larry Page to Wil Wright (creator of the Sims), to designing the layout and cover, to using desktop publishing and video editing software to himself to bring it all together.  In fact, I confess that although I have made it through the text, I haven't even looked at the DVD yet that is included with the book, and as I've implied, Bill also produced.In the name of full disclosure, I am an IDEO Fellow and have known and admired Bill for along time. But I know and admire lots of people who write books on creativity and innovation.  This is the masterpiece in my view.  This book is published by MIT Press -- which has had few of any books at the top of the best-seller list in its history -- and it is about 500 pages longer than most books that are slated to be hit sellers.  But it deserves to be a best seller given the current clamoring for creativity and innovation throughout the world.  Designing Interactions only costs $26.37 on Amazon -- and it has more useful information and inspiration than any 10 other books you are likely to buy that are vaguely related to the subject -- and they don't have a DVD.Now I have to go back to my other chores and resist the temptation to watch the DVD for another couple days.  It is 100 minutes!P.S. Checkout the Designing Interactions Website -- you can see video clips from the DVD there and read a sample chapter. The URL is http://www.designinginteractions.com
My favorite of the Dresden Files. At a nadir from the events in Grave Peril, Summer Knight takes Harry from lowest point and brings his life back together.  We learn more about the youth and making of the most interesting Wizard PI ever written.This is my favorite Dresden File, and I write this as book number eight was recently released.What makes this one so great?  We get to see Harry work as a detective, and are with him as he makes revelation after revelation across the bad hand of conflicting obligations he is dealt.  Stuck with satifying a Faerie Queen, the White Council, his friends, himself, and sort of saving the world, Harry Dresden truly gets his act together and steps up to the challenge.Butcher wrote this believable with rich details to a break-neck narrative pace.  I can't forget the touching emotional scenes or the humorous parts. In short, the multi-layered plot and richness of character in this novel is rare in all fiction.  Appreciate it.Summer Knight also gets away from the vampires and more into the supernatural background behind the world of Harry Dresden, which was a big plus for me.  Lots of urban fantasy authors seem stuck at one supernatural aspect, but Butcher breaks that mold.In conclusion, if you like fantasy and don't have this book, buy it!  You'll want to read it again.  I don't care if you haven't read the rest of the series, buy it anyway.  The book is that good
Excellent Book Re: Coaching. I have been cosidering pursuing a career as a "life coach" for some time now.  In an effort to ensure that this is the correct path for me, I decided to purchase this book to enhance my knowledge of what coaching is all about - hoping that it would give me an "eagles-eye" view of what to expect, and the tools I may be using.After reading "Coach Anyone...", I can honestly say that I have obtained a much better idea of the role of the life coach.  On top of this, it provided me with many different ideas, models & methods to consider using in my own practice, as well as ways to counter the pitfalls that may occur.  Ideas on how to build a coaching business is also included.Overall, I would highly recommend this book to both the novice and professional alike.  Whether you've already started your coaching career, or are just wondering what coaching is all about, this book will provide invaluable insights to help you along the way
Good book. If you want to learn what is openGL and how to create 3d graphics using this library, this book is perfect. But if you need more, such as collision detection, 3d engine design, game programming ..., you should choose another book
GREAT TIME TRAVEL NOVEL. I stumbled across this title from another readers list and tracked down a copy at our library. It was well worth the search! Not a romance but just a great read...I couldn't put it down
Thorough as usual. You know you're in for a long read when the original hardcover came in two volumes!  But anyone familiar with Michener knows not to be put off by that.  As with his other "fictionalized histories," the stories here - and there are many - are a fairly good reflection of what really happened in the place being profiled.  This time, it's South Africa, and the time span is from prehistory to 1979, with a heavier concentration on more recent decades.Writing just over a decade before apartheid fell, Michener really does seem to have tried to comprehend the incomprehensible as to how that shameful chapter of history came to pass.  As usual, his anti-heroes are presented evenhandedly, leaving the reader to recognize their flaws.  There are, of course, plenty of those, and they at least keep the very long book flowing pretty well.  Throughout the 1200 or so pages, his historical research is impressive as always.  The book's one shortcoming is that it does try to encompass so much over such a long time, so after a while its own references to past events become confusing to the reader.  Helpfully, there are genealogy charts for the major families in the back of the book, but even those sometimes left me barely able to recall the events referred to a few hundred pages down the road.And how does it all end?  Without giving anything away, I can say it's interesting in retrospect to see what Michener - or at least his characters - were expecting in 1979 and when they thought it would come to pass.  If you like his other historical epics, you'll probably like this one too
DO NOT GO TO DISNEYLAND W/O READING THIS BOOK!. This book was my bible for our trip to Disneyland.  We traveled w/ 2 young children and so many of the tips and advise in this book was irreplaceable.  We also purchased Birnbaum's Disneyland Resort 2005 : Expert Advice from the Inside Source (Birnbaum's Disneyland) which was a good book too, but since it's the "authorized" version, you feel like you are looking through rose colored glasses as you read the book.  Whereas the Unofficial Guide to Disneyland was GREAT for giving you all the pros AND CONS, not just "DisneyLand is great, buy all our souveniers"...LOL!!!  Birnbaum's book served kinda as an over-view for me, whereas the Unofficial Guide got into the nitty gritty of really helping me enjoy my vacation to the fullest.
Good Overview on Southeast Asia. Clark Neher, professor of political science and director of the Center for Southeast Asian Studies at Northern Illinois University, presents a comprehensive view of Southeast Asia. Having lived in Thailand and the  Philippines for seven years, Neher shows clear understanding of the present  situations in the region.  	Neher points out that there is great  diversity in the region. Other than geographical proximity and a colonial  past, there is little that link the nations in this region to be seen as a  coherent whole.  The primary focus of the book deals mostly with the  process of modernization especially within the twentieth century up to the  time of his writing, and how the Southeast Asian countries fit in the New  International Era. Thus the whole outlook of the book deals almost  exclusively with political and economic developments since the World War  II.  	After a brief introduction to the region and its emergent  importance in the international scene, Neher gives an overview of each of  the ten Southeast nations, namely, Thailand, the Philippines, Indonesia,  Malaysia, Singapore, Brunei, Burma, Vietnam, Cambodia, and Laos. However,  the report on each nation was not evenly dealt with. I feel that a  disproportionate coverage was given to Thailand and the Philippine compared  to the other nations. His overview of these two nations took up almost 80  pages, whereas only 140 pages were given to the remaining eight nations.   This does not reflect good scholarship when the author did not provide a  reason for it, especially when one realizes that the author had actually  resided in these two countries for seven years.  	Furthermore, although  the third edition was published in 1999, most of the latest updates were  given up to early 1998. Most of these additions were single-paragraph  add-ons of news without further analysis. A reader seeking understanding of  the latest development of the financial crisis finds little helpful  understanding of the situation. One would expect better analysis of the  situation since it has far reaching consequences in the global scene.  This  lack of coverage betrays the intent of the author to present Southeast Asia  in the New International Era and the fact that it was revised in 1999.  One  serious mistake was the addition of a paragraph detailing political change  in 1998 in Indonesia by mistake in the section that deals with Malaysia.  	 Neher's presentation gives a lucid account on how each of the Southeast  Asian countries grappled with democratization in the postwar era as each  was trying to gain economic and political stability. For example in  Thailand, the traditional culture of venerating the monarch gives it unique  stability even in the face of numerous coups and military rule. The King  intervened successfully in each case, thus was able to avert bloodshed even  when the country went through many changes of government.   	In recent  years, Southeast Asia has enjoyed relative peace and stability that brought  economic boom to the region. Such economic success did not occur evenly in  all the Southeast Asian countries. Burma, Laos, and Cambodia remained  isolated; while Indonesia has its fare share of political unrest. However,  as the author points out, most of the Southeast Asian nations are moving  fast, though each at different pace, toward modernization
Most complete and understandable book on Essence. Susan is a long time (over 20 years) personal friend of mine and we have both followed the same spiritual path during this time.  Her book is so lucid and easy to understand.  She gives a great introductory perspective  in the first 3 chapters: Origins, Ancient Wisdom, &amp; Modern Research and  then she spends about 250 pages on the subject of Centers and Body Type,  two aspects of our human essence.  It's filled with easy to understand  examples, plus she has photos of real people (most of them I know and can  attest to the accuracy of her perceptions from years of my own  observations) to illustrate types.  This is an amazing book at an amazing  price!!!  I reccommend it to fellow spiritual travelers all the time, as it  is one of the keys to self knowledge.  If you don't know who or what you  are, how can you become anything more?  Go for it!!!  Thankyou Susan :-
Body versus mind. The fairly plain life of Scott Carey, this book's title character, gets unusual when he starts to shrink by one-seventh of an inch per day after being exposed to radiations; despite the efforts of various doctors, no cure is in sight. This bodily transformation doesn't do much to his mind: though many times smaller, Scott still is pervaded by the same desires (mostly sexual). In fact, if his situation irritates him at first, it's mainly since he becomes smaller than his wife - he feels more like a boy than a man. Financial problems resurface, as he can't work for his brother anymore. By being reduced to such a little size, he now has to think, something which he wasn't used to; predictably, it makes him uncomfortable. Less than one inch tall and the prisoner of his house's cave, the end seems near; but when the occasion of getting out arises, he can't resist and is lead by pure exhaltation, no longer afraid of death. After a night of sleep, he wakes up in a whole new world which marks the next step of his voyage. For this to be possible, his body had to be reduced to... almost nothing
A Lifesaver. This is a great book.  It would be great for the avid runner, but I think it speaks especially to those who want to be active, but don't know where to start.  I have been running for 4 weeks now, and though that isn't very long, I can tell a huge difference in my physical shape as well as my overall demeanor.  The book is a conversational read and your never left feeling like you're not good enough or you're not qualified.  It teaches that everyone can be a runner with will power and self-determination.
Outstanding collection of problems. This book contains roughly 1900 problems in 45 years of IMO history. Most of the problems are accompanied with a solution. This is an excellent resource for anyone preparing for a high calibre math contest such as olympiads or the William Lowell Putnam Mathematical Competition.This book also has an extremely comprehensive collection of definitions and theorems which span from analysis to algebra to combinatorics in the first part of the book, which is a nice summary of tools useable on math contests and in math courses
Ex tenebris lux. Once again John has written a very resourceful book that is sure to solve those late night ponderings in search of the obscure.  See you in lodge Frater
Vibrant and healing. A text that will change the way you look at the passing of the physical body. Not only does it provide another culture's way of honoring the soul's process, but it enlightens the reader in living more fully. Sogyal Rinpoche is as vibrant in person as an author - combining eastern thought with western mentalities
The ONLY Buffett book you'll ever need. Usually biography of a person like Buffett would be dull and slow, but not this one. Although there are no usual "Warren Buffett Way" tips on stock picking, the book uncovers various aspects of Buffett's life, which has great implications on how Buffett grew into what he is today.Two thumbs up! Another great great book by Roger Lowenstein.Did I mention it's the only Buffett book you'll ever need
Lady Windermere. I have always enjoyed all of Oscar Wilde's works, but this is not very good compared with the others, but none the less  still worth reading. The characters were sort of dull, but the plot intresting which made up for it. I'd reccomend this to fans of Oscar Wilde, but if you have just discovered Wilde, skip this and start with either, "The picture of dorian gray" or "the importance of being Earnest"
Brilliant Work by the Best T'ang Scholar Yet. This work is brilliant. That said, don't pick this up expecting to read cover to cover. View it more as a thematically-organized encyclopedia of T'ang exotics and you'll enjoy the experience much more. A must-read for any student of the T'ang period
Thank you. THank you for the book.  It arrived very fast and I can't wait to use it in my class
Enjoyable reading... and does help to change the way we see.  The excercises suggested are awesome to do. The photographs offered impressive. Best suggestion: Do the excersises. (We do learn by doing).  I read and did and my vision was expanded. (Never had I considered taking a photograph for texture!) Of the photography books I have thus far this is one of the best
Fascinating Read!!. It seems that today people are becoming more aware of the danger that hurricanes pose, especially after the Gulf's devestation from Katrina, Wilma, and Rita; the four hurricanes to strike the Florida coast in 2004, and now Cyclone Larry which devestated Northern Queensland, Australia. Hurricanes are becoming a much talked about and even debatable topic of how to prepare, track, and live with these storms that are now on the rise.The reader's of Isaac's Storm will get a sense that no matter what time period you live in, hurricanes prove to be a great threat if not treated with respect and caution.  This was the deadliest natural disaster to strike the United States. Many people will say this was because it happened over 100 years ago, therefore the technology and warning system was not as advanced, but Katrina proved this to be wrong.While reading this book I was able to pull many similarities from the Galveston Hurricane and Katrina.  Most of the people to have perished in both hurricanes was due to flooding. Galveston and New Orleans are surrounded by a body of water on both sides.  Although many people did not heed the warning in Galveston (since there was no official warning), Katrina victims had ample warning, and either refused or could not leave the area under certain circumstances.Erik Lawson gives a very detailed account of what had happened that night on September 8, 1900.  But even before he depicts the magnitute of this atrocity he goes back in time to explain how weather became a science and hurricanes were discovered by man.  After the storm has passed, the author continues to recount the aftermath and the struggle for Galveston to revive itself to it's former glory (it never has).Isaac's Storm is a fantastic, intereting read for anyone who is interested in weather or life altering events.  If anything, you will gain a new respect for hurricanes and it may prompt you to listen and leave if you ever have to face an evacuation
great for woman preparing for  labor. When I purchased this book it was out of print.  Although the version of the book I purchased(1976 Copyright) was a little dry the information in this book helped me understand what happens when we relax.  This understanding really helped me with his exersizes as well as ones I found in other books.  A must if you want to go natural
An Eye Opener Indeed. Professor Karsh is phenomenal.  He understands Islamic history much better than any of my Moslem Professors.  The book does trace the history of Islam from its inception.  While it is difficult for a Moslem to see the Prophet criticized (we are not allowed to criticize any Prophet, including Christian and Jewish ones), I have to admit it is hard to challenge the author.  He is factual and analytical.  He writes remarkably well.  Most impressive is his possession of enormous facts.  While it will never happen, I believe he should be invited to Al Azhar and be listened to.  We Muslims are not sufficiently critical of our past
Thorough!. Linda Goodman keeps it real, understanding that nothing is definate and everything changes. The reason I love astrology is because I feel it helps me deal with the sometimes social awkwardness of life -- and Linda Goodman's books are very detailed.  You should also try SUN SIGNS by LINDA GOODMAN, it's like this book, but has nothing to do with love.love her
Gentle as a Lamb. Sheep are appealing creatures, known for being gentle.  Indeed, our very lexicon includes the expression, "gentle as a lamb," so it comes as no suprise that many delightful books for pre-schoolers involve sheep in some form.  The ovine theme works like a charm in this book.  It takes its place among other good ovine literature such as "Sherman the Sheep" and "Sheep in a Jeep."This book does a nice job of blending fact and fantasy.  Sheep are drawn in pastoral settings, happily eating daisies, grass and clovers as well as being anthropormorphized and engaged in human activites such as fixing a car; sleeping in a bed; taking baths and dancing.Young children will find that this book will keep their attention.  The language is clear and direct without overdoing; the point is made right off the bat.  Cognitive concepts such as color, up, down, in and out are included.  One can also interpret the sheep of many colors, blue, red, etc. as being a metaphor for diversity and acceptance.  The Quest for the Green Sheep makes for very humorous reading indeed.The writing, together with the excellent illustrations make for a very nice package indeed.  Regardless of level of degree in matters ovine, readers and listeners alike will enjoy the pure fun of this book.  People of all ages will laugh at the ovine antics and get a charge out of finding out the whereabouts of that green sheep!
It was awsome and I learned so much. I learned lots of different knots.  Some I never even heard of.  Plus it comes with all the things you need
A Beautiful (Lesbian) Love Story. Liza has a pretty normal life in New York, living with her parents and brother and attending a very small private school.  She has a couple of friends but has never really connected with anyone in her class.  Liza is just biding her time until she goes to MIT to study architecture.  One day while she is at a museum trying to gain inspiration for a senior project, she meets Annie, a girl with a beautiful voice and dark secretive eyes.Immediately Liza and Annie hit it off.  Liza isn't sure why she is so drawn to this girl, but she knows that she is happy whenever Annie calls and is thrilled and nervous to be around her.  When they are together, Annie and Liza are hesitantly getting closer and closer until one day Annie kisses Liza.  Liza isn't sure what to do or how to react, but she knows that she feels more for Annie than she has ever felt for anyone in her life.  Gradually she begins to come to terms with the fact that she is probably gay.Life as a gay teenager is difficult.  Annie and Liza are always worried about showing affection for each other, and there is no place where they can really be themselves without being found out.  Then Liza agrees to feed the cats of a couple of teachers at her school who live together.  Suddenly there is a private place for Liza and Annie to go.  But will the fact that they are carrying on a relationship there jeopardize the careers of the teachers who live there?I loved the characters in this book and the sensitivity with which they were portrayed.  Annie and Liza were very realistic and easy to sympathize with.  I also liked the way the story was told, alternating Liza trying to write a letter with her memories of the previous year.  I was mostly happy ith the ending, too, although I didn't really like the way Ms. Widmer and Ms. Stevenson accepted their fate without a fight
Well plotted story. Kinsey Millhone, former cop turned PI, is back on a case when an expensively dressed woman hires her..money upfront, to locate her missing sister, Elaine, who was seen leaving her local apartment to fly to her summer retreat in Boca, but hasn't been seen since. As Elaine was wearing a $12,000 lynx coat and hat when she left, she'd be difficult to miss, so Kinsey flies to Florida to try to pick up her trail. Elaine's disappearance coincides with a murder/arson case in the building next to hers, so Kinsey enlists the willing help of an almost crippled but very mentally alert old lady, a neighbour of Elaine's in her apartment building, to point her in the right direction towards solving the case. I thought I was pretty smart and thought that I'd worked it all out, halfway through the book, but..no..there was a twist to the tale and a bucket full of red herrings to lead the reader astray. I always enjoy the Kinsey Millhone stories as she's not too gorgeous, not too clever, just persistent and methodical
Protein Power Lifeplan. This an excellent guide for health improvement.   It isn't possible to evaluate the effectiveness of the method until the knowledge obtained can be put to use over a period of time and conclusions drawn
WE ARE SPIRIT BEINGS HAVING A HUMAN EXPERIENCE. DR. DYER HAS CAPTURED THE MEANING OF LIFE, AND EXPRESSES IT SO SIMPLICTICALLY THAT IT IS UNMISTAKABLE.  A MUST READ
A mixture of Biography, History, Science, and Speculation. What is it that connects us to each other, and perhaps connects us across time. Lyall Watson is a gifted scientist who suggests some provocative possibilities in simple prose. If you don't want to think about his speculations you will still be entertained by his biographical adventures about South African Bushmen and Elephants. The only reason I didn't give it five stars is that the author spends a lot of time telling the history of various Elephant herds and the men who slaughtered so many of them, and that's really a separate tale (or is it tail?
Great New Genre Cussler Has Created!. I just read through the first two Oregon books and was looking for the third in the series. I noticed from the reviews on it that Mr. Cussler has listened to the whiners and changed the series. What a shame! No, this is not a Dirk Pitt book. He is still doing those for people who need a mindless read. If you enjoy reading the exact same formula over and over and over and over, Dirk Pitt is still there for you. He's even been joined by Kurt Austin so you don't have to wait so long for a new book to come out. The Dirk Pitt and Numa Files books have their place and I enjoy them for what they are - good, simple entertainment.But for those of us who appreciate something more, the Oregon series is a whole new revelation. It is Mission Impossible on the high seas. Mr. Cussler had created a whole new sub-genre to the adventure novel. Like a great movie, I have spent the past 2 weeks reading and re-reading Golden Buddha and Sacred Stone to get every last morsel that is in them. They are adventure books for thinkers!I was surpised to read on here that this book had no suspense. It has tons of suspense! With all that is going on, you are always surprised at what pops up next. Yet, it all comes together eventually. Unlike the Dirk Pitt novels, you can't guess what is coming before you pick the book up. From cover to cover, the reader is kept guessing at what is going to happen to crew and how they will overcome the obstacles that crop up. Will they make it throught the sewers before the dye and the police catch up with them? Will they have to alter their plans due to the flooding? Will someone on the crew die in the escape? Suspenseful!The Oregon Files books are the finest new series I've read in 10 years. I hope that Mr. Cussler and his publisher have looked beyond those who complain that they have to think to read this book and leave the other two series to them. You have something truly special here. Keep the Oregon Files as they are in the first two books. You do that and I'll buy every one you put out. (More than once too, because I'll be giving the books away for others to read.)The books are perfect!One suggestion though. How about a .lit version to keep on my computer? I'm running out of shelf space with all the physical versions I've bought
still damned funny. Okay -- having read every single one of Barry's books, I'd agree that this is not his absolute funniest, but I still laughed out loud every other page or so.  I consider Barry the most hilarious writer alive, bar none.  This  may not be his funniest book, but it's still funnier than 99% of the other  books out there
Finding Fish. Finding Fish, by Antwone Fisher, is a passionate and heart wrenching look into the life of the author as a ward of the state. Thankfully, he escapes the terrors of his childhood and eventually finds success. Fisher writes with a distinctive voice. He is able to convey the emotions of the young boy he portrays in the memoir, rather than telling the story through the voice of an adult. The memoir is an honest, and shocking, look into the world of an orphan without anyone to protect him. His father had been shot two months before his birth and his mom is in prison. Throughout his life with the Picketts,his foster parents, Antwone is forced through horrific events that are painful to read about. He is molested at a young age by a babysitter, beaten, mentally abused, and treated like a ghost. He becomes reserved and shy, lacking love and the comfort of a family. Even worse, his social workers are sadly oblivious to the abuse because the Picketts are able to transform into respectable and polite adults when in public. Remarkably, Antwone braves through his torturous childhood, as well as homelessness for a short time, and finds himself in the Navy. This becomes his miracle, and inspires him to do more with his life. He finds himself traveling around the world, educating himself about different cultures as well as teaching himself English with the help of a thesaurus. In comparison to his childhood, Antwone is in paradise. This transition from a hopeless child with no allies in the world to a strong, successful Navy officer illustrates a major theme in the memoir. No matter how horrible somebody's life is, with perseverance and hope it is possible to achieve anything. Although Antwone is thrown into a terrible life, he finds his own success and thankfully escapes his past and finds happiness. This book is an emotional rollercoaster and any reader will become attached to Antwone, rooting for him against the negativity in his life.
A Year in the World. This was a vicarious year of trips for me.  Many of the places I'll never see, but I know how they are thanks to Frances!!!  Have bought the book as gifts for several people who love travel as much as I do
2005 Business Book of The Year. "Go It Alone! By Bruce Judson" is my 2005 business book of the year. It gave me a clear understanding of how to operate my websites and internet based services. "Go It Alone" explained to me (1.) the rationale behind outsourcing my internet infrastructure vs. paying a programmer to write the code or perhaps writing the code myself. (2.) It stated a compelling case for identify my core strengths and focusing on that while running any internet business. (3.) It gave me a clear idea of the competitive advantage that would accrue to me if I outsource all services that are not part of my core strength.(4.) It made a logical case for not providing services to myself or others that I cannnot sustain a competitive advantage over the long hau
Great adventure. Great book, and great idea.  Who would not want to take off work and follow the striper run, and tell the stories of those who part of striper lore.....Great read.
An Autobiography with an Engaging  Presentation of Research. MY AWAKENING is a captivating book that exemplifies how a student is to do a research [theme] paper.  Dr. Duke used autobiography to structure his awakening that was thoroughly researched, cross-checked and referenced.  His writing engages and draws you deeper into each of two topics using the facts and evidence; while his multiple sourced examples test the credibility of his sources.  Here you will see how racial differences evolve in geographically separated populations; and you will see how influential zionist leaders can maintain their culture of excusiveness while directing others to multiculturalism.  The author studied, awoke and was surprised by the discoveries.
Southern beauty of a novel. An excellent novel.  Pat Conroy is obviously a master of the English language with an expansive vocabulary.  Writes both the southern and northern ways of existence with ease.
Good introduction to some of the Celtic deities. I was pleasantly surprised by this one. Geared slightly towards a Wiccan audience, Carl McColman and Kathryn Hinds's "Magic of the Celtic Gods and Goddesses" nevertheless has something of value for anyone interested in Pagan Celtic religion. Many books about the Celtic deities are poorly researched, present unsubstantiated personal gnosis (UPG) as fact, or are just plain wrong (I seem to recall one horrifying book that presented "the hunter god Flidais, King Stag". Uh...). "Magic" does none of these things. Its scholarship is solid and well researched, the authors are careful to make it clear what's in the lore and what are derivative possibilities from it, and I didn't find a single factual error in the whole thing. Go, authors, go! They struck a good balance between practical inclusion of the deities in your daily life and adherence to the lore, between reviving and upholding ancient traditions and finding your way in the modern world. They addressed several basic common-sense Pagan 101 points that I thought were important, making the book very accessible to beginners. Those sections were slightly tedious for the more advanced reader, but I'm still glad they were there.The suggested correspondences of deities to times of the year it might be particularly appropriate to honor them is very focused around the Wiccan Wheel of the Year, so if you just celebrate the four Celtic festivals, that might be annoying. However, in fairness, the authors do present an appendix talking about the four Celtic festivals, the linguistic derivation of their names, and what they center around.  There is a really excellent thought-provoking bit comparing and contrasting the roles of Lugh and Brighid in dealing with hostile forces, and a related discussion of Brighid's role as a peacemaker in addition to her more usually focused on affinities.I don't always agree with the authors' UPG takes on the various deities, but they are careful to say things like "some see $foo as a modern-day deity of $bar", or "one might associate $foo with $bar", rather than the incorrect "$foo is $bar". And sometimes I did agree... their presentation of Brighid as goddess of high technology, based on Her role as a smith, is something I and other folks I know have been working with for years. So I'd definitely recommend this book to any Wiccans that are looking to get a better understanding of the Celtic deities... the authors did a better job than I would have thought possible of writing about the deities in a way that's not strongly cleaved to any particular Pagan religion. They leave the precise ritual framework and underlying assumptions up to the audience and their religious tastes.  The book is thought-provoking (it took me three weeks to get through it, even though it's relatively short) and worth the read
David Sedaris. Another collection of essays from a brilliant wit who you know you love to read. It's like I've said in my reviews before. There's no need to review each book when I can just give the author a blanket endorsement and guarantee you'll love whatever you find by the guy. I love it when that happens. I may have annoyed Jan by laughing out loud too often. Sedaris is like that.
Great lessons to lead by...Repetitious in some chapters. I read this book because I was doing a speech on leaders in one of my classes. I enjoyed his lessons that he presented in each chapter. I knew this would be good because he led NYC out of 9/11 which earned him Time's Man Of The Year for his leadership.Here are some of the lessons that he describes throughout the book so that you have an idea of what to expect.First Things FirstPrepare RelentlesslyBe Your Own ManReflect, Then DecideStudy. Read. Learn IndependentlyThose are a few of the chapter titles. These lessons are almost generic, but he does a good job of explaining how he uses them each day. Everyone has there own ways to lead, but Giuliani will go down as one of the greatest for his effort on 9/11. Other than it being by Giuliani there are not any new lessons to learn on leadership. You will just see the ones that he uses to lead
A challenge and a pleasure at the same proportion. To read Marcel Proust's "Remembrance of Things Past" is a pleasure and a challenge in the same proportion that any brave read can have. Not only is it a hard task, but also a very pleasant one. The books are written in such a way that readers are transported to another time and place, and get to know the characters as if they were old friends of ours. Of course, if it weren't like that, not many people would dare to try and read the seven novels that compound the whole series. But Proust is a master to keep your interested glued to his words. Even when this words are in a paragraph that lasts four pages."Swann's Way" is the first novel and it is a blessing and a curse at the same time. It is good because everything is new to us, so the `nameless' narrator takes his time to explain a lot of things, introduce people, describe places and the action is built up bit by bit. On the other hand, the reader is not used to Proust style and when we come across a paragraph that lasts four pages we get scared.To make things more complicated, when he was writing "Remembrance of Things Past" Proust wanted to make a novel, but he also wanted to philosophize. Therefore, there is a lot of philosophy in his books. At first this device seems to be difficult to understand, to get the gist, but with time, one gets used to it, and is able to realize that we're not supposed to read this books in the same way we read any other novel.Proust's work is about senses. He does not expect you to understand everything he is saying. His narrative is not cumulative. What he wants, in fact, is to make his reader feel what he was saying, to feel things like time passing through our lives and its effects on our memories. Bearing this in mind, any reader is able to focus on the poetic narrative and the author's idea rather than understanding the events.Of course there is a plot in the book, but there are things that are more important to produce the effect Proust wanted. "Swann's Way" begins with the `nameless' narrator remembering experiences from his childhood in Combray. But the largest section of the novel is not about him, but about Swann, a friend of his family. Fifteen years before the events described in the first part, Swann felt in love with Odette, a woman with a terrible reputation. And this love affair will affect his life forever.Despite Proust's language being evocative, it is not difficult to understand his sentences. His work is replete of references and allusions, mostly to visual arts, namely painting. Some descriptions are like the works of Monet and Botticelli. The writer also has interest in literature. The main character relationship to his mother echoes works as "Oedipus Rex".Qualities like these make "Remembrance of Things Past" one of the most important works produced ever. With his caldron of references, ideas and images, Proust has created one of the most beloved works from the XX Century. It is certain that this series of books will be read for many many years to come, and will be seen as a definition of what we used to think.
Let's Talk about Love. Let's Talk about LoveAnger.  Kidnapping.  Explicit sex.  Drugs.  These words describe just a few of the many topics that a reader can find in Han Nolan's Born Blue.  What the reader can expect from Nolan's novel is a heart-gripping, exciting journey of a young girl trying to find out what life and love are really all about.Born Blue is a story of a journey the main character, Janie, takes.  Janie has been in the foster care program since she was very young and, although her mother is still alive, disturbing circumstances do not allow her to care for Janie.  Our protagonist finds herself caught up in a whirlwind of events as she is kidnapped, moved from place to place, taken advantage of, and gets pregnant.  All the while, Janie has only her two passions to keeps her going; her love for "the ladies," Aretha Franklin, Ella Fitzgerald, Etta James, etc., and her hunger to become a famous singer herself move her along through the novel.At such a young age, Janie is scarred by the abandonment of her mother and therefore throughout the novel it appears that she eventually pushes away those that really care for her.  She finds love in her friend Harmon, Harmon's family, and others she meets along the way such as Cliff and Paul, yet each time it's as if Janie is going to push them away before they have a chance to leave her as her mother did.  Instead she finds her refuge in famous singers she does not even know rather than in actual relationships with other people.  Her vision of what love is and what life is about are severely obscured and it is not until one major event in her life that finally seems to open her eyes to reality.What is striking about this novel is the way that Nolan is able to make the reader both love and hate the main character so much.  One gets a feeling that he or she is growing up with Janie and, as a result, the reader longs for Janie to make decisions that will better her life.  When she makes the wrong ones, Nolan has written in such a way that the reader can easily become angry and could almost yell out loud at the girl running in the wrong direction.  The development of each character, in fact, is done so that readers can easily enter into the world of the novel.Without a doubt, adolescent readers will be drawn into this book.  With the risky topics and high point of action, Nolan will have young readers hooked on the plot and characters in Born Blue.  I believe that there is someone or some event that each and every young person can relate to and find him or herself in.  Even if the reader's life does not hold so many dramatic, life-changing events in it, he or she can relate to the feelings of being alone and sometimes seemingly unloved or the feelings of worrying about a friend in trouble.  Also, with the attachment to the characters as mentioned before, the adolescent reader can almost develop a sense of what it is like to be a parent or authority figure, who is just hoping for the best outcome.Basically what it comes down to is that Han Nolan's Born Blue is an enjoyable, fun, stay on the edge of your seat, type of novel that any reader will enjoy and be eager to keep reading till the end.
The finest political novel by an American writer. If I could give this book 15 stars, I certainly would. It is the finest political novel by an American writer. It has few rivals, maybe "I, Claudius" and "Claudius the God", both by Robert Graves, are as good, but students of history, political science or leadership will find "Lincoln" to be an exception work of literary art.There are several reasons why I so strongly recommend this book.First, this novel demonstrates exceptionally well the balance between self interests and loyalty, as exemplified in the Lincoln cabinet. Salmon Chase, the Secretary of the Treasury, and William Seward, the Secretary of State are finely portrayed characters. They both were positioning themselves in the Lincoln presidency to succeed him. This required careful political skills to appear supportive but make every move in regard to self interests. The passages where Lincoln wins over William Seward into a real honest partnership are masterful and my admiration for Seward soared. Salmon Chase on the other hand continues to play a careful game of undermining the President behind his back while playing the loyal servant to his face. The passage where Chase is eventually confronted by Lincoln, who was never fooled in the first place, is a wonderful example of the careful interpersonal chess moves required in political life.Second, the novel does a wonderful job of demonstrating how difficult it is get someone to follow orders and do the job right. Lincoln remains totally frustrated with his generals, especially the handsome, charming General McClellan, with his own political ambitions. The man refused to engage the enemy. Lincoln eventually fires him and promotes General Grant. Mrs. Lincoln is somewhat scadalized by the Grants, but Lincoln finally has a military genius on his side and Lincoln offers minimal guidance as long as he sees the war turning around due to Grant's initiatives.Third, the novel does a great job of demonstrating the total hell that Lincoln occupied in the White House. The public came into the public rooms of the White House every morning to try to intercept the President on his way to his office. His wife engaged in questionable kick-back schemes with the White House staff. His older sons went to war and his younger son dies of swamp fever. Mary Lincoln was a burden to the President and her nervous breakdown after the death of their child, Willie, further burdened this exceptional political genius.Fourth, Lincoln practiced careful adaptive leadership, keeping his cabinet and officers focused on the grim realities they had to face every day without flights of hubris and fancy.Lincoln held our nation together at its darkest hour. Vidal was able to capture the amazing day to day reality that this feat entailed. Vidal creates a vision of Lincoln that comes to life in this fine novel.
Great book for family travel in NYC. Our family just returned from a long weekend in NYC, and this book was invaluable.  The book's recommendation of the Doubletree Hotel as the best 'kid-friendly' place in town was right on.  Spacious rooms, modern, clean and a great location.  The book suggested John's Pizza which was another great call.  The pizza was great, the restaurant was loud enough to handle the kids and we were able to get a table quickly on a Saturday night
Comprehensive but does assume some background. Undoubtedly a fine work. Comprehensive, Incisive and written with great passion. However it does assume at least a passing aquaintance with the actors, thus for the beginner it would be probably be advantageous to supplement with additional material
Truth might be scarier than this fiction. Think of Animal Farm combined with Yellow Submarine, with running banter from Veggie Tales.  In this political fable, national populations number in the handful.  The Outer Horner militia, for example, consists of Freeda, Melvin and Larry, and all the inhabitants look like refugees from evolution's junkyard.  (A character might have glossy black filaments, say, with a tuna-can tail.)   The trouble begins when Inner Horner--a phone booth of a country, population 7--shrinks by inches, forcing one resident to poke partway over the border to the larger Outer Horner.  This incident sets the stage, in the surrounding area, for a nationalist demagogue--Phil, whose ideas are proving just a little smarter and more sadistic than Freeda's and the others'.  After a few days' worth of fines and taxes that leave the Inner Hornerites naked and trembling, Phil rather easily sells his countrymen on the need to dismember their imagined enemies ("Us being us, do we not, being fully good, have the right to end what, totally bad, threatens us, even in the slightest?").He just as easily dupes his own senile president into giving up power, and soon has everybody outdoing each other to see who can be the most unreflective about signing a (Patriot Act-sounding) Certificate of Total Approval.  ("I'll sign it without even looking at it," said Larry.  "I'll sign it with my eyes closed," said Leon the Border Guard.  "I'll sign it with my eyes closed, facing away from it," said Melvin.) Only a reluctant invasion by the pleasant coffee-drinkers of Greater Keller can stop the cancer from spreading there too.Although the book is very thin, the modern metaphor definitely resonates, and it's obviously fun to read.  The sandbox scale of things, in particular, seems inspired, and helps make both national tyrant and sheeplike followers seem as infantile and stupid as they should.  Saunders does very well not to make a full novel of this, or to stylize.  He has kept the book very small--it's a mere scenario really.The book's drawback is that in the age of Karl Rove, our reality may have already outstripped the fiction.  Saunders' book isn't as fresh as Orwell's (naming jails "Peace-Encouraging Enclosures" is a dated echo of Orwellian doublespeak).  But it also goes further than Animal Farm, and by doing so, forecloses hope.  His social Darwinism suggests there will always be demagogues and sheep, and that the cowardice in us is ineradicable even by God.  The book offers a wink to those of us who think we're better, who day by day allow our nation to go to the bullies.  But he's preaching to the already-converted who read stuff like this (or who read at all).  Saunders' story needs a savior figure--there's absolutely no one in his universe to like.
What the book really says... In the review: "Buyer Beware! Raw meat kills..."Reviewer Shani most likely has not read this book, as what Kliment says is not to drink raw milk, rather to look for organic milk that has been safely pasteurized with different techniques to retain important enzymes.  She writes:Milk Raw,p. 24-24:  "It was common for physicians in the early part of the twentieth century to use raw milk and butter made from raw milk for therapeutic purposes... Federal and state laws requiring pasteurization of dairy products, however, make raw milk almost impossible to come by.  Most agribusiness dairies heat their milk to 212 degrees.  Louis Pasteur discovered that milk heated to 140 degrees for one-half hour was enough to kill bacteria.  The purpose of boiling the milk at 212 degrees is not to keep the public safe from bacteria that causes disease but to extend the shelf life of the product... I buy a brand of organic milk called Organic Life that hasn't been heated to such a high temperture that all the enzymes have been destroyed and will spoil in two days if not used.  A brand of milk that seems to last forever in the refrigerator, even if it is labeled organic, should be avoided."Kliment addresses other raw foods (meat, eggs...) in  the same safe and insightful manner as she discusses milk.  Even an improperly balanced vegetarian diet can potentially lead to degenerative diseases, and Kliment discusses those diets as well, providing many safe and effective dietary plans.There are so many different dietary recommendations in this book that if one doesn't suit your style, then there are others that are equally effective.Berthe Gerard
Right on Target... ...which explains her success as a partner with Jack Welch.Ro has hit the nail on the head here. It's not really about keeping his favorite yogurt on tap or catering to his needs, it's about removing the obstacles and the minutiae so that the leadership can lead instead of wasting time on those things that can be done by others. It's more about being a true partner than it is about being a sterotypical assistant.My take on this book is that although written by an assistant, it is applicable to anyone who has a boss and who wants to be a solution instead of just an employee. Many people take issue with being asked to handle things that they deem are "personal" for thier boss. That conversation is a waste of time and will be a deciding factor on how high you will go in your career. Make no mistake, for leaders of large organizations, there is no distinction between a personal and a work life. They are one. So, Ro really points out that being a solution for Jack sometimes meant that she had to make sure those "personal" things were managed to completion by someone other than Jack. That freed Jack up to take care of business.Pre-managing your boss is a great way to bring speed to the entire organization. Ro stated early on that she was a creator of time. That is one of the most powerful offers that one can make to their boss and their organization. Time is the most precious asset that many of us claim to not have enough of. By ensuring that Jack didn't have to sweat the small stuff and sift through unneccessary crap, she was able to create the time for Jack to become the leader he is and to bring more prosperity to the organization and the people who support it. Be it personal or business, she handled it.Observe also, that while many may think of Rosanne Badowski as just an assistant who wrote a book, she obviously has enough insight and leadership skills of her own to be the assistant of one of the most powerful CEO's for 14 years and...she wrote a book about it. I am also quite sure that she has enjoyed some prosperity as a result of her success with Jack
Amusing, Well Plotted, Academic Mystery.. It seems that some rare books are disappearing from the local college library. Meanwhile, our intrepid tenure- seeking lady professor meets with a famous Lady Mystery Writer, and her very large dog, suitably named TROUBLE. And a conference is to commence on WOMEN IN MYSTERY  FICTION. So the Prof must escort the famous hard-boiled author to this conference. Meanwhile, a dead body appears in the library, which puts a damper on both the college and the conference. In the burgeoning field of academic/lady sleuth mysteries, this is among the top! So if you're a mystery fan looking for great laughs (mainly at certain academic pretentions), a good mystery, and a colorful cast of rogues and do-gooders, you can do a lot worse that reading this one
Great practical information!. Educational professionals who appreciate Todd Whitaker's approach will enjoy Ryan Delaney's Mission Accomplished by Anna T. Erickson
Hitler chose his help well, especially with clueless Traudl. After reading this book and watching the movie "Downfall" its clear to me that Traudl Junge was pretty much a clueless human being.To remain so unknowing throughout her years at Hitler's side just strikes me as unbelievable. She was offered the cop-out excuse that 'she was so young at the time' but I don't think she was that young at all.... irritatingly clueless, but not young. Its probably one of the reasons that Hitler took her on; her limited capacity to think beyond her make-up. This was probably very common in Hitler's entourage.Anyway, regarding the book, its an interesting read though I have to admit my resentment of Traudl's apparant non-assessment of what her higher-ups were actually doing for nearly three years increased with each chapter.I suppose in Traudl's case all that is left to be decided in the end was whether she was an emotional cripple before she joined up with Hitler or became one afterwards because of it. If you read the book (and hopefully see the film as well) you might understand what I'm talking about. The movie actually grants her more humanity than her own words do in the book.I'm now inclined to think she went in as a pathetically clueless individual; Hitler realized this and gave her the job.There are a number of good reviews of the book here; somehow I only feel inclined to review Traudl Junge.Update:After reading a book about Eva Braun I have to admit I was a somewhat brutal in my assessment of Traudl Junge.The book was 'Eva Braun'# Author: Nerin E. Gun# Paperback: 280 pages# Publisher: Coronet Books; New Ed edition (January 1, 1976)# Language: English# ISBN-10: 0340199326# ISBN-13: 978-0340199329Apparantly Hitler did indeed have a way of charming women in those years and it seems that Eva and Traudl were simply two of many, many German/European women who found him magnetic. The book was written in 1967. If you are interested in a very easy but very informative look at Hitler's dealings with everyday people in everyday situations, I recommend it highly. I found it to be much more informative about Hitler's non-military/political ways than Traudl's (most likely) sanitized version
A "Can't Miss Pulp Fiction Lovers Anthology". I read Adventure, Vol. 1 about two months ago...and enjoyed it.  It's hard to give a sweeping review of an anthology; particularly in this book where the stories cover just about every subject found in pulp fiction: sci-fi, horror, war, hero/adventure, even a superhero story.  With that said, it is fair to say that there is something for every pulp fan in Adventure, Vol. 1.  There is an odd tale or two that I just couldn't fathom, but that may be a product of my impatient/fast reading style and nothing to do with the quality of the story.  All of the stories are written well by many authors whose names are very familiar to me as a fan of sci-fi, fantasy, and superhero fiction.My favorites, in no particular order are: "Richard Riddle: Boy Detective in The Case of the French Spy" by Kim Newman; "Silence of the Sea," by O'Neil De Noux; "Dogfight Donovan's Day Off," by Michael Moorcock; and, "Johnny Come Lately," by Marc Singer.  "Richard Riddle..." is an excellent adventure/horror tale starring a trio of kids, told from their point of view, but nonetheless a gripping adult "nail-biter."  "Silence of the Sea" brings to mind the writing style of Jack London...if he had written sci-fi.  "Dogfight Donovan's Day Off" is quite similar to a G-8 or Dusty Ayres yarn, except that the degree of action experienced by the protagonist here makes both those pulp characters look like girl scouts pressing flowers.  I would very much love to see "Johnny Come Lately" expanded in to a full length novel.  In one, too-short story the author recites a very detailed mythos/back story and present plight for a superhero who far exceeds his four-color peers in dimension/depth.Titling a book "Vol. 1" would suggest, to me anyway, that a "Vol. 2" was in the offing.  However, looking at Monkey Brain Book's (the publisher's) anticipated 2006 releases on their website, I don't see an entry for "Vol. 2."  That's too bad.  I think Adventure, Vol. 1 is definitely worth a follow-up volume.Respectfully,Chris Yates
A Classic and a must in your shelf of PT books. This is probably what I consider as the Bible in the realm of Physical Therapy.  I have had this book ever since I was in college and it has proven to be valuable to me now that I am in my 11th year of practice as it was when I was still in my budding internship. I consider the cases found at the end of every chapter as the most helpful and insightful and for anyone hooked on evidence-based treatment strategies, this book is a must.  Ms. Sullivan's work is seminal and phenomenal
POPSPICK PLUS. Don't miss this book.  For teachers the last two chapters of this book are worth the price of the book.  It leaves a lasting impression
Small Town  Life With A Few Surprises For Sonny And Duane!!!. In this novel Larry McMurtry inroduces the reader to two friends Sonny and Duane. Sonny and Duane live in the small dusty Texas town of Thalia. Sonny is 16 years old and very innocent and naive until he begins an affair with an older local married woman. Duane is in love with the prettiest girl in town who sadly has a very mean streak in her. Duane and Sonny spend their days drinking beer, going to the movies, playing pool and spending a lot of time at the diner. Bored out of their minds they set off on a very memorable road trip to Mexico in search of an erotic encounter with a prostitute.When they return they find that things have changed in Thalia and the town will never be the same again. This book is a rare gem from a writer who has spent most of his career debunking myths of the Old Wild West. In this book he proves that he can easily move from one genre to another with ease.Mr. McMurtry is truly a Master Of His Craft
Great Value for the Price!. In 1972 and 1973 Navy F-4s ruled the skies over North Vietnam, downing 24 MiGs while racking up a 12-to-1 kill ratio. Statistically EVERY time Navy F-4s clashed with VPAF MiGs, they kiiled at least one MiG. The outstanding record set by Navy F-4s during the Linebacker I and II campaigns is vividly chronicled in Elward and Davies' volume.The Navy F-4 experience over North Vietnam in 1972 and 1973 was far different from the combats waged in the 1965-70 period. (See Osprey Combat Aircraft #26). During the Rolling Thunder years the kill-loss F-4 ratio steadily dwindled with many kills lost due to poorly peforming missiles, crews lacking in ACM training and poor radar controlling.Fortunately, the Navy responded to its poor showing and through a variety of measures - the Ault Report, Have Drill/Have Doughnut MiG testing, Topgun, etc. - produced F-4 crews that became MiG Masters in 1972 and 1973.Like their earlier Osprey volume on Navy F-4 MiG killers, Elward and Davies' book boasts many first-person narratives, rare photographs and great color profiles by Jim Laurier. Both volumes serve as useful and exciting introductions to Navy F-4 fighter ops over North Vietnam.For more exhaustive works on the air war over North Vietnam, readers should check out Marshall Michel's excellent CLASHES book and the reviewer's own MIG KILLERS OF YANKEE STATION
Cool Story!. In this book, there really isn't one main plot.  There is actually a whole bunch of interesting little plots telling about events that happened during Caddie Woodlawn's childhood:Caddie Woodlawn's real name was Catherine and she lived on the western side of Wisconsin.  Most people called her a tomboy because she loved to swim, build things, and fix clocks.  She also hated cleaning, sewing/knitting, and wearing formal clothing.  Even though she was a tomboy, she was also very kind.  One time she had a silver dollar that her Uncle Edmund had given her.  He said that it was just for her and she could spend it on anything she liked.  Caddie ended up saving the silver dollar for a long time.  When she finally spent it, Caddie bought little candies and knickknacks that were for a few kids that had just lost their mother.This is just one of the things that Caddie Woodlawn does.  At first, the story seems a little dull.  Then, once you finish the book, you end up thinking it was pretty good.  I like how the story isn't based on one plot.  The part I didn't like was how the story didn't stay interesting the whole book.  I'd give this book about 3  stars out of five.
Well written. This is my first Julian Barnes novel as well.As a Sherlock Holmes fan the premise was interesting but somehow I found only the plight of George and his family to be the most interesting. With Doyle I think I was given almost too much information-just enough to wonder if I really liked the author as a man.I read the book in under two days on a trip and despite the misgivings I had when I started it, it did turn out to be a worthwhile read-an interesting look at the times and the foibles of the English legal system at that time
Refreshing, hype-free "reality therapy" -- a life saver. This book breaks away from the pack by combining practical, hype-free admissions advice with a refreshing dose of reality therapy.  In addition to soup-to-nuts application guidance, the book offers parents advice for preventing the college admissions process from straining our relationship with our kids (I strongly suggest reading this book with your college-bound daughter or son). The author wisely cites studies showing that a good parent-child relationship is a far greater predictor of academic and life success than SAT scores or selective college acceptance! Thank you -- I needed that.
Beautiful duotones and prose to match. This book caught my eye at a gift shop. After paging through it, I bought it for myself. For Christmas this year, I plan on sharing the author's peaceful words with a few of my frantic friends who could use the gift of tranquility this holiday season. I think it's the perfect gift book
Audio book version finally got us hooked. My husband and I all are both Tolkien fans but neither of us had managed to really get into the Silmarillon.  The book's length and somewhat stiff narrative slowed us up or put us off.  Finally we heard that the audio book version was good and thought we'd give it a try.While the beginning "creation myth" may still be a bit slow for some people the audio book version overcame many of the book's obstacles.  The reader has a clear, sonorous, English-accented voice which is a perfect match with the tone of the story.  His commanding narration bought to life the tragic tale and completely engrossed us in the story in a way that the book failed to do
Perfect  Library  Resource. As other reviewers have stated, this book reads like a dissertation given all of the works cited. The author has definitely done his research and is comprehensive in covering all aspects of dreaming. The information presented is interesting and fascinating, but the book is not for those who would rather read a novel than a textbook or term paper.  I, alas, am one of those people and donated my copy to our Women's Circle library. This book is a valuable resource and is recommended for those who are taking on serious study
The PTSD Workbook. This is a good book that is challenging and rewarding for PTSDers to read and work through.  The cautions and reminders to take care of oneself while working through the exercises are helpful.  There is lots of information presented about PTSD in a very readable fashion.  If a survivor of trauma had to work through those experiences and the resulting symptoms of PTSD alone, this is definitely a good place to start.  I like to use some of the exercises with my teenage clients who are dealing with trauma-related symptoms
So.  This explains it!. As a consultant to large businesses, I have noticed that people play perfectly predictable games (what they may refer to as 'tactics'), and are astounded that I can predict their next move as well as their ultimate goal -- no matter how they attempt to disguise it.They are at a decided disadvantage since Games People Play went out of circulation not long after Dr. Eric Berne died. Get this book now, especially if you are working your way up into management, or someone else will succeed in playing NIGYYSOB on you, and you will wonder why your upward mobility hit an invisible ceiling.You stand no chance against me in a group if you have not read this book.  I will know your next move before you do
Excellent for those seeking information about these problems. I would highly recommend this book to women who suffer from pcos, hirsutism, obesity, infertility, menstrual irregularity, alopecia or hair loss, acne or oily skin, anxiety and depression. All of these symptoms deal  with high testosterone levels and can be dangerous if not treated as  mentioned in the book. She addresses all the issues except for some herbs  which is why I rated this book a 4 instead of  5. Clearly androgen  disorders are a big problem not being taken seriously by the medical  profession and others in the field. I suffer almost all of these symptoms  and it helped me to realize that something is starting to be done or at  least someone like Theresa Cheung is taking these issues serious.  The high  testosterone  which she points out in the book can lead to diabetes,  hypertention and cancer unless treated. I am grateful for the book and the  detailed explaination about the endocrine systems and how they play a role  in the body. One note, she mentions Saw Palmetto in the book as being an  herb for body building due to the fact it raises testosterone levels. In my  research this is not the case! I have found that Saw palmetto can possibly  be used to treat androgen disorders, which is not even mentioned in the  book. In my studies I have read that Saw palmetto can be used by women who  have an excess of androgenic hormones. Some of the indications for saw  palmetto include hirsutism, infertility, acne, amnenorrhea, pcos, debility,  and deficiency. It helps to stimulate breast growth and to bring on  menstruation. Saw palmetto has demonstrated anabolic, antiandrogenic, and  estrogenic activity.  Theresa cheung addresses western medicine treatment  methods quite clearly and there are many options. This book answered most  all of the questions I had dealing with excess testosterone
There is Hope!. I truly am beginning to understand my mother.  Although she has refused to get help- therefore has never officially been diagnosed- this book is a Godsend to help me piece together why she did some of the things the way she did.  It's helping me in treatment of my own disorder (Bipolar II), as well as helping me recognize inherited behaviors that I don't want to display when interacting with my own children.  This book is helping me build a relationship with my mom.  Instead of so much animosity for her, I feel a lot more compassion.  Understanding is the first step to Healing.  Buy this book
Best auto touring guide for SE Utah. This is a wonderful guide for auto travel in SE Utah.  Using the mileposts as references was a great idea and easy to use.  If we did not have this guide, we would have never found an off the beaten path dinosaur track site.  A definate need to have refence book for the serious day tripper in Southern Utah.  Wish K. E. Rivers would write another book.
Biggest Help. This book so far is great. I know you want us to read the whole book, but I have only read a few pages. This book is great. It helps me see that there are many people out there that are vegetarian and there is nothing  wrong with it. This gives great ideas for eating out, food at parties, and  much more. If your are considering being a vegetarian, read this, it will  help you 100 percent
Good Cable Modem Technology Tutorial. As a non-expert in the field, "Broadband Cable TV Access Networks" is a very complete book that is well-organized and full of information. The introduction sections are very clear and setup up the rest of the book very well. It is clear that Shlomo is an expert in the field and also a very good writer that integrates difficult concepts into a readable story. On areas that Shlomo is not an expert in, the descriptions are not so complete. Sometimes, the book moves too quickly through the details, but the amount of material in the book is impressive for its size. Overall this is a very good book that holds the reader's interest.
Heavy Construction Cost Data- 14th Edition. This is a great reference guide in standard version. To avoid confusion, the ISBN number for the metric version is 0 87629 555 3
Mary Gaitskill is one of my favorite authors. I once heard Tom Waits say, "I like hearing beautiful melodies telling me terrible things." That's the perfect description of this book
Beautiful language and art--highly, highly recommended. It's rare that a children's book comes along where both the artwork and the language reach the heights offered up by Fletcher and the Falling Leaves. The story's premise--a young fox attempts to protect his favorite tree from the encroachment of autumn, trying in vain to keep it leaved, literally to the last leaf--could have easily become overly sentimental and cloying.  Instead, there is a true sense of sadness and empathy leavened by some wonderfully quirky moments all of which lead to a close that is as satisfying as it is moving.  As it is, the story could certainly have stood on its own for plot alone, regardless of language or art.  But the artwork is simply sensational, the impressionistic watercolors perfectly matching each page's tone and sentiment, matching the movement of time through day and night, from fall to winter, culminating in perfect pace with the plot in a final illustration of the tree that is simply beautiful.  It's a good book for the story, an excellent book for the story plus the art.  What makes it a great book, truly a beautiful book, is the language, which never fails to please, to startle, to jostle. The words are sharp and vivid, the rhythm carries you along, and the rhymes and slant rhymes sneak up on you in singular moments of sheer joy in language.  The book is a pure clinic in children's picture books as all three elements--plot, art, and language--each alone a superior example, come together to create a whole even greater than its impressive parts.  A great book, highly recommended
Can't be better. Simply put: the best Spanish novel of the eighties. Intense, witty, perfect
This book is fantastic!. I read a lot of spiritual or metaphysical books but this one is definately one of the best, most personally useful ones. I just started it yesterday and although I am only half way through I am so excited by the information within I could not wait to rave about it and recommend it to family and friends. It is so enlightening to me in explaining my negative thought patterns and how programming from childhood has influenced my entire life. No wonder Louise Hay is a guru to so many new age type authors. I am reading sections aloud to my husband. I am underlining passages to re-read later. I see myself so clearly in the examples given as well as other people I love in my life. Although I did not buy this book through Amazon like many others I've read, I would most definately purchase it again for a gift or advise somebody I really cared for that could use this kind of revelation to buy it. My copy is the earlier printing (1984) so I can only assume more recent re-printing dates are at least as good or improved. Do not hesitate. You need to read this book. You deserve it and can really benefit from it
Very well written book about capitalism and democracy. Although this book was written many years ago, it rings true for today's issues.  The book is made up of multiple (25 or so) mini essays, each about 5-10 pages long.The book has a clear and logical philosophy that is consistent.  Its' basic premise is that pure capitalism is the first and only moral system for man.  This is because capitalism equals freedom which frees a man from coercive oppression, and that man can only create wealth and new ideas when free to use his mind.  The book states that the US briefly came close to pure capitalism in the 1700 and 1800s, but is now heading to fascism, as the state leaves property in private ownership, but the state controls output and use of the private property.This book is the best I've read in several years, because it helped me unify my outlook on several fronts (political, economic, legal, social, etc) into one grand, consistent theory.  I think this book will appeal to liberals and conservatives alike.  Both are damned in this book by Rand, but I think the left, right, and center will recognize parts of Rand's philosophy that are dear to them too.Read it for yourself to see, the book is cheap.
Jo Mielziner - a forgotten genius. Mary Henderson has given us an invaluable insight in the world of Jo Mielziner. So often the names of creative people who ensure that a production &quot;works&quot; are never known or easily forgotten by the viewing audience. The set and lighting designs of Mielziner for plays and shows like A Streetcar Named Desire, Death of a Salesman, South Pacific, etc. were considered brilliant and groundbreaking by the theatre world of his time. Mielziner also greatly influenced modern stage design (the East Room stage in the White House and the Denver Center Theatre, for example) and with his art and creative insight put his unique stamp on the world of modern theatre until this day. An overview of his work was long overdue. But Mary Henderson has given us far more than that. She has given us Jo Mielziner, the person, by providing fascination facts and photographs of Jo's private life. The many colorful prints of his designs and the enjoyable flow of the text make this book a &quot;must have&quot; and a wonderful gift for anyone interested in the history of 20th century theatre
Good overview. For those who do not know E-bay very well, this book is for them.  I got some good pointers by reading the book and more than a few ideas of what I need to do before starting my own business on E-ba
weight loss, common sense, and taking charge of your life. There is so much to love about this little gem. The author speaks to you like a curmudgeonly uncle who takes you seriously enough not to coddle you or offer you comforting excuses. You want to lose weight? Fine. It's going to be the hardest thing you've ever done, but here's how you go about it. While everyone else is counting calories and grams of this and that, he cuts straight to the point: cut calories (900 may be too few for some people, but he gets your attention with the dramatically low figure) and exercise (again, 4 miles in 30 minutes may be a bit much to ask for some of us penguins, but he doesn't set the bar too low to be a challenge). His voice, while caring, is uncompromising. He is not sympathetic in the cloying manner of many self-help gurus, but in the manner of a teacher who is confident that you can do what you set out to do - as he has - and if you don't succeed, it's because you don't really want to. Some people have medical conditions that may contribute to weight gain, and his simple approach does not address those complexities. I think the author would suggest that you know enough to take care of yourself, which is what this is all about anyway. He removes the weight loss/diet genre from the gnostic realm of medical professionals, and returns it to the accessible realm of common sense, where it belongs. The book is a metaphor for how you can take charge of your own life, give meaning to your own life, without waiting for someone with credentials to tell you you're doing it all wrong if you don't do it his/her way. If you're looking for more complexity, you may be looking for a program that's so difficult to follow that it comes with its own built-in excuses. You won't find excuses here, but encouragement and prodding. Americans are not fat and slovenly because we've failed to eat nothing but protein or failed to find The Zone, but because we eat too much and don't get enough exercise. Do something about that, and then, with the discipline you develop in the process, go change the world, why don'tcha. Lose the weight, and get over it
Dance on fire. Firestarter will make you very angry. Firestarter will make you very sad. It's a clinic in shameful government abuses and a lesson in parental devotion. It's a glimpse at the hidden powers of the mind, and a treatise on the atrocities committed by men who hunger for power.Stephen King should not be able to jam so much inside a story and still make it keep a reader up until dawn. But Stephen King is Stephen King and that's what he does. In Firestarter, as with The Dead Zone, he empowers his characters with powerful abilities and then exploits those abilities from every angle.A little girl who can ignite infernos through simple thought should not be restrained in a fictional work. King does not restrain her. Young Charlie runs amok and as a reader, you'll be very glad she did. For every house that burns, every car that blows up and every evil G-man that runs shrieking in flames, our little protagonists has amble motivation.Her father can manipulate another person's thoughts just by thinking real hard. A man such as this should not be hidden in a back room to do mere parlor tricks. King does not whittle away Daddy's powers. Daddy uses them much as you would if someone locked you up and tried to steal your daughter.Firestarter is an outright grabber from start to finish. King has created some vividly evil entities through the years, but few so detestable as the men and women who make up The Shop. It is a sublevel government agency aimed at mowing down children and families in the ultimate race for world supremacy. Though he doesn't flout his research skills, King no doubt studied up on the CIA's experiments with mind control and chemical manipulations as he prepared to write this thriller. It's another fantastic tale that may be closer to fact than we want to believe
Sobering Debate. Why is there terrorism in the world today? Alan Dershowitz speculates the reason can be found in the world's reaction to terrorism in the past. He claims the appeasing nature of the European nations when faced with the terrorist acts of Yassir Arafat's PLO (and other Palestinian groups) from 1968 to 2000 convinced the Islamic extremists that terrorism indeed achieved its desired results and is therefore a popular device used today.Dershowitz details the history of terrorism, going back to ancient times, but he focuses primarily on the terrorism began by Palestinians in 1968 (and continuing to this day). With the exception of the United States and Israel, each country victimized by Arafat's terroristic acts eventually caved to him, met his demands and eventually recognized his cause. Countries like Germany, France and Italy are Dershowitz's favorite targets, as he contends the leaders of those countries acted exclusively with self interest, failing to consider the incentive they were giving to the terrorists to commit harsher and more creative crimes in the future. Dershowitz asks why would terrorists stop terrorizing when not only were they not punished for their crimes, but they were also rewarded with exposure and support. We all know about the Olympic killings in Munich, but how many people know that Germany released three of the murderers involved shortly after their arrest?According to Dershowitz, the actions of European countries from 1968-2000 made the September 11th attacks inevitable. They received no penalty for similar crimes in the past (and actually received incentive), so why not do it?Even though Dershowitz is not usually a fan of the politics of George W. Bush (see his book on the election of 2000), he sees the overwhelming response by Bush after 9/11 as the proper action for any nation victimized by terrorism. Whereas Dershowitz believes the European nations encourage future terrorist acts with their actions, Bush's effort to strike back with sever and precise force is the right thing to do.Dershowitz goes on to discuss scenarios in which torture would be morally acceptable when fighting terrorism. Many people will ask if this is the same Alan Dershowitz who has made a career out of being one of the top civil liberties attorneys in the world. Yes, it is. Even though he puts a deep importance on civil liberties, he also believes the safety of the world takes precedence. Dershowitz has spent years developing his theories on when the safety of the masses trumps the liberties of some. Most of his counterparts prefer to bury their heads in the sand on this issue, unable to face the reality that sometimes liberty must be sacrificed for the betterment of society.Dershowitz keeps coming back to two important events. First, he uses a quote by George W. Bush after the beheading of Daniel Pearl in which Bush says terrorists must understand that these types of acts only hurt their cause. Dershowitz shows how terrorists have not believed that in the past when their crimes were directed at most of the world (excluding the USA and Israel).Dershowitz's second favorite event to discuss is the pre-9/11 incarceration of Zacharias Massaoui and civil liberty laws that tied the hands of the authorities who had him in custody. He claims this is a close real world example of the "ticking time bomb" scenario many philosophers and leaders have debated for centuries: what tactics are you willing to take to get information from someone who knows of a catastrophic event but will not discuss it?Dershowitz's solutions point to a man who truly is concerned with protecting the constitutional rights of the individual and abiding by the laws of the Geneva Convention, but who is also concerned with avoiding the naive policies of most civil libertarians who would rather protect the rights of one man than to save the lives of thousands.   Even those who disagree with him on certain issues will see a debate master at work.  Rarely are arguments more focused, more passionate, better researched or more convincing.  A must read for anyone interested in understanding global terrorism
Ignore the comics and you'll enjoy the book. I was intrigued by the characters and story, although some story lines could have been better developed.  That shortfall resulted in some surprises at the end, however.I am not a fan of comics, so I found the comic strip artwork to be distracting and a bit irritating.  When I discovered there is a hidden message, I went through them all searching for the letters but finally had to give up.I will definitely read more of Picoult's novels, but need to be prepared as the two I've read are heart-wrenching and require a supply of Kleenex
A family affair. Fortune's Children was a good read for anyone interested in how the rich lived in the late 1800's. The author detailed the main characters very well as well as the over the top, outlandish homes that these characters resided in.  It is truly a nice look into that era and what it all meant to be a Vanderbilt. Reading this book has piqued my interest in other books about the first rich family of America. Once I began reading this book I had trouble putting it down
Legends. I must say, the added MW and TH comments and their views was a good addition to this book. If you haven't read the originals, you should pick those up first before reading this one. It may ruin the end for you
Great Read. Chapel Noir is a great read. I've never read any Irene Adler mysteries and I actually picked up the book because Jack the Ripper was named on the cover and was greatly suprised.  I couldn't put the book down and quickly became attached to the characters and the story line. Beware though, if you read Chapel Noir you'll have to read Castle Rouge because where Chapel Noir ends Castle Rouge begins.  I hope Ms. Douglas doesn't wait another seven years to write another Irene, Nell and Godfrey adventure.  In the meantime, I'll have to go back to the beginning and try to find the first books of the series
Mem Fox. What can anyone say about Mem Fox? She is a wonderful author from Australia. Children adore her and so do adults. The illustrations are beautiful also. Please read all of her books, especially, Koala Lou. She will introduce your child or your students to the wonderful world of Australian animals. This makes a great introduction to a social studies unit. I was fortunate to have met her. What a nice lady.
Great Work. No book has ever influenced me as this book By Dr. Covey. I think Dr. Covey is the Newton of human behavior.Apples were falling from the trees but it was Newton who discovered the law of gravity. Similarly the 7 habits are common sense but Dr. Covey has beautifully knitted these habits.I bet most of us follow most of these habits, reading this book reinforces the existing principals that we have & teaches us about the missing links in our life.How many times have we been told about the Goose & the golden egg story? Did any body think that even our resources in life & business are like that goose & we have to take care about the well being of our resources.The best thing about this book is that it redirects your priorities. Often we neglect our Physical health, our family, and our community obligations.I recommend reading The 8th Habit because it comes with a DVD which is treasure of new thoughts.
One of the most moving and changing Christian Books ever!. I read this book a few years ago because my sister-in-law ordered it, and accidentally mailed it to our house, all the way across the country.  It looked interesting, so my wife and I called her, told he that Amazon had shipped it to the wrong address, (she had used our account to order it), and sent her replacement copies.  Few books shake me to my core.  In fact, I think this is likely the only one that had me so shaken, so moved by the end, that I actually cried I had no more to read.  Eldredge hits the nail on the head, repeatedly.  Men are meant, by design and disposition, to be dangerous things.  We are meant to have adventures, to seek the love of a dear woman, and to have a cause.  Eldredge points this out, and shows how we have been immasculated.  Women, for the last hundred plus years, have sought to make men more into their image, creating the "metrosexual" trend, and at first cheered about it.  Now women bemoan the facts, "where are all the real men?!"  Um, darlin', you crushed our manhood over a hundred years, you don't want us to be warriors, you don't want us to be dangerous, you don't want us to be who we are designed to be, you yell at us when we try to be leaders, and you want to be angry that we are NOT adventurous, dangerous, or leaders?  Rediculous!  Read this book, men, and live it.  Your wife will love you for it.  Trust me
A very enlightening book. I cannot agree more with the previous reviewer.This truly is an edifying book for those who want to reach out the vast realm of spirituality, education, and human experience.  I have read the Dalai Lama's books and been wondering what kind of education would create a creature of intellect and spiritual with unfathomable wisdom?  This book helps me to sneak preview the 'mistery' yet it challenges my own perceptions about rituals and religions, as well as my belief systems. Religious disciplines and devotions are always inspiring, but in this book, they are taken to the next level because they are narrated through a man from the other side of the hemisphere, then in his early 20s, whose soul-searching quest took him to this incredible journey.Moreover, Georges Dreyfus was raised in the west - French speaking region in Switzerland - which makes his ardent spiritual transformation through the Ge-luk scholastic approach to Buddhism (let me say it) much more prevalent. He has crossed the threshold of west and east in a pious way, many would have thought it is impossible, and yet, when he returns to our mundane world, he can see that there is, for instance, humor in debate practices in monastery scholastic tradition. Unquestionable, not all of us can take the risk of being defeated in a harsh and thought-provoking debate lightly, with humor!This is not a `how to' book, yet the description of such a strenuous 'memorization tradition' as part of the scholastic curriculum is more than didactic. I am tempted to say that those Monks will score very high in GRE and SAT tests. Yes, this book is not a self-help one, but it is definitely the one that I will take out of the bookshelf every so often.
Top book for home brewers. This is an excellent book for anyone just getting into home brewing, for extract brewers getting into all-grain, or for all grain brewers who want to dive into the more technical aspects of brewing. The text is well written and organized, the author provides good illustrations and pictures to help the reader understand the process and covers everything from the most basic to very advanced topics. This is a must for any brewers library, 5 + stars
Great for a beginner. I am only a quarter of the way through so far, but the subject matter seems to be perfect for my level of electronic understanding.  It is well written, and I am completely satisfied with the purchase
Fabulous Elopment Book When You Don't Know Where to Begin. The book gives creative and fun ideas for couples looking for something different. I would highly recommend the book to any couple not sure about a traditional wedding.  I loved that it also gave resources such as web sites and phone numbers
5 Stars for the 5 Star General. I loved this book.  I was sad when it was over.  Not only does it give a wonderful biography of a great man, but a walk through world history during the first half of this century. Enjoy it
Amazing, Elevated Poetry. The quality of this work is exceptional. I'd be surprised if you could find language this ele-vated anywhere else (except for the Book of Isaiah - in the original language)
The Horse Whisperer. Anyone can train a horse with these easy-to-follow tips.  Students who have used these techniques also tell which ones worked best for them
Woven Stories. Pam Houston once again has spun a web of collected stories encircling the life of of our heroine; this time, it's Lucy, photographer, hunter of the perfect emotionally available man, realistic woman-with-issues that we can all identify with. Filled with rich metaphors and descriptive detail, this collection of related stories is fun to read and leaves  the reader emotionally satisfied when he or she comes full circle by the end of the book. I highly recommend this book as great summer reading! Enjoy
Truly insightful on the culture-theft wars. A Change is Gonna Come is a landmark book in the history of the rock/race conversation, because Werner - a white professor of Afro-American studies - has a deeper understanding of the meaning of whiteness than any other rock historian I've seen. It makes a huge difference that Werner is both an anti-racist, and is comfortable in his own skin - this comfort allows him to navigate the culture-theft accusations and counter-accusations without needing to pick sides
Effective Public Relations. Now in its eighth edition, Effective Public Relations is very near to its 50th year as possibly the most highly influential text in the field of public relations. Widely recognized and enjoyed by Intro. to PR students  all over the country, EPR is the reader's tour throughout the world of PR,  including its history, practices, careers, ethics, and countless other  components of the field. Public relations continues to struggle to  establish its true identity as a necessary and inherently ethical field of  practice. The eighth edition of ERP is yet another celebratory tribute to a  dynamic field that has had a tremendous effect on humankind for as long as  human history can be traced. Effective Public Relations should not only be  a prerequisite to further study in the field, but should be required  reading for anyone who has the slightest curiosity as to what public  relations, in its most true and dynamic sense, really is
Another captivating tale. When my 7 yr old told me about a NEW Junie B. Book, we ZOOMED to the computer to order our copy speedy quick!Our family has been enjoying the chronicles of Junie B for two years, and can't get enough. They are fun to read by both children and adults. Parks make for wonderful chapter books for your beginning reader, and are  recommended by many professional educators.After reading some of the other reviews, it occurred to me that the grouchy ladies also shop Amazon. :)
Fast paced mystery!. Wow - what a fascinating thriller!  Our good friend Alan is caught in the middle of an incredibly complex web of a who-done-it.  He is called to the hospital on yet another of his consultations (who pays for these anyhow?), where he begins treating a teenage girl who refuses to speak.  We soon learn that the girl is the daughter of a local news anchor, and the sister of a critically ill child who has received a lot of publicity because the HMO has refused to cover the girl's treatment costs.  When the head of the HMO turns up dead, all fingers point to Alan's patient.  But did she do it, or did any one of half-a-dozen other suspects, all of whom are interrelated and have their own motives, commit the murder?  We won't know until the end, when Alan finds himself on an incredible journey through the Denver international airport ... luggage system!  This book is hard to put down, and a very enjoyable read.  There are a lot of characters, but they become familiar quickly, and they are not hard to keep mentally separated
A compelling story of enviro issues, politics and nature. A compelling story of how the wolves finally came back to Yellowstone. A natural history story about these fascinating animals. A political story about misinformation, disimformation, political infighting, even major splits in the environmental community.The book reads like a novel. I highly recommend it
Great Entertainment Value. A cheerful look at the world of the closeted cross-dresser, this book describes Veronica Vera's approach to offering cross-dressing services to men who have sufficient funds to be able to travel to her New York "Academy" for "lessons" of one sort or another.Illustrated profusely with photos of students and staff, there are chapters covering everything from attitude, through body shaping and deportment, to finishing touches such as makeup, etiquette and outings. You can follow the adventures of students like Sally Sissyribbons as Ms Vera covers "studies" such as Home Ec, Fashion, Field Trips and Sex Education.Yet, despite the sprightly, titillating approach to cross-dressing there are some very useful tips and tricks sprinkled throughout. More, Veronica Vera's philosophy and some very timely words of wisdom can be found, strategically placed for the most effect. For example, while covering the subject of what is referred to as "passing," she says, "You can sell what you believe in, so believe in your right to be your femmeself and you will be empowered in all aspects of your life."Although the book provides the reader with lighthearted, humourous entertainment, if that is what you are after, I would not recommend it to the person who is seriously looking for advice or support on transgender issues.
A Great Book for Women Training for a Triathlon. I bought my daughter this book at Christmas and she thought I was crazy.  She had suffered an injury in High-School soccer that would prevent her from playing the sport competitively again.  So I just looked at this book and liked the contents and gave it to her.  Well you can guess what happened, nothing!  Then my wife/her mother started reading it and training and my daughter joined her and now they both are participating in Triathlons and even winning their age divisions.  Is it because of the book? No, it is because they are committed to succeeding and the book gave them the information they needed to do just that.  No matter what book you read, it will do you no good unless you act
Understanding is a first step, and almost half way!. If you are a man, and you are deeply suffering because either you are in love, or because you feel you are loosing one, this book is worth a hundred psycho-therapy sessions.  It is very likely that it will help you to understand yourself, and therefore you would become much more likely to take control, or at least, to feel wide relief associated to deep understanding
This is THE book to have when you're loved one dies!. It hard enough when your parent unexpectedly dies and you discover you are the executor of the estate.  There are so many questions and so little time.  This book is a godsend.  It covers everything you need to know from the moment your loved one passes.  It describes step by step, in plain english fashion, what needs to be done in the first week, the first month, and in the future.  Everything from death certificates, to funeral arrangements, to claiming life insurance, and, of course, dealing with the estate.  It's all in this book.  It is your one-stop resource for unbiased, easy to understand, how-to information.  This is THE book to have even if you are not an executor.  It will help your entire family. It answers so many questions and takes the mystery out of settling an estate. It's like having an estate attorney in the family. It has helped my family tremendously.Books from Nolo Press have always been easy to understand and use.  This book is no exception and contiunes their fine tradition of making legal processes accessible to ordinary folks like you and me
An inspiration for  shaping organizational change. Sara Lightfoot is an incredible author that writes with style, candor and vividness that allows one to experience the context as though he/she is actually involved rather than examining the process vicariously. The author  recognizes that it is important for readers to be able to place these high  schools in context, visualize the terrain, the community and the people.  Lightfoot has done this by working through the inside out, much like an  artist painting a portrait capturing the essence of truth with a myriad of  dimensions.       Lightfoot offers a penetrable look inside high schools  whhile exploring the inherent goodness of schools. She provides a  description of &quot;goodness&quot; as not being static nor an absolute  quality that can be measured as a single indicator of success of  effectiveness but a mixture of parts that produce the whole. This mixture  encompasses less tangible, more elusive qualities that can only be  discerned through close, vivid description, through subtle nuances, and  thhrough detailed narratives that reveal the sustaining values of an  institution.       A quality that is evident of Lightfoot throughout the  text is that she looks for the&quot;good&quot; in all six schools,even  though they are not equal. All too often, rersearchers get caught up in  identifying a cause or over-emphasining the negeative aspects while  allowing the &quot;good&quot; qualities to go unnoticed. Lightfoot goes the  extra mile is this respect by bringing forth the good in each school.        It is through work such as this that researchers can learn many  transferable lessons that can be utilized in a wide array of research  studies. With this in mind, I give Sara Lightfoot's book, The Good High  School, a five star rating
You want a title?  Not bloody likely. "I go to encounter for the millionth time the reality of experience and to forge in the smithy of my soul the uncreated conscience of my race."The whole book is filled with stuff like this: at first glance full of depth and meaning, and at closer look fancy jibberish.  Academia has praised this book for a number of reasons, most notably its innovative stream of conciousness style.  Critics and high school lit teachers alike seem to agree that James Joyce is pretty great, and this is one of his crowning achievements.  Honestly, I'm not sure I see it the same way.  The book doesn't exist on its own plane of unqualified excellence as I had been led to believe.  Many of the characters, although based on real life counterparts, lack depth and development.  A lot of this has to do with the entire book being presented from the main character's point of view, so we are not allowed to see any other perspectives of the events that unfold in the novel.  A lot of the action doesn't really seem to add to the overall story, either.  It does not appear that the main character grows from any of the situations or that they have much of an effect on later developments.Despite all of this, I still enjoyed the book, as should be evident by the 4 star rating above.  I liked the book because of the first point I made about specious depth in the writing.  The book is written in its own highly esoteric language that I really got a kick out of.  That line I quoted earlier may not really mean anything on its own, but it just sounds so damn pretty, how can I resist it?  This book is certainly not for everybody, and it takes soem getting used to for the first hundred pages or so.  But once you realize the plot doesn't matter a great deal, you can relax and be swept away by the language as only Joyce can command/subvert it
These are vignettes, designed to inspire further exploration. The widely divergent reviews reflect a lack of understanding of the purpose of this book. It is meant to touch on many mathematical ideas, not to go into depth on any one idea. My son read this at age 8, then at 10, and again at 12 - getting something more out of it every time. Many of the ideas intrigued and inspired him to seek out more information on his own, to research and understand more deeply. For that purpose, it deserves the highest rating.I did not give 5 stars because there are some instances where I did find errors, these do not detract from the purpose of the book, but they are annoying to those of us who try to delve deeper. What I consistently found myself doing is researching from the internet and other print resources. But the idea originated from the overview in the book.Many recreational mathematics books are inaccessible to beginners or math phobes. This book allows you to sample many, many ideas without feeling overwhelmed by details you may not understand. If you want details, you go explore the world opened up by the book
Informative, entertaining but not scholarly. I like to think of this book in terms of what a typical educated person in India -- Hindu or non-Hindu, and not a scholar of religions -- would know about the Hindu religion from being immersed in Hindu culture, just as an American or European would absorb an understanding of the concepts of Christianity; similarly for a person brought up in Muslim, Buddhist or other cultural surroundings.This book succeeds, I think, in conveying a working knowledge of Hinduism to a person who was brought up in another culture; reading the book would enrich a visit to India or a relationship with a Hindu friend. The book also is entertaining and well-organized, as other reviewers have commented, making a topic that can be forbidding -- in its vastness, complexity and differing threads -- easy to digest.However, the author has neither a historian's drive for perspective nor a journalist's detachment. She frequently shifts in and out of character between believer and skeptic, sometimes on the same page. (See for example the page containing the explanation of the word "rishi".) The book contains many stories of dubious historical validity based only on anecdotal evidence. There is much credence for the paranormal in the Hindu world too (at least as represented in this book), and so your skeptical reviewer got a headache. I wanted either to explore the background of the stories -- or else to lay aside the topic because I could spend the rest of my life in such research, and there are other ways I would rather spend my time.This same conundrum would be found, of course, in encountering Hinduism out in the world rather than in a book, so maybe there's a lesson in the presentation! Certainly, read this book to understand the concepts, vocabulary and practices of Hinduism -- but you may save yourself a headache if you can avoid chasing after the loose ends.
Christmas present. Thanks to "The Da Vinci Code" and "The Rule of Four", my daughter in-law has developed a taste for the Italian masters. This is a big, heavy book, with great full color reproductions and the bios of the artisis
A great book for the true jazz lover. While a student in Professor Walser's Jazz class at UCLA, I was one of several students lucky enough to have read every chapter before it  made it to press.  Every chapter was like a time machine, transporting us back in time to an era where racism and sexism took a toll on some musicians while only strengthening the resolve of others.  This book was, at the time, one of the best readings I had done in a long time.  In reading direct quotes from the greats of music, you couldn't help but feel a bit inspired.  &quot;Keeping in Time&quot; is a gem and should be assigned reading to anyone studying jazz or just wanting to learn more about the many performers who played or sang that one song you liked differently.  Professor Walser certainly knows his subject matter well.  And in my case, he certainly excelled in the one thing he likes to do: teach
Highly recommended reading for all grandparents!. In The 12 Rules Of Grandparenting: A New Look At Traditional Roles And How To Break Them, Susan Kettman examines the &quot;rules&quot; of grandparenting and seeks to clarify, explain, and reform in a non-threatening way what should be expected of grandparents -- and what not  to expect. Advice is offered on such sensitive subjects as developing a  positive grandparenting attitude while maintaining a life of your own;  babysitting (and how to say &quot;no&quot; when necessary); fun projects  and activities to enjoy with grandchildren; giving to grandchildren without  spoiling them; techniques for scolding or disciplining without hurt  feelings; involvement in situations of divorce, custody or illness.  Enhanced with an appendix of grandparent support organizations, The 12  Rules Of Grandparenting is &quot;must&quot; reading for anyone who has  become a grandparent and wishes to fully enjoy the experience, or must deal  with disruption in the lives of their grandchildren and in need of sound  advice on what to do
Useful. Not cheap for the class, but very useful and clear cut. All the material included wasn't very helpful to me, but the website was. Overall, stll nice but no keeping value..
Truly an excellent book. When I was a little girl my mother had a bookshelf full of paperback horror novels that she would read- mainly Stephen Kings and and few Koontz's. I specifically remembered asking her one day- "What's your favorite one?" she picked up Swan Song and said "This one for sure." That was about 10 years ago, and one day recently I was in a used book store and came across it. I bought it and honestly thought I would hate it, because I have little or no interest in the King's and Koontz's that filled her shelf. Start to finish I was enthralled with this book. I thought it was powerful and very well written. I was interested in every character that McCammon presented. I read The Stand a few years ago, and it I felt as if it couldn't even compare to this book. Since finishing Swan Song, I pick up any McCammon I come across- Mystery Walk was great, and I just completed book one of the Speaks the Nightbird series. Nightbird is different from his past novels (perhaps explained by the 10 year break?) but again, McCammon writes so well and makes the readers truly interested in his characters. All in all, I love McCammon and Swan Song is one of the finest novels I have read, even if it was in the "discount horror bin" at my local book store
Simply the best!. For the academic, there is no more authorative source than the Diccionario de la Real Academia Espaola
practical and good from one who is in the business. The ordinary person would not think that the business and professional man in the State of Idaho has much need for foreign export/import information.  That is not the case and the WELLS/DULAT book on EXPORTIONG FROM START TO  FINANCE was just the ticket for many of us.  The practical approach,  examples and forms in the book were invaluable to us.  It is great to have  a readable book by someone who is in the business and who knows what they  are talking about
Solid Study Material. This book is broken down nicely and tailored very well to the 70-270 exam.  I have used numerous textbooks and study material in my quest to obtain my various certifications, but this one was definitely the best.  It is well organized and easy to read.  The chapter end questions are decent and resemble those on the actual exam.
Some real gems. Worth buying for the excellent Chicken Bouillabaisse alone, which is sublime. However, note that the recipies are hit or miss. For example, a rabbit stew with olives is sub par
Terrific!. I hadn't read an Alex Cross book in over a year, and wasn't sure what to expect from this novel.Some of the books were interesting turn-pagers, others were just mediocre.This one might be the best of the lot, however.The biopic tale of two gruesome serial killers on the lose is presented brilliantly, and there are plenty of twists and turns to keep you hooked until the final page.Terrific storywriting, interesting chracters, and a terrific plot. Kiss the Girls was my favorite Cross novel, but this replaced it. I can't remember any part of the novel well I felt I was just reading filler or wasn't the least bit interested in what was going on.I had grown sour on Cross novels over a year ago, but this one hooked me back in.
The help I needed. This book contains exactly the information I was looking for.  It was highly recommended by a friend, and it lives up to her sales pitch.
Get It In Writing!. As Judge Judy points out to her audience, there are no courts that protect couples living together.  People who decide to live together, need to set up a legal contract.  When things fall apart, the last thing needed is the distress and lawsuits that don't have any validity of who or what is owed.  In a society that pushes marriage on men and women, it's refreshing to know that there are people who choose to be happy with an alternative lifestyle.  When the marriage falters, couples have to seek legal assistance to end their marriage.  And divorce drags on for years because the courts fuel the fire which drains both parties emotionally and financially.  And children are caught in this mudslinging.  Perhaps an alternative to marriage may change the divorce laws in this country
Sets the Players in Their Time. Wood sets the stage for his "biovignettes" of selected revolutionaries by describing their world. Each was influenced positively or negatively by the aristocracy of the old world.The best essay on "character" (as I took the title) is that of Washington, probably because he had so much of it.  GW not only rejects the opportunity to be like a monarch, he actually frees his slaves and provides for those too feeble to benefit from freedom.  Washington worries about the propriety of this and that and is careful about setting precedents.  All Americans are indebted to him for setting high standards on day one.  He seems the least influenced by the workless mandate of the "gentleman".  Unlike some of the others, he actually fought in the war.Of them all, the high born Burr comes off the worst.  He's the first to milk patronage and court lobbyists.The portrait of Jefferson is the weakest.  While actions and words on slavery are given a reasonable treatment, Sally Hemmings is dismissed in a paragraph.  Here also, the author allows his modern stereotypes to intervene, he compares Jefferson to a "knee jerk liberal" (because, Wood says, TJ is not an original thinker) but doesn't relate this to Jefferson's "contempt" for big government and says like modern day liberals TJ can't understand economic forces (is our spend thrift Congress liberal?).  Wood's stereotypes later surface in the Paine essay where he implies modern day liberals see society as malevolent and government as beneficent.Wood is able to bring us into that world where so much was still to be known.  The founders' ideas were confined to what they knew.  Hamilton had a vision, and worked hard to sell the idea of "currency".  Others navigated the new political landscape to sell the idea of federalism to self interested provincial state governments. The founders dispair as their letters to one another diminish in importance as coarser tracts of the common man, bereft of classical illusions become more influential. Most of these revolutionaries died discouraged or worried about the changes they had wrought.Wood has digested a lot of information.  I gave the book 4 stars and not 5 because I took the title to mean there would be more on morals/ethics and hoped to learn more about attitudes towards slavery, the native population, business dealings and women/family.  The introductory chapter implies that the book will do this, but in this book "character" is more like "disposition" and through it we learn the attitudes of these revolutionaries and how these attitudes related to constitutional and governance issues
the best. ok...for a brief opinion, i think this is an absolutely amazing work of fiction that ranks up there with the best of faulkner...it ranks up there with the best books ive ever read...the prose really makes me reread passages out loud, just as previously posted by another reviewer...in response to those that deem the work short on plot, i just wanted to mention this....i could be remembering wrong but i am pretty sure that this is a somewhat autobiographical work that focuses on mccarthy quitting the drink and leaving tennessee for texas...so this is not necessarily the same kind of work that the border trilogy or blood meridian are.something interesting for me in reading these reviews is that faulkner suffered from the same kind of criticisms, especially while he was alive...lack of structure and coherent plot...i do believe that he is the greatest living american author...if not, i would love to find the person that beats him
"Naked"- Sedaris bears all. Nothing's sacred to David Sedaris, as fans of his have come to discover and appreciate. His entire family is a sacrificial lamb to his sometimes scathing sense of humor, and anyone who crosses his path the wrong way is thrown onto the pyre just as quickly. Sedaris dissects people to the point of making them caricatures, and yet they always ring true, no matter how ridiculous. My favorite example is from the essay "Planet of the Apes," in which a young David hitchhikes home from the movie theatre, and accepts a ride from a crass old woman who asks him to "just tell me where you live, Pinocchio, and save the baloney for lunch." Regardless of whether people actually speak this way, all of us can say we've met some form of this woman, and David nails her in this description.Sedaris is good for leading his readers through his own form of literary slapstick and then hitting them with some sad truth in the end. He does this quite well in "The Drama Bug," in an odd moment of admiration (instead of lampoon) of his mother, and "Get Your Ya-Ya's Out!" with an equally tender look at his often-satirized father.Underneath the jokes and the bearing of dirty little secrets is a genuine love in the Sedaris family, which keeps these essays from sinking into either too-dark humor or a general "Mommie Dearest"-like look back in anger. Sedaris's family may drive him crazy, but the feeling is mutual, and that levels the playing field a bit.
Be a wise man (or woman). Larry has produced an easily affordable primer on Project Management. Much better edited than his Artech House textbook. This one is very suitable for handing out to every member of the Project Management Team for their use in understanding the road ahead. Along the way, Larry throws in the benefit of his and other's experience to help avoid making the same mistakes. As Eli Goldratt just said "the difference between a smart man and a wise man, is that the smart man learns from his mistakes, the wise man learns from the smart man's mistakes". You can be wise by buying this book
Like Watching a Train Wreck. ...you know that your fascination is morbid, but you can't tear your eyes away from the awfulness of it: the sheer ghoulish drama unfolding before you like some sick joke of the gods.I remember the first time I watched this play. I believe it was Lee Marvin's portrayal of Hickey on a presentation of American Playhouse. I was held from first to last with that jaw-gaping awe that only the best dramatic works can inspire.This is a rare work of the highest measure. It combines its existential angst with portrayals so uncluttered that we are spared the usual contortions of the literati. To be sure, there is symbolism and allusion enough: the entire play takes place in a bar called "Hope"; the setting is a meat packing district, literally the most dead end of dead ends; Hickey sells for a living, a profession that trades on hopes and fears. But these are just passing nods to the writer's craft. O'Neill includes them to keep the acolytes happy. The story depends on neither its setting nor its devices. It would work as well set in some professional clubs I know.This play is concerned with the necessity of delusions. The various characters assembled around the bar waiting for Hickey's appearance are different flavours of delusion. It's like Dante's Inferno, with each character defining a different circle of hell. And when Hickey shows up, his effect is not much short of Satan's.No one could write a play like this today. We have become a society so steeped in cool cynicism that we have lost our authenticity. Today, a theme like O'Neill's could only be invoked with a veiled smirk. Think of all the recent movies that have dealt with this thesis: they are either clichd, cruel or contemptuous. Consider, for example, "American Beauty". Delusion is a topic we approach with patronizing disdain for fear of seeming earnest.What is the line between delusion and hope? Is hope itself delusional? Perhaps all humans are fundamentally flawed and can only avoid despair by wrapping ourselves in a cloak of unreality and fantasy. Hope is a crutch; avoidance is therapy; unflinching reality leads only to death or to madness. Heavy stuff.It doesn't matter whether you agree or disagree with O'Neill's thesis because this play wasn't written to advance a specific point of view; it was written to exorcise demons. All of O'Neill's great plays were, to varying degrees, products of his suffering. This one came closest to connecting his personal pain with universal aspects of the human condition. This theme scares us because we are all so very vulnerable to self-delusion, and O'Neill's unsparing scrutiny exposes our own fear and pain so candidly that we are forced into self-reflection and humility. This empathy is at the heart of all the great tragedies: we could be as foolish as Lear, as jealous as Othello, as ambitious as Faust, or as delusional as Hickey. Don't set yourself higher than these figures: there but for the grace of God go I
Please, someone just SAY something!!. This was a very well done suspenseful tale of the kinds of secrets and pains that occur in families and how the sufferers of those manage them.   In stiff and proper small town Wisconsin in 1919, we learn that Amanda lost her sister, Mathilde (Mattie) through the ice on a winter's eve.  Returned from Milwaukee after nursing WW I soldiers and suffering a bad relationship, Amanda has only a year before losing Mattie and taking up management of the family farm and the raising of her little niece, Ruth.  When Mattie's own husband, Carl returns from war, Amanda is not particularly forth-coming about the circumstances of Mattie's death and the two of them exist in the family home almost in a sort of truce - Amanda taking the lion's share of raising the child.Ruth and Amanda are the story-tellers and there is some confusion early on about when things are taking place (in the recalled narratives) but eventually the cadence of the story picks up and is not only manageable but well done.  Although ostensibly the book is a suspenseful one, all roads leading to the discovery of what actually happened to Mattie and why, it is also a complicated exploration how people deal with the traumas in their lives.Very well written, I was only frustrated by the behavioral limitations that Carl and Amanda seemed to exhibit.  There were many times I wanted to shout, "Just say something!"  But I recognize the time period, the ethnic and sociological limitations, and the behavioral `expectations' that these people faced.  And more than anything, I felt sorry for them.
The single greatest example modern theatre. Guare's &quot;House of Blue Leaves&quot; is by far the most memorable, well-written, and exceptionally challenging play that I've yet to come across.  Granted, the only production I've seen was an amateur presentation  at a local performing arts center but, that aside, the content of Guare's  play completely overshadowed any lackluster performances.  As for the  philosophy employed in so many recent films (Magnolia, Being John  Malkovich) regarding self-affirmation through the powers of universal  forces, &quot;House of Blue Leaves&quot; exemplifies this modernist  philosophy through and through.  Although &quot;Six Degrees of  Separation&quot; is the more regarded of Guare's plays, HOBL is the most  exceptionally subtle and quietly subversive.  Very, very impressive work
Right on the mark. Guarendi is LOL funny (really) and provides super insightful advice on how to raise our kids--from toddler to teen--in this crazy world.  This is a must-have book for all parents who are looking for real common-sense advice.  I guarantee this will become a generational favorite
To be continued.... I haven't read a novel by V. C. Andrews since the series that began with "Flowers in the Attic", but that was a long time ago, and I should have expected something different. I was still somewhat disappointed that this one wasn't in the same genre, and more in Young Adult territory, but it was entertaining all the same.  This is the story of three teenagers from different walks of life, but each firmly on the path to self-destruction.Robin is from a broken home, doesn't know who her father is (neither does her mother) and has been forced to move to Nashville with her mother, who is pursuing a singing career.  She constantly gets herself into trouble, until she meets a boy with even worse problems, when everything finally falls apart.Teal has everything a girl could dream of, except the love of her parents.  She was born after her parents had passed the point of wanting children, and never felt like a part of the family.  To get the attention she craves, she keeps pulling wilder and more dangerous stunts, and when she meets a boy from the wrong side of the tracks, she stretches way too far on her already insecure limb.Phoebe was born into problems, with an irresponsible mother and a weak-natured father, and when her mother takes off for parts unknown, her father leaves her in the care of her aunt and uncle, who are strict disciplinarians.  Unable to stay out of trouble, she meets a wealthy young man who has selfish motives of his own.This is where the story leaves us high and dry, and you need to get the sequel "Midnight Flight" to see what happens to the three in the end.  The story of the troubled teenagers is a "to be continued"Amanda Richards, January 21, 200
An elegant meditation on the balance between art and love, as well as an intriguing mystery. Fifty-one year old Alice Brill awakens one morning knowing something is very much wrong. She feels it deep in her breastbone where she has always received terrible news. She knows that what is amiss is a personal problem, not a worldwide issue. However, she has no idea what exactly the mysterious foreboding is about.Naturally, Alice's life isn't perfect. She lost her job as an editor in a publishing house but has mostly recovered from the sorrow of that blow. She now finds satisfaction in her work as an independent book doctor. Her father has slid into senility and currently resides in a nursing home; her mother is long dead. Alice and her husband Ev are arguing frequently, with many disagreements centered on their underachieving, misdirected son Scott. Could her sudden unhappiness be simply disappointment in her own life? After all, she had once taken satisfaction in writing fiction, as had Ev. Both of them have let their art go in order to work at jobs to support a family.Alice is particularly intrigued by a novel manuscript she is editing and becomes more and more fascinated by the author, a young man in Michigan far from Alice in New York. She finds herself looking forward to his emails and phone calls. Can this untoward attraction be the mysterious trouble of which she remains constantly aware?Alice also wonders if an unresolved puzzle from the past could contribute to her unease. While delving through the paperwork of her mother, a published poet, she stumbles across a mystery. Hidden away, she finds intriguing letters and a poem new to Alice. Could her mother have had a secret life? As she reads the poem, she discovers something alarming in her own body. And all the while, she is constantly conscious of that strange sensation of impending doom: something is wrong or will soon go wrong.As time goes by, Alice begins to wonder if she has made up her own life in a manner similar to times in the past when she wrote fiction. What is the truth about her existence, and what has she only taken as reality? If her past as she remembers it isn't factual, how will she delve into it, since her main link to the long-ago is her now senile father?That urgent feeling of impending trouble eventually comes to be realized in many facets of her life. As her father once would have said, now she has something to cry about.Alice continues to be haunted by the locked door in her past --- an actual physical locked door and a symbolic one. In order to understand herself and her place in her world, she must find the key, and yet it eludes her. In the meantime, her complicated, messy present life surges around her. In her father's rare moments of lucidity, he seems to offer her brief tantalizing clues. Or does he? It's impossible to tell given his state of mind, and Alice's own.THE DOCTOR'S DAUGHTER is an elegant meditation on the balance between art and love. It is also an intriguing mystery complete with subtle twists in the plot. The novel's people are completely real; Alice is such a sympathetic character that the reader identifies with her and can't stop reading in order to find out what happens in her life. This is an engrossing, beautifully written story, and I recommend it highly.--- Reviewed by Terry Miller Shannon (terryms2001@yahoo.com
Almost like following a TV series!. I am always fascinated with anything to do with the middle ages. The best attribute of this book is the clarity of its author's writing. It is a pleasure to read Bishop's words (in very plain English, I should add). This is not a big book and, yes, you can comfortably read it in the beach or while sunning out in the yard.Having said that, I felt that the format could have been a little better laid out as there will be a tendency for readers who only have a passing interest in history to forget what they read only a few pages ago (as each page throws out one detail after next). But that also means that this is one of those rare books where you can start reading from almost any page and not be "confused". All in all, a great starter book on the middle ages
Should be required reading for everyone on the planet!. I had never heard of a traumatic brain injury until after my brother suffered from one due to a car crash. After four long months of intensive care and rehab, we (his family) still didn't understand his injuries until we read Claudia's book. We were by my brother's side night and day...reading all that we could...talking to every doctor, nurse and therapist that we could...none of them explained brain injury the way Claudia does. We discovered Claudia's book about 5 months after my brother's injuries and I so wish we had known about it from the beginning. We would have understood certain situations so much better. I think "Over My Head" should be required reading for everyone on the planet. God Bless Claudia and I thank her for writing about her experiences
Any parent would find this inspiring!. I admit it:  I am in love with John Holt.  I realize that he's deceased, and I am happily married, but it's ok because my husband is falling in love with him too.  We are both sad that we didn't get an opportunity to hear him speak when he was alive.  Thank God he wrote so many books.We started by reading "How Children Learn," and then moved on to "How Children Fail," at which point we decided to read everything this man has ever written.  We're working on it."Learning All the Time" is a fascinating book.  In it, John Holt, a former schoolteacher and eventual homeschooling advocate, discusses how kids learn and how adults relate to them.  Most of us adults don't give kids enough credit for how much they want to learn and how much they CAN learn, at earlier ages than we would have dreamed possible.  He challenges everything we've been taught about the allegedly short attention span of very young children, and, since we have the privilege of observing such children in our home on a daily basis, we can see that he is right!His philosophy involves making interesting learning materials available to kids and avoiding the two extremes of (a) frustrating them by pushing them into areas where they don't have aptitude or interest; and (b) limiting them by underestimating just how much they can learn, and how fast.  Basically, he really LIKES children and respects them as human beings.John Holt was trained as, and worked as, a teacher in the 1950's and 1960's.  The more time he spent in the classroom, the more he came to believe that traditional methods of teaching were wasting a lot of children's potential and failing to keep their attention.He has a tremendous respect for children.  He has a lot of insight into the fact that many adults don't understand, respect, or, quite frankly, even like children.We have applied his philosophy with our own young children, with delightful results.  For example, neither of us are fluent in Spanish, but my two-year-old and I are learning it together.  I resist the urge to "play teacher" in favor of learning alongside my child, and I am amazed at how much she is able to learn and retain.  We have also used his approach towards potty training.  When we resisted pushing, our daughter took ownership of the process.  Sooner than we would have thought she would, she announced to us that she was a big girl and didn't want to wear diapers.  A few weeks later (we expected that it would be many months), she announced that she would not be wearing diapers at night either.  She has been true to her word!  These are just small examples of how we have asked ourselves, with a little irony but in a mostly serious fashion, "What would John Holt do?"  Generally, the answer is to be real with our kids, offer as many learning opportunities as we reasonably can, and pay attention to what they are learning -- and marvel at them.In the book, he gives concrete examples of kids who could easily have been considered failures in a "cookie cutter" classroom situation.  In Holt's opinion, even many kids who are considered learning disabled would do just fine (or at least much better) if they were allowed to reach their potential without an excess of testing and time-wasting "learning" activities.Holt's writing has influenced us to seriously consider homeschooling our children.  Even if we don't, I think that our parenting is being enriched by his approach, and I would recommend this book to any parent or educator
Bluhnderful!. I'm sure you're wondering what Bluh means if you never read this book. So I'll explain. Count Olaf reapears with another evil scheme to get their fortune. So Violet hands out mints to her brother and sister knowing that they're allergic to them just to buy them time away from Count Olaf who's in yet another silly disguise. So Klaus gets hives all over his tongue and all he can say is Bluh. I love that kind of humor. It's funnier than I make it sound. I wish the movie didn't ignore such funny and clever parts of the story.The Aunt Josephine scenes were done well though and Meryl Streep deserved some sort of award for her funny peronoid performance. She was truly the character 100%. Since the movie was 3 books in one it ignored a lot of different details from the books due to not having room for them. It just shows the children on a boat to find their Aunt but never shows the trouble they have to go through to get it. In the books they have to worry about Olaf's theatre friends being around just as much as they have to worry about Olaf.The books are clever but it does have it's flaws. The kids are supposedto be really smart but you can figure out things that they don't know yet long before they figure it out. When there's someone in one of the stories with their face hidden, you know it's obviously one of Olaf's friends or either Olaf in disguise. So it's frustrating that in each story the kid's never realize that from the start. I still have trouble putting each book down though even if you know from the start they'll bump into Olaf and that each book doesn't have an happy ending though. It's unpredictable when he will show up and in what disguise or how they will stop him. These books manage to be just as addicting as the Harry Potter books and just as clever too.
Great Introduction. This little number is great for an individual who has little knowledge of Judaism.  Displays in a readable way the differences between Christianity and it's parent faith; Judaism.  Great read for anyone wishing an introduction into a very misunderstood faith, especially looking on from an outsider.
Good Read. I really enjoyed this book and have purchase the next book in series.  If you are a fan of Dean Koontz you will not be disappointed.  I give it four stars only because it is one of those books where you have to get past a chapter or two before you are hooked in, but well worth the wait.  Whew, what a ride
Berserker. Man this is a great book! This book was so exciting that I wanted to read it again and again! If I were you I really would like to purchase this book if you are a crazy fan of Neon Genesis Evangelion. And yes this another book where Shinji says he doesn't want to pilot Unit-01 anymore and his friends talk him back into piloting Unit-01. Overall I really like this book
Cool creepy crawlers!. After reading some of the naysayers petty complaints about this book I almost didn't get it.  Wow, am I glad I did. I read a lot and a lot of good literature (Paul Auster, Ian McEwan, Graham Greene, etc.) and The Ruins, alhtough certainly not great literature, was a real corker!  I could not put it down. All the comments about the characters being shallow, dumb, irritating were lost on me. They acted like any privileged 22-year olds would and as for suspending belief, I only once was a little disappointmed when they left the cab/truck driver without any notion of how they were to get back to town.  Other than that, well who says plants can't hear, see, think and most of all EAT HUMANS.  Shades of Little Shop of Horrors but without the humour.  I was glued to my couch non-stop with this one.  Why anyone would have a difficult time just enjoying the hell out of such a creepy and scary book I do no know. No immediate plans for a trip to the jungle for me after The Ruins.  I loved it and truly hated to see it end.  But of course, it didn't end did it?
Vivre le Lonely Planet en Paris!. After many a trip to Paris, Lonely Planet still stands out as the guidebook of guidebooks. This edition has great restaurant reviews, as is common with LP guides. We have never been steered wrong unless it was to a place that had gone out of business and therefore was no longer open. To avoid this, you can always call ahead of time if you are really concerned.What I always like about LP is the background info they give on the city, plus they recommend books, music and movies to get you in the mood for your travels. The hotel info is good, though their prices are not always totally accurate (understandable, hotels change their rates yearly and therefore may not always be updated in real time). What is accurate is the ranges they give Budget, Mid-Range, High-End.They also have top 5 restaurants, top 5 sites, depending on the arrondissement you are in. This is great because if you are on the go, it saves you the trouble of reading each restaurant review, or each museum/site description.You will probably want to buy a map to accompany you, as the ones in the back of the book are adequate, but could be better. We have traveled with Rough Guide maps, very convenient and weather safe with relatively large print. LP makes maps too, but I prefer the RG's.If you are lucky enough to go to Paris, this is a great guide to have in your bag. It is also a great pre-trip guide and reading the background or getting some of they books they recommend before you step on the plane can only enhance your experience. I would recommend A MOVEABLE FEAST by Ernest Hemingway, a fantastic book about his days in Paris in the 20's
Suitable preparation for Actuary Exam P. I used this book (as well as the SOA sample exams) as my sole means of preparation for the Actuary Examination P. Ross does an excellent job of utilizing a plethora of examples in order teach a particular concept. In some cases, a chapter may consist of two pages of instruction, followed by dozens of examples. This method tends to be extremely effective with regard to test preparation, but more frustrating for students using this as a course textbook. The proofs provided are fairly vigorous, but a strong background in Calculus is essential to understanding any significant portion of this book.The chapter discussing "Jointly Distributed Random Variables" is the longest in the book, and perhaps rightly so, considering this comprises the majority of the P exam. However, in 50 pages of text, about five pages involves a formal discussion of terms and proofs, and the rest is made up of about 40 examples, many which span multiple pages. Again, this happens to be quite effective when paired with the SOA example questions, but may prove to be a difficult text to follow when a professor expects you to understand the finer points of probability theory.If you can answer every question provided in a sample exam packet, you will easily pass the exam; and you will master the sample exam if you spend several months covering the first seven chapters of this book
Good book. Television Writing from the Inside is a very good guide.  Larry Brody writes from experience and it shows.If you found this book helpful, you will also likely enjoy Starting Your Television Writing Career by Abby Finer. Another very good book
Valuable Resource. This author has the distinct ability to make the reader feel like they are conversing with a friend rather than reading a book.  The content is vast and is very well written.  Annie B. Bond is very generous with her knowledge and leaves virtually no question unanswered.  If you made a New Year's resolution to lead a healthier life by creating a healthier home, then this book is a must have
Clear, concise, and well illustrated. While not as detailed as a textbook might be, it covers general points very well
Clear, well-organized guidance. This book does exactly what the title says it does. It provides clear, well-organized and specific guidance to building collaboration in a whole range of situations and between individuals, within groups and across organizations.This book is likely to be useful whether you are a professional facilitator or simply someone who needs to get agreement with one or more others. Much of its advice is, of course, widely available elsewhere, but this is a good choice for a single reference.
Beautiful cakes!. This book has the most beautiful cakes I've ever seen.  We used it for our wedding cake.  Unlike other reviewers, I don't think these designs are too difficult for most good bakeries.  We just brought them the picture and description and they did a fabulous job.  On the other hand, I don't know if these designs are realistic for doing at home since they are pretty complicated and require a lot of experience.  The directions are pretty thorough, though, so it might be worth a shot
Good introduction. I can't help feeling that this book was written in a hurry.  Whilst I enjoyed reading it, I thought that the illustrations (of which there were many) were poor and quite artificial.  Some of the areas of palm reading were beiefly glimpsed over.  It seems very disjointed and the layout of each of the marks and areas of the hand could look more classified.  While most of it is in here, there must be better than this
Outstanding, Hallowell does it again!. Indeed, one's happiness is best not left to chance! Dr. Hallowell, in his pioneering work with children teaches all of us as parents, educators, and professionals working with children that happiness is about feeling loved, connected, and secure in the world.  Through his personal experiences and professional interactions as a child psychiatrist, Dr. Hallowell thoughtfully reminds us of the significance of playfulness, optimism, and joy in our daily lives. This enlightening book is both thought provoking and brilliant and should be read by anyone wishing to enhance happiness in the lives of children
A good help to the series. It presents many interesting info about the begining of the series, so you could read about the casting processes. Of course it has a good explanation of the main chapters over the 7 years. The only bad thing about it is that the photos are B&W
Bad Dog. This book has taken anthropomoric writing over the top.  I laugh every night re-reading some entries.  "My brother just got out of Betty Ford." "Do you know what time it is, young lady. You're grounded."  "If only our onwer had a brain."  Looking at the costumes, I picture the owners dressing up their dogs with glee.  It would have been very funny to watch that.  Thanks for a cheery little book.  You authors must be characters
Mysticism Without Obfuscation. What I love best about Scholem is that he wrote eloquently about spiritual enlightenment without presenting himself as being a mystical master or guru.  He will guide you through the history of Jewish esoteric thought, after which you can sample some source texts (many of which now are available in English translation).  No preaching here - just good scholarly thought and clear, eloquent writing.  It's also amazing how a 60-year old volume remains the standard introduction while still being regarded as controversial in fundamentalist quarters.  An awesome achievement
Great short stories for your kids to read. This book shares the thoughts and stories of young african american  children.As the kids speak up you will here the palm of there hart speaking  to you. There are just great stories some happy some sad and some tell you  just how much different there lifestyle is from ours.the kids will take you  to there world and express there heart
Some of the BEST, most authentic Thai recipes!. After having gone through several supposedly &quot;authentic&quot; books on the subject, I decided to take a cooking class. I was annoyed that my versions of Thai cuisine never seemed to even come close to even a typical restaurant. Chat was the one who was teaching that day, and in about one hour, I had somehow created my FAVORITE dish, Green Curry! I couldn't believe that with a few specialized ingredients, the elusive magic that I wanted was there. I made my own green curry paste first. THAT I think made all the difference. You can't duplicate something like this from a can or jar in some store. We did several other dishes that day during class, and every single ingredient somehow stayed distinct. What I'm trying to say is that Chat is an amazing cook! This book of his has all recipes you could want on the cuisine. And it really is authentic, because he grew up there! A big difference. He runs over how and why the food is different by region. He identifies the common unique ingredients in most of the dishes (like galangal root, thai bird eye chilies, kaffir lime, and fish sauce of course!). And there are many pictures that go along with each dish. Each recipe is all laid out and described in one page, because he makes it very easy. He's very good at explaining as well the reasons why one prepares an ingredient a certain way (like using a mortar and pestle instead of the blender). This is my favorite cookbook from a person who really made me feel like I can actually cook. I've since had four cooking parties with over ten people with recipes from Chat
Have you ever lived with one?. I really enjoyed this book.  The writing is quite informative for those receiving their first introduction to this personality type.  I'm a divorce attorney and have seen, and continue to see, a record number of divorces due to this personality type.  Narcissists make very poor partners and the relationship becomes toxic.  Those in relationships with narcissists are continually told that they are the ones causing the problem.  Due to my extensive experience with these relationships I wrote a book for my clients about the toxic/narcissistic personality type and I use my divorce cases to illustrate the toxic behaviors.  The book is called &quot;Toxic Relationships, How to Regain Lost Power in Your Relationship&quot;.  Those who have read this book may also be interested to read about toxic/narcissistic relationships, how to live in them, and improve them
Awesome book!. I purchased this book recently. I have been following the recipes almost on the daily basis. Kwality's (Quality) ke cholay and Nani's Kulfi are exceptionally good. They both take me back in a very nostalgic mood.  The taste was heavenly. I feel it was very generous of Mr. Saran to share his Nani's (Grandma's) Kulfi recipe which not only tastes delicious but also can be made in a jiffy! We also loved green beans, prawns balchow, lemon rice, daal, Tandoori prawns, Manglore Shrimp, Lahori chicken, to name a few.I encourage you to try the recipes just as they have been written, they will come out great. Next time, you can add or decrease the spices based on your individual taste. I assure you each recipe will come out very flavorful. I also liked the trick for making Paneer (Indian cheese) at home using ricotta cheese.The book is full of taste, delicacies,  memories and emotions. It's an awesome book and I am very glad that I have it.
hallelujah. Maya Angelou can write, orate, and narrate, but here she is wearing a different hat as chef. These recipes chronicle some important memories including fried chicken for when the pastor came to visit, lemon meringue cake which her brother savored for, and couselet which she served to none other then M. K. Fisher. There are few people who have lived such an extraordinary life then Ms. Angelou, but her recipes reflect simple good cooking that her grandmother used to make (where she wasted nothing- check out the recipe for crackling crackling) and passed to her. I love Southern food and a lot of these recipes blow away the homestyle food served here. I love her potato salad with all the eggs and pickles, her collards, lettuce and peas, and  of course the banana pudding (yum!). There is something so fufilling to read her memoirs and savor some of these comfort foods, then prepare and relive the stories she's telling. Only Maya Angelou can have that effect on people
Fantastic. This is a unique read...  Not a novel, but equally engrossing; not a historical account, but namedrops events from history which most readers will probably be unaware of; my first philosophical read but not  intimidatingly so!  Chapters are split into themes such as &quot;how  respect has become more desirable than power&quot;, &quot;why there has  been more progress in cooking than in sex&quot; and so on.  It was the  index which made me buy this book, oddly enough: &quot;Caesar, Cairo,  Cardano, Calcuta, Calvin (John), camerada, cancer...&quot;  Any book which  includes such a diverse range of topics has to teach you many things.  I'm  jealous of the author and have bought this book for friends - and would  recommend it to anyone
Insightful and helpful. One of my family members is narcissist. This book explained why I sufferred so much from this person.
A full-color photographic showcase. Enhanced with informed and informative essays by Morris Lapidus, Suzanne Ramljak, and Arthur C. Danto highlighting the central themes of the art, Michele Oka Doner: Natural Seduction is a full-color photographic showcase of the work of internationally acclaimed artist and designer Michele Oka Doner. Grand architectural projects, clay sculpture, drawings, cast silver, and many other types of media offer a broad spectrum of her artistic inspiration; including works celebrate the human figure, natural elements, and sweeping lines which are a recurring theme. Michele Oka Doner: Natural Seduction is an important and very welcome contribution to personal, professional, and academic 20th Century Art History/Art Appreciation collections
Good no-nonsense guide to all sorts of tax situations. This book tries it's hardest to explain taxes in an easy to understand fashion for us normal people who don't have time to look through those extremely complex IRS instructions and other gibberish they give us taxpayers.  The book does a pretty decent job of it too (however to accomplish that flawlessly, in my humble opinion, is impossible).  Overall, any individual or small business that needs a few clues on how to do your taxes can benefit from this book.  I can't wait for the 2001 edition to come out
The best so far in the series!!!. ALthough a fan of Nora Roberts, I had avoided these books due to a dislike for romance writer's sci fi, however, I have to admit to being pleasantly surprised.  Should have trusted Nora's writing ability.  This book is by far the best of the series that I've read so far.  It is in the style of Dame Christie, and if you love her work you'll enjoy this futuristic take on the genre.  One caveat, Nora or her publishers should really take the time to put in the front cover or on the back of the book a spoiler warning as this book gives away the ending to Witness for the Prosecution and Murder on the Orient Express.  Yes these stories are famous and a lot of people have read them, but not everybody.  Be coureous to those young readers who might read Robb before Christie and have two great stories spoiled
Still deciding. I just started reading this today.It is hard for a non-MBA to review the book, being that my only understanding of what goes on in MBA halls is based on my friend's stories and the plethora of business books I've read.However, I can say that the book covers most of the topics being discussed in classrooms today.What I find most convinient is the ease with which the authors handle the business language. Furthermore, the book is tightly organized, starting out with a basic review of macro/micro economics.I think even someone just looking for a basic understanding of business and economic phenomena will take away a lot from this book
Collected and worth reading through. Wallace Stevens is one of those rare writers who had a golden touch with words. "Wallace Stevens: Collected Poetry and Prose" not only brings together several collections and uncompiled poems, but also selections from his journals, essays and letters. And in all of these, he showed himself to be a thoughtful, intelligent and very talented man.Over his lifetime, Stevens wrote several books of poetry, but his exquisite poems are best taken by themselves: the lush grandeur of "Sunday Morning," the hymnlike "Le Monocle De Mon Oncle," and the humid grittiness of "O Florida, Venereal Soil." He takes multiple looks at "Thirteen Ways of Looking At A Blackbird," and the lush "Six Significant Landscapes."In other poems, Stevens dips into outright surrealism, like in the delicate "Tattoo" ("There are filaments of your eyes/On the surface of the water/And in the edges of the snow"), and also adds a meditative bent into "The Snow Man" ("For the listener, who listens in the snow,/And, nothing himself, beholds/Nothing that is not there and the nothing that is").But Stevens was a man of many talents -- there is a trio of one-act plays, erudite and a bit whimsical, and which have his usual thoughts on art and poetry woven into some of their passages. It is followed by the essay collection "The Necessary Angel," which reflects on the nature of imagination, poetry, art, and the role of the poet in a society. His "uncollected" prose is not so tight -- there are literary experiments, snippets of atmospheric fiction, and sprawling essays on all sorts of subjects ("Cattle Kings of Florida"?). Even included are acceptance speeches and sound bites, like an enlightening little nugget on Walt Whitman.Finishing up the volume is a selection from Stevens' notebooks, ranging from puzzling ("Poetry is a metaphor") to revealing ("After one has abandoned a belief in God, poetry is that essence which takes its place as life's redemption"). And finally we get his letters and journals, which are friendly, relaxed, laid-back -- and still show that his mind was always thinking about his art."Wallace Stevens: Collected Poetry And Prose" is probably the best way to get a full view of Stevens' work. And his mind, too -- his poetry gives little glimpses of his attitude toward the world and his art, but his essays and journals add to that. By the time you hit the final page, it's hard not to feel like you know Stevens.If nothing else, Stevens' writing can be read just because it is exquisitely beautiful. He lavished details all over almost every poem he wrote; his style tends to be a bit on the ornate side -- Stevens freely uses the more exotic terms -- such as "opalescence," "pendentives" and "muleteers" -- wrapped up in complex verse, sometimes with a rhyme scheme and sometimes free-form.His prose style isn't any less impressive -- Stevens could lavish as much on his essays as he did in his poetry, and showed that he was very good at arguing his points. The last parts of the book are sprinkled with anecdotes about his travels, bits of poetry, and plenty of beautiful imagery ("The streets are blue with mist this morning").Wallace Stevens is known for his exquisite, lush poetry, but the full "Collected Poetry and Prose" shows just what an intelligent, cultured man he was. A must-have
Communists in Denial. John Earl Haynes and Harvey Klehr's In Denial is a detailed analysis of the publications and techniques of America's Stalin worshippers.  While millions of Americans believe that communism died by 1991 following the collapse of the Soviet Union and the opening of many of the archives in Russia, the authors revealed that American Communists remain active in the Organization of American Historians, the American Historical Association, in the recommendations of content for children's textbooks, and in many other influential positions.  While Nazism and Communism are both totalitarian ideologies, why do American universities employ worshippers of Stalin but not of Hitler?The Communist revisionist historians can be detected easily, regardless of the labels they use to conceal their Communist beliefs.  For example, what did a historian write about the Nazi-Soviet Pact of August 22, 1939 and of the role of the Communist Party USA (CPUSA)?  Stalin supported Hitler's rise to power in Germany.  American Communist true believers were too stupid to understand what Stalin was doing.  The CPUSA took an anti-Nazism position and cheered the Polish resistance to Hitler until the Soviet Union revealed that it would invade and annex half of Poland.Initially, American Communists supported a third term for President Franklin Roosevelt, a Democrat.  In 1940, Roosevelt mandated the choice of Henry Wallace as his vice president.  When the Soviet Union changed policies, the CPUSA reversed its position and attacked Roosevelt.  Wallace won the endorsement of the American Communists when he ran for president in 1944.Throughout the book, the authors stressed the anti-communist efforts of American liberals, Democrats, socialists, neoconservatives, and of former CPUSA members.  Both Lenin and American conservatives shared negative views of left-of-center politicians in Western democracies.  American Communists are still attempting to brand all anti-communists as McCarthyites.  American Communists claim that Senator Joseph McCarthy's congressional investigations were terrible witch hunts while ignoring or minimizing the tens of millions who were murdered or terrorized in Communist countries.American Communists have claimed that neoconservatives (neo-Trotskyites) are anti-communist.  In fact, neoconservatives are only anti-Stalin.American Communists continue to hold important positions in American universities and in other important organizations.  Neoconservatives have been able to be elected even as Republicans to Congress.  Neoconservatives support the MEK (or MKO or Rajavi cult), a Marxist terrorist organization responsible for the murders of American military officers, Rockwell International employees, and large numbers of innocent persons in the Middle East.With researchers able to study some of the Russian archives, it is now possible to prove that many Americans lied when they claimed that they were not Communists or Communist spies.  Unlike the Salem witch trials and the killings of innocent persons, the House Committee on Un-American Activities identified correctly many Americans as being Communists.Clearly, nearly all Americans need to read In Denial.  Truly, ignorance is a weapon of mass destruction.Professor Paul Sheldon FooteCalifornia State University, Fullerton
Synopsis. (From the back cover, 1969 Edition)Here is the unique and absorbing social history of the Negro in America, told in the earthy, haunting, eloquent words and music of the blues. It is a tale of personal heartbreak and racial suffering, of despair and yearning; yet in the very melancholy of these "devil songs' there is a deep affirmation of life and a continuing expression of hope.Paul Oliver loves the blues. Twenty years of listening and study have gone into this book, and he writes with authority and affection of a folk art that has profound significance for all Americans. Jazz fans and record collectors in particular will find this book a valuable addition to their libraries. Three hundred and fifty blues lyrics are quoted and indexed, and a comprehensive discography is included
A very good read!. Ms. Conant once more brings a tale of suspense and murder.  As well as bringing into play another purpose for dogs in Ruffly the hearing aide dog.  Thouse of us who love dogs appreciate her efforts to help educate people who thing &quot;Rover&quot; is just a pet
Gobbling through history. This book is a gem! It documents, with remarkable art and historic references, the turkey's journey from the Americas to Europe. The illustrations are delightful, ranging from tapestries and cookbooks to political cartoons. Everyone I have shown this book has enjoyed it.
Lessons of life from one of Rome's greatest emperors. Marcus Aurelius, philosopher-king of Rome for two decades, preserved his experiences not for posterity but likely for himself. A reminder of things past forming a deeply personal philosophy to guide the future. Solidly founded in Stoicism yet borrowing from cynicism, epicureanism and platonic thought the "Meditations" is a unique man's thoughts and experiences. Hardly original it is nonetheless, potent and applicable.The main themes of the book can be summed up:Experience as much as you can and interpret these experiences as honestly as you can.Do what you can with what you have been given.Do not fret over that which you cannot control..accept it.Some of my favorite quotes:Think of yourself as dead. You have lived your life. Now take what's left and live it properly.Doctors keep their scalpels and other instruments handy, for emergencies. Keep your philosophy ready too-ready to understand heaven and earth. In everything you do, even the smallest thing, remember the chain that links them. Nothing early succeeds by ignoring heaven, nothing heavenly by ignoring the earth.
I LOVE IT!. At first I thought that this book was useful.. It turned out to be a MUST-HAVE for everyone! A great resource and instructional book for almost every aspect of a human being's health! Although people always tend to comfort themselves that nothing's wrong with their health, sometime they suddenly find out that they have been having a hidden, serious problem that they should consume not less than a billion medicines to cure.This books helped me spot the reasons why I had several but minor problems which my mother always tried to convince me to believe that I'm a perfectly healthy person.  Now, and with the help of Hormonal Balance, I discovered and was able to reach the specific health problems I've been having for the last 15 years and how will I be able to overcome them.Highly recommended!Special thanks and appreciation to Dr. Scott Isaacs who seems to have put a lot of effort in bringing up such a perfect solution book
yoga explained. Sri Aurobindo provides an overview of the field of yoga.  This is not a series of physical exercises, but the practices that allow an individual to understand the complex inner psychology and begin to move it toward union with the Divine.  After a brief overview, Sri Aurobindo goes into great depth on the paths of knowledge, love and works, and concludes with his own unique contribution to the yoga of self perfection, where he reveals the evolutionary purpose of our human existence and puts the entire struggle we face into context
Great primer for understanding the Mid-East - Israel. Slightly depressing, but a great overview of why the Arabs, Palestinians, and Israelis act toward each other the way they do
finally, the real story is told!. What a wonderful job Mr. Noles does in telling the story and interweaving the lives of these two unfortunate souls against a backdrop of old Florida.  He is able to convert his massive research into such an interesting read; I had difficulty putting it down
How To Date A Beautiful Woman. This is a book that will guide you step-by-step to unlocking the door of her heart and enable you to fulfill the ultimate challenge of dating, enjoying and loving a beautiful woman. For the first time since the creation, you (modern man) now have a manual that will provide you with necessary skills essential to dating a beautiful woman forever and a day.
VERY FUN READING. This is the book "Christmas with the Kranks" was based on.  This was a surprisingly enjoyable, cute read about Christmas and the desire to skip it all together, and avoid the mega-hype for a year.  Totally different from anything Grisham has written, as far as I know.  Short and sweet, you'll smile along, laugh and relax while reading this book
Makes you think. I think this book is well written with insight into many of the problems we face as couples. Don't wait until things are too late.... this book helped us maybe it can help you too
An Excellent Book Simplify The  Complex Sale Cycle. Invoke Solutions is one of my client companies.  (www.invoke.com) Their offices are located next door to ours in Wellesley, MA.  Because of some encouraging early success with their unique marketing research software and solution, Invoke's Board recently decided to staff up additional sales territories across North America.  Ben Cesare, Invoke's Senior VP of Sales, retained me to help them to find Sales Executives for some of these new territories.  Ben came to Invoke with more than 20 years of experience in leading sales teams, including a stint heading up Channel Sales in North America for Apple Computer.  Ben understands the world of complex selling!In the course of helping me to understand the kind of candidate that will be most successful in telling the Invoke story, Ben mentioned that his favorite book on the subject was written by Rick Page: "Hope Is Not A Strategy - The 6 Keys to Winning the Complex Sale."  It did not take me long to figure out that this book should quickly find its way to the top of my reading list.  I have just finished digesting the book.  I can see why Ben considers it "the Bible" for the art of complex selling.  Over the past several years, I have been trying to learn all that I can about best practices in sales and selling.  This thin volume - less than 200 pages - is the best resource I have seen for simplifying the sometimes mystifying and multi-layered process of managing competitive sales.The book is laid out in four major sections:Section 1: The Challenge - The Complex SaleIn this introductory section, Page unravels the intricacies of selling in a rapidly evolving business environment.  I found the chapter on "Talent and Team Selling" to be of particular value.  In this chapter, he lays out the different kinds of skills that are needed for different types of selling - Tellers, Sellers, Hunters, Farmers, Business Developers, Partners and Industry-Networked Consultants.Section 2: The Solution - R.A.D.A.R.This sections contains the Six Keys that Page refers to in the subtitle of the book.Key 1 - Link Solutions to Pain or GainKey 2 - Qualify The ProspectKey 3 - Build Competitive PreferenceKey 4 - Determine the Decision-Making ProcessKey 5 - Sell to PowerKey 6 - Communicate the Strategic PlanSection 3: Strategies for ExecutionThis section is replete with mini-case studies of how specific sales teams or individuals implemented the execution strategies outlined in this part of the book.Section 4: Winning Before the Battle - Account ManagementPage writes: "A friend of mine was an airborne instructor in the Army.  I asked him if it was difficult to get people to jump out of an airplane the first time.`Actually,' he said, `it was harder to get them to do it the second time.'That is my definition of a great salesperson.  Will they buy from you the second time?If we oversold or underdelivered, then it wasn't a sale; it was a lie.  Lying is easy; selling is hard.A great salesperson sells in a way that leads to trust and repeat business."I recommend this book for anyone who is selling or leading a sales team.I also recommend Invoke Solutions' fascinating new approach to streamlining market research.  They are saving their clients time and money while providing more useful market intelligence.  Check out their Website.Al
one of the best. This is definitely the best book I read in a long time. Ayn Rand's Objectivism philosophy is fascinating to anyone that loves freedom, capitalism, and reason. This is not a book that any closed-minded socialist-like thinker should read (i.e. people that believe in increased federal government control over our lives). This book rightfully criticizes the intellectuals of the 20th century that promoted socialist programs and even socialism itself. Ayn Rand was a real thinker that reminded me of how great this country was and still could be if we return to what we were when this country was created by our democratic, capitalist, and intellectual founding fathers. I am looking forward to the Atlas Shrugged movie that is in the making
A Wonderful Surprise. Greenmantle is a beautiful story, a hidden story. It is a story of love, murder, revenge, loss, past mysteries, resolution, friendship and the fantastic. This is the first work of Charles De Lint's that I have read, and I must say that he will be put on my list of must read author's after this wonderful book.Greenmantle is the tale of "a mystery," a being that exist in our world, yet lives in a parallel version of that same world. He is a stag, a greenman, Pan, a goat, etc. Alice Treasure and her mother, Frankie, move to a very small country town out in the woods after winning the lottery. Ali discovers the sound of pipes playing in the woods and is changed by the sound.Mix this story with a mafia story and what you have is Greenmantle. I never thought that I would be a fan of any story about the mafia. Just never been in to that genre, but De Lint works the mafia into a work of fantasy and it really works! What you get is a wonderful story with a strong human touch and beautiful, well developed characters, set in the real world, yet a fantasy world at the same time.De Lint's writing style reminds me a lot of Neil Gaiman's. Common themes can be drawn between the two writers. Both are able to create a totally believable fantasy world within the modern world in which we live. Both focus on relationships between people and the power that is in those relationships. Both take ordinary people and make them into their own kind of heroes. Gaiman has a slight edge over De Lint, but that should not take anything away from De Lint. De Lint knows how to write a page turner that doesn't just have a driving plot (numerous plots at that), but he knows how to write well. He always chooses the right words and really makes this book an enjoyable and moving experience.The cover art is wonderful and is done by David Bergen. Nice stuff.Favorite line of the book: "I've been all the way there and back again - just like Bilbo.
Different from other Dark Tower books, but still just as good. Wolves of the Calla, in my opinion, does the best job of any Dark Tower book so far of telling a story about people's lives in the world of the Dark Tower.  In prior books, the towns/cities that were traveled through were secondary to the journey to the Dark Tower (Tull, Lud, Topeka, etc.).  Calla Bryn Sturgis, however, is the entire focus of this book, and while that may make some answer-hungry readers upset, I still found that I enjoyed it immensely.The ka-tet of Roland, Eddie, Susannah, Jake, and Oy are on their journey under the beam, headed toward the Dark Tower, when they are interrupted by a group of people from a town up ahead.  These people are in a dire situation, and need the help of the gunslingers.  Every twenty years or so, a group of "wolves" comes out of the east, and takes one of every twin in the town (twins are the norm in this world).  The twins aren't killed, but they come back "roont," which is to say their brains have been basically sucked dry.  The ka-tet meets a man who will be familiary to many King fans, Father Donald Callahan ('Salem's Lot).  Callahan lives in the town now, and is one of the main proponents for using the gunslingers to take out the wolves.  Callahan also has a secret: in his church he holds one of the colors of the Wizard's rainbow, and he offers it to Roland if they will help rid the town of the curse of the wolves.If all this weren't enough, Susannah has reverted back into her previous schizophrenic state.  She has created a whole new personality, Mia, who is the mother and protector of the "baby" that Susannah is carrying inside of her.Wolves of the Calla was completely different from what I was expecting when I picked it up.  Frankly, the book has very little to do with the Dark Tower when compared to the previous books in the series.  Of course, the tower is constantly in the back of everyone's head, but the main focus of the novel is defeating the wolves that take the children from Calla Bryn Sturgis.  In this novel, I feel that King has created the best villains yet in the series.  He does a great job making the reader truly hate the wolves, and you cannot wait for the climactic battle.It is also very interesting what King is doing with the whole idea of things from our world being true in their world.  The wolves have a few weapons at their disposal that might (should) seem very familiar to you.  The whole idea of Callahan now being in the world of the Dark Tower opens up a whole bag of tricks.  And it is apparent that King is going back into this bag with a revelation that comes near the end that involves a certain author we all know and love.But, of course, it wouldn't be Stephen King, and it wouldn't be a Dark Tower novel if there weren't a few crazy twists thrown in just for good measure
Provides actual info!. First off, I have to say I hate the name and this is the only "Dummies" book I have ever bought. When things are too difficult for people to use, it is the designer who is at fault, not the user.There, I feel better.After reading many reviews of many wireless network books at amazon, I bought this one. I had tried on a couple occasions to get a wireless network going at home without success. I had wireless internet, but could not share files or printers. There are maybe two pages of information in this book that revealed everything I needed to successfully advance from "internet only" to a real network. And I could easily find and understand the information! The book has much more info, as well, but I had already figured out the other settings and had other sources for the technical background info. I don't mean to belittle this with the "two page" comment, there are few "how to" books I have found that have more than that. I am very glad I bought it. Five stars if it did not have an insulting title.
quitling with carol armstrong. Lots of ideas - beautiful color photos.  Makes me want more of Ms. Armstrong's books
A Devotional Classic. I am in absolute agreement with the review below.  As I set my heart upon the Lord in the early pages of this work, it brought healing tears to my eyes.  This book helps open heaven to our hearts, and would be wonderful in meditative prayerful reading.  it was written in 1650 by a man who in deep sickness thought he was dying about the glories of heaven, but went on for 40 more years and had one of the legendary ministries of England.  A Puritan/Calvinist, but this work will be apprieciated by all who love the deeper Christian life
Important book. This important book is so well written that, despite its broad sweep and intellectual distinction, it flows beautifully. The first chapters provide one of the simplest and clearest descriptions of cosmology I've ever read, perhaps even bettter than Neil deGrasse Tyson's in Natural History. Christian provides a marvellous theoretical framework for understanding history as playing out repetitive patterns, and the sweep of learning, while careful, is extraordinary.
thoughtful and thought-provoking reading. In Church And Civil Society, Francis Sullivan (Executive Director of Catholic Health Australia, Canberra) and Sue Leppert (Executive Director of Anglicare, Canberra and Goulburn) expertly collaborate to compile, organize and edit a number of informed and informative contributions focused on the relationship between theology, church, state, markets, and civil society. The tension between the churches' responsibilities and contractual obligations as a service provider in a particular political and economic context, with its commitment to being an agent of social justice, advocacy, and responsive action for the disadvantaged and the marginalized is analytically presented. Also explored are the way community services are currently expected to operate in a climate of Australia's market driven economic objectives, privatization, competition policy, and government social policy reforms. From terms of engagement, to images of church, to issues of spirituality and engagement, Church And Civil Society is strongly recommended to the attention of the Christian community as thoughtful and thought-provoking reading.
Good recipes, original combinations. The cover says (pictures) it all. I can assure you that mozzarella and figs is a great change from ubiquitous straight tomatos. The rest of the book is the same: good Mediterranean-style dishes with a good deal of interpretation from different perspectives. This isn't a book only of traditional dishes, and that makes them very refreshing and inspiring
Help children of all ages work through the stages of divorce. This book is a great way to help children deal with the losses associated with divorce.  Through the use of animal characters, children are able to explore the feelings and experiences encountered in a divorce.  The characters give children an avenue to begin discussing what they are experiencing and an opportunity to talk about what is happening to them.  This book is a kind, gentle way for a parent to help and support their child through a difficult situation
A wonderful, timely, fun book. WOBBLIES! is truly a wonderful, unique piece of work. The book tells the story of the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW, better known as the Wobblies) through a collection of over fifty graphic stories (i.e., comics) produced by some of today's most exciting progressive artists/writers (Harvey Pekar, Mike Alewitz, etc).The individual works are incredibly diverse, linked thematically into six chapters: (1) "Early Days" (founding convention, Big Bill Haywood, western miners, Mother Jones...); (2)"Lawrence and Patterson" (the most famous strikes the Wobs led); (3) "Wobblies Far and Wide" (Joe Hill, free speech fights, itinerant Wobs (or, hoboes); (4) "Repression, Martyrdom, General Strikes"; (5) "Beyond Martyrdom" (focusing on the often neglected Wobbly history of the 1920s); and (6) "The IWW Lives!" (the Wobblies up to the present).As a special treat, there is a collection of original IWW cartoons and illustrations at the end (indeed, this book carries on that very special wobbly tradition).This is a wonderful book that couldn't be more timely-- being released on the centennial of the founding of IWW (one of the best comics in the book depicts the founding convention of the Wobblies in 1905). Because of its graphic/comic form, it will surely help popularize the IWW to a new generation-- at a time when this is needed more than ever. (And, on top it all, it is a very *FUN* read-- highly recommended
We laughed and laughed... a really fun read!. I give this book five stars for entertainment value, which was our purpose in selecting this book.  Our six year old daughter identifies Junie B.'s misbehavior and has no desire to emulate her actions or grammar.  It is funny because she is so outrageous.Junie B. Jones and the Stupid Smelly Bus is the funniest children's book I have read with my daughter in a long time.  We laughed uncontrollably so often, my husband came upstairs to see what was going on and stayed listening until we finished the book.My daughter came home the next day and showed me she had checked out the next book in the series from the school library.  When it came time to read, her eyes lit up with excitement.  That's when you know a children's book is worth five stars
Always expect the charm of the South to shine through in novels from Fannie Flagg!. Welcome to the World, Baby Girl! is another entry in Flagg's catalog of Southern fiction.  The story jumps around in time, between the life of famous, glamorous TV personality Dena Nordstrom in the present day (1970's), and the history of Dena's hometown of Elmwood Springs, Missouri, circa the 1930's and 1940's.  As a jaded Northerner, Dena avoids her past and her association with a backwater place in Missouri.  The story of Elmwood Springs is also the story of Dena's upbringing and the disappearance of her mother, but Dena knows nothing of it.  The reader, however, is certain to be charmed by Elmwood Springs, especially radio personality Neighbor Dorothy, who we are introduced to in the first pages of the novel.  Longtime residents Norma and Mackey Warren (Dena's cousins) provide delightful dialog and antics, and show their love to Dena when she returns home after a long absence.The title of the novel is perfect--Dena thought she was worldly and all-knowing when she was on top of the NY television world.  In reality, there was a whole world in little old Elmwood Springs that she needed to learn about to become a complete person.The reason I'm giving this 4 stars instead of a perfect 5 is that Flagg wrote the book to lead up to a major twist about Dena's past.  Some of the narration and Dena's behavior on the way to this twist is a little weak.  The reader might even get disheartened with the novel in the middle, because of the dragging-out of the lead-up to Dena uncovering her past.  Once Flagg gets into it, however, the reader will say "a-ha! So, that was where she was trying to go!
I don't know why I love it like I do. I don't know why, I just do. Icy weirdness and strange childhood memories. I just love this photographer's work
Truly a Timeless Classic. This book is a must read for people of all ages.  I don't know about the 'Dover Thrift Editions', I got mine at Barnes and Noble, so I suggest you check that version out.  Old Ben Franklin was an amazing man, he truly was.  This book is one of the best I have ever read.  This is a must read for everyone!  I can't believe we never read this in school! It should be a mandatory read.Anyway, please read this book and I assure you, you will enjoy this insightful, unprecedented man.  I promise you will.  How there are so few men of that class today!
Simply Fantastic!. Excellent introduction to the field. Will get your basics sound. Worth every penny I spent on the book.Just buy it
A Good Introduction to Torts. This is a pretty good book-better than many 1st year law casebooks!Dobbs has organized the material well, and it's all interesting stuff to know.  Torts is the class that most people think about when they think "LAWYER"-the material covers intentional torts (battery, assualt, trespass, etc.), negligence, defamation and more. There are a few grammatical errors (maybe 1 per 40 pages), but I think a lot of reviewers let their hatred for torts affect their reviews.  All in all, I think this is a great 1L textbook-better than any Emmanuel's outline.  I would recommend Dobb's LAW OF TORTS as a supplement though-these two books work best together
Not my favorite. Perhaps the most amazing thing about this book is the reaction to it by various readers.  Those who detested it said it was because of the violence.  Those who like it apparently liked it because it was by Nora Roberts.There are the usual Nora Roberts fixtures here:  a beautiful, independent, tough heroine; R-rated sex scenes; handsome and talented lovers; flowers, etc.  It has been touted by some as a mystery of sorts, but there's nothing very mysterious about it.  Anyone who doesn't know who the arsonist is after the first fire hasn't paid much attention.  In fact, I kept wanting to tell Reena to wake up and go get him.Perhaps the biggest departure from Ms. Roberts' previous books (for me, at least) is the rather humdrum atmosphere.  Ambience is the writer's strongest suit in other works--Alaska in winter, an island off Boston, Chesapeake Bay, Ireland, Louisiana etc.  Old Baltimore neighborhoods and a pizza shop aren't quite the same.Still, the writing is mostly good and I kept reading.  A second-rate Nora Roberts book is still more interesting than most other novels being published today
Excellent research, grounded in sound principles and beautiful thoughts. I decided I liked Judith Lasater after reading her articles in Yoga Journal.  She explained in one article the pathological process of sciatica nerve pain in very concrete, medical and scientific terms, enabling me to understand it completely and therefore help myself and bring this VERY common problem under control.Yoga Journal also recommended this book; "Living Your Yoga..." as another good read for her so I purchased it, like many of us, wanting to know how to bring this beautiful practice of Yoga that we love sooo much into our everyday lives!I could not put this book down, fellow readers, what I found was sometimes overwhelming, especially since most of us in Western society are taught to think "from the neck up" and not from our hearts.  Some of it could only be assimilated by much contemplation, like the statement that all of us humans have our reality defined by our beliefs and practices.  Reading the chapter on suffering, that was a tough one, especially since I see so much of it in nursing and it is difficult to cultivate "detachment".  In other ways, this book is almost like a workbook, giving practices for the reader to participate in and mantras to chant at the end of each chapter.Then there is the last chapter on love...Well, I wont spoil the surprise but I am sure that no one will be disappointed!
Fabulous Fusilli!. I usually like to read several books at once. But I HAD to read "Hard, Hard City" in one sitting. It is sensational. I beg anyone who has not read this author to order this book immediately. It's that good
Smart, fun, and pleasingly cynical. I'm at home on bed rest and desperate for something good to read.  This book did the trick..  The narrator is smart, funny, and clearly aware that it is next to impossible to do much about most of the evil sleaziness of the world.  Certainly it is impossible to make changes in individual lives, one at a time.  (Or maybe I'm just jaded, too.  Some may call it maturity.)  Clearly, the narrator is the most decent character in a novel full of morally bankrupt people (from both sides of the tracks).  Ironically, his career is blindsided due to what others perceive to be questionable morals.   Anyway, join Max as he watches pathetic people with and without class, power, and agency screw up their lives even more than they already have, and help him make sense of it.  Great literature this ain't, but a smart, fun, cynical read it is
The most powerful indictment of 19th century capitalism in existence. Friedrich Engels' classic "The Condition of the Working Class in England" was written when he was only twenty-four, and had but recently abandoned his Calvinist upbringing for a more critical, socialist, point of view. Yet this book reads as if it were written by an experienced political commentator or a radical sociologist, without actually at any point becoming melodramatic or dense.Engels' main purpose is to confront the bourgeoisie with the reality of their mode of production and to contrast this with the rhetoric of "free choice" and "civil liberties", as well as the capitalist apologia of the political economists of his day, in particular Andrew Ure. With great insight into both the causes and effects of the capitalist system, Engels catalogues the endless want, filth, despair and misery experienced by millions of labourers every day in 19th century England. He pays attention to housing, to factory safety, to unionism, to the physical condition of the workers, to alcoholism, the state of the Irish underclass, to prostitution and disease; in short, all the ills attendant on industrialization.What gives this book such power is that Engels on the one hand proceeds in an analytical manner, making use above all of sources from the bourgeoisie itself and from Parliamentary reports, in explaining the functioning of the capitalist system and the competition between capitalists and between labourers. On the other hand, he writes in a particularly readable manner and at no point bores the reader with the mere summing-up of statistics. On the contrary, every analytical truth is accompanied by a vivid description, taken from Engels' excursions into working-class neighbourhoods, of the terrible state of humanity that the economic laws of capitalism cause for a great number of people.For those interested in political economy, it may come as a surprise to see how much of the functioning of capitalism Engels already understood at such an early point in the development of theory. This gives the lie to the many theorists who would later claim that it was Marx only who worked on economics and that Engels was a mere epigone; this book should be a vindication of Engels. His later sketches of the political economy and of the historical development of capitalism would lay the foundation for both the Communist Manifesto and Marx' economic works. But the core insights that would create the modern theory of socialism are for the first time fully expressed here, and in a most appealing and shockingly effective manner.In other words, an absolute must read for every person of intelligence
A Good Primer. This was the first book about everyone's favourite comedy couple. I recently read it for the fourth or fifth time and felt inspired to recommend it at Amazon. McCabe interviewed both comics and knew Laurel for years. As an overview and appreciation of the Laurel and Hardy career this is still the best book to start with. Those more seriously interested will find a number of excellent books on the subject written in more recent years. I  recommend 'Mr Laurel and Mr Hardy' enthusiastically to all fans
One of the best books I've read on communication. &quot;The Art of Talking so That People Will Listen&quot; offers great insight and practical tips and language skills to use in building and strengthening your relationships. I have used this in course content I develop and it is always received very well. I recommend this book for anyone who wants to sharpen their verbal and written communication skills
children revealed. Parenting is very hard and the most important lesson as parents that we can teach our children are skills in successful relationships and loving one another. As it says in his first book "5 love languages" - Relationships are more meaningful than accomplishments. Children are so hard to figure out most of the time. Any help in relating to them better and creating a stronger bond that will last a lifetime is a priceless treasure. This book encourages gentleness, compassion, the importance of listening and the validity of each precious childs thoughts, emotions and feelings.  By studying this book,you will be able to successfully help lay the foundation of who they will become- how they manage their own emotions, solve problems and cope with the challenges that life throws them. All of which are found in how we treat others, how we deal with anger and disappointment and how well we express these emotions with another person
Attractive concept but some missed opportunities. The American Auto Factory is a historical and sociological look at the development and changes in technology which directly impacted both workers and management told through vivid pictures and concise text.  Or so I believed.  What was actually there was only partial to my perception.  Beyond the vivid and captivating pictures was a very dull and unexciting narrative of the history of the American auto industry.  Not that the history itself is uninteresting, rather, it has been told countless times before in numerous books in more detail then provided here.  The American Auto Factory should have focused its narrative on the changing conditions and relationship of the men (and eventually women) working in the factories portrayed both through pictures and text.  Decade by decade, I expected a discussion on the changes in technology and how it effected workers perceptions and relationships with management, their jobs and each other.  Unfortunately the authors decided to provide a simple historical narrative on the auto industries main players, GM, Ford and Chrysler with minor discussion on the independents in the corresponding chapters.  Having said all of that, it still doesn't take away from the beautiful pictures included.  If the authors did one thing perfectly right, it was to dig up all those archived photos and include them in this book including Diego Rivera's famous (or infamous to some) mural, Detroit Industry.  The pictures are wonderful and convey an entrancing story of the auto factory from the way it was to the way it is.  Buy this book if you want to be visually captivated at the workers and their machines in the process of creating the automobile.  Don't buy it if you want a better understanding at how workers were and still are affected by these same machines
very good book. a very good introduction and simply introduced art from different eras ,what i like about this book its very well organize
Highly Recommended. Anyone interested in learning about conservative Presbyterian &amp; Reformed (from now on P &amp; R) theology should consult this book. Coming from a Calvinistic Baptist background there are certainly a number of things that I would disagree with in the book. However, Reymond has done a very good job presenting P &amp; R theology in a clear but scholarly fashion. Though many will complain that the book is not balanced and treats some subjects superficially, Reymond's objective was to articulate what the P &amp; R tradition teaches rather than giving us a comprehensive systematic theology (try Erickson's instead). Some P &amp; R people will find that Reymond is too logical rather than biblical and that he relies on Gordon Clark too heavily for his view on revelation, God's nature, the atonement, election, and theodicy. For example, Reymond is unapologetically supralapsarian in his view of the decrees (pp. 488-502) and insists that whatever comes to pass is good because it is willed by God (see section on theodicy on pp. 376-8). Also, his view of Christ's eternality is also controversial departing from the standard Nicene view (a view which I disagree with Reymond). However, you have to give him good marks for trying to defend his particular position. Besides these questionable positions, Reymond does an excellent job defending a very high-view of the inspiration of Scripture (liberal &quot;Christians&quot; perhaps should read up on this section). He also does a good job defending the typical Calvinist understanding of fallen man (that fallen man is totally depraved and unable to save himself). Another aspect of this book I like is the way he presents the orthodox Reformed understanding of the covenants of the Bible. He follows the traditional Westminsterian scheme of a dual covenant of works/covenant of grace structure (covenant of works=meritorious salvation; covenant of grace=salvation by faith in Christ alone). Though I do not agree with this structure, Reymond has given us a good treatment of the topic from a historic Reformed perspective. His section on soteriology is very well done (following the traditional Reformed schema) and his section on ecclesiology is very informative (expousing the Presbyterian and paedobaptist perspective). His section on eschatology could have been better. He writes from an amillennial perspective, but gives lots of Scripture passages to defend his viewpoint (however, many will find his sections on the divergent views of eschatology very informative [pp. 981-6 and 1067-93]). The appendices are also useful--even giving us a brief treatment on the Calvinistic TULIP (pp. 1125-6). Finally, the bibliography section on other systematic theologies is very handy for theology students (pp. 1133-42). One final note before I close. Someone below was disappointed because Reymond didn't really interact with the so-called New Perspective on Paul. Reymond does this in his book on Paul's theology. This book was not a place for Reymond to interact heavily with this growing movement. However, the New Perspective is a new movement that is trying to influence (I should say infiltrate) the P &amp; R tradition. Reymond defends the orthodox Protestant view of justification (pp. 739-56); the New Perspective is trying to destroy the teachings of the past 500 years. Reymond does briefly discuss Daniel Fuller's and E. P. Sanders' views on pp. 431-3 and p. 1116 (footnote), respectively. Reymond does a convincing job telling the readers that the view of justification and law promoted by these two authors (faith+works = justification) is a departure from Reformed (and Protestant) orthodoxy. Reymond is not trying to put-down &quot;biblical theology&quot; here, but trying to defend the correct view of justification by faith alone (sola fide). Those who have a problem with Reymond on this issue are those people who are trying to legitimize their stay within the Protestant tradition while denying a major tenent of the tradition (perhaps they should find a different home to expouse their works-salvation gospel). Only one perspective is right--both cannot be. This book is a must read for all who are interested in P &amp; R theology
Intriguing story told with lots of heart. For a book on the arcane and technical worlds of computer science and chess, this story is highly readable and entertaining, and often quite funny and deeply poignant.  The development of a history-making machine was, in the end, a very human adventure
Brutally honest americana. Sam Shepard is an american original. I first encountered his work at the Public theater in NYC in the early to mid-70's. Then having seen Buried Child, i knew I had to read his work. His language is spare, tough and elagaic, like Cormac mcCarthy's novels of the southwest. The best work hee oare the first three plays: True West, Buried Child and Curse of the Starving class.Shepard is a poet of the interior,his convaluted families express despair over hideous personal tagiedies{Buried Child] or their own inability to love{True West]. Shepeard use of language is interesting. It is its strongest when it reflects the rhythm of a place or time,{curse of the Starving Class} and ,for me at least, is most evocative  of a place either real or imagined,very much Shepard country.{I saw a young John Malkovich in a Shepard play} Now far better known for his acting{The right stuff, et, al],when Buried child first premiered, he was still a poet/playwrite living out west who refused to fly and who was commisioned by Bob Dylan to write a screenplay for his abortive Rolling Thunder Review movie, Renaldo and Clara...Brilliant,Blistering theatre,that has held up well these 20 years. A True American Master.HIghest possible Recommendation
very very dry, but well researched and important. The very fact that we in America call the Russo-German conflict in WWII the 'Eastern Front' and not 'The Great Patriotic War' is evidence of our reliance and bias due to the use of primarily German sources for information. This has colored to some degree our understanding and knowledge of the most incredible and terrible war front ever fought. This work is to be acclaimed for its use of Russian sources and data to help balance out our knowledge and allow us to 'see things from the other side.'That being said this is a very dry tactical military description of the war. Missing are the types of stories and anecdotes found in works like Barbarossa. The work is probably best suited for the avid addict of European WWII or a researcher. There are of course some primer text and intro backgrund and decent conclusions at the begining and ends of the chapters but on the whole it reads as a graduate dissertation and tactical timeline.The research seems excellent, the info remarkable and I would recommend it for the historically factual merits alone. This is not to say Russian sources should be trusted more than German ones, but the author has done a remarkable job sifting through the evidence to bring as non biased a view of the war front as possible
Fun Sequel to 'Putting Boys on the Ledge'. Fourteen-year-old Frances knew that there was something weird going on when she walked into her friend Blue's house, only to be confronted by her three closest friends (Blue, Allie and Natalie), and she was right. For she is immediately bombarded with an alternative to her crush on Blue's older brother, Theo. The solution is that she must join a co-ed club, one where she will be able to meet some new boys, and possibly begin dating, so she can finally do something other than study during weekends. The problem, is that Frances' parents won't allow her to do anything that takes her mind away from studying. So she comes up with a great idea. She'll start a study club, that way she'll be with guys, but will be studying at the same time. Everybody wins. Until Theo joins the study club. Then all bets are off.After reading PUTTING BOYS ON THE LEDGE, the prequel to STUDYING BOYS, I knew that Frances was my absolute favorite character out of the four girls, so I was absolutely ecstatic to see that STUDYING BOYS was told from her point of view. Frances is an amazing character, who proves to readers that it's good to be smart, and that smart girls can get the cute guys just as easily as the popular girls. Stephie Davis is amazing at proving that girls can take a lead role in relationships, and that they don't have to agree with whatever the guy says to hold on to the romance. Overall, this is a very girl-empowering addition to the teen fiction genre, that will hold a special place in the hearts of female readers the world over.Erika SoroccoBook Review Columnist for The Community Bugle Newspape
Getting a glimpse ... As the parent of a 5 yr old autistic child,I read this book with great interest. It hasgiven me some insight as to what my childMAY be experiencing (each autistic child isunique). The author's experiences and trialshave given me ideas to consider as aides formy daughter and confirmation about what I'vebelieved she needs in the way of structure.The author is TRULY a remarkable person andI am thankful to her for having the courageand the thoughtfulness to share her experienceswith the public. I am also moved by the strengthand courage demonstrated by her mother throughthe years; another remarkable woman.I am excited to read the author's "ThinkingIn Pictures" next
Nobody Blends Shakespeare's Word & Action to Attention Like Bloom ... Every epoch has a True Champion of Shakespeare, ours has Mr. Harold Bloom.This book must be devoured with all the vigor of a True Glutton.  One must be inebriated with the rich abundance of his offering.  Right. Here. Live.As Marlon Brando sliced to the quick of Apocalypse Now, The Bard must be Redux via the Bloom route.  But be quick about it.  Give this Tome more than two weeks and you've missed His Majesty ...THEN, take a look at all that glitters for the Gold in Clare, in Clare Asquith's SHADOWPLAY.  See my review of said inflection point, from hence all future Shakespeare wisdom will spring.  You may find it more enriching than possibly imaginable ..
Amazing Little Book. I have to say that this book revolutionized my love life between my and my man.  I had been plagued with questions about &quot;how&quot; and &quot;where&quot;, and this book answered EVERY one of my questions, in addition to suggesting many things I had not previously thought of.  Kudos to Jack Morin - If we ever meet, I'll shake your hand, and THANK YOU!  You have truly changed my life for the better
Great read. Tortilla Flat is a gripping tale of a group of scoundrels who are only looking out for themselves.  They live in the old, rundown part of Monterey which is known as Tortilla Flat.  The main character, Danny, inherits two houses which brings his so-called "friends" to his side.  They embark on many wild and ever memorable adventures which are driven by greed and the need to take from others to better themselves
They Bury Lies, Don't They?. Tempe Brennan starts out her second adventure exhuming a grave at a small church.  Tasked with identifying the bones of a nun, she's just getting adjusted to the Montreal weather.  In the middle of the night, she's called onto the scene of a terrible fire that turns out to be rife with murder.  As Tempe works on her two cases, she also returns to her Stateside home and continues being drawn into a macabre web featuring a cult.  At the same time, her sister is exhibiting strange behavior after her latest divorce.Kathy Reichs is a practicing forensic anthropologist who has somehow found the time to write bestselling fiction.  Lately, her life has also led to a television series called BONES.  Although the Tempe Brennan of the television show is little like the Tempe Brennan of Reichs's novels, they're both worth reading and/or watching.  Max Allan Collins has written a novel based on the television show.I really enjoyed the forensic aspects of the novel, but there were several instances where I almost felt bowled over by everything that was going on.  Tempe's relationship with her sister, Hari, is dead-on and accurate, feeling very real and very troubled.However, DEATH DU JOUR also felt hurried and too relaxed at the same time.  There was a lot going on, but it took a while for everything to come together.Kathy Reichs is still turning out one of the best forensic series out there, and I'm a fan of the television show.  DEATH DU JOUR is a fun, educational read that mystery and crime scene fans will enjoy
Judgement in Death. The audio was fast moving had some twists and turns kept you guess who the murderer was.  Enjoyed the book tape tremendousl
Wonderful. This is a wonderful compilation of verses illustrated with wonderful art by Mary Englebreit.  It is so enjoyable!
A Gift to All Parents!. Lori and Becky use a solid faith-based framework in walking us through a practical approach to Christian parenting.  Their book guides parents in their journey to raise children with a foundation of strong values.  It is truly a gift to all parents
An unusually clear book -- and great for OCR researchers. This nifty book is unusual in several respects: it is written in an extremely clear and simple style; it presents good clear code, both in print and on the accompanying CD; and it presents a variety of different methods for achieving each given goal. For example, the book presents a half-dozen different algorithms (usually with code) for edge-detection, for thresholding, and for skeletonization. For the most part, the book does a good job of explaining the relative merits or suitabilities of the different algorithms.It's important to say, though, that this book is not a comprehensive introduction to image processing issues and algorithms (such as Gonzales&Woods), nor is it a soup-to-nuts cookbook of code (such as Myler&Weeks' admittedly dated "Pocket Handbook"). Although the book is written in a style that students could understand, I wouldn't recommend it as a first book for novice students. It would be better suited to a non-specialist who nevertheless needs to accomplish something specific -- like thresholding or edge-detection -- in short order, and with an algorithm that's tuned to their particular application.One last thing: this book will be VERY MUCH appreciated by anyone seeking a foundation in optical character recognition
Fans of Ms. Brown will enjoy her latest personification mystery. In Virginia, septuagenarian "Sister" Jane Arnold is the grand mistress of the foxhounds at the Jefferson Hunt Club.  Though crusty she is normally friendly to man and beast though she finds the four legged species much kinder than the two legged animal.  However, Jane does not like two new club members due to their cavalier attitude towards tradition.Affluent Crawford Howard disrespects everyone especially Jane when he deems their antiquated methodology holds him back; he commits the ultimate insult when he purchase foxhounds to form his own rival club.  Cancer specialist Jason Woods expects VIP special treatment from the JHC especially Jane, but even long time members do not get superior handling and Sister tries to ignore him.  Meanwhile Jane's companion Gray Lorillard audits the books of a local company only to learn Iphigenia "Iffy" Demetrios has been withdrawing money from it for years.  Not long afterward someone murders Iffy and wounds Gray's brother.  Jane and her four legged buddies conclude that someone fears what else the audit will reveal.The villain is obvious and the story line with talking animals used by Rita Mae Brown in this series (see FULL CRY) and her other major series (Mrs. Murphy) will delight her fans who will definitely want to read this charming cozy.  The talk with the animals' whodunit is fun to follow as Sister and her four legged pals investigate the murder and the apparent attempted murder where she assumes Gray was the target.  Fans of Ms. Brown will enjoy her latest personification mystery.Harriet Klausner
The Campaign for 'Real' Cats. For those of you who absolutely need to know what a 'real' cat is...  Also tells you how to extricate your 'real' cat from flypaper.  I laugh every time I re-read that part (and I re-read it frequently).  Also, an informal introduction to Schroedinger's cat.  I absolutely loved the book.  Cat lovers, and those odd few who aren't, will probably find it amusing.  I sure did..
Fine Collection. I have made a number of dips from this book, and I'm always satisfied.  The recipes are easy to follow, and the dips seem to always receive rave reviews.  The dips are basic enough, but also usually have a unique twist that satifies.  If you need to make a dip, then you should pick up this little gem of a book
A relatively quick read with lots of good information. For obvious reasons, the witness protection program has always been and probably always will be controversial. I believe the authors make a very good case for its merits, however. Thanks to this program, the law now has much more effective tools to protect ordinary people from the reckless, greed-crazed megalomaniacs who prey on them. It also gives those trapped in this soul-deadening lifestyle an opportunity to change their lives and make something worthwhile out of them. Apparently thousands of families' lives have been changed for the better as a result.Politicians and television journalists like Geraldo Rivera thrive on stories like that of protected witness Marion Pruett who murdered his own wife and four other people after having entered WITSEC. Often, though, certain inconvenient details get swept aside. Such as the fact that Pruett would have been released from jail by the time he committed his crimes, anyway, whether he had joined the witness protection program or not. Because his sentence would have run out by then.None of us like to see dangerous people on the loose, but the simple fact is that you can't keep everyone who has ever committed a crime in jail. Even if there weren't any ethical issues involved, there simply aren't enough resources. Thanks to our unrealistic drug laws, the United States is already the largest per-capita holder of prisoners in the entire world. What a sad commentary on the so-called land of the free and home of the brave.I recommend this book for the fascinating glimpses it provides of politics both inside and outside the Justice Department. I was irritated to read about how J. Edgar Hoover's solution to organized crime was to simply claim it didn't exist despite the overwhelming evidence that it did. And I was enraged to read about Jeb Bush's lobbying to get a dangerous anti-Castro terrorist an early release from jail in order to drum up votes in Miami's Cuban community for his father's re-election. But I was also gratified to learn how hard work by Gerald Shur, Howard Safir and hundreds of others has paid off over the years despite attempts by corrupt government officials in America and elsewhere to both exploit and defeat it.Also interesting was the story of how Shur and several deputy marshals traveled to Nicaragua during the Reagan years to protect the judge and jury of a trial against five soldiers accused of raping and murdering a carload of American nuns. The descriptions of the dangerous and seemingly hopeless conditions judges worked under in that country at that time made me thankful to be a citizen of a country which, while it is not perfect, at least offers its citizens a reasonably safe and reasonably fair environment in which to pursue meaningful lives.The description of Colombia under the reign of terror of Pablo Escobar and other psychopaths was also frustrating to read. It's only fair to blame those Americans and others who supported Escobar through the purchase of illegal drugs for enabling him to become so powerful and despotic. Nevertheless, those who persist in believing that the best course of action to take against drugs is to simply ban them must surely see that they do just as much to enable the Escobars of yesterday and today than drug users. For, certainly, the price of these drugs is kept artificially very high because of the risks that must be taken to produce and distribute them.Like all problems, the problem of illegal drugs is not a simple, black and white issue that can be solved by simply resorting to punitive measures. What is needed is innovative thinking such as what has gone toward the establishment and refinement of the witness protection program over the past four decades.
good reference for advanced, NOT A LOGICAL INTRO to GR. This book is known as the 'bible' of General Relativity or 'MTW'.People with different preparation will perceive MTW in different ways:The beginners in GR very often will feel that the book is a good reference and shows 'properties' of the defined objects instead of explaining the logical necessity of demanding such properties. My first course in GR was based on that book and although I learned some 'index gymnastics' from it, very often I had questions of the type 'where does this come from, why is it defined this way'. Often I would read about something like 'affine parameter' and I would not understand its importance at all.For beginners I recommend the books from J.Hartle, B. Schutz, and S. Carroll in order of increasing abstraction. I am currently in the middle of course based on the Carroll's book and I understand things I have never ever been able to understand from the 'bible' like the fact that we may define different connections but only one of them is metric compatible and we CHOOSE to work with it, or that we CHOOSE to work with a torsion free connection, or that reparametrizing a geodesic may not give you back a geodesic (in relation to the affine parameter remark above) ... Such facts are either not clearly spelled in the 'bible' or they are digged in somewhere 300 pages away ...Once you are past your first (or better second) course in GR, that book will be an invaluable reference for you with plenty of examples how to apply different computational and theoretical techniques in GR.The reviewers that give it high rating are obviously either experienced in the field or are begginners that value a book only because of the well-known authours.The book is really a titanic effort to compile all relevant pieces of info into one thick volume   BUT PLEASE PLEASE think carefully before you recommend it for INTRODUCTION to General Relativity !!!
Treehouses of the World. There's a serious caveat to this review. The book I got was NOT translated from Japanese. I don't read Japanese.With that said, I did get a lot from the photos and the brief English translations. This is a picture book, not designed for builders, more for lookers. It's high quality with great photography and many houses "discussed."My favorite part of the book was the photos and the many many locations and settings of the treehouses covered
entertaining. I found this story very entertaining. A hard book to put down! However, there are points where you have to question if there is some fiction thrown in the story or weather Queen is being completely truthful about his involvement in certain circumstances. None the less, it is a very entertaining read
Unbridled Genius. One of the best. It is as if James Joyce were alive and queer in 1973 New York. Kramer is an author, dramatist and activist who helped found Act-Up. In this harsh, funny, terrifying, graphic, pornographic, brilliant, compelling book, he both honors and skewers the "gay scene" of the early '70s.This book is simply required (though at times difficult) reading.
Just what this knitter needed. I taught myself to knit from books when I was a teenager. Now that I'm in my 50s I've knitted for many years, but still didn't know some of the common "tricks of the trade" I might have learned if I had been taught by an old pro or if I had taken classes. This book fills in the gaps and gives me lots of ideas about how to work around problems. It also increased my understanding of some technical details of knitting that I would never have figured out on my own. Easy to read, well organized, and a useful reference book to keep on hand
lending and losing this book should have taught me a lesson. Having read Portrait of an Artist in college I learned to appreciate the talent, determination and self reliance that success requires.  It should be required reading for every young woma
Best In Many Ways. I received this book as a gift a few years ago and have used it often.  The recipe's are imaginative, easy and always well recieved by family and guests.  The recipe's ingredients are basic and credible.  And of course, the presentation in this book is a knockout!  The food, the scenery, the dishware.  All top drawer
Wonderfully Masterful. I am no expert in the area of Mathematical Analysis, but I am an avid reader of any book that pertains the subject.  I found this book in my schools mathematics lounge and could not resist reading it from cover to cover.  This book is of the quality of such authors as Buck, Widder, Courant, and Rudin.  As another reviewer has noted, this book is definitely worth every penny.  It is not dry or to pedantic as some of the other afore mentioned authors, yet it is not simple and lacking in content.  Of course like any quality Advanced Calculus book it requires the reader to have mathematical maturity as well as patience and the drive to self-explore the concepts.  If one cannot follow simple examples and from those examples formulate their own, they may want to review the very basics of mathematics or consider a different major.  I would highly recommend this book to advanced undergraduates or beginning gradutes students as a reference book or for self study
Applying the Tree of Life. I always was interested in the Qabalah and the Tree of Life and studied it off and on for a long time. But I never was able to use it for anything practical much less for my own life matters. This book showed me just how really practical the Tree is and how it can be used with profit. I enjoyed it and use it in many matters each week although I sure don't live by it as gospel. Still, I now have something useful and I understand the Tree a lot better and appreciate it more. One thing. I just found out from a web search the author has a website (8th matrix press) that has a calculator that will do all the hum drum math for you in seconds. If I like it so much why am I giving it 4 stars rather than 5? I don't think anything in this life is perfect, so that's why. But check it out. It will help you more than you think
Icons viewed by the Orthtodox. Among the many books on icons, this is one of the oldest still in print. Why has it become a classic? Because it was written by one of the greatest twentieth century theologians, Vladimir Lossky, and by one of the greatest  20th century iconographers,Leonide Ouspensky who spent the whole of his  artistic life in France painting icons and frescoes. Their approach is  unique not only because of their deep experience of the Orthodox faith, but  also because of the way they decided to describe the colour prints  reproduced in this volume. What we have here is a superb commentary in the  form of selection of poetry from the feasts during which these icons are  placed in the middle of the church. Much of this Byzantine hymnography has  no parallel in the West. It is what is heard in the eastern Christian  church throughout the liturgical year which this volume beautifully  illustrates both in word and image. The authors' feeling for the uplifting  prayer of which icons play such a vital part is genuine and rarely found in  any other book about the iconographic tradition.  All Christians and many  non-Christians will appreciate  their  respectful presentation of the  revelation of God to man as it is presented in this book
A straightforward guide to the mentally demanding rigors of philosophical study. Plato's Sun: An Introduction To Philosophy is a straightforward guide to the mentally demanding rigors of philosophical study, intended especially for students and novices. Chapters cover such topics as "What Is Philosophy?", "Metaphysics: The Search for the God's-Eye View", "Logic and Its Place in the Universe", and "Ethics: The Good, the Bad, and the Beautiful". Glossaries of names, key terms, and Greek terms, as well as a suggested reading list, round out this excellent text for classroom or self-study.
Well...Okay you should keep it. I hope you are familiar with the series, if not, start with the first book Temping Danger.  This latest book Blood Lines, the third in the series, will leave you baffled.  Author Wilks takes you on a ride though a maze of multiple avenues to the plot, that will be a little taxing for those of us that have little patience. The jumping around from character to character was a little annoying.  I still feel in the dark about the bad Goddess thing.I personally didn't like the fact that the Author changed the strength of the main female charactor Lily into this brainwashed government agent that is stupid enough to think everything is solved with a gun and badge. Lily doesn't know enough about her mate or his culture to bust a grape. I was equally revolted by the fact that Lily thinks it's OK to give the U.S. government the Codex, a book of knowledge. Give the book to a group that were going to shoot dragons from the sky. And I really wish she would stop her secondary charactors from functioning in denial, THAT is old. If you are a fan of Author Wilks of course you enjoyed her book. I enjoyed it. I just don't want to see a good author go bad. I will await the next one, just not with a Hurry Up frame of mind, as I would some authors
An Elegy of a Wonderful Marriage. John Bayley CBE and Dame Iris Murdoch were married for almost 50 years. Their relationship was truly unique, special, and hard to replicate. They trusted each other, nurtured each other in literary criticism and writing, Their union was brought together during their time at Oxford where they lived for the remainder of their years together. JOhn writes lovingly about Iris even during her illness of Alzheimers which deteriorates the brain matter. Iris relied on her mind to write, analyze, and plan elaborate novels which were multi-storied and engaged the readers to think themselves. She was also a philosopher, college professor, etc. It's hard to imagine that Iris was no grand beauty but she had both inner and outer beauties. Sadly, her disease would rob them of so much more. Iris became more childlike and unable to care for herself while John became the primary caretaker. John who was in the shadow was now in the forefront without much help. It's hard watching the film without shedding a tear or reading this book without feeling something for somebody we never personally knew but by reading this book, we do learn about this amazing couple. We learn about their triumphs and failures. How they were just happy to be together and go swimming, if only happiness was that easy to find nowadays. John was a wonderful husband. I admire his truth, candidness, and revelations that their marriage was not always about sex and that Iris didn't care for it in general. They didn't have any children and neither seemed to mind that outcome of their marriage.
Best shape of my life. You can't go wrong with the abs diet. It's not really a diet, but more of eating food that's good for you. All the recipes are laid out for you, and it's all straight forward. I'm in the best shape of my life thanks to the abs diet and a little exercise every week
Streams. I enjoy this book but sometimes I have a hard time understanding what some of the people are saying. I am using it in my prayer time. Thank you
A Great Source for Juvenile Justice Information. This book was a great source of information on the Juvenile Justice System, especially the system in Los Angeles.  A compelling read, the grim realities of juvenile justice are conveyed with an unusual blend of compassion and pragmatism.  A must-read for anyone interested in learning more about this important subject
Goosebumps. If you are a fan of "The Twilight Zone" then Finney's stories might be right up your alley. His tales are wonderfully eerie and thought provoking.  I'd say each story is between 5 -15 pages. Nice quick diversions. I read this book in one sitting non-stop and enjoyed every page
A Masterly Work. This is the first novel I have read of Kazuo Ishiguro and I could not resist sighing reading the beautiful prose. The portrayal of the butler, his detached restraint and attempts to be the epitome of "dignity" throughout his career-- while extraneous circumstances sway his ideals and the gradual overwhelming realization of the barrenness of his tenuous beliefs, marked by the ultimate realization of a life wasted, transform the novel into a mesmerizing psychoanalysis of man's feeble relationship between his self and what he projects. Amidst the ruins of a fading empire and ways of living, hope still persists of a beautiful "evening" of life. Marvellous.
In a word, fantastic. This is one of those books that I've known about, and heard about, and been told about, and has been recommended to me countless times over the short span of my life. I remember one such recommendation in particular---from Fr. Miguel, my spiritual director at the time. He saw in me an immense love for philosophy, and wholeheartedly recommended that I read the book. In fact, one of our first 'projects' was to watch the movie, although we couldn't find a copy of it available anywhere.This past Christmas time was that time when I finally endeavored to obtain a copy of the book in review here. One of my bosses at work gave me a gift card for Christmas to Borders. I utilized it quite well, purchasing 'The Karamazov Brothers', and a collection of novels and short stories by Flannery O'Connor. Trust me when I say that the purchase was emphatically worth it.For starters, I almost didn't buy this edition, simply because it was titled 'Karamazov Brothers', instead of what I'd heard my entire life---from my youngest days, too; watch the cartoon 'An American Tale', with the beloved Mousekewitz family, and their son Fivel; when asked what his favorite book is, Fivel names the book in review---namely, 'Brothers Karamazov'. I bought the edition nontheless, precisely because it was published by Oxford University, and I knew them to be a fabulous publisher.Beginning to read a book the size of 'Karamazov' is tough, due to its sheer length. Indeed, it is the longest book, apart from the Bible, that I have ever read. But, as I am fond of telling people, 'It is the best damn novel I have ever read.' I work a full-time job, thus don't have a whole lot of expendable time, thus it took me two months to read this book. Those two months were, however, two of my most memorable.I've not read anything else by Dostoyevski, so I'm not sure if he's this 'good' in his other stories, but he was a sheer genius at character development. I simply cannot emphasize that point enough. The characters introduced throughout the 1,000 or so pages were developed and described so splendiferously, that I felt as if I were being introduced to real people. The whole scenario surrounding the murder was so realistically told, that, despite the fact that I am quite able to stomach immensley violent movies such as 'Saving Private Ryan' and 'The Passion of the Christ', this book made me shudder as I read the pages, paragraphs, sentences, and words describing the murder that is, in some sense, the centerpiece of this beloved novel.Even the peripheral characters, those that are, well, quite random, and only in a few chapters, but developed oh-so-well strike me as being as real as my roommates, simply due to the---I'll say it again---sheer genius of the author.Unless if one is completely philosophically inept, they notice that this book is much more than just a murder mystery of sorts. This book struck me almost as being a philosophical treatise against nihilism. In fact, a dear friend of mine told me that he's heard of Dostoyevski referred to as the 'Christian Nietzsche'. The same friend of mine---an avid Dostoyevski reader---said that he read that Nietzsche in fact took the time read Dostoyevski's novels. I can't help but wonder what he thought as he read these novels that unabashedly attacked the very philosophy that he pontificated over-and-over in his works.To close, I first apologize for my rambling, and lack of direction in this review. There is just so much to be said in regards to this great book, and I lack the time to address each and every thing in it that made it what it is---great. Thus, I close by wholeheartedly recommending this book to any and all.God bless.CocamoJo
Christ Doesn't Change; Our Understanding Changes. A book that will make you think--not a bad thing for Christians to do.This book looks at our understanding of Jesus and how it changes as we age.  As Charles Britt, a very wise man once said, "All we as Christians are asked to do is "To Commit What We Understand of Ourselves to What we Understand of Christ...."  We will change as human beings and our concept and perception of Christ will change..."That's what this book is about: our changing concepts of Jesus. He doesn't change; our understanding of Him changes as we age and grow in life experience.One important point: This book, while very good, is for those who have already started the journey of thought and faith. Beginners might want to start with "The Jesus I Never Knew" by Philip Yancey, then come back to this book.  Both are well worth reading--this one is a little deeper. Deeper thought is required here.  "The Jesus I Never Knew" is a better primer for this book.Yancey is a writer; Borg is a theologian. Both have their places
Good read. If you're looking for a fast, funny read, you will not be disappointed with The Deal. The plot is intricate, the action is non-stop, and the characters are outlandish, especially the industry's movers and shakers-the extras-that Lefcourt takes great delight in lampooning
Great book. i`m not very good writing in english, but this book rules, is quite serious and the investigation is very well done...the pics are great, so the editio
Don't go to a casino until you read this book!. What a unique book "The Zen of Gambling" is! The best part is the chapter on the psychology of casino gambling called "Viva Las Vegas." Author Root's philosophy about the ways that casino execs trap gamblers and force High Rollers into playing "dumb" is a classic. His section on poker strategy is world class. This book is a must read for anyone thinking of setting foot in a casino
IT'S ALL ABOUT THE ETHICS OF BASEBALL. THIS BOOK IS THE BEST BOOK I'VE EVER READ.  IT GIVES YOU ALL THE ETHICS OF AMERICAS PAST TIME. THE RULES OF THE FUTURE BASEBALL IN YEAR 2000, AND  MUCH, MUCH MORE, READ IT
Comprehensive. I found this book to be quite complete in material compared to others which I've looked at. The style of the book is not too intimidating for those just starting to workout. I especailly like the fact that they emphasis proper flezability and form alond with stretching... something I wish I could have read before I sarted working out for the first time.
Great Recipes. This book is full of great recipes. The author doesn't waste any space. There are recipes for almost anything you'd want to make. Buy this book. It is worth the money
Excellent!. If you love historical fiction, this is a must read!!  Fans of Phillipa Gregory will appreciate the Illuminator.  I just do not understand the criticism, after all this is fiction, is it not?  The ending begs for a sequel, and I will be the first in line to buy it
The tragic history of God's people. In this magisterial work, Johnson chronicles the long and bitter path of the Jewish people from the time of Abraham. A thorough and exhaustive work, it explores, amongst other things, monotheism, the concept of the sanctity of life, the Israelite prophets, the birth of Christianity, the Enlightenment, the Holocaust and the establishment of modern Israel.The narrative is compelling on many levels, as a work of general history, as a tome of metaphysical and philosophical thought and in its discussions of historic personalities. The seven chapters are: Israelites, Judaism, Cathedocracy, Ghetto, Emancipation, Holocaust, and Zion.The scope of History Of The Jews is too vast and its insights too edifying to be summarized in a short review. To do it justice, it needs a review the size of a small book! The question posed by the author in the Prologue: Is there a providential plan of which we are the agents?, is answered with a resounding yes when one reaches the end.I enjoyed Part Seven: Zion, the most, as it charts the events leading to the restoration of Israel and this brave little country's survival against impossible odds. Those who do not see a divine hand behind the history of the 20th century must be wilfully blind.If this were the only book he had written, Paul Johnson would still be a hero and a genius in my eyes. His account of the terrible suffering and the awesome contribution to mankind of the Jewish people will stand the test of time. But history is still being written despite the fatuous title of Fukuyama's famous book. There is hope that God's miracle nation will play a greater and happier part in the future.This masterpiece concludes with a postscript, a glossary, extensive source notes and a thorough index.
Reviews by Nan Kilar and Bobby Miller. An upscale interior designer has found peace and contentment in Whispering Springs, AZ. She has a thriving business, and she's settling into newlywed life with a private investigator. That alone tells you that trouble is already on its way. Krentz has authored some thirty or more NYT bestsellers. Not that that means anything. That's not true. It means that the publisher believes enough in Krentz's work to spend the big bucks needed to get the NYT to endorse it. Hey, I've got the NYT's name on my newest book. If you can't beat them, join them
A surprisingly gripping tale of adventure. Before reading Sea of Glory I had not heard of the U.S. Exploring Expedition or any of its crew members. Having read Nathaniel Philbrick's wonderful account of the voyage I find its continued obscurity striking. Despite the tremendous controversy that surrounded "the Ex. Ex." and its volatile commander, it made significant and lasting contributions to science, cartography, and the international reputation of the United States. In addition to discovering Antarctica and charting much of its coast, the expedition mapped an incredible number of islands and coastlines and returned a treasure trove of scientific observations and specimens.Sea of Glory is, at its core, an adventure story. Hundreds of men and a half-dozen ships set sail knowing they would be at sea for at least three years. In addition to sailing into (literally) uncharted waters, the men would have to survive a host of challenges if they were to return home. The ships were tossed about by storms, battered by icebergs, and severely damaged by reefs and sandbars. The men themselves, meanwhile, had to deal with frigid temperatures, angry natives, and their always unpredictable commander, Charles Wilkes. The reader will quickly appreciate how incredibly dangerous the journey was and marvel at the fact that anyone survived it.Beyond the rigors of life at sea and the impressive accomplishments of the expedition, I was especially struck by how different the world was just a century and a half ago. No one knew the location or size of Antarctica, assuming it even existed. The west coast of North America was barely charted and was not at all certain to become part of the United States. A sailing expedition consisting of six ships and just a handful of scientists was able to profoundly impact multiple branches of science.Because the Exploring Expedition was a government-sanctioned, scientific endeavor, all of its members were required to keep detailed journals during the voyage. Thanks to this requirement, Philbrick is able to provide a highly detailed account of all that happened and allows his readers to see into the minds of both the commander and the crew. It is certainly a story worth reading and I will recommend Sea of Glory to others. You will find this book especially enjoyable if you are a fan of Magellan, Cook, or other maritime explorers
A book that has been rejected, despised, and burned in India. A book that has been rejected, despised, and burned in India, The Myth Of The Holy Cow by D.N. Jha dares to challenge the traditional Hindu belief that the cow is a sacred animal. The Myth Of The Holy Cow makes the controversial claim that beef was an important ingredient in the cuisine of ancient India, long before the birth of Islam, and allowed in the Brahmanist and Buddhist diet. A meticulously researched, strongly worded, persuasively articulated challenge to long-held religious beliefs, The Myth Of The Holy Cow is a unique and iconoclastic contribution to the study of Hindu beliefs, practices, history, and customs
A Book To Encourage All!!. This book, even though it is fiction, with true history mixed in for good measure was very inspiring!  Everyone I had listen to it, loved it!  I would like to thank the author and say it was well written, and the narrator read the words beautifully!  Thanks again
4.5 stars. Read this book at a light warehouse because you will NOT want to be anywhere near the dark!
Road Trip!. Alright, I got to take educational road trips with my children. I found this book was a great guide to get out of the house for my family and take a road trip that was not only educational but family bonding as well. A must read and get out on the road
A book to introduce your children to the Chinese New Year. This book just perfect for introducing your child to the Chinese New Year and a perfect place to start! My daughter loves lifting the flaps on each page and is the begining of her learning all about her Chinese Heritage! I only wish it where a lot in board book form
Chess Opening Wonderland. John Watson has written another amazing book. It's hard to believe that he could create another tome the equal of "Chess Strategy in Action" and "Secrets of Modern Chess Strategy". Lo and behold! This new volume on the e4 chess opening is a masterpiece! IM Watson has a way of bringing a refreshing approach to tried and true openings. I have read lots of opening theory but this work illuminates the themes and strategies of openings in a way that I have never seen before. Watson also provides excellent sample games and analysis of the material he discusses.I have not read the entire work yet, but I can highly recommend the chapters on the Pirc Defense, Philidor Defense, Caro Kan, Giucco Piano, Kings Gambit, and Sicilian. I think this book will be very useful for almost any level of player. Also please read the chapter on the "Significance of Structure"Eevn though I have been playing chess for over 50 years (USCF-expert, when active), I feel that I have only gained a genuine understanding of these openings for the first time after reading Watson's book!!Finally, this volume will not only increase your understanding of the e4 openings, but it will also deepen your enjoyment and love for the game.I can't wait to read Volume 2 on d4!!By the way, I should mention that I think the review by j clark very accurately describes the book.
Great as a book on tape. If you have not heard Grafton's alphabet mysteries as a book on tape, do yourself a favor and get hold of one and enjoy! Judith Kaye IS the voice of Kinsey Millhone. She has the attitude and the wit down perfectly.Of course, a great performance with a lousy story still makes a lousy story. Fortunately, this is a great story. The mystery is interesting and puzzling. Kinsey misses some obvious clues but, even though I had them way before she did, I still couldn't figure it out! A pleasure
Bullseye. SPOT ON! This book sculpted out the last one and a half years of my life with laser-like precision. I read it in one sitting, and it has thoroughly fortified my spirits with guidance that I'm glad to know is the result of the authors' experience with countless other cases similar to mine.
I loved it. This is probably one of the best books I've ever read. I devoured it. A lot of people compare Leopold Von Sacher-Mosoch to The Marquis de Sade, but this novel was tragically romantic. I would compare it to something like Wuthering Heights.
Great Puzzle Book for Middle School Students. The puzzles in this book are wonderful to use after students have finished a test or other work.  It keeps them quiet so that the other students can finish their work undisturbed.  The puzzles are a little more challenging than the usual Highlights Hidden Picture puzzles, which makes them great for junior high age students.  I highly recommend this book and hope that Joe Boddy creates more in the future
A Must Read. This work sheds new light on a very fascinating question. In fact, this book is the basis for some of my own research within the field.  I highly reccommend this book from both an academic and sports fan's viewpoint
Journey Into Healing. This book uses poetry as an introduction to its prose reflections, reflections which consist of spiritual meditations, commentary, thought provoking questions, and personal biblical interpretation.  The author, as she did in her book "Sacred Voices," focuses on the perspectives of women, this time moving beyond Genesis to include Esther, Hannah, Ruth, and Naomi.  The book is intended to help people as they, like their biblical ancestors, struggle with the age old problem of pain.  The poetry is not particularly sonorous, but it does grapple with heavy themes, and it serves as a solid jumping board for the author's reflections.
Very good read. This was an excellent biography. Very well written and extreemly interesting. Spured on by the movie the Aviator, I set out to learn more about this remarkable man. After reading the book, I am more amazed and saddened by the life he lived. It leaves you a lot to ponder over. Did his parents contribute to his mental problems or was he just born with the inability to love anything, ever...Very fasinating...Great book
Excellent. This is an excellent book for those who, like me, are trying to understand what is shamanism, with the eventual perspective of becoming shamanic practitioners. The matter is tidily presented. This book is CLEAR! It was written by a person who has CLEAR ideas in his mind. It delivers knowledge (which doesn't mean it'll make a shaman out of the reader, of course). It explains the difference betweeen a psychotic, a shaman and a shaman pratictioner. It explains why people may want to journey in the non-ordinary reality.  It is a book written for the reader. The only criticism I have is that journeying is presented as easy as eating breakfast. Potential problems are totally down-played
Short and sweet review. This is a great book.  I was given it in a pile and recently picked it up and then could not put it down.  Great characters, detail and story.  My wife stayed up until 3 in the morning to finish it.  Read this book if you get a chance
Extraordinary; a work of genius. These are true tales from a clinical neurologist's notebook, but this isn't just any neurologist.  Oliver Sacks, author of the justly celebrated, The Man Who Mistook His Wife for a Hat (1986) and Awakenings (1973), which was later made into a movie starring Robert DeNiro and Robin Williams, and other works, is a gifted writer with a fine sense of story and an even finer sense of humanity.  He has a style that is both affecting and fascinating, yet studiously objective, a style laced with footnotes and clinical observations, historical comparisons and wisdom.  Part of the power of these tales, and of all of Sacks's work, is his ability to be totally engaged and to identify with the subject while part of him is off to the side observing with scientific impartiality.  This makes for a compelling read.  If you've never read Sacks before, you are in for a very special treat.These tales are paradoxical because "Defects, disorders, diseases" can bring out "latent powers, developments, evolutions, forms of life, that might never be seen or even be imaginable, in their absence."  It is this "'creative' potential, that forms the central theme of this book" (from Sacks's Preface, page xvi).The first tale, "The Case of the Colorblind Painter" is about a successful artist who worked in color all his life only to became colorblind at age sixty-five, and the effect this had on his life and work.  The second, "The Last Hippie" is about an amnesiac man with a frontal lobe tumor that left him stranded in the sixties.  Sacks tells this sad, pathetic story with vivid detail, and characteristically ends it with a footnote, a footnote of such warmth and genuine identification that we are moved to tears.  (Don't skip the footnotes!)The third tale, "A Surgeon's Life," is an amazing account of a Canadian surgeon with Tourette's syndrome.  It is here that we begin to see the central theme of this book in brilliant illumination.  Dr. Carl Bennett, riddled with the bizarre tics characteristic of the disorder, compulsions that cause him to throw things, to touch things again and again in a ritualistic manner, to flail, jump and jerk about, nonetheless became a very successful (and beloved) doctor of surgery.  Sacks scrubs up with Dr. Bennett and goes into surgery with him, during which, miraculously, the tics disappear for however long it takes to complete the surgery.  Sacks visits him at home and meets his wife and two children, sees the dents in the refrigerator and on the walls, and comes away with a sense of how astounding the human potential to overcome adversity can be.The fourth tale, "To See and Not See," is about partially restored sight and how it was not a blessing.  This sad story illustrates how sight is learned from infancy and is largely a constructive and interpretive function of the brain.  This tale also lets us see how the world of the sightless can be rich and fulfilling beyond our imagination.In the fifth tale, "The Landscape of His Dreams, we meet a gifted artist, Franco Magnani, who from memory alone recreates his home town of Pontito, Italy through his paintings.  He has a nearly photographic, three-dimensional memory, but because of a strange illness that befell him when he was thirty-one, he cares only to re-create his Pontito, not the people or events, but the houses, the masonry, the stones, and he does so continually with microscopic and affecting detail.The chapter "Prodigies," focuses on an autistic artist, Stephen Wiltshire, whom Sacks is determined to befriend and understand.  In this tale, and the concluding tale, "An Anthropologist on Mars," Sacks helps us to penetrate the world of the autistic and see it (at least in my interpretation) as an alternate view of reality, a view with its own strengths and weaknesses, a world that is just as true and valid as the "normal" one.  Of course severe autism is debilitating in the extreme, and even modest autism can permanently scar and alienate the autistic from society.  Yet, perhaps that is society's loss.  I even got the sense, in reading these concluding stories about autism, that perhaps theirs is an evolutionary "strategy" trying to emerge, that is, a different way of seeing and dealing with the world that also might work.  I would not be shocked to discover some day that the autistic, with their sometimes extraordinary gifts of memory and concentration, are melded more completely and seamlessly into our usual consciousness, and that humankind is the better for it.  Incidentally, the last tale about Temple Grandin, who is a professor of animal studies at Colorado State University, is remarkable because it is about an autistic who is completely integrated into the society, yet remains autistic.  She is the one who says she sometimes feels, because of her different perspective, like "an anthropologist on Mars" when she views "normal" people.  Sacks allows us to see why.Bottom line: this is an extraordinary book of insight and scholarship about the human condition, written with grace and a deep sense of humanity, not to be missed
mesmerising and honest. as we watch with bated breath American troops and their Iraqi proxies fight tooth and nail to take the insurgent strong-hold of Fallujah in Iraq so i counsel all who care about what happens in this crucible to read and study carefully this magnificent book by the world's leading expert on Saddam Hussein. First, what this is not. In a new foreword Mr Coughlin admits with admirable honesty how he was taken as a fool by the  shadowy people who live in the secret world of the spies. They fed him what he calls lies and he swallowed them as did others in a less exalted position. no excuses there then and now mr Coughlin says he wished he had known there were no weapons of mass destruction. Be that as it might mr Coughlin argues with real logic the West had to take out Saddam. I take issue with him not on the why but the how. surely our own elite forces, aided by the British and others, could have gone in quietly and done for him and his friends and family. had that happened we could have avoided the mess of today. that is only my viwqw it is a small objection to what is a wonderful guide to Iraq. Well done!
Great gift for a friend strarting a new job at a new company. I bought this book for a friend who was leaving one investment bank to head up a group at another bank.  After reading the book, he told me that the situations described and issues discussed were dead on correct.  He had  thought that the challenges he faced were unique, but amazingly this book  had illustrated the many common issues facing managers in a new company and  gave useful guidance in how to deal with them.  Oddly, he said that he  couldn't put the book down--praise usually reserved for a thriller.   Evidently, it applies when a book can improve your life as well
&quot;Recommended Reading&quot; by JPRI. The Japan Policy Research Institute has just added &quot;Yakuza: Japan's Criminal Underworld, Expanded Edition&quot; to its recommended-reading list of twenty &quot;Classics.&quot;  Other titles on the list include Ruth Benedict's &quot;The Crysanthemum and the Sword&quot; and Takeo Doi's &quot;The Anatomy of Dependence.&quot
Tale will both inspire you and warm your heart!. Read THE TRAVELER'S GIFT by Andy Andrews, a self-helpbook that effectively uses fiction to hold your interest . . . it isthe story of a typical guy--David Ponder--whose troubles beginwhen he loses his job.When his car crashes, he then begins a journey that willremind you of the movie, IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE . . . but whatmakes this tale different is that along with way, Ponders encountersvarious historical figures who each teach him a different rule of success.The first is "The Buck Stops Here" (Harry Truman), followed by "I Will SeekWisdom" (King Solomon), "I Am A Person of Action" (Colonel Chamberlain,Civil War hero), "I Have A Decided Heart" (Christopher Columbus), "Today IWill Choose To Be Happy" (Anne Frank), "I Will Greet This Day With AForgiving Spirit" (Abraham Lincoln), and "I Will Persist Without Exception"(Archangel Gabriel).By the time Ponder is ready to return to the real world, you will havefeel that you will have learned something from his travels . . . and thoughyou just know that all will turn out well, the ending will still warmyour heart.There were several memorable passages; among them:* David put his energy and focus into providing a home and lifestylein which his family would prosper. But his work at the plant, whileit did provide a living, never seemed to provide a life. As Davidtold a friend one day, "I'm working so hard to live where we wantto live that I don't actually get to live there."* Truman paused. He pulled out his handkerchief and wiped his brow.David's head was hanging, his chin on his chest. "David, look at me,"the president said. David's eyes met his. "The words It's not my fault!should never again come from your mouth. The words It's not myfault!  Have been symbolically written on the gravestones ofunsuccessful people ever since Eve took her first bite of the apple.Until a person takes responsibility for where he is, there is no basisfor moving on. The bad news is that the past was in your hands,but the good news is that the future, my friend, is also in your hands."* "I do not complain," Anne said. "Papa says complaining is an activityjust as jumping rope or listening to the radio, and one may choose notto turn on the radio, and one may choose to complain, and one maychoose not to complain. I choose not to complain."
Too Short to Do Itself Justice. ** Spoiler Below **This is not one of Chabon's best.  The language is beautiful and some of the scenes are effective--for example when Mr. Panicker is driving his dilapidated car and almost runs down "the old man."  The descriptions are great.  But the plot is not fully wrought out.For example, was the pseudo milk plant ever fully explained?  What were they doing in there, besides milking "beef cows"?  Colonel Threadneedle was from a London intelligence outfit and not from the local milk compound, so who were the other guys?  Also, towards the end when the boy shows Holmes the piece of scrap paper with Mr. Black's shop address and the word "Blak" written on it--Mr. "Kalb" spelled backwards--how was Mr. Holmes so sure Kalb was the guilty party and that he had the bird?  Sure, Mr. Kalb made contact with the boy, but he did so in the very beginning so there's no revelation there: Mr. Kalb was the one who caught the boy falling off the roof! . . . Someone who know the answers to these questions, please post.The fact that the parrot's numbers turned out to be irrelevant--not bank numbers and suddenly no longer needed for the war effort--was disappointing.  We were built up to expect something, and instead the book is conveniently wrapped-up and its loose ends are cut.  Yet, having thought about the ending further, while I still find it disappointing on several levels, I am beginning to appreciate it, albeit in a cerebral kind of way.  The "Final Solution" explaining the parrot's numbers is the sequence of train cars headed east to the Nazi death camps.  The numbers are representations of dehumanized people converted into numbered chattel.  In the last few pages the old man muses on this same theme, wondering whether human reason and understanding will be replaced by "lunatic cryptographers" and their codes, whether the dignity of man will be lost and human inquiry will be reduced to insensible numbers: to binary codes, percentages and stick-figure calculations.  Holmes is a living relic of yesteryear and thereby has insight into the contemporary milieu.  He represents the human face of curiosity: bravery and resolve, a gentleman's logic in the face of insoluble problems.  But as the book ends, we are left wondering whether such virtue can carry on, or whether it will die and be absorbed by the void underlying the new and rapidly changing world.  In the end is modern truth so esoteric as to be no more understandable than the indecipherable chatter of a bird?There were some good moments in terms of character portrayal.  For one, Holmes is very well depicted.  We are given a man whose mind tries to overcome the failings of its body, a desperate jockey tired of whipping an all-but-spent horse.  There is a poignant moment when Holmes and Mr. Panicker reach Mr. Black's shop and find it closed--Holmes bumps into a mental impasse, and we catch a glimpse of the despair that haunts him in his lonely hours.  Holmes bangs on the empty shop's door with his walking stick--"'A Monday' said the old man sadly.  'I ought to have foreseen this'. . . 'Such practical considerations seem to lie beyond my . . . '--and the weak man lurches forward, eyes staring "as if blindly at the unanswering face of the shop."  What does he do when the steps of logic end?  When life has no clue there to greet him?  Behind the great detective lies a feeble old man.The book raised some interesting questions, but on the whole it could have either been a lot shorter or a lot longer.  A longer book, which I am in favor of, would have allowed for the expansion of characters, better development and a non-jettisoned resolution of the plot.It's only 131 pages, so you won't waste too much of your time if you read this book.  Chabon fans might read it just to keep up with their author.  Others might check out something else
A favorite book to read my 4 yo. Too bad Lobel didn't do more Owl books -- he's one of my favorites but I agree w/ the other reviewer who says this is his best!  "Tear-water Tea" is my daughter's favorite story in the collection and I don't mind reading it over and over again
WORTH NOT FORGETTING. Burroughs' Martian Series is worth remembering and rereading from time to time.  I first read these books well over 50 years ago and they, and this book, have lost none of their charm.  For the student of SiFi and S&S, these are a must read.  Granted, the style is certainly different than todays books, but this is a plus.  We need to read and remember it.  That being said, these books are just simply fun to read.  Recommend them highly
The PECS System. This consists of Phase I - VI, Additional Concepts, Other Goodies and Appendices covering about seventy-five pages. Each phase has three sections, The environment, the training steps and helpful hints.Phase I - The physical exchange,Phase II - Expanding SpontaneityPhase III - Picture Discrimination, Phase IV - Sentence Structure, Phase V - Responding to "What do you want?", Phase VI - Responsive and Spontaneous CommentingPECS was first developed for use with preschool children with autism that had little or no speech.  For the first phase there needs to be a reinforcer assessment. This means picking five to eight edibles that the child/student likes. The items preferred would be picked within five seconds. For those items that were picked at least three times remove them and conduct assessment with remaining items. This continues until a pool of three to five preferred items have been determined.There are diagrams explaining how this system works. The process starts as backward chaining with the trainers delaying the verbal praise until the student has released the picture into the open hand of the trainer. The helpful hints in this first phase discuss finding the right symbol system.Some will use black and white line drawings or product logos. Then the size of the photo is determined, usually two-inch. The trainer should wear a apron or waist pack to keep the pictures in and purchase lots of velcro!Phase II has the trainer moving further away from the student and have the student remove the card from the board and hand to the trainer. The trainer can get up to make the student than have to stand up to hand the card. Verbal praise is continued with reinforcement while the exchange is in motion. A helpful hint is now to have a three-ring binder for the cards, as you move to more pictures.A diagram in the book shows how this process is done in an easy to understand format. Picture-take picture to materials-materials (no interruptions)-take materials to work area (no interruptions)-activity(no interruptions)-get reward-finish activity-get reward-put materials away-take picture-go back to schedule.
A really good read. Anthropologist Dr. Bill Brockton is summoned to a Tennessee mountain town where the local sheriff and deputy take him to see a mummified corpse of a young woman.  His first task is to find out who she is and how she died.  And then he has to find out who killed her while not dying himself.I liked this book.  The protagonist clearly knows his forensics but is down to earth, gets car sick, is emotionally insecure and very human.  The story opens with a great hook and kept me going straight through to the end.  The sense of place, dialogue and suspense and references to other authors, characters and books all contributed to my enjoyment of the story.  The supporting characters are diverse; from the small-town sheriff to the Vietnam vet, to Brockton's assistant; but they all have definite personalities. Some of the forensic detail may not be for the faint of stomach, but it is fascinating stuff.  This was one really good read.
son-in-law. hard to buy for son-in-law keeps this book handy for re-reading chapters. was happy he is enjoying it hope it helps his golf game
Excellent Home Cookbook for Arab Families. `The Arab Table' by May S. Bsisu, a native of Kuwait, the wife of a Palestinian (and resident of Lebanon for several years) and current resident of Cincinnati is a personal account of Arab cooking, based less on scholarship than on her experiences and experiences of her family and close friends. That is, the title is just a bit misleading if it gives the impression that it is a systematic study of Arab cuisine. It is much more like Suzanne Dunaway's `Rome at Home' or Mario Batali's `Recipes from My Two Villages' than it is a study such as Paula Wolfert's books or Claudia Roden's `The New Book of Middle Eastern Food'One minor caveat I may mention is that Ms. Bsisu is remarkably candid about the amount of help she got in putting this book together. One gets the feeling that the only thing she wrote herself is the recipe headnotes and an outline of the recipes. Credit for almost everything else is given to co-authors, copy editors, and recipe testers. That means that I will be cautious before buying any other titles by Ms. Bsisu, as her work is much more the work of a committee than a single person.I am really happy to see a book on this subject being published by a major American house, as just about any information on the Arab culture leaking out to the American hinterland will repair the damage done by recent terrorists. I do feel the author is just a bit too focused on her ethnic good points when she praises Arab hospitality, suggesting that maybe other ethnic groups are just a bit less friendly. One can read very similar comments about the Italians, the Greeks, the Mexicans, the Spanish, and the Amish, just to name a few.One thing which immediately strikes me about many of these recipes is how similar they are to Greek cooking. Yoghurt, olive oil, lemons, flatbreads, lamb, spinach, eggs, eggplant, kebabs, and chickpeas are all straight out of the Greek cuisine. The Greek, Turkish, and Arab cuisines even share the same Mezes traditions, although the Arabs would generally take their snacks with coffee rather than with wine. One thing that this similarity helps is the fact that Greek raw materials are so easy to find in the United States, at least in major metropolitan centers. One can easily convert conventional yoghurt into `Mediterranean style' yoghurt. One only needs to find a source for sumac, a pepper-like spice with a lemony taste that is unique to Middle-eastern cooking.The one application for which this book is really superb is as a cookbook for an Arab family living in the United States or other English speaking country, and who does not have a strong Arab culinary tradition of their own on which to fall back. The Arabic name is given for every dish, and most of those names are unfamiliar to me except for the obvious such as Taboulleh.My Mediterranean culinary scholarship may not be as good as it should be, but I have some suspicion that some dishes in this book are not truly Arab, even if they have Arab names. My greatest suspicion falls on those dishes from Morocco. Even though Morocco has been an Islamic culture for close to 1300 years, I think the natives of the Madgreb are more Berber than Arab. Otherwise, most of the dishes seem to come from Kuwait, Lebanon, and Palestine. There is some Egyptian influence from the Sinai, but this isn't Arab either.One thing that makes this an excellent book for the amateur, especially the amateur with an Arab background is that there is a very nice balance of easy and complicated recipes, including several very good recipes for Arab flatbreads. And, the recipes are well written, giving a substantial amount of detail, probably more than you may find in more scholarly books or books from large area surveys as you may find from, for example, Elizabeth David.Highly recommended as a source for Arab home cooking.
Coyote has risen!. In the first book of the series, "Coyote," Allen Steele told us how the captain of the first interstellar colonizing ship, Alabama, smuggled prisoners-of-State (intellectual dissidents oppressed by a right-wing authoritarian government) on board, and they stole the ship, reached Coyote, a moon of a planet named Bear, circling 47 Ursae Majorus.  In "Coyote Rising," things have gotten complicated.  On Earth, people are running out of living space, the government has shifted to a "Collectivist" (a variant of socialism) authoritarianism, and technology has advanced to produce ever-faster ships.  The result:  the original Coyote colonists get a series of unwelcome visitors from Earth, flee the original colony to form a new colony on a neighboring island, and a civil war begins to brew.As with the first book, this one originally appeared as a series of novellas in a science fiction magazine.  While there are still traces of disjointedness, from turning a series of novellas into a novel, the mild discontinuities did not interrupt the flow for me.  There is a larger cast of well-developed characters here, including the introduction of Savants (cyborgs with downloaded human minds) and a religious mutant.  The terrain of Coyote is well-described, as are the human interactions, and there is plenty of action.  The fauna of Coyote does not seem adequately developed (i.e., there should be more animal species).Thanks to the friend who sent this to me, Jan Dierckx, I found this book gripping and thoroughly enjoyable.  I look forward to the next in the series
A good novel as well as a lovely piece of writing. I enjoy EL Doctorow's work, so it was with pleasurable anticipation that I picked up City of God and was astonished at what a beautiful book he had wrought.You should, when approaching this book, be aware that the narrative is experimental and postmodern. (It certainly fits every definition of postmodernism that I've ever read, including that in my favorite reference, Teaching the Postmodern.) Yes, it begins with a riff on physics and awe. It includes epistolary sections from characters to a character based on EL Doctorow.There is also a strong narrative thread that keeps the book from becoming amorphous literary rap lyrics. An enormous bronze cross has been stolen, as is revealed on the fourth page, and its chase leads Tom Pemberton to Rabbi Joshua (the Hebrew name for Jesus, and I'm shocked that none of the other very intelligent reviewers here seem to have picked that one up, esp considering later plot developments,) and Sarah, his wife (very Da Vinci code, there.) Tom's interactions with Joshua form the, ahem, crux of the novel, and change Tom's life irrevocably.While I, too, am astonished by the beauty of the book, and I appreciate the effect of all the narrative threads and their coalescence after the last page is turned, reading the book itself is an enjoyable experience. The characters are drawn nicely, there is excellent tension and struggle within the characters' lives, and the plot leads from one suspenseful scene to the next.TK KenyonRABID, coming in 2007 from Kunati Book
You will meet a tall, dark stranger... When Stephen King has a great idea, he does not squander it. Many writers have tackled the concept of precognition, but few have done is so masterfully. "The Dead Zone" is full of thrills, mayhem and wow moments while King is still getting warmed up.When Johnny Smith wakes up from a five year coma, he is endowed with the gift of second sight. By touching another person or a simple item, he is treated to the vision of a future event. The sky is the limit with such a concept, and King does not leave any piece of that sky unexplored.Before the midway point of the book, Johnny is saving people from house fires, reuniting a mother and son, and steering youngsters away from a horrible skating accident that has not happened yet. A reader has his money's worth before this novel is half done. Each character is vivid and dynamic, particularly those of Smith and a certain politician named Greg Stinson.The second half of the novel is no less exciting but profoundly more significant as the story unfolds. Tampering with the future is an endeavor fraught with peril, as any fan of physics can tell you. Johnny is confronted by such a challenge, forced to choose between accepting the fate of the world or embracing his gift and using it to change the future. There is a serial killer to sniff out, and even that is not as vital as his next step, which involves a truly demented man who will one day be president.The finally act of the book can be summarized by the question: "If you could go back and time, knowing what you know about Adolph Hitler, would you kill him?"It's a fun question to ask at parties. For John Smith and his dubious, extrasensory abilitiy, it's one big cross to bear."The Dead Zone" is one of those books that will be studied for generations. But forget the acadamia for now. It's a must read novel for fans of almost any genre, and a perfect choice for those rare birds who need an introduction to Stephen King
One of two of the best books I have EVER read. This was an excellent murder mystery thriller.  I LOVED it.  I won't be able to wait 24 hours before starting the third.  It is so suspenseful the whole way through.  I thought I knew who did it but that changed within  minutes because of all the unexpected turns.  We also learn that if we put  God in control the outcome will change majorly.  If you do decide to read  this I strongly suggest reading the first book &quot;Private Justice&quot;  first. It ranked as sky-high as this one
SCHOLARLY PRESENTATION. This book is loaded with info on various early artifacts but is mainly for those involved in field work and academia. I wish I had looked a little more closely before buying it. What I really wanted was a pictorial reference with plenty of colored photos. The writing is highly detailed as you would expect for a scholarly reference. There are line drawings and b/w photos but no color plates. Most helpful for professionals involved in the excavation process and for museum curators, etc. However those interested in a general, mostly pictorial guide to early colonial artifacts should look elsewhere
A feast for the minds eye. One cannot write about this book without referring to the the animated film A Scanner Darkly.  It has an astonishing combination of great storytelling, filmmaking, acting, and computer graphic skills.  The animation - brought to life by a procedure called rotoscoping - doesn't resemble anything a computer might have created.  Indeed, given the glut of computer technology in film these days, A Scanner Darkly has a rather restrained quality.  Instead of a showy CGI motion picture - the great work of master illustrators makes the film work well from beginning to end.  The artwork serves the story well and never detracts from the plot.  In addition, the films score is unforgettable.  It doesn't take long to figure out why either.  With artists like Radiohead, Thom Yorke, and the Golden Arm Trio - one can't help recognize it as inspired music.  Scored by Graham Reynolds, the musical shades of a dark unsure time and place give way, on occasion, to blitheness.  When put together it is a feast for the eyes, ears and brain - a perfect blend of all one sees and hears in this masterpiece mislaid.  Through word-of-mouth, A Scanner Darkly is gaining a wider audience daily.  It has the power to attract and hold ones interest.  It is one of those films destined to become a classic.  And in the future, people will recognize how worthy of notice it is and will remain.Now, as for the book - it is a feast for the minds eye.  It tells the story using the artwork from the film.  It is A Scanner Darkly in comic form - thought-bubbles and everything.  I can't think of anything more delicious.  From the cover to the story and the artwork within, it's a beautiful book. My only criticism with the copy I got from Amazon has to do with the print and the size of the book.  That is, the drawings are a bit dark and the book is a bit small for my taste.  Because it is printed on a high quality flat paper rather than glossy paper could be the reason the artwork is dark.  I think glossy paper would have given the book a unique luster that would have added to the visual experience and perhaps brightened the drawings - who knows.  In addition, a magazine-like-sized hardback might have made it easier to hold.  Then again, the odd size might have been a deliberate choice to throw the reader off, just as the story itself does.  Even so, this is a great read and souvenir of Philip K. Dick's wonderful story and Linklater's film.  With all I've said, this book is still a great buy.I recommend the movie, the soundtrack, the book, and anything else you can get your hands on
Developmentally on target, prevention at it's finest. &quot;But I'm Almost 13!&quot; is a marvelous, logical, and compassionate flow of expertise for parents who are about to dance the dance of adolescence. Theory is delicately woven into a masterplan for parental and pre-adolescent growth. Achieving an understanding of the &quot;vital ingredients&quot; and mastering the techniques of &quot;choreographed discussions&quot;, &quot;modeling&quot;, and &quot;decision trees&quot;,  parents will greatly reduce universal worries and agony often experienced during these challenging times. All who read, apply, reread, and reapply, will happily achieve Dr. Ginsburg's &quot;cognitive Ah-Ha&quot; discovering a higher degree of parental self-efficacy while enhancing their preteens and teens ability to successfully churn through the abstract mazes ahead. Having parented two adolescents, and provided parent training for many so desperately searching for guidance, this invaluable resource offers the insights, skills and reassurance we all seek. The trick is to apply it early and often.  Enjoy
Anthony Trollope, Where Have you Been?. This is a great Victorian novel, and the first by Anthony Trollope that I've read. After reading Can You Forgive Her, I was inspired to buy the entire set of Palliser novels; I plan to read and savor each volume in the  series over the years. Can You Forgive Her introduces us to Alice Vavasar,  her father, cousins, and fiance. Alice struggles with the question of whom  she should marry. George is brandy; John is milk and honey. I love that!  What a choice! Trollope has a wonderfully amusing style, evoking with great  clarity 19th Century life in Victorian England. It's a time so very  different from ours in the U.S., and yet, one can learn a great deal about  the roots of some American cultural obsessions with love and politics. A  hint: if you don't know British parliamentary history, you may want to  review a little. However, don't let this deter you from trying out this  splendid, enjoyable novel
How times have changed.... I am echoing another reviewer in lamenting the sorry state of movie posters in 2006. The Octopussy campaign from 1983 was simply stunning as the myriad posters in this volume show at least 3-4 different pieces of artwork, each one beautifully painted and in keeping with the Indian theme. The use of Octopussy herself as a Hindu goddess behind Bond was brilliant.Compare that to the current ad campaign for Casino Royale -- which is virtually indistinguishable from a Gucci billboard. It says nothing about the film, its minimalism ill-conceived and simply lazy. Worse still was the "Die Another Day" poster which was quite simply four layerrs in Photoshop: Pierce and Halle, a background, and the type layer. Moreover a simple type-treatment for the title, nothing like the individualized logotype for a film such as Octopussy. I could go on... This is a gorgeous book
Old fashioned coming of age story. This book is so well written and has such good character development that the reader can forgive the melodramatic, predictable story line.  The novel takes place in Switzerland and centers on Rudi a sixteen year old boy whose father,a famous mountain guide, died during Rudi's babyhood while trying to reach the top of "The Citadel" ( a fictionalized Matterhorn).  Rudi's mother wants a safe life for her only child and sees a career for him in the hotel business.  Rudi of course dreams of conquering "The Citadel"  and fulfilling his father's interrupted destiny.  This book is a good choice for fifth graders and up looking for an adventure story with an interesting setting and memorable characters.
My favorite Enneagram Book. The Enneagram isn't easily taught through reading a book, but this one does the best job in both introducing the types and more importantly giving clear ways to work with the system. By including core features and super-ego messages, it helps the seeker go a bit deeper into the types than any other of the books I read--getting behind the personality into what drives and feeds it. The little test at the beginning of each chapter are pretty good, but I think it's better to look at the chart of the levels in each Type chapter to help discover your Type. The chapters feature many exercises to guide the reader into self reflection.Other features, like the "Red Flag" fears of each Type, are addressed helping a person notice when they are losing themselves. I think this is a good book both to introduce the system and for the more knowlegeable student of the System. I have used it as a source to take me deeper and deeper on personal journey and a clear way to help others understand themselves
Ought to be required reading in high school civics class. Premise of the book, that they rip you apart for even suggesting that the official stories are less that truthful, is right on the money. It is inconceivable that anyone can take the Warren Report as the whole truth with any kind of open eyes
Awesome Book!. this is such an awesome series...easy to read, but fun, too! Has some cool recipes, chicken piccata is the BEST
Complex, Deep and Moving. "Story of an African Farm" is a difficult work to describe. It must be read several times, and carefully pondered before all of its secrets are unlocked.Ostensibly, the book revolves around the lives of three children (and, later, adults) who live in the Karroo plains of South Africa. The main focus, however, is on two of the characters - Waldo, the earnest and deeply curious son of the German farmkeeper, and Lyndall, the beautiful, outspoken and rebellious orphan who suffers all her life for her ideals.The book itself is semi-autobiographical. Waldo represents Schreiner's journey from fanatical, childlike faith to bitter skepticism, who reaches a watershed of sorts when he hisses to Lyndall 'There is no God - none!'. Lyndall, on the other hand, embodies Schreiner's frustation with her station as a woman - barred from the upper echelons of society, and her inability to find a mate who is both her intellectual match and willing to accept her as an equal. "I want to love", she whispers to the grave of Waldo's father, "I want something great and pure to lift me to itself."There are many other themes that flesh out the subtext of this extraordinary book - the tragedy of solitude, that ultimately, all humans are alone in the cosmos. "Dear eyes", the dying Lyndall whispers to her mirror, "they will never part us."Readers who expect a narrative will be dissapointed. What narrative there is serves only to undersore the book's many themes. Often, the flow of the story is out of sequence, or devoid of context, and deliberately so. Roughly, the book is divided into three sections - the first introduces us to the characters as children, and reveals their innermost thoughts. The second, and shortest section is entitled "Times and Seasons". It is somewhat of a summary of what has gone before, dealing mostly with Waldo's journey from Christian fanaticism to dispairing atheism, and foreshadows some of what is to come. The third, and longest section, covers the lives of the characters as adults, and is by far the most powerful, and moving piece of the book.The reader who is looking for mindless action is advised to pick up the latest Tom Clancy novel, or whatever passes for literature these days. Those who are willing to put aside all preconceived notions, and have their cherished beliefs challenged are invited to read this book. The search for truth is endless. But this book is a perfect place to begin
Excellent book on leg care. This is really an excellent book for a novice to find out about what's going on with their horse's legs. You can sit down and read about the things people are telling you but you don't understand, like when my friend's horse had to be kept in a stall for six months. It seemed like torture, but once she read this book, she understood what the ligaments looked like when they were torn and why it was so important not to let the horse out in the pasture. There are lots of photos and drawings so you know what the author is talking about
Covering a wide range of varients. Winning Poker: 200 Rules, Technique & Strategies is a straightforward guide to mastering gambling card games. Covering a wide range of varients including Texas hold'em, Omaha, Seven-Card Stud, Five-Card Stud, and Five-Card Draw, as well as more unusual variations such as High-Low Chicago, Winning Poker not only describes rules and statistical analyses for calculating odds, but also explains how to read an opponent's tells, analyze a game, decipher poker slang, and more. An invaluable tool for anyone looking to improve their poker game, whether among friends or at a casino, and also a useful resource for better understanding televised poker championships.
This is unforgetable. This is a must read for Octavia Butler fans. Totally believable, makes you think about things that are happenning in our world today
still needed in 2006. In some ways, this is the book that came out to say, "Why Feminism is Still Needed." Written in the early 1990s, it covers the way that - sometimes despite appearances - American culture's deck is still well-stacked against women. If there is any book you can read that will fire you up about feminist issues, this is it
Read Between the Notes. The author seems very adept at bringing to light the fundamental essence of physics knowledge, particularly the unresolved questions. With his help, I was able to pinpoint what appears to be a surviving trace of Aristotle in physics, particularly in wave theory.For some time I've sort of surmised that a wave is actually no more than a pattern or grouping of particles. As such, it is simply an object like any other object. Reading Ridley's book, it is clearly apparent to me that distinguishing between waves and objects has created a difficulty.The soliton is an attempt to reconcile this difficulty. Differentiating it from waves and objects may simply be a persisting affinity for Aristotelian categorization with some Newtonian mechanics mixed in. (Thankfully, it is at least uncorrupted by probability theory?)Opening the discussion of electomagnetic vs mechanical waves, the author states: "But then horrible questions arise. Mechanical waves cannot travel through space devoid of matter. They are a cooperative motion of atoms or molecules, and their velocity is determined by the properties of the matter in which they travel. ... "So what, materially, is vibrating in empty space?"Well, this is rather interesting, you know? I mean, can it be more clear that by creating a philosophical divide between waves and objects, we are presented with such a problem? By recognizing that waves are simply patterns of particles, we escape from this problem, since it is no mystery that objects traverse empty space (if such even exists, at least outside the place reserved for Newton's actual accomplishments).There's also the matter of the anomoly of diffraction of waves (Shroedinger) which, I believe, is hereby resolved. What's next? :-)In any case, my hat's off to Ridley - he's amazing
The traveler's best friend. Rob Sangster's Traveler's Tool Kit imparts the magic of discovery as well  as the life-changing impact of the journey.  Rob's sound advice enables  every traveler. from inexperienced to world-wise, to meet other cultures  and new experiences with passion and integrity.  Rob has an innate sense of  what real travel is all about and he brings that gift to readers.  By the  way, in addition to improving the quality of travel, Traveler's Tool Kit  has already saved me a lot of money
Classic book. This is the classic book on the subject to be ever written and retains its class by incorporating some of the recent developments in the boundary layer theory.A great collection for anyone in the field of turbulence, aerodynamics ...
Awesome reading!!!!!. I bought this book first because I didn't see the the first book "Operation Vampyre".I read it in two days and totally loved it.I bought the first book today and it is awesome too.Bishop is an incredible writer and can't wait for the third book to come out.Hey Mr. Bishop,keep up the good work!!!!!!!!!
The True Story Of Pocahontas, John Smith and Chief Powhatan. Everyone is familiar with the story of Pocahontas and British explorer/adventurer John Smith. They are romantic stories fed to us by the likes of Disney (10 yrs ago in the 1995 film) and countless romanticized versions in historical fiction novels. This "documentary" book exposes the truth about what really happened in the span of time that John Smith, Jon Rolfe and the Virginia Company founded Jamestown and dealt with the Indian tribes headed by Chief Powhatan and his brother Openchancanough. Since Thanksgiving is fast approaching, this makes a fine book to read if you are interested in the earliest British colonial period of the 1600's, when the pilgrims fist arrived in the Eastern coast of the United States. This period has been romanticized by movies and novels, evoking a thrilling time of danger, intrigue and romance, when Indians and colonists sparred and sometimes made peace, even made love. Princess Pocahontas was the daughter of Chief Powhatan. She was only fifteen or so when she first met Jon Smith and a romance was highly unlikely, even if perhaps the girl felt an attraction to the supposedly attractive adventurer. John Smith had traveled across the globe to foreign lands as a British explorer and was in his day a bad boy. That he may have gotten into trouble with Chief Powhatan and his people is probably true. Pocahontas was a diplomat, a healer/medicine woman and regarded as a peacemaker. Even if she didn't do a dramatic a thing as offer herself up as sacrifice to save John Smith's life, she did for a time lessen tension between the natives and the colonists. She married Jon Rolfe, a British nobleman, was converted to Christianity, learned to read and speak English. She journeyed across the Atlantic, leaving behind her old life in the tribe and became a popular figure in London society. She became a lady. Most people forget about this phase in her life and it must have been a very interesting story within itself. Did she miss her old life ? Was she as respected in London or did she experience a form of racism because she was not a white English lady ? Powhatan's life is documented well in this book. He was a very influential man in his time and he, too, was able to negotiate with the English. Jamestown brought these people together. They hoped that Jamestown would be an independent, Utopian society where English and natives could live and prosper. Unfortunately, Jamestown succumbed to disease and death. The dream died and conflict between natives and colonists resumed. If you're a big history buff, this book is for you
Refreshing and Honest. Of the many volumes on the subject, I find this book to be the best.  Told with charm and grace, Nellie Connally relates the events of November 22, 1963 as only an occupant of that ill-fated Presidential Lincoln could.  Devoid of conjecture or theories, we are simply presented with the facts.  The Connally's viewpoint from the jumpseats is sobering.   Pivotal moments, from Mrs. Connally's last words to President Kennedy to Governor Connally' near fatal wounds to Oswald's emergency room visit after the Jack Ruby shooting are covered in a comfortable format; making one feel that Mrs. Connally is relating the events to you personally.  Thank-You, Mrs. Connally
The New Bible for the PMO!. This book takes the novice in project management through the stages of development of a project management organization in a logical, easily understood manor. It should be considered a required resource for any professional managers library. Obviously, highly recommended reading that both summarizes previous books but opens new areas of exploration. How to &quot;advertise&quot; the PMO for its continued existence, how to identify and track the value add (or lack of) that a PMO contributes to the corporate goals, etc. GET THIS BOOK
A Most Important Book for America's Future. I read a lot of books and this is one of the most important books I've ever read. It is absolutely packed with facts that very few Americans know, facts that will probably contribute to what kind of America will exist in the future. If we continue our slavish, nearly unconditional support for the militaristic policies of Israel's Likud Party it seems likely that we will experience more deadly terrorism and possibly slip into a more authoritarian society. Not the America you've come to know and love.Paul Findley was a Republican member of Congress from Abe Lincoln's Springfield IL for 20 years until the Israel lobby contributed to his defeat in 1982. He became interested in MidEast issues by accident doing a service for one of his constituents, but as his knowledge grew he stood up for MidEast peace in Congress until the Israel lobby defeated him. In 1978 he was so popular he won 70% of the votes in his district; in 1980 the lobby aggressively supported his opponent and he got 56%; in 1982 Dick Durbin ran against him with Israel lobby support and Findley lost by 1407 votes.But, they say what goes around comes around and after his defeat and having seen the dirty, smear tactics the Lobby used against him he spent a couple of years researching and writing this book. (It is remarkable that Israel-supporters, one of whose major organizations is the Anti-Defamation League, is so practiced at the systematic use of public defamation of those who only mildly disagree with them.) This book is packed with examples of the hardly believable, massive influence the Israel lobby has exercised over politics, public debate in the media and university campus discussion even mildly critical of Israel. It is extremely well researched and has a very high signal to noise ratio (very little mere emotional rhetoric). Although Findley had considerable difficulty finding a publisher, as do all books and articles critical of Israel, the 2003 edition is the third.It cites the example of people like Charles Percy, J. William Fulbright, George Ball, Adlai Stevenson III, and many others commenting on the stranglehold this lobby has on American policy and discussion about Israel. The level of this influence will shock you if you read this book, that's guaranteed.How many of you know how many detrimental events have arguably occurred to America because of our nearly unquestioning support of Israel? OPEC's 1973 oil embargo, the 1983 bombing which killed 243 Marines in Beirut, 9/11, and many more. (Of course the Israel lobby would come up with a whole list of clever and devious arguments that these events weren't the result of US support for Israel, but if you read Findley's book you will begin to learn to identify these clever, disingenuous arguments.)A very tiny example of influence can be seen in the one-star votes this book has received here on Amazon, they have no arguments but merely try to bring the rating of this book down. It is remarkable that this book has received so many reviews (77 and counting) and so many of them are so highly positive. Read it and prepare to be shocked.For additional information on the Israel lobby read Michael Saba's, "The Armageddon Network" and the scholarly article, "The Israel Lobby and US Foreign Policy" by John Mearsheimer and Stephen Walt published in the London Review of Books and on the Kennedy School of Government website in 2006
A Fun, Thoughtful Read. Allison Bottke has written a fun, thought-provoking novel about sticking firm to one's faith in the midst of daily life. Her heroine, Dee Decker, wrestles with marital issues, work issues, and children issues--things every reader can identify with. I can't wait to read Allison's next novel
larry brown, fay. contemporary candide.  unusual and gripping story of the underebelly south.  larry brown is a superb writer.for any serious reader.
A+ Business History. Though access to the founders of Google seems to be lacking, the story and insight of Google's rise in the world of technology, business and culture have been very well documented.If you are fond of the stories of American Business, this one belongs on your bookshelf
Iran Awakening by Shirin Ebadi. A well written book outling her life at a very turbelent time in Iran. She is a highly intelligent woman who tackles oppression is a courageous and spirited way. Iran under the mullahs tried to revert to prehistoric times and basically ruined the country and its society particularily the lifes of women. This book proves the indominatability of the human spirit and the ability to come to terms with the most appalling oppression. She continued to rear her two daughters in an atmosphere of fear and oppression and still continued her wonderful work for human rights. Having read the book I believe she richly deserved the Nobel prize. The book demonstrates that we are all the one spirit and despite geographic , religous or cultural differences we are all trying to do our best in living our lives and doing the best for our children. Life can be a struggle but it is much worse for people living under oppressive regimes. In helping to put a face on a "muslim" we can see that in the extremities of any religion great evil can be perpetrated in the name of a God but the vast majority do not support these extreme views.Anybody with "hawkish" views about military intervention should read this book and I believe that if read with an open mind your position may very well change.Again what it demonstrates to me is that change can only be gradual and countries will eventually change only through the will of its people. The problem for Iran is that a lot of its best brains are leaving in droves and who can blame them
Not for the My Little Pony/Care Bear fantasy fan. I want to say so much in this review...If your taste in fantasy can be described as: brass knuckled-concrete street corner-git yo hands up and guard your grill-cuz it's ON...get these books!If you like bada** mother(hush your mouth)'s as main character...GET THESE BOOKS!If you're a fan of Richard Sharpe(Bernard Cornwell, Sharpe Series)...get these books!If you're a fan of Roger McClintock (David Weber, Prince Roger Series)...get these books!If you're a fan of Kane (Karl Edward Wagner, BloodStone)...get these books!If you want to see your hero in touch with his feminine side...DONT get these books!If you want to see more emotional depth from your characters and have problems resolved with conversation and sharing of feelings...DONT get these books!If you're a fan of the G.R.R. Martin type of fantasy...I suggest you stop reading Sci-Fi/Fantasy and start reading mysteries, romances, and crime dramas...oh yeah...and...DONT get these book!Heroic Fantasy fans to the best of my knowledge Conan was the first/last(can anyone think of any other heroes like him?)...this book is HEROIC FANTASY and not some sappy emotional dribble that is trying to tell us some real world message using elves/etc...not some drek where the heroes strength comes from the love-in-his-heart-crap and he can only be strong by...you know the rest...it pretty much describes 99.99% of every "fantasy" title published in the last 20 years...well these two titles probably constitute the majority of that remaining .01%...read them slow...savor them...once you're done...its no telling when the next ones will come along
John Madden writes just like he talks!!!. He even sounds excited in print!  Madden clearly loves the game of football, and his exuberance is evident throughout this book.  His stories and anecdotes from both his coaching and broadcasting days are both  hilarious and insightful.  My own favorite part of this book were his  reminisces of his days with the Raiders, when he coached that team to their  first Superbowl victory.  He really makes you feel like you were there
If only there were more churches like this one!. We've been living in a new city searching for a church where we could invite any of our friends, regardless of their background, life situation, and past church experience (or lack of), without fear of putting them in an uncomfortable situation.  A much larger order to fill than we had expected, because, as it turns out, many people are NOT comfortable in church--period!  This book explains how that has come to be and why churches are struggling, but, most importantly, it demonstrates exactly how churches and ALL Christians can (and should) reach out to and meet the needs of an ultra-diverse population with diverse backgrounds, lifestyles and situations.  This is NOT "watered-down Christianity" or "moral relativism"--contrarily, it is biblical Christianity in its best, purest, most powerful and effective (and user-friendly) form.  For ANYONE interested in effectively reaching the seemingly unreachable.  The author is incredibly engaging and easy to read, but be warned that the substance might just change your perspective on church and religion!
Best book on US Social Classes in the last Decade. Zweig's book is an empirical and analytical tour de force.  In rigorous fashion he outlines the current class structure of the US in terms of power and control in the workplace.  He proves the continuing relevance of class analysis in an era when most Americans consider themselves middle class, and he aptly describes the class war which the &quot;ruling elite&quot; has been precipitating on the working class. The book is clearly written and convincingly argued, and should be accessible to a wide audience
Heartstopping Suspense!. In the days beyond one of the worst disasters to hit American soil, Secret Service Agent Cameron Roberts and what's left of her team fight to make sense of everything that's happened. And make sense of why one of their own would betray them in leading an attack on Cameron's lover Blair Powell, who happens to be the daughter of the President of the United States. An act Cam could not perceive let alone understand.With Blair's home in shambles and unwilling to stay in the White House, Blair and Cameron turn to one of two friends that Blair trusts without question. To a place where she can feel protected, safe from harm, to a place where she is now protected by a new security chief.  Protocol demands Cameron is out as the head of Blair's detail, a fact Blair is not happy with at all.Secret Service Agent Paula Stark, Acting Security Chief, has her own battle to fight as well as contending with her new duties. Her lover, FBI Agent Renee Savard was thought to be lost when the buildings went down. Her joy at finding her alive is tempered by the nightmares she now suffers.As the past and present of Blair's protectors join forces to uncover the traitors behind the devastation caused by the attacks Cameron is blindsided when a woman she knew as someone else reenters her life. It seems she is not who or what Cameron thought her to be. If she's not who she claimed, then exactly who is she? And what does she have to do with the task they now face?  How will the truth of who she truly is impact the lives of everyone involved?Cameron and Blair, reluctant friends at first, lovers to the end began their journey together in the intriguing book Above All, Honor, continued their story in the heartstopping Love & Honor and fought their way through two traumatic events in Honor Guards. Once again Radclyffe, an author with a well honed and indisputable skill as displayed thru her wide arsenal of over 20 books, takes us through the lives of two strong willed, determined women as they fight their way back to the one thing they hold dear above all except love...their Honor Reclaimed.
One of the most thought provoking I've read yet... While browsing through the local bookstore, one cannot help but to be bombarded with at least 5 different published versions of this wonderous story.'The Divine Comedy' by Dante Aligheri sets in motion the journey of a pilgrim through the nine layers of hell. Accompanying him is his guide, none other then the famous poet Virgil. While he accends down into the depths, each layer has a character with a story to be told. To be honest, I had flipped through this book before and found in daunting. Set up in 'Canto' form, the book is split in 34 chapers. I was pleasently surprised to see that I had been very wrong. This book has opened up new ideas to me, and made me think of religion and the philosophy of life in a way I never thought of before. The Inferno is a very descriptive story that will not leave you unsatisfied
Valuable tool for public finance research. This text is essential not only for students taking courses in public finance, but a primary tool for researchers in this subject. This text comprises of works conducted by the leaders of this field. I recommend this  text for anybody who is serious in learning the current research in this  vast field of economics
It's a favorite. This is one of my very favorite garden books. Pictures are beautiful, and the book is informative...giving plant names and even showing layout drawings of how the plants were placed. The gardens were not designed by professionals but were created thru trial and error, the way most people do their own. Shows how pretty a garden can be without perfection. Even shows many tiny doorway gardens that should not be intimidating for busy American gardeners. I would highly recommend this book
We've Got a Winner!!. What a nice little book for kids.  No big bad wolves. No mean kids.  No mean grown-ups.  No one is abandoned or lost.  No name-calling.What a nice little book for grown-ups, with New Yorker artist Ian Falconer's kindhearted, eye-catching illustrations and perceptive humor that really feels like one parent talking to another (although I guess the character is modeled on his niece actually).Just a cute portrayal of a happy little girl, highlighting some of the universal qualities found in happy little girls.  Olivia likes to dance.  Her mother let's her know that she loves her but is worn out by the end of a day with her.  Olivia likes to go to the beach.  She builds sand castles.  She goes to the art museum and thinks about the paintings she likes.  She gets in a little trouble trying to make her own home Pollock mural.  She likes having books read to her at bedtime and enters intense negotiations concerning the appropriate number of books.(I see that there are some sequels out.  I'm a little nervous about checking them out.  Whenever I see a kids book I like, it seems to be followed up by sequels that don't live up to mark set by the original, but we'll see.)What I enjoyed most about this book is that it is an easy book for a parent to read in an interactive way.  There are lots of opportunities to ask questions:  What do you think Olivia thinking in this picture?  How are you like Olivia?  How are you different?  And so on.  Big thumbs up.
A very thought-provoking book!. This is an excellent book that will really make you rethink the history you've been taught. As another reviewer put it, half the population was  left out of history! This book gives an account of the many roles puritan  women played during this time and the immense impact they had on history. I  enjoyed reading about the impact of sexuality and reproduction. Imagine  your entire life being filled with getting pregnant, giving birth and  lactating and then starting the cycle all over again. It just goes to show  that women who aren't allowed control over their bodies aren't allowed any  control in society. We can tie this to our own culture and the struggle for  birth control and abortion rights.  Anyways, a great read and I shall make  my future sons and daughters read it so they know that women have a strong  important place in history
Patterson returns to form. Mary Mary is a step in the right direction for James Patterson's Alex Cross novels following the abysmal London Bridges.  I'm not a hard core fan of James Patterson (who I find inconsistent), and in particular - I'm not a big fan of Alex Cross (who I find dull).  I was pleased that the diversions into Alex's personal life were kept to a relative minimum in Mary Mary (and  mostly kept to the first half of the novel).  I know a lot of readers think of Alex as an old friend and they want to check in on his personal life and catch up with how he's doing but I find these chapters to be nothing short of torture to read.Despite getting bogged down in the early chapters with Alex's personal life, Mary Mary turns into a good taut thriller.  I found the Storyteller to be an entertaining sociopath to spend time with (a good killer is essential to novels like this). Patterson doesn't provide much insight into the Storytellers mind and motivation, but I enjoyed his ranting all the same.The plot is filled with twists and turns (some predictable - some less so).Readers of James Patterson who were dismayed by recent Alex Cross novels (Four Blind Mice, Big Bad Wolf, and London Bridges) will be pleased to note that Patterson has returned to form with Mary Mary.  Patterson may be lazy with his research and have a poor ear for dialogue, but he can churn out a good thriller from time to time.  This is his best in a while.
Awesome Book. If you're a Rossi fan, this book is just for you. Definitely different version from M. Oxley which is good too.
Great Reading. This is a delightful book, both with the recipes and for reading.  I bought one for one of my daughter in-laws also and she loved it also
We're never alone, even when we're by ourselves. I loved this book, and I'm glad the author brought us along on his journey.  I have often wondered what it would be like to take off for awhile, and leave the bustle of everyday life behind.From reading I discovered that I would never really be alone, because all of the people that I have been fortunate to know have shaped my life.  They are part of me, and hopefully I am part of them.  Our friends and family are there in spirit all of time - good and bad.  It all makes up a portion of the fabric which is us, which makes nothing bad.  It's all good.The natural setting for the adventure is top-notch, and I do plan on exploring the Rogue River.  I certainly need to bring my fly-rod.Thanks for sharing your life with us, John.
P & P with contemporary issues. Ms. Smith's modern version of P&P is tightly wound, starting with the tornado literally forcing Eddi (Elizabeth) and Dave (Darcy) together  to the proposal onstage in the middle of the Texas version of P&P, one will find well-developed characters and many similarities to the original.  Ms. Smith's religious beliefs, especially those on abortion,were more pronounced than they were in her book Possibilities.  Religion was not an "issue" directly discussed in the original, other than to make fun of Mr. Collins.  I  did not care for the "sermon" in the middle of this story.  It seemed out of place, but it did not destroy my overall pleasure in the book
Endocrinology Made Easy. Basic and Clinical Endocrinology provides the basics needed for a medical school endocrinology unit. By purchasing this book, a medical student is able to focus on the endocrine system in great detail
Is this book for you?. Who will most enjoy Runaway?1. Old hearts who need defibrillating back to a life of passion. If you want to feel again that rush of first love, the sinking of personal rejection, the stabbing realization you've missed out, been decieved, or made a mistake, jump in.2. The recently or imminently divorced. What are you running from? What else will you lose in the bargain?3. Tired of your humdrum life? Munro finds the bizarre, the magical, the extraordinary in middle-class or back-woods lives.4. Mothers. The stories celebrate the intricate psychological and social lives of ordinary women. Most poignant is "Silence," a heart-wrenching mystery of a daughter's desertion of her mother.5. If you enjoy strong fiction but don't have huge blocks of time to read. The stories are short but rich.6.Aspiring writers of short fiction. Long established as a master of the craft, Munro is able to draw both scope and depth into each character, each setting, each situation immediately. She is both entertainer and prophet of the modern human condition.In my opinion, the book falls short of 5 stars because of the unconvincing portayal of life in the early 20th century in the story, "Powers."
A small collection of a larger-than-life career. In 1984, I had the honor to spend a day with Miss Brooks, and to hear her do a reading of many of the poems in this book. I wish that all of you could have heard that reading, her work is meant to be read aloud. That's  what I would advise you to do, buy this book, and when you get it, read the  poems aloud. Play with the flow and the cadence of the words. Miss Brooks  is a national treasure, and her words speak to us all
Crime Scene. This was a fantastic book. It had lots of case studies and heaps of glossy, colour diagrams, which made the text very easy to understand. It was technical yet very easy to understand and it was very detailed. A must read for all those interested in forensi science
Very Good Compared to Others. Read this book for one of my MBA courses. Found it a good read. Coming from a Financial Management course I was leery about this course and its textbook, but the text helped me a lot
One of my favorites. I've been going through reviews trying to find a specific book I lost years ago and found that this one hasn't been reviewed by anyone yet.  This is probably my favorite Harlequin book.  I've enjoyed most of Ms. Ross's books but this one is absolutely the best.  Filled with all the desire, deception, heartbreak and hope that one could want in a romance.Rich, famous gorgeous and reclusive Pearce Tyron seeks to hire a nany for a baby girl in his custody.  Hoping to get a good story reporter Cathy Fielding inadvertantly gets the job.  Set up with lies from the first time they meet eachother, the story of Pearce and Cathy has me choked up each time I read it
Great Research, Describes the State of the Art. There are a lot of books on digital cameras and how to take digital pictures. There are also a lot on processing these images to create the special effects that you might want. But up until now I have not seen any that talk about converting these beautiful images into something so mundane as a picture you can put into an envelope and send home, or hang on the wall.Of course everyone starts out with an inexpensive ink jet printer, the kind you get at WalMart or where ever for only a few tens of dollars. The next step is to realize that the ordinary typing paper you've been using is not the best, so you go get some that promises photo quality.If the result you're getting with this approach is satisfactory for your needs, you need go no further, and this book probably isn't for you. I say probably, because there are hints here on paper, ink and techniques that will help you get the most out of any printer.But if you want to go further, up to advanced amateur standing or beyond, then I'd consider this book a necessity. It covers everything. From printer technologies, to specific brands, to inks, to papers.At this level, you're not talking about $29.95 printers, and just getting the right printer is worth far more than the cost of this book. It clearly represents the state of the art in photo printing today
Carnival coming to town......come aboard!!!. This is a book where Dean Koontz 'Funhouse' creation lack - visionary imagination. Bradbury has this unique ability to capture the mind of readers and pull them in a world of dreams that become horribly wrong in a world of doubt. Have you ever seen what an apple can do to you? Have you ever cross a railroad crossing, yet you stop and wonder? I re-read this book again because it is just soo good, yet so evil. A thick plot layered in so many ways that only the wicked be damned. Nightshade and Halloway wants to find out...will you join them?A highly recommended masterpiece of a read.....just forget the movie.
Shows ways to bring soul back into health care. Through the use of story, anecdote, and interviews the authors help understand what is meant by soul and provide guidelines on how to bring soul back into medicine. I loved the blend of personal and professional in  the writing. I feel challenged to be more aware and mindful that all my  professional interactions are opportunities for soulful connections in  addition to whatever else is needed. The authors have given us a much  needed book
Long time absolute favorite and a true gem on imagination and execution!. I've been working with this book (with children) for many years and have just bought my fifth copy (as they seem to 'disappear' whenever I loan them to children to take home--I suspect they love them too much to part with them for good!). The idea of reality being what we're used to it being (not rather what it HAS to be everywhere), as well as the hilarity of the situation the people of the story are faced with is just delightful. It is an excellent resource of rich vocabulary and expression, and the drawings are believable and at the same time jaw dropping. Highly recommended to all ages, especially preschool through the lower grades
As close as it gets. If you ever have wondered what life is like in a federal penitentiary?  This book pretty much covers it.  Forget all the text books and hard core prison movies, this is as close as it gets to the real thing.  I just wish Earley would have used the "real" names of the inmates.  The staff mentioned in this book are truly real and legendary in the federal penal system, most have since retired.  You won't put the book down.  Good read for real cheap
A Good Starting Point. A good book for beginners and those who are just beginning research on the various mythical beasts. She covers nearly every creature within mythology, quite a few of which I never heard of. At times it felt as though she wasn't saying enough about a creature but she did give enough to go on to further research each one
Really Resonates. It's sad to me that Bernard Malamud's novels seem to be falling by the wayside lately. After reading The Assistant recently, I've been reminded of just how excellent Malamud's writing is. In particular, Malamud is excellent in The Assistant, his best novel. This is definitely one of the must-read novels of the twentieth century.The novel centers around the characters affected by Morris Bober's grocery in a poor neighborhood in Brooklyn. The middle-aged Morris has lost his life working in the unsuccessful store. Because of the economic/spiritual struggles caused by the store, each member of the family has been scarred. Morris's wife Ida has become bitter and cynical. His daughter Helen searches longingly for love and laments the failed realization of her dreams. Then, into their lives comes Frank Alpine, a troubled, depressed man who will become the assistant at the store. The four struggle with one another, attempting constantly to overcome their harsh fate and to obtain some sort of fulfillment together.It's a fairly simple story that reads really well, and remarkably quickly, in my opinion. Despite the simplicity of the story, however, meaning, almost archetypal meaning, ebbs at every moment. It's a beautifully conceived and constructed work touching on themes of morality, justice, redemption, and love. It's very much about what it means to be human. The Assistant is definitely one of those novels that serious readers should catch.
Gabaldan redeemed herself with this book. After reading the "firery cross" I was skeptical when I started this one.  I thought that it might not be up to her usual standards (like the 5th book - firery cross).  Ms. Galbaldon is back to her exceptional standards.  If you were disappointed by the 5th book, don't let that discourage you from getting this one.  I enjoyed this one very much and look forward to reading her forth coming books
All for One and One for All!. I remember the Rexall stores in the late Fifties, not here in Knoxville, but doted around in the small towns of Middle Tennessee.  Louis Liggett started the company in Boston in 1903 and they compounded drugs back then, as aspirin was almost the only thing available in pill form.  When I was in my young teen years, the only thing I could swallow was Carter's Little Liver Pills.  I still can't get the generic Calcium down!The Rexall products were all high quality and inexpensive.  Then the drug manufacturing companies came along and, after 75 years, put them out of business.  That's why prescription medicines are so expensive today, and why we have to depend on them.  The generics are worthless as far as I'm concerned as they are not regulated and not the same as brand names -- no way!  If they were, they would cost more.  Everyone knows you get what you pay for.On radio in 1937 there was a Rexall Magic Hour.  In 1949, they presented the 'Phil Harris/Alice Faye Show.'  It included a full cast with two young girl singers and ten men doing sundry things in addition to the two stars.  Something like Garrison Keilor's 'Prairie Home Companion' show.In early television, NBC sponsored the half-hour program, 'The Rexall Theatre' on Sunday nights during the summer months which starred Pat O'Brian as your corner drug store pharmacist.  The had a 'talking penny' in some of their ads.  Comedian Louis Nye advertised their products on t.v. with the motto: "All for One and One for All."  Edgar Bergen and his dummy, Charlie McCarthy, appeared on the cover of 'The Rexall Magazine.'The streamlined Rexall Train criscrossed the United States from Boston to L.A. and served most states (exceptions were Nevada and West Virginia) but skipped Knoxville for a route going from Chattanooga to Nashville to Memphis.  We had the Southern and L&N railways for this area; the ticket shown was similar to mine every summer to Washington, D.C. on Southern Railway.  We still have an active freight railroad in Knoxville, locally owned and making noise day and night.  Sometimes, it wake me up as I sleep with my window open as I did in the old days.  It works out of the old L&N terminal renovated for the 1982 World's Fair.In place of Rexall, we now have Walgreen's; the thing I dislike the most about this firm is the problem of "substituting" for the medicines your doctor prescribes -- not generic, but something totally different with unnecessary ingredients added.  This could cause harm to a person's health.  There are a handful of small locally owned drug stores, Long's in west side of town being the most popular.  In Pulaski, Reeves's on the Square will still sell a nickel coke.  Gregory Macdonald wrote about it in one of his books, A WORLD TOO WIDE.   Check it out
Unique Book Frames Critical Subject for Executives. This is a key book that provides an innovative look at a critical subject.  After infinite books on &quot;how&quot; to get products to market, here is a very valuable analysis of &quot;what&quot; to bring to market, how to leverage and extend a company's capability base.  Product Strategy will have an enormous impact on the senior managers that read it and on the companies that implement its findings.  It is full of useful methodologies and gripping examples, and provides a great balance of strategic vision and operational guidance
fun--informative. I liked the salary portions, and the job descriptions best. Was fun to see how much others make. Good for finding comparisons in various areas, ie. stress levels, money and perks too
Falstaff and Richard II's Consolation Prize. In "Richard II," Bolingbroke usurped Richard II's crown and became King Henry IV. In "1 Henry IV," King Henry IV stopped the rebellion by Hostspur, Worcester, and Vernon. But his enemy Northumberland is still out there. And this brings us to the present chapter "2 Henry IV." Despite the title, the real star of this play is Falstaff. In "1 Henry IV' Falstaff had a moderate roll. The learned Isaac Asimov was of the opinion that Shakespeare got more than he bargained for with his Falstaff and realized he could write a play with Falstaff as the prominent character. One minor complaint I have is that while Falstaff probably could handle a play, some of the scenes with him seem drawn out. Northumberland reappears and he is of course sad over the death of his son Hotspur. (Slain by Prince Henry in Part 1.) We also meet the Arch Bishop of York who becomes an enemy of Henry IV. The Arch Bishop delivers a striking passage that emphasizes that the past and to come always seem better than the present. In Act 2, we quickly learn that Falstaff has built up some debts and that he is neglecting his duties to the king. (Big surprise!) Prince Henry is a backstage player for the early part of the play, but rather than being close to Falstaff (as in Part 1), he bitterly rebukes Falstaff for his style of life. Also, Prince Henry expresses some sorrow over his father's failing health. But he is afraid he will be seen as a hypocrite if he shows it. (Many people in his position wouldn't be able to  wait to wear the crown.) Interestingly, a woman named Doll begins to find Falstaff attractive. King Henry IV does not enter until Act 3.1, and we can see that the rebellions have taken their toll on him. He is having insomnia and he can only talk about the tribulations of his crown. It is even possible that he feels he deserves his afflictions. Later, Falstaff gathers his men together in a well drawn comical scene. Westmoreland and Henry IV's son Lancaster defeat the rebellion of the Arch Bishop of York, Mowbray, and Hastings in a less than honorable way. But this is not an invention of Shakespeare. It really happened. In the comical 4.3, Coleville surrenders to our favorite fat rogue Falstaff. It is on the funny side when Falstaff comments that Lancaster is so uptight because he doesn't drink. But the sad part of the play returns soon enough. Despite the fact that Henry IV 's enemies have been defeated, Henry IV's health has failed, and he doesn't have much more of a reign to enjoy. (And if you follow my reviews, this constitutes a small consolation prize to King Richard II.) The scene where King Henry IV admits his crimes, begs God's forgiveness, and wishes the eventual Henry V well is one of Shakespeare's greatest moments. I always liked how in "Richard II," Henry IV was a young and energetic usurper, and then in "1 Henry IV" he was portrayed as somewhat more heroic and a likable king, and in "2 Henry IV" he was portrayed as a sorrowful and penitent man. Some people dislike Henry V for banishing Falstaff, but the truth is Henry V has little choice. Falstaff's actions (as comical and entertaining as they are) are flat out criminal. Though Shakespeare did not keep the epilogue's word by putting Falstaff in "Henry V," he would eventually reappear in "The Merry Wives of Windsor."
Practical Homicide Investigations. Excellent reference book..I am a criminal investigator.  The timely manner I received the product was appreciated
I recommend this book for everyone... This is not a large book, but it is a wonderful book. I highly recommend this book for everyone. Especially for gifts. I would love to read more books like this. It is truly an inspiration
The truth may be shocking, but it is always a good read. I have to admitt, at times, I was shocked by the honesty of some of the pieces in this book.  The information shared was very personal but made the experience that much more personal and eye opening.  I found myself relating to women and men on issues I had never given much thought.I particularly enjoyed Jason Shultz's "Getting off on Feminism" and Naomi Wolf's "Brideland."  Interestingly, they both involve weddings--Shutlz deals with a feminist bachelor party and Wolf deals with the lure of weddings.Overall, it was a great book.  I highly recommend it.  Even if you wouldn't consider yourself a feminist, read it, and you may find out some interesting things about yourself.
Walsh does it again. John Walsh is one of my heroes.  This book, as his others, is another excellent in-depth look at Walsh's recent cases on America's Most Wanted.  This book starts with a bang and keeps up the pace.  I highly recommend this book to anyone who wants to protect themselves and their families from the becoming victims.  These cases will open your eyes
Fun listening. Jim Dale has the ability to bring Harry Potter and characters to life.  It is captivating.  He is the best storyteller I've ever listened to and of course, he had such great material to read!  I've got the whole set now
The Story of the World, Volume 3: Early Modern Times. We love these books!  We couldn't wait till this latest book in the series came out.  This book, like the previous ones, is a history written like a story.  Each chapter (topic) is connected to the next and covers history as it happened all over the world. (This one, #3, covers from about 1500- 1850). I purchased a book for my 10 year old to help him learn history.  When history is told in story format so much more is absorbed and remembered later, as well as being more engaging reading.  He loves history now.  I ended up buying one for his older brother, as well, because he was always borrowing his brothers book.  When my 70 year old father came to town (a lover of history)- he picked  up the Story World and read the whole thing!  He said it was very well written and he mentioned that he was impressed by how straight forward and unbaised it was. I remember so little about what I studied in history as a child, but I know it will be different for my kids -because of "The story of the World". I catch my son sneaking in a few chapters when he is suppose to be doing other things...but I can't get too mad-  he's wanting to read History! My youngest son (3rd grade) just started reading this Story World book for himself and he shows the same enthusiasm.  I think this book and others in the series are excellent for all ages to learn and develop a love of history.   (I am enjoying them now, myself, and maybe my knowledge will eventually catch up to what my kids have learned!)  A great choice.  I say, to a fantastic writer and educator... Thanks!!! to Susan Bauer for writing these books and sparking a great love and new hobby in our family.   Jean in Ohi
Helps you make good choices while eating out. This book lists more than 5,000 food items at 60 major chain restaurants (both fast food and sit-down).  I've found it to include even the most recent menu additions of my favorite restaurants.  It gives clear, concise, easy-to-read nutritional information and food exchange counts.  I use this book constantly, and also highly recommend "The Complete Guide to Convenience Food Counts" by Lea Ann Holzmeister (great for meal planning & supermarket trips).  These two books put together contain virtually every item of food I look for, and I recommend both without reservation to anyone on a food exchange diet plan
BEST BOOK ON AGROECOLOGY. I highly recommend the Book Agroecology by Steve Gliessman. It reflects  indepth knowledge of agricultural issues of today food production systems.  Those of us interested in challenging thoughts and ideas to achieve  sustainability must look at the contributions of this book. Some chapters  demand basic knowledge of Ecology while other chapters demand higher level  of ecology and Biology. The book provides examples from different parts of  the world (tropical and temperate zones) so that it should be very useful  to agronomists, and agroecologists from countries other than the US.   As  an agroecologist I highly recommend this book. I find it very useful to  teach Agroecology and Ecology, in both agricultural schools and Biology  students
A Good Introduction to the Trail of Tears. This is a worthy introduction to the Trail of Tears. For students aged 12 and older, a more compelling book is Walking the Trail, One Man's Journey Along the Cherokee Trail of Tears by Cherokee author Jerry Ellis. He was the first person in modern history to walk the 900 mile route and the book, nominated for a Pulitzer and National Book Award, has been in print for 15 years. The author lectures around the globe on the Trail, having presented in Asia, Africa, Europe and throughout the US
This is a work of art!. I had purchased several of Sabuda's books for my grandchildren, the Cookie Countdown is amazing and what a surprise at the end!  I have a friend who loves toys and gadgets and other mysterious things who was being given a fairly prestigious award for his work across the country.  I got a copy of America the Beautiful as a gift for him because I knew he would love it.  Both he and his wife were just amazed.  He sat for hours opening and looking at each page.  He still tells me he finds something new each time he looks at it.  I knew he would love these books as much as I do and as much as my grandchildren do.  Sabuda makes little works of art
Nice guide for preparing a ceremony. This is a pleasant book, but it is more of a guide for ceremony preparation, with good structure and nice ideas, but a small selection of elements and readings. It is enjoyable and easy reading. Together with another "heftier" ceremony book, such as Judith Johnson's The Wedding Ceremony Planner, or Diane Warner's Complete Book of Wedding Vows or another such book, it's be enough for an engaged couple to plan their ceremony. It will be staying on my shelf.
Very satisfied with the contents. If you read the editorial review: It is stated that the book is about installing and configuring Oracle Database 10g on Linux. Yes, the author did explain clearly the process of installing and configuring the Oracle 10g on Linux. He also covered a few more topics such as HA (High Availability), Tuning SQL, RAC, Replication, Index and Partitioning ... but not in depth. But the coverage is acceptable and useful. Do buy this book and you will find it useful if you love Oracle DBMS running on LINUX platform.
Great, but... I love McEwan's writing enough to forgive him for the few faults this novel almost conceals.  At its best, the prose evokes Fitzgerald's effortless beauty.  At worst, it feels showy, or show-offy:  18 pages to describe a squash match?  No need.  We GET it.  Ian knows squash, Ian knows fine wine and food, Ian knows Neurosurgery, Ian knows Blues.  The problem is that the novel Hangs too long, or too deeply on each of these subjects.  Ok, so the book is only about one day in this guy's life, one 24 hours of his hyper-consciousness, and as a result it HAS to go deep.  Still, I felt at times like McEwan was showing off, not just showing
Great Content. This soft cover on transparent art, though a little pricey, finally puts techniques for using this medium all in one place for those who are serious about learning how to use transfer medium in their artwork. As with most books of this type, the artist/crafter must own or invest in a significant amount of other supplies in order to duplicate the projects. The book is well done; the explanations clear; the photographs of the processes clear. Somerset Studio, as usual, has done a good job
Must read for any asian.. Its a nice read contrasting cultural background and biases of different asians, and how that hinders progress in corporate america. Must read for any asian. Few things I already knew having worked for sometime. But its a good review material when you take a step back and rethink the way you operate
Definitely a MUST for Spyro gamers!. Spyro the Dragon, my favorite video game, wouldn't be comleted 100% now if I hadn't gotten this hint guide.  It offers amazing detail, wonderful hints, and information on the enemies you will have to defeat
A gem... I saw the 1963 classic first, which happens to be one of my most favourite ghost movies of all time! (what a major disappointment the remake was). So as soon as I could a got a copy of this. It was an awesome novellete. I read it in one sitting, couldn't put it down! I do have to say I enjoyed the movie better...but this is a great journey as well.
Enjoyed seeing familiar characters. This may not have been her best novel, but I thoroughly enjoyed it. It was nice to see some of the characters from her previous novels in new adventures. If I hadn't read some of them I might have been lost with the REM-4 plot line.
EUROPE: ALL IS NOT LOST, YET. Anyone wanting a quick way to assets the general merits and intellectual muscle flexed in the book should glance at the chapter headed `Two Ideas of Freedom', contrasting the secular and sacred versions of Freedom with luminous brevity. However, the general easy-reading contemporary nature of the prose will be better gauged from the later chapter `The Cost of Boredom', which sums up why white post-Christian Europe cannot be bothered to procreate with sufficient vigour to stem its population decline, and our `postpolitical wilderness' of rule by faceless bureaucrats.As an American theologian and the biographer of Pope John Paul II, George Weigel is well placed to speak with perspective on Europe's current problems. The main thrust of the book is a critique of atheistic secular humanism (ASH) and its many virus variants which have infected the Euro-Russian continent. The emphasis is on the 20th century, and picks up the root philosophical and cultural causes of World War I and II, and the rebellion of the `Les Soixante-Huitards' (1968 riots) with remarkably fluent and coherent reference to Western European history as far back as the High Middle Ages of Aquinas and Occam (1200-), and glancing reference much further back. The Cube is the intellectual symbol of the sterile closed-universe ASH viewpoint, the architectural colossus of 'La Grande Arche' of Paris, being an open cube of white marble and glass about 40 stories tall and 348 feet wide. The cathedral is the rather more famous church of Notre Dame, which despite its ancient complexities and beauty in spire and tower, would `fit comfortably inside the Grand Arch'. This current edition is dated 2005, and probably just missed the rioting and looting and epidemic of car-burnouts that afflicted France that year.It is difficult to do anything like reviewing justice to this book at one reading, but one of the central themes is that `western Europe is committing a form of demographic suicide' (p.5), with a general greying of the population and coming universal pensions crisis due to a birthrate being less than the replacement rate. He might have added that Russia currently has an annual death-rate that exceeds the birthrate by 750,000, but his purpose does not extend to a proper vilification of communism. The root cause of our lack of reproductive enthusiasm is analysed to be spiritual nihilism, emptiness, and lack of purpose in life, having rejected the Christian roots of our historical culture. Its criticism of the purblind inability of the EU to see the problem, let alone grapple with it, will gladden the hearts of those who oppose this political con-trick that is the eurozone--despite the (to me) astonishing revelations he makes of the catholic Christians who were the architects of the whole scheme.He is frequently at pains to trace the intellectual, cultural, and moral roots of western Europe (the eastern empire is sparingly but properly referenced, and not ignored as is so often the case). Recently the ruling EU elites totally refused to recognise the Christian heritage of Europe in the drafting of its 70,000 word constitutional treaty. Our roots apparently jumping from the classical civilisation of Greece and Rome to that of the humanist Enlightenment of Descartes and Kant (which merely extracted the parts it liked from Christian culture, and promptly forgot what it takes to develop and preserve them, which is a living faith in a Judaeo-Christian God.)He invites us to contemplate a striking list of Christian scientists, artists, politicians, leaders, warriors, and philosophers--and asks us to imagine Europe [history itself, I would say. Just consider that we only discovered the gas oxygen about 225 years ago. We could not even begin to describe the chemistry of burning or human respiration before this], without their contribution. And this is a list which is so wide-ranging that it includes Milton, Mendel, Michaelangelo, Wesley and Wilberforce, while it omits Shakespeare, Isaac Newton, Handel, and dozens of others.The other main theme is euro `Christophobia', which is detailed in many ways, from the persecutory attitude to the Catholic Professor Rocco Buttiglione in his proposed place in the EU government, to the universal demand for tolerance which includes rather madly includes rigid intolerance of any discussion of the Christian religion or its place in influencing civic society. Altogether, this adds up to the best analysis of secularism that I have ever read.The statement of the very obvious that is the underlying theme of the themes, is that western European civilisation was built by the Catholic church. There is more balance and a gentler tone here in the treatment of the subject, but the author is generally in line with Thomas Woods book, `How the Catholic Church built Western Civilisation'. Which is well paired with this one, before or after making little difference.The only weakness of this book is that it understates its case. It would be easy to adduce more evidence of outright damage and incoherence of ASH in our literature alone (Kafka, Samuel Beckett, Sartre, Nietzsche, Camus), and then as a whisky chaser consider the intellectual flight from science. Professor Robin Dunbar's `The Trouble with Science', published in 1995 traces the problem in Britain back at least twenty years. And is still seen in the rapid and ongoing rejection of chemistry and physics in the school system throughout, from GCSE at 16, to university graduate, a trend which is steadily shutting down departments in these subjects as I write. My second reading of this book starts right now, and I can also see how it would help one or two of my friends, with Christmas about to hove into view. Read them and pray.
humorous, smart and enticing. Dr. Wansink's book takes the mystery out of unnecessary eating and peppers it until it brews to the right consistency, that is with sagas that are palatable, anecdotal and scientifically proven. To boot, his tips on re-wiring one's brain to eat differently are long overdue. In the world of fad diets, Dr. Wansink's book cuts through the fat and offers a 'lean' approach to eating healthy and with mindfulness. Bravo! A must read for anyone who cares about health and wellness
interesting preview. AN INTERESTING PREVIEW OF HIS LATER CLASSICS ON THE LIFE OF HITLER HUBRIS AND NEMESI
Butterflies. I checked out this book at the library so many times I thought I'd better get one of my own.  Found it for the right price at Amazon.com.  It's an excellent butterfly book for the novice identifying butterflies of North America
smart book. This is a smart leader's tool--models, frameworks, examples, case studies.  The author has clear real life experience which makes it different than theoretical approaches by those with no practical background
A Must Read Now More Than Ever. This book provides a scholarly view of the relationship between Islam and the West devoid of the biases that would prevent a critical analysis of the situation.  Fuller and Lesser bring years of phenemonal experience at the CIA and the State Department.  I would account the previous reviewer's low rating of this book due to his own inability to reach the top level of these guys.  If you want to learn about the Middle East then Esposito, Fuller, and Glenn E. Robinson are the way to go
Goldmine Record Album Price Guide. This book was a big help in determining price for each record.  However, when I took the records to a record store to sell them they were not worth as much as the book claimed.  It is probably because the book is based on collector prices and I have not looked into selling to a collector.  Overall it's a great book especially if you don't know anything about records
Excellent Cookbook for Kids!. This cookbook for the younger reader is wonderful.  This book is easy to understand, filled with many pictures, that not only gives recipes, but also teaches various cooking techniques.  Williams Sonoma has a wonderful way of creating cookbooks for the younger people that have not only creative recipes, but recipes for foods that we eat every day.  I highly recommend this cookbook for your young novice cook
The Time Machine Review. (contains spoilers). This is a good  scientific book that is based on time traveling. In this book there is the time traveler and the narrator. The narrator take the lead roll when the book is talking about the meetings the time traveler has at his house. As the story starts out, the time traveler creates a miniature time machine that disappears in front of the narrator and the guests. When the time traveler goes into the future with his time machine, he stops in the year 802,702 AD. He sees the small, robbed creatures that are called Eloi. At first he tries to learn their language, but they get bored and go away. As he is discovering the land, the other creatures, Morlocks, stole his time machine and put it in the Sphinx statue. When he discovers his time machine is missing, he panics and scares the Eloi. Then on his adventure of discovering the land again he comes across wells and quickly learns that there are creatures down there. Before he enters the wells, he saves an Eloi from the river. This Eloi's name is Weena. The time traveler figures out the Eloi are scared of the dark because the Morlocks attack them in the dark. After the time traveler goes into the wells and scares the Morlocks with fire, he returns to the land and runs away to a safe place, Palace of Green Poreclain. with Weena. When he discovers that the Palace of Green Poreclain is a museum, he gets flammable substance and matches, which are not around in this time. On there way back to the Sphinx statue he and Weena are attacked by the Morlocks. The time traveler sets a small fire to keep them safe, which inturns creates a large forest fire. During the forest fire the Morlocks take Weena, so the time traveler follows them in hope to find safety and Weena. When he gets back to the Sphinx he finds that the door is open so he goes in and the Morlocks close the door so the time traveler can not escape. With the time machine right in front of his eyes he fights off the Morlocks and shoots into the future, where he discovers the end of time. As he goes back in time to tell his story he gets to his laboratory and forgets what happened to him. Then he tells everyone he will be back in a half an hour to gather evidence that he traveled he never comes back. Again I liked this book because it was easy to put your self with the time traveler and go through all of his experiences.
This is the best book ever written!. Okay, maybe I'm exagerating a bit because I have two poems in there (Hell's Angels Barbie and Confederate Barbie are mine) but there's no two ways about it -- Mondo Barbie rules!  Buy this book!
The Truth About Disco. Thank you Tim Lawrence.  This book is the antedote to all the haters out there who still believe that "Disco Sucks" after the post-Comiskey Park backlash.  This book is such an amazing and wonderfully readable document that I would recommend anyone interested in 20th century American musical history, or the [...]/black urban experience of the 1970's, or relatively recent New York history read it.  Of course if you're interested in  disco music or dance music the book is absolutely essential.This book goes much deeper than the usual Studio 54 cliches that people associate with the genre (although Studio 54 is included, of course) and discusses the origins of the sound and the largely unhearalded people who made this scene happen.  David Mancuso is described as a pivotable person here, and the folks who were there will confirm it.  The book begins in his legendary club, The Loft, and lovingly details his obsession with sound and the disco experience.  Other innovators from the early 70's are also featured including Francis Grasso, Steve D'Acquisto, Bob Casey, and many more.  The scene is chronicaled from humble beginnings through the glory years of the mid 70's and ends the decade with the backlash in full swing in mainstream culture but continuing to thrive in clubs like Paradise Garage and Better Days.  Along the way you meet producers like Walter Gibbons and Tom Moulton who made some of the classic recordings of the era, and Lawrence takes the time to explain what is so remarkable about their work.  You also get delightfully naughty stories about some of the key players in the scene including DJ's, artists, and of course, the patrons that illustrate some of the excesses of the time .  Personally, I think that it's this superb combination of detailed research and bitchy gossip that makes the book so thoroughly readable and fun.I loved reading this book; the only drawback for me was that I couldn't help pining for the days when New York club culture was this incredible before AIDS and Rudy Guilliani conspired to very nearly kill it off (fortunately they weren't entirely successful).HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!!
A Damning Portrait of Hillary. Unlike  "Hell to Pay" and "The Truth About Hillary", two BOOKS about the former First Lady and current senator, Tom Kuiper's "I've Always Been a Yankees Fan" is not a book, but merely a collection of quotes.  Of course, it is a very amusing, entertaining, and sometimes downright scary, collection.  Hillary Clinton has always had a sort of "ice-queen" aura about her, and some(fine, I'll be honest, ALL) of what has been recorded in this book only enforces that same image.  What she's said in anger over her husband's affairs, what she's said about anyone who disagrees with her on anything, even what she has said that would classify as Anti-Semitism, has been collected by Kuiper.  What really stated the case for this collection of quotes was the cover, emblazoned with the title-"I've Always Been a Yankees Fan"- but just under those words was a photograph of Clinton wearing a Chicago Cubs cap!  Flip-flop? Don't think too hard.  It is obvious that she said she was a Yankees fan when she thought it would help her public image, and said she was a Cubs fan when she thought that would help her public image.  This is clearly the result of political motivation.At times, however, "I've Always Been a Yankees Fan" can be long-winded and repetitive, especially with its use of pictures.  Over and over, I saw pictures of President Clinton embracing Monica Lewinsky; pictures of Hillary's calculating glare; even pictures of Bill with a fat cigar protruding from his mouth.  Also, for someone to truly appreciate this collection of quotes, he or she would be advised to read up on some of the events that took place during the Clinton years (not just the years of the Clinton Presidency, mind you), such as the Whitewater scandal."I've Always Been a Yankees Fan" could possibly become the holy grail of anti-Clinton rhetoric, a tool used to damage her prospects during the 2008 campaign.  For her admirers, on the other hand, circling the wagons in response to those who criticize her political talk would not be surprising in the least.  When Bernard Goldberg released his scathing "100 People who are Screwing up America(and Al Franken is #37)" Jack Huberman wrote a response titled, "101 People who are Really Screwing America(and Bernard Goldberg is only #73)".  Hardly original, but I'm sure someone out there will compile a response to this- possibly a collection of quotes from a leading Republican who may have high hopes for 2008.Kuiper's collection presents to the reader a cold image of the New York Senator that is all the more damning, frankly, because it is entirely in Hillary's own words.
piss-yourself  funny and  a classic? yep, yep, yep. examples from t.v. shows I grew up watching somaybe a little dated but still a funny book witha message for girls and even older women about theneed to use humor and comedy in our lives so that wecan be seen as real human beings and also as people whomanage to have a really good time, and with a message forfemales who need to have encouragemnent to take themselves--this is the weird part--seriously
More Powerful for Tobacco Addiction than Patches or Gums!. I have been studying tobacco addiction and helping patients quit for over 25 years...Cessation has every thing to do with packing the brain with reasons to quit and techniques to help accomplish the goal. Each person has to decide which reasons apply personally. LIFE CHANGES is packed full of reasons to quit and exercises to help you take control of your life back from tobacco. It exposes tobacco not as a friend that settles you  down and keeps weight off, but an enemy that robs you of over  a decade of what should be golden years. I like this book and whole-heartedly recommend it to my patients. Congratulations to David and Carole Johnson! Through their book they will save and touch more lives than they will ever know. This book helps develop tools that, if achieved, will be far more powerful forces to combat tobacco addiction than any patch or gum could be
A Rendezvous with The Origin of Species. The Ancestor's Tale: A Pilgrimage to the Dawn of EvolutionRichard  Dawkins's "The Ancestor's Tale" is remarkable on several levels: as a Scientific Tour de Force; as a literary accomplishment; and a personal statement.  At a time when the Evolution V. Creationism dialogue continues unabated (propelled by books like Frances Collin's "The Language of God"), Dawkins makes a reasoned defense of Evolution and rejection of Intelligent Design.***But it is in his creative use of examples from nature that he contributes the most; taking a Cue from Chaucer's "The Canterbury Tales" he brings us back through geologic time (eras, epochs, periods and so forth) to the development and evolution of species. For Instance:  The Beaver is the only species that builds dams; and has the "damn building" gene whether or not the beaver is in a pond or lake:"Dam building is hard-wired in the brain," he writes. " I have seen a remarkablefilm of captive beavers imprisoned in a bare, unfurnished cage, with no waterand no wood. The beavers enacted, "in a vacuum," all the stereotyped movements 	normally seen in natural building behavior when there is real wood and realwater. They seem to be placing virtual wood into a virtual dam wall, patheticallytrying to build a ghost wall with ghost sticks, all on the hard, dry, flat floor oftheir prison.  One feels sorry for them: it is as if they are desperate to exercisetheir frustrated dam-building clockwork."   P.189Dawkins has a remarkable ability to translate pure scientific theory into concrete instances of evolutionary change. From the Dawn (literally) of time he constructs a clear, cohesive pattern of life. At over 600 pages, "The Ancestor's Tale" is a weighty undertaking.  But with Dawkins' literate exposition, reading it is not a ponderous task.Dawkins takes apart the Creationist argument of "irreducible Complexity:""Francis Crick (Co-discoverer of DNA) himself--whether with regret or relief itis hard to say--finds little good evidence to support his own theory of DirectedPanspermia.  But the hinterland between science and science fiction constitutesA useful mental gymnasium in which to wrestle with a genuinely important question: given that the illusion of designed conjured by Darwinian\Natural selection is so breathtakingly powerful, how do we, in practice distinguishIts products from deliberately designed artifacts?.....Could there be genuinelyPersuasive examples of irreducible complexity in nature:  complex organizationMade of many parts, the loss of any one of which would be fatal to the whole?If so, might this suggest genuine design by a superior intelligence, say fromAn older and more Civilized planet?"(P.550)Resoundingly No, Dawkins writes.
Highly Recommended. In less that one year, we get a second amazing book by Hatsumi Sensei. While focusing on stick fighting with ROKUSHAKU BO (six ft long staff) and JO (5 ft walking staff) this book also offers the reader insight into current lessons the ninja grandmaster is teaching in Japan. The photographs illustrate the text though showing flow and direction. Once again, I am very impressed by the photography. This book is both a useful text for students and a work of art for the collector. A fine addition to your ninjutsu library
2nd Edition ''Urban Bikers'' Tricksier, Tipsier. Cape mysteriously fluttering in the still air of my living room, Mr. Bike sat down across from me to straighten out his tights and to talk about the second edition of his show-all, tell-all book on bike use and maintenance, Urban Bikers' Tricks and Tips.''For the most part you'll find the really accessible style and great illustrations that makes both versions of this book really easy to use,'' rumbled a deep baritone from the center of that oak barrel of a chest.''So why buy the new book?'' I asked.A pointed inquiry, I thought, but I might as well have assaulted a truck tire with a drinking straw. ''The section on locks got revised the most,'' answered Mr. Bike, casually adjusting his mask. ''Small lock makers are offering really great locks now, and I've uncovered some that are going to be really hot. And I've added some new tricks and tips I've learned since the last printing.''''Learned from first edition readers?''''Some. But also some things that people have asked me about, like how to put a bike in a car without a bike rack.''Had I just glimpsed Mr. Bike's relatively-soft-compared-to-the-chiseled-rest-of-him underbelly? I pounced. ''Isn't that something most people could figure out?''Fire leapt in his eyes, and I cowered as he spoke. ''Bicycle magazines, bike maintenance books, and other experts perpetrate an aura around cycling of technical complexity mastered only by esoteric knowledge and buying the right equipment. This intimidates a lot of people. The mission of this book is to get people to relax. By tapping into a global brain trust of urban cyclists, I've collected low-tech and no-tech ways to find, use, fix and keep a bike, exploding the 'bike expert' myth and empowering the common person to control their cycling destiny.''We are finished here,'' exclaimed the mighty hero. As he rose above me, adjusted his singlet, and strode toward the door, I realized that that the wisdom of the world's urban cyclists was leaving with him.''Just one more question!'' I pleaded. ''Please, kind sir: Where can I find this book?''Mr. Bike turned, his cape flaring dramatically. ''At all good and decent book stores, at amazon.com, and at mrbike.com!'' he bellowed, the steel I-beams of the building thrumming in tune. Then he was gone
Smashing history of Congress and Phil Burton. John Jacobs has done a spectacular job of capturing and relating the career of Congressman Phil Burton, a swaggering, ruthless liberal from San Francisco who came within one vote of serving as House majority leader in  1976. For anyone who wants to understand the history of the contemporary  Congress, they need only read &quot;A Rage For Justice,&quot; and &quot;The  Ambition and the Power,&quot; by John Barry, which tells the story of  Congressman Jim Wright, the man who beat Burton by that one vote. Both  books are chock with candid interviews and revealing anecdotes, and written  with style. Each serves as a model of congressional biography
Couldn't Put it Down. I know it's a cliche but it's the truth! I think this would be my favorite Coulter to date. I don't care if it isn't well researched... I didn't recognize the discepencies as I am not a scholar of Regency history and culture. It was fun and I enjoyed the interaction between the characters. It was certainly not boring. I would read it again.
its really good. this play is just amazing. its a beautifully written simple love story. But the characters are extremely captivating. I reccomend reading this or seeing it if you can. Its great. Dont be fooled by how simple it is though. its deceptively s
life changing. I just refered about 8 people to this book in the past week so I figured I should add a review here also.this book is REALLY and TRULY LIFE CHANGING... there is something about the words and the way its written that you can't put it down until you're finished reading it, and there's an overwhelming sense of peace that comes over everyone who reads and finishes it.it is short... to the point.. and really inspirational. i keep a copy on my bedside table and open it almost every day to find the nearest highlighted quote to give me energy...Since i have read this book (and his other books also) i have seriously changed my life for the better... it is so simple to do... you realize the power of peaeful and mindful living and how easy it is to do
Mobius strip. This is the beginning of the posthumous work of Mishima.  You will follow the lives of four people who got reincarnated in different time and in different place with Honda.  His flowing and elegant style hits the highest and psychological descriptions, that even characters did not realized themselves so well, are so elaborated and sometimes scare us.  It seems like weaving beautiful tapestry and you can feel the person of genius and bliss for enjoying the output of the genius.  But you may lost at the end like this story and come back to this story again and again
The Best Nursury Rhyme Book Ever!. This is a much coveted, lovely book that I enjoyed as a child and still enjoy as an adult.   A guaranteed keepsake to hand down through the generations
A primer on trust. The issue of trust -- of others and of myself -- comes up all the time. Whom do I really trust, and how do I build trust with people whom I would like to trust more? How much can I safely let back in people who have betrayed my trust in the past? What moves can I make that will make me more trustworthy? Cynthia Wall's exercises are often helpful in clarifying underlying blocks, allowing me to go much deeper into the real issues.I am in a process of exploring this issue with my women's group this year; it's a very rich and scary topic. The Courage to Trust is a valuable, compassionate guide for us in this exploration. I think anyone who has ever been betrayed or disappointed by someone will find helpful support in this beautifully and thoughtfully written book
Fascinating look at the southwest. The disappearance of a scientist and the murder of a Navajo Tribal Police Officer coincide, and a Hopi is blamed for the murder.  Meanwhile, several Navajo have died from Bubonic Plague (something they still die from, seriously).  Is there a connection? Yes.  In this one, Leaphorn is now a private citizen and Chee is acting Lieutenant.  Their roles almost seem reversed but they're still the same old characters.  I don't think they had to have Janet Pete in this one again, I think he should just dump the b****
Informative, if a little stuffy. The author recommends the reader have several years of college-level music training. He uses harmonic/melodic analysis as one would use in dissecting W.A. Mozart, et al, in theory class. This is an interesting and insightful approach that sometimes gets a bit too clever, given the subject matter. The author demonstrates genuine admiration for the Beatles as composers/poets/performers, but occasionally becomes condescending, perhaps a product of his academic background. On the other hand, he seems to be very precise regarding who played what on which track--that's interesting for a musician at any level. All in all, an engrossing work. The more knowledge of music theory the reader possesses, the more he/she will enjoy this book
Better, faster, cheaper than almost any other theory book. Although this book is obviously not geared towards those undergoing heavy-duty classical music training, if you just want to learn what chord construction, chord progression, scales, and a little of what jazz and rock styles are all about, this is the book for you.  This is, hands down, the best theory book for the player who just wants to play an instrument well enough to jam with his/her friends or to learn and play songs from a fake book.  Even an accomplished musician who knows little about theory (and yes, those people do exist) can benefit from reading this plainly-written, enjoyable, and inexpensive little book
Austrian Economics. Murray Rothbard's contribution to economic science cannot be overstated. Following the footsteps of Mises' _Human Action_, Rothbard's own treatise leaves no economic question untouched. _Man, Economy and State_ presents the entire corpus of economic law, deduced logically from the undeniable fact of human choice. Because of the Austrian methodology, Rothbard was a system-building rationalist, and so this book has little resemblance to mainstream economics. As a praxeologist, Rothbard builds economics not on models or mathematics, but using primordial logical principles to explore the formal implications of purposeful human behavior. Rothbard not only presented Austrian economics in a systematic, complete way -- he also advanced it considerably. Some examples of his contributions to the hardcore of Austrian economics: he refined the theory of utility, he greatly elaborated and developed theories of production, (although I believe his theory of interest was incorrect), reconstructed the approach to welfare-economics, demolished the illusory free-market monopoly problem, etc. Also crucial to his economic theory was his indepth exploration of violent intervention in the free market. That volume, _Power and Market_, is included here (as it was originally intended). Here, Rothbard drives the final nail in the coffin for virtually any argument that the government do anything positive for the economy. He also recognized that economic and ethical problems have the same, fundamental root: scarcity, without which neither discipline would be at all meaningful. This connection was critical for Rothbard as he developed his political philosophy, which was systematically presented later in _The Ethics of Liberty_ (1982). Considering Rothbard completed this treatise when he was only 36, his level of scholarship is nothing short of incredible. His footnotes are full of treasures.This is truly one of the most important works of economic theory ever written. Indeed, it covers _everything_, and Rothbard's clear, tempered prose is unrivaled in either philosophy or economics. Anyone who is alive should read this book. If you're dead and you can read, well...that's amazing, but still the book won't be much used to you.
Attractive Invite to World of Indian Cuisine. Jaffrey is surely one of Indian cuisine's true ambassadors.  Finding the need initially in our country to receive Indian food, she had to prepare it herself and thus modified recipes to American appliances, measurements, etc.Thus, we have a trusted intro into this fascinating, spicy world of major cuisine with a reliable source to guide.  There is an excellent source listing by state with many mail and email order sites.I am enchanted with the spices and yogurt sauces, e.g. Lamb korma with almonds, pecans, and sour cream; lamb chops with whole spices and yogurt; shrimp with brown sauce; sweet rice; yogurt with roasted eggplant.This is great work to enter and explore this flavorful world. Color photos of finished work would help us that are unfamiliar with this.
Important social perspective told with a classic beat style. Ellison addresses an important topic with a free flowing beat style that puts the harsh realities of segregated America into poignant prose.From its starting point, where the reader may think "this is the real stuff, this is the uglier side of American history as told by a man who lived it," the narrative has one early surreal interlude, runs into a realist storyline for a good clip, then hits the reader again with extended riffs of vivid metaphor later on.Invisible man is an important read as much for appreciation of Ellis's style as for the socially relevant subject matter.I'd recommend this book to readers interested in the U.S. social history and the civil rights movement, and to those who enjoy the beat style prose that took shape in the early 1950's (I'd imagine Jack Kerouac fans would also enjoy Ellison)
Gold standard. This is *the* definitive textbook for physical exam. Great pictures, explanations, and descriptions. Required text in many medical schools
Great Book. This was a great book which really helped me get a good foundation on clean web page design. Easy to read and great examples
Great Swashbuckler. Our hero encounters tyranny, injustice, slavery, cruelty, rapine, vengeance, piracy, war, treachery and towering over them all... romantic love at a distance.  His superior morality and quick wit allow him to conquer all.  Reads fast and is great escapist fun
Life Is At Your Feet. This is the life story of Kim Phuc, with supporting coverage of the horrors of Vietnam and the endless legacy of pain and sorrow caused by the war. Kim was captured on film in the devastating news photo form 1972, as she ran naked and screaming from a napalm attack (which turned out to be a friendly-fire accident, to boot). While reading this book, I was unable to stop flipping it over to look at the famous photo on the cover again and again, as writer Denise Chong does an outstanding job of bringing Kim and her story to life. Granted, the book does have a few weaknesses. Chong obviously saw the need to add background information about the war to support Kim's story, though in the attempt to summarize or introduce the issues and politics of the war, Chong's coverage seems simplistic and perfunctory. Also, as Kim's biography progresses, Chong is trying too hard, and inconsistently, to make the book "inspirational," with Kim's inner thoughts and reflections on her ongoing struggles coming across as forced and sappy in places.But these weaknesses do not damage the overall success of the book, because Kim's life story is definitely compelling, and her postwar struggles are especially informative. We learn about the wartime travails of Kim's middle-class Vietnamese family, culminating in the horrific day when she was injured and barely survived. Kim has suffered through chronic pain and constant health problems stemming from here severe napalm burns. Meanwhile the incompetent new Communist regime in Vietnam used her for years as a pawn in propaganda schemes, and ruined her once successful family. Kim spent most of her teen and young adult years trying to escape the regime's clutches and finish her schooling; and interestingly, she observed the collapse of two Communist systems, both at home and as an exchange student in Cuba. (She now lives as an activist in Canada.) Chong's coverage of the postwar hardships of those affected by the Vietnam War is especially valuable, because you see little of this type of material in standard war texts. And you will surely root for Kim Phuc as she slowly puts her lifetime of horrors behind her. [~doomsdayer520~
An extraordinary book from an extraordinary artist. This book is fantastic as far as photo books go.  There is a important quality attached to having good reproductions in a printed book.  The Bone House has some of the best reproductions of the original prints availiable,  aside from appropriate information about the author and artist himself
All the facts and more... This slim little book taught me more about opals than rummaging around in the opal stores and book stores of Sydney ever did... Fred and Charlotte have managed to add lots of juicy information about opals - how they are made, history, cutting, what makes them special etc and present it in a very easy to read manner.  A great book to give anyone an indepth knowledge of opals
Classic Stories. I read this book many years ago and to this day several of the short stories stick in my mind. So when looking for a good book for my wife to read, I thought this was the perfect choice. Unfortunately, I didn't have a copy. So I was overjoyed to see this book being reprinted and eagerly ordered a copy.Look for "Who Goes There" which is the short story the movie "Thing" was based upon
Amazing Book. This is a must read for any person responsible to manage an IT organization supporting multiple companies with different processes and management teams. This book looks lets you reflect on how decisions are made and who is responsible for decisions. It does not tell you how to run your IT organization. Spending time understanding the concepts of this book would make you look at problems in a different way.
Great Novel. I am a late-comer to the V.I. Warshawski series. I'd known about for years, but after seeing the dreadful Kathleen Turner movie version, I decided to skip the books.  Stupid me!  I've only read this first book, but I have to say I'm hooked.  The character of V.I. Warshawski is probably one of the best female P.I. characters out there.  Sara Paretsky has written strong, three dimensional female that you can easily become attached to.  The plot of this first book was a little choppy, but the author's understanding of Chicago -- the lay of the land, the police, the politics -- makes up for any shortcomings.  Bravo job!  I look forward to reading the entire series
kids love to say no. This book lets your child tell someone else no and is very empowering. I bought it based on the reviews and was dissappointed when I read it to myself but sure enough my two year old loves it as much as everyone else's kid did. It's her first pick book at reading time
Marketing Simplicity. Want to sell more of your product?  Want to know how to market effectively?  Then you need to get this book.  As a constant reader, I find that thinner books offer so much more than larger books.  Why?  Thinner books condense information into easy to understand rules, laws, and principles.  Al Ries breaks down the rules of successful marketing down to just 22 laws, and he does a great job of explaining each.  How much easier can that be?  And you only need to remember just a few of them to market successfully.  And though this book was not written to tell you exactly how you are going to make your product sell more, it will tell you your goals and destinations.  This is the first book any marketer should read.  Only then does it make sense to read the rest.Gus MaximusThe Art of GamefareThe Art of Winning at Multiplayer Video Gameswww.TheArtofGamefare.com
Promoting and actions in alignment with ethical values. Teaching &amp; Learning Peace by educator and peace advocate William M. Timpson is a scholarly, education-oriented instructional guide to the teaching of nonviolent and peaceful means for conflict resolution. Individual chapters cogently address the fostering the right classroom environment for learning peace; promoting and actions in alignment with ethical values (especially by example); instructional strategies (including multi-modal delivery and experiential learning); and much, much more. Teaching &amp; Learning Peace is commended as being an exceptional guide, -- especially for professors and parents concerned about educating the next generation in the ways of nonviolence
Puts modern serial killers to shame. It says a lot for a story when it begins with a shipwreck and builds in intensity from there.Batavia's Graveyard, painstakingly researched and written by Mike Dash, starts shortly before the proud, richly laden Dutch merchantman Batavia, on her maiden voyage for the Dutch East India Co. in 1629, shattered its hull on a coral reef near Australia and some 1,500 miles shy of its destination in Java. It could have been a simple story of survival if not for the presence of Jeronimus Cornelisz aboard the doomed vessel. At first glance a simple, mid-ranking official for the company, Cornelisz harbored heretical ideas and an overblown sense of his own importance in the scheme of things -- and he had the intelligence and charisma to bend others to his will. Long before the shipwreck occurred, Cornelisz had plotted mutiny and piracy on the Batavia. But once he found himself stranded with more than 250 survivors and limited resources to keep them alive, the Dutchman decided to take matters into his own hands and decide who should live and die.It might be somewhat hard to believe if this were fiction, but Dash has drawn his story from the logs, court records and testimonials of the day. As history, Batavia's Graveyard is a gripping, deeply disturbing tale. Dash should be commended for his ability to present the story with such perfect balance between sensational drama and stark historical facts. There are enough notes and references to sate even the most passionate researcher, and the narrative never falters in its flow.by Tom Knapp, Rambles.NET edito
Leads to quality time with my son. This is my Kindergarten son's favorite Junie B. book, although he loves them all. He laughs out loud at Junie B's antics and loves pointing out her grammar mistakes.  I love Junie B. books because it helps initiate  conversations with my son about his Kindergarten.  I'll ask questions like,  'Has anyone in your class ever done anything like that'.  This particular  book led to interesting discussions about how grown-ups make mistakes too  and whether someone goes to jail for a minor crime (that's all I will say  without giving it away).  Enjoy Junie B. - she's charming
Fast read. Wherever Jack Reacher goes trouble seems to follow.  He can't even have a quiet cup of coffee without a crime taking place in front of him. This is the 10th book in the Reacher series and they seem to be getting better and better.  Can't wait for the next one to come out
One of those "changes my life" books. I LOVE THIS BOOK. I'm not a scientist of any sort--I'm a linguist and lay pastor. But this book took me into a realm I had never been. I read it on the beach--got totally sunburnt because I couldn't put the book down and go in the house. I'm sure Bakker had no idea a 40-something divorced Mom/college prof was going to relate to his book in this manner, but, .... here's what I took away from it.It explained to me the 'prime directive' of biological life--to pass on our DNA. No matter what we're doing throughout our lives, we are driven by the same urge--to attract a worthy mate who will engender healthy offspring and help us raise those offspring to continue to pass on our DNA. Even though Red is completely unaware of this directive, it guides every choice she makes, from the moment she wakes in the morning til she falls asleep at night. Having lost her own chick, she risks her life time and again to help rear her sister's chick, and see the chick safely grown, mated and producing viable offspring. Other chicks of her same breed are interesting--important too--but do not arouse in her the protective urge that her sister's chick does. They don't carry any thing NEAR the close DNA match that her sister's chick does--why waste time and resources on them, unless her sister's chick is safe? This explains why I adore my brother's chicks, I mean kids, but I'm not real crazy about my nephew-in-law. He's got NONE of my DNA--and he has my brother-in-law's snout.From Red I learned several things about relationships that I believe are based upon how deeply the Prime Directive is encoded into our biology, and I think that realizing how  engrained these behaviors are in our psyche can help us make better choices: to acknowledge the Directive and act according to it, or to lay it aside on occasion for another (higher?) purpose. Some of these lessons are:1) Attempt to make yourself appear healthy--acknowledge what the 'healthy' signals are to your species (and culture) and do what you can within reasonable bounds to accomodate those, so that you can attract the largest number of mates possible from which to choose the best mate for yourself. Red spent hours trying to smoothe over scars on her thighs for fear the male raptors would think she had "fallen" during hunting.2) Choose a mate that is not only healthy (refer to species-specific and culturally determined codes for assessing health),  but also exhibits character traits that assure him to be capable of a) engendering healthy offspring; b) hunting successfully with me (since raptors and humans hunt in pairs); c) protecting said offspring until they are old enough to pass on their (our) DNA themselves.3)Give him a good sniff at first meeting to make sure that he smells enough like your littermates to be LIKE you, but enough DIFFERENT from your littermates that he's not.... ewww... one of them.4) If a potential mate comes to do his Dance of Love and his nodding and bobbing just don't appeal to you... don't feel guilty about it. Move on. There's something amiss there. Soon there will be some suitor whose moves will thrill you right down to your tarsal claws, I mean toenails.5) Pay close attention to female relationships. They can provide very valuable assistance when your chicks need a hand across a raging, flooded stream, while you are stranded downstream.6) Once your chicks are able to find their own mates, and they're off making their OWN chicks... you have complied with the Prime Directive!! You are HOME FREE!! and now sex is for FUN! Find that mate and party hardy
Digital SLR Pro Sedrets. Great book on photography, has a lot of tips, ways to make simple equipment (that works well)...a great reference manual for anyone using a digital camera. Kind of like the "Joy of Photography" to us new digital owners
Great Book of Artic Warfare. The story is wonderfully told of how a German felt about fighting for his country and what it was like to fight in the Artic for the Waffen SS.  Read Seven Days in January: With the 6th SS-Mountain Division in Operation NORDWIND, it is a good compliment to this book
One of the best elementary /intermediate book. I used this book as a student and still use it for teaching.  Pieces are nice and students are challenged to think musically.  It moves quicker than some other method books; it covers materials from elementary to early intermediate.  Upon completion of the first grade book students can play standard repertoire in the early intermediate level.  Students must have completed early elementary level before using this book because this book starts with playing two hands in C position.  Emphasize phrasing from the first piece.  Highly recommended
excellent book. Good information on the subject especially for a newbie.  It offers some new ideas for the seasoned prof but don't expect too much.  May be lacking on intense analysis but I reccomend it for all
Fairy Review. My daughter, Rachel, loved these books.  They have cute pictures, imaginative descriptions and the whole set of books from Ruby to Violet are cute.
Unvarnished Truth. I am vain enough to think I have a finely tuned BS detector, and frankly, I think most self help psychobabble is just that; BS. Dr. Blanton however is not only brilliant, he is incredibly honest. I particularly liked the chapter where he admitted that he would like us all to read his book and admire his intelligence. We all have fantasies like that, but how many people can be that frank and honest about it? One of the few books I've read twice
Simply Delicious. This is one of the most wonderful books on chocolate that I have ever read and cooked with.  I had the opportunity to visit Recchiuti Confections when I was in San Francisco this spring and was thrilled when I saw this book -- Michael Recchiuti sharing his secrets to chocolate making and making wonderful chocolate desserts.  I have made several of the recipes already and they are all wonderful. The Gingerbread Cupcakes with a White Chocolate Lemon Topping is marvelous and the Rocky Recchiuti Brownies are the best I've ever made.  This book will make your holiday baking out of this world and the book makes a terrific gift for any food lover on your shopping list
Painting the Impressionist Landscape. Lois Griffel's "Painting the Impressionist Landscape" is very simply a must have for the library of anyone interested in using color to capture their surroundings in paint, anyone interested in bringing their work to a new level.  Of the many books on my shelf this is the one that I would not do without.  Lois Griffel has demystified a painting process, made it easy to understand and given us a way to practice it, the oft' dreaded block studies.  She has successfully fulfilled her stewardship of the Cape Cod School started by Charles Hawthorne and developed by Henry Hensche.  She is a great teacher who should be read and studied by anyone interested in color, especially painters both experienced and beginner alike.  Many of today's greatest painters studied with Hensche.  The rest of us can get a touch of the training here.  Great book!  Thank you Lois Griffel
Classic. This is a classic book, and series, that is always worth a tenth, eleventh, etc. read
This is a wonderful life-changing book. I love McCarthy's book.  His writing is enjoyable, which is how all writing should be. It was a pleasure to learn from this man.I recently started studying anything I could find about peace and this book was the second one I read after searching at the local library.I now have an idea how much literature there is out there about non-violence.  McCarthy has successfully urged me to keep reading about this subject.  Besides his occasional description of other sources, mentioned throughout his book, he even put a section at the end that lists additional authors and their titles, for further study.As a result of reading his book, I find that I would like to help in any way I can to make the world a better place through teaching non-violence.
a beloved memoir. James Herriot once again takes you on a magical journey through his whimsical hamlet of Yorkshire Dales, stealing your heart at every stop along the way. Anyone who picks up this book will be immediately captivated by the depth of love and respect for animals that embodies all of Herriot's books. Every character you meet, be it human or animal, will tug your heartstrings in a manner that you never expected from such a humble book whose clear honesty parallels that of the other books in an unforgettable series. You don't have to be an animal crazed lover like me to enjoy the simple joys of this book- it is definitely a cherished read, you won't regret it
"Wonder"ful. I stayed up late every night until I finished this.  Sensitive and completely engaging.  A historical novel that is riveting and relevant today
fabulous. As a professional humor writer, collaborator, author of more than 2 dozen books,  I just have to put up a defense for the writing quality of Baker's book.  Truly, in my opinion,  it is excellent!  In fact, I've pointed to this volume (among literary industry professionals) as a "go-to" example of what a good collaborator can do to make a potential "self-help-yawner" come alive.  The right balance of story, research, humor and information makes this one of the most enjoyable and readable books on the market on the subject and science of happiness.  I'm seldom provoked to write a review, but I feel these authors deserve a professional pat on the back for a job very well done.  I loved this book, have bought 3 copies thus far and given them away.  I'm on-line again today to buy another for a friend stuck in the blues...
The last two, actually. This is the first installment in a series that looks to have a long life ahead of it. The topic has been done in various ways before, including Pat Frank's 1940s "Mr. Adam": through some cataclysm, all men on earth are incapacitated or (as here) killed. All but one - Y, Yorick, bearer of the last Y chromosome on earth. Second to last, if you count his unaccountably live (and male) pet monkey.And we're off. It's a Mad Max world of social collapse. Fragments of the old order try to maintain some semblance of sanity, despite the roving cult/gangs that control parts of the landscape. And, like Mad Max, vehicles and fuel become critical trade goods. That's the setting in which Yorick, agent 355, and a cloning specialist set off - one step behind the answer, and one step ahead of the warlords and international hit squads chasing them. But what about the mysterious ring and amulet?This first book serves largely to set the scene, define the characters, and get the action started. And it's off to a good start. This has all the makings of a very enjoyable and long-lived adventure series, and I'm coming back for more.//wiredweir
An anthology of seven folktales steeped in Irish history. The collaborative effort of author Malachy Doyle and artist Niamh Sharkey, Tales From Old Ireland is an anthology of seven folktales steeped in Irish history, culture, and tradition. Illustrated with carefree whimsy, they weave myths and legends about ordinary humble folk as surely as remarkable heroes. A pronounciation guide for names and a list of sources for each tale rounds out this excellent and enthusiastically recommended anthology for young readers bridging the transition between picture books and novels.
Jonathan Livingston Seagull. This is a wonderful, concise read for those of us searching for meaning to this thing we call "life".  It's one of those books that you can read over and over again, and find new insights each time that you do
Beautiful book. This book is topical and beautfully illustrated. It is an excellent book to introduce children to the war in Iraq in a nonpolitical way and to break some stereotypes: I appreciated the strong but caring Muslim woman and the men who helped her. Adults will enjoy reading this book with their children, too, because of the good story and the wonderful drawings. (I am a child psychology professor)
Resonating and Relevant. Experiential Marketing strives to make its case that it's important to relate to customers on an emotional basis.  Given how much the decision-making process is linked to emotions and not just sheer logic, Schmitt makes a powerful argument that customers need to feel an emotional connection to the company they purchase from.  Schmitt does an excellent job of writing a fascinating piece that is sure to help take marketing into the next step.  It's as good as Guerilla PR: Wired, which explores how to use that same emotional connection via the Internet and other technological methods
Excellent photo reference. Another fine effort by Bouchery in the World War II genre. This particular work focuses on the equipment, clothing and personal items borne by British, Canadian and Free French paratroopers for the Normandy Invasion. Period photographs as well as staged images with period gear and clothing give the World War II military buff a great guide. Now I would like to have a similar work for the Market Garden operations that include the Polish paratroopers
This is a good manual, except . . . This is a very well written manual of jo exercises. The descriptions are easy to understand; and in a couple of places the author also shows the wrong way to do the lesson, so that the reader doesn't do that. The  quality of the photos is much better than some other manualsThis book focuses on the techniques, so all though the book tells a little bit of history, history is not the main issue. That might affect your decision to buy the book, either positively or negatively.My only complaint is directed at this class of book, and not really this book alone. I would like to see some of these books published with a spiral binding, like a technical manual, so that it can lay flat on a table. If I could read the advice while I'm trying to practice the lesson (while I have a jo in my hands, and I'm standing in chudan kumae) I would be happier
For Aspiring "Bark"itects. As a lifelong cat lover, I normally would not have glanced at this book, but my nephew, now a Jr. in high school, has chosen Architecture as his career. That, plus his love of dogs, caused me to have a look at the contents of this book as a possible fun gift for him. Glad I did! The imagination, the styling, the artistry, and of course, the LOVE that obviously went into the creation of this book, proved to be a great gift choice for my nephew. Even if there area no canines sharing your life, this would be a great coffee-table book to keep on display for friends and guests to enjoy
Graphic-Not a book for the easily horrified. This book was very informative.  I was fascinated by all the things that Hazelwood has encountered in his career.  This book is very graphic.
Worth reading. For newlyweds or those married for a number of years, this book has many gems of wisdom to offer.  My husband and I have been married for 28 years and read the book together and found it refreshing and helpful in some areas where we recognized chronic tension in our relationship.  The authors' overall assessments of a variety of relationships and wisdom for handling various issues that arise between committed couples is on target. It is worth reading and would make a good gift for weddings (or anniversaries!
The Last Miles. Well written and well researched book about the last years of Miles Davis.  Typically, critics and listeners have downplayed the music of Miles after his comeback in the early 1980's.  This book argues that the music of this period was of a high standard and should not be overlooked.One interesting note - friends and colleagues of Miles Davis have some drastically different views of his retirement years - 1975-1980
This book deserves much more attention than it has gotten. I read this book several years ago, having had no prior interest in the shroud, and found the presentation of how the image was made to be pretty reasonable and well-demonstrated.  I am moved now to write this review because I recently read Second Messiah, which criticizes this book and which postulates that the image is that of a real human laid on the shroud, which I think cannot be true because, among other reasons, the image of the long hair of the back of the head would not run straight down the figure's back as it actually appears on the shroud; instead, as the body was laid down, the hair would first dangle to the cloth and then, as the head lowered to the cloth, the hair would crumple underneath the head, as anyone with long hair knows happens if you lie down after a shower.  This book Turin Shroud describes a physical process involving a camera obscura and a primitive emulsion on the cloth, producing a photographic image.  I can't speak to the Leonardo theory or the Priory of Sion material they include, since I don't follow nor much care about such conjectures.  But that material even if wrong doesn't impeach the physical theory of image production.  As to motivation, it seems reasonable that someone would try to create such a religious object as Christ's shroud, in order to attract pilgrims and donations, and may have stumbled on the process to create this image.  There is another, long review on this site that goes into more detail -- I've read this review and I generally agree with its approach
About Mac. I like Robins ways of teaching, and her book is great. For me it is a bit confusing as I have to keek refering back to other sections. Otherwise great
Solid academic research reveals a real woman. How many books written for what could easily be a Phd. disertation can be enjoyed and discussed by several generations of women from teenagers to grandmothers?  Not many.  But this is one.  It was wonderful to sit  and  discuss this this well researched and documented work, Eleanor Roosevelt,  1884-1933 by Blanche Wiesen Cook. The footnotes took up a significant part  of the volumn, but were at the back of the book so one did not need to  interupt the flow of the storey unless it was desired.  How amazing it was  for me to learn about a woman who I vaguely remember only as a president's  wife and someone who wrote a column in one of my mother's favorite  magzines, Ladies Home Journal.  Growing up in the 60's why was not more  written about this remarkable woman who could have taught a generation of  women how to make it in a man's world.  While we stumbled around she had  already walked the path we vainly thought we were pioneering.  Yet we were  all kept in the dark about her.  Her storey was not taught to us in school,  although we  certainly all  knew avout Franlkin Roosevelt's struggle to  overcome his physical problems to become president.  Why only now are we  learning about Eleanor's role in that fight?  Eleanor had learned to  balance the needs of children, a philandering husband and the call she  heard to make the world a better place.  One might wonder why women were  not told her storey.  Could it be to keep us in our places; the kitchen ad  the bedroom and out of the boardroom? Who knows, with information like this  a generation of women might not have thought their only choices in careers  were teaching, nursing or airline stewardist?  How wonderful to read about  all the leading women of her time who faught for women's right to vote,  rights for minorities, fair and equal pay for both men and women along with  safe working conditions.  The role Eleanor Roosevelt played in world  politics and human rights issues should have assured her a few chapters in  the history books along with her peers, Elizabeth Cady Staton and Jane  Adams.  It is so exciting to learn more about all of these women, who could  have served as role models for young  women, had we been better informed  about them.  This is not a mistake that will go uncorrected in my circle of  friends.  This book will be read and discussed with our daughters, neices  and the daughters of our friends.  Thank you Ms. Cook, I can hardly wait to  get started on the sequel
This Book Will Blow Your Mind... I read this book quite awhile ago or was it just tomorrow? I am fascinated by all things that have to deal with time, the nature of reality, and God. I guess I could have worse hobbies. But things are not always what they seem to be. In truth, things are always much, much more than what they appear to be.I had an experience once where all of the sudden I was somewhere in my past. It wasn't like a memory...I was actually there and yet I was simultaneously conscious that I was also somewhere else in time and then I realized if I could be in the past as well as the present I wondered if I could also move into the "future" and lo and behold, I was there. And then before I knew it, I was back in what I knew to be my present reality.We cling to our beliefs of what we feel to be true of certain things and when those beliefs are threatened, we're threatened because we think we've been mislead or lied to when all that really took place is that we were given some incomplete information and that's okay, no need to get our knickers in a bunch, just go forth in this new now moment..the only time there REALLY is and accept, embrace, and embody the Truth that ALL things, including your "little" life is much bigger than you had previously realized.I remember that you already bought this book next week and you told me three weeks ago you really, really liked. All things are taking place in the now. All the possibilities of time and space converge upon a single point.This is a great book and a great find. Read it and blow your linear mind right out of the waters of pragmatism
Shocking, Emotional... Beautiful. 9 year old lily, witnessed the murder of her whole family. With no one place to go to Eve opened her home to the child to keep her safe and to find the assasins. As Eve get closer to finding the murderers she's put herself in grave danger.The story is amazing and has some shocking twist, it keep you guessing who the villans are. And brings you to almost tears as this innocent girl deal with the death of her family
Our Greatest Roadblocks and Tragedies are Often Caused by Our Misperceptions. Unfortunately, for too many students, literature is only as good as the professor who is teaching it. Some students of literature end up studying it on their own, for their own pursoses - with no time deadlines and no required 'number of words' essays. If you have never seen this play, I encourage you to read it and underline it at your own pace.  "Quality literature is not intended to be immutable Truth sent down from the mountain; rather, it is a conversation to be continued with future generations."In the beginning of the text of the play, each character is described. The playwright's description of the key role of Tom, the son, sets the stage for unavoidable tragedy. The playwright himself suggests the only solution to the social problems raised in the play is: "to escape from a trap he has to act without pity." This foregone preclusion is nonsense.The words of this play are beautifully and thoughtfully chosen. The play clearly displays tragedies of the female characters, who make their personal success dependent on executing a perfect traditional marriage - an objective the mother, the daughter, and the son are not likely to achieve any time soon - if ever. The play shows what often happens to people who frame their mental success or measure the quality of their soul on whether they can obtain and maintain an absolute, singular intimate relationship with only one other person. And as with many Tennessee Williams plays, the drama is not so much a result of defective people trying to succeed in healthy social environments and constructs; rather, the drama (the stuff that "the theater" was created to show) is created more when ordinary, complex & fragile people try to fit into narrow social molds that few people are likely to prosper in.Amanda, Laura, and Tom are worthy of lasting love. The tragedy is they have each defined love in different, seemingly small but devastating ways. And as a result, they have blinded themselves to their potential to love each other and find love in others. A tragedy in any relationship would be to be with someone who, for whatever "good" reasons, stops learning & adapting - they become someone from whom little new can be learned or expected. Tom senses those trends in his mother and sister and concludes that neither of them are capable of reconsideration. Thinking he cannot reason with either of them, he incorrectly assumes he is trapped. He knows of no method of education to change their mindsets, and he tragically abandons them, like his father before him.Tom says, "I didn't go to the moon, I went much further - for time is the longest distance between two places." And his abandonment, leaving them not only for a period of time, but more accurately for an indefinite and possibly never ending period of time is a level of insensitivity I doubt he fully conceives. Because as the playwright says, "His nature is not remorseless;" rather more likely he is lacking either the education and/or human experiences that would give him a better understanding of the harms his abandoment could cause. Leaving a poor mother and handicapped, hard to employ sister during the depression is not an act that (as the playwright himself incorrectly asserts) warrants him acting without pity. His mother and sister do not need pity. They need support, education, and a determined, dogged willingness to find new ideas, perceptions, and possible solutions.I have no problem with Tom going off and exploring the world, but he doesn't tell his mother or sister when or if he will ever return - a decision that is neither necessary nor healthy for him, his family, or the other people close to him. And I don't need to hear Tom at the end of the play trying to engender sympathy from the audience for his abandonment by saying he is still haunted by the plight of the sister he left behind. To quote the sentiment of a more recent great American playwright: "If He ever did come back, if He ever dared to show His face, or His Glyph or whatever in the Garden again . . . if after all this destruction, if after all the terrible days of this terrible century He returned to see . . . how much suffering His abandonment had created, if He did come back you should sue the bastard . . . Sue the bastard for walking out. How dare he. That's my only contribution to all this Theology."Tom go home. There is great discovery, challenge, and adventure in working to reconcile the irreconcilable differences in our roots - even if you are only partially successful. The road less traveled is often the more difficult one leading us back home
Excellent. There are two plots to this story:  Sylvia Compson's search for her mother's quilts, which Sylvia's sister had sold; and the story of Eleanor, Sylvia's mother.It needs to be remembered that the audience gets to learn about Eleanor, but Sylvia is not reading a journal by her mother, or in any way learning what we as the readers now know about her mother's life.  Some of it Sylvia is able to piece together in the book, but the majority of it, only we as the readers know.It gives us insight and understanding that Sylvia does not have. It also gave me more understanding of the rift between Sylvia and her sister Claudia.I think this was a very good writing device.  One thing I've noticed about Chiaverini's writing is that she is not afraid to introduce new characters, or change our opinions, even slightly, about existing and continuing characters.  She is not afraid to let some characters move on, as they would in real life.  For me, that is what makes these books so interesting, so valid and so real.  People move on.  People change careers, divorce, marry, move away, try new things, and sometimes stay in the same job and the same area.  It's life.  I think Chiaverini's books mirror life.The hunt for the quilts was painful in a way for me.  My own family has been searching for family quilts that disappeared during the funeral of my great-grandmother.  I think this is a very truthful portrayal of how disheartening it is, too, to work so hard on any needlework craft, including quilting, and those who don't appreciate or understand the enormous amount of time, patience, creativiity, and work that goes into it, just letting the dog lie on it, or giving it away, or selling it.  Yep, I've seen all of those in real life happen and it breaks the heart.  It also makes me decide nope, I am not giving that person any more of my needlework.  Too bad for them.The adult children of Andrew seemed like an accurate and possible portrayal to me.  I'm sorry to say it, but weddings and funerals bring out the worst at times in a saint.  I've seen people who are normally rational, kind-hearted, dear people go into anger and say and do things that are shocking.  You realize that you didn't really know that person after all.  For those who say the reaction of the adult children was not creditable, I can only say that for me, it sure was.  I've seen really decent, kind people who go to church and do the right things in life and are law-abiding citizens do and say some really crazy, out-of-character, nutty things when it comes to marriage or funerals or more to the point, who is getting what in a will. If you haven't experienced it, my bet is that someday, unfortunately, you'll find that you will.  "It'll never happen in MY family!" are famous last words.And that's what this book is, and what all of Chiaverini's books are for me:  honest.  Honesty doesn't mean a perfectly happy ending.  If it was perfectly happy, all of the quilts would never have been sold in the first place, or if they had been, all of them would have been found and in pristine condition.I really enjoyed this book.
Understand American intervention and its consequences. Certainly an interesting and powerfully argued examination of United States' policies of global intervention and their consequences.Certainly most Americans take for granted the necessity of our global outreach.  As stated by Professor Johnson, while taking for granted the presence of our military on the foreign soil of other sovereign nations, an American could not even imagine the intrusion upon our land by another military. While we Americans often do not even stop to ponder why we have troops in Japan, Germany, Italy, Indonesia, Saudi Arabia, etc.., Professor Johnson goes a step further to remind us that there are no "German, Indonesian, Russian, Greek, or Japanese troops on Italian soil."  This sets the backdrop for his text which shows that the U.S. in its role as the lone global superpower has involvement in many countries that leads to unintended and often deleterious consequences.(Reading this book I could not help but be reminded of the book "Imperial Hubris" by Anonymous/Michael Scheuer.)I personally do feel that Professor Johnson's arguments for reeling in American global intervention/imperialism are one sided and supported by the examples of "Blowback" or deleterious unintended consequences.  The contention can be made that the position of economic preeminence enjoyed by the U.S. today is precisely a result of its global intervention/imperialism.  With that thought in mind, I take the teaching points of this book in stride, to wonder if the U.S. would be able to maintain its position as the "indispensable nation" and perhaps even strengthen it, by demobilization in some areas.
The secondmost read book in Christendom. The Blessed Jacobus's compilation of the miraculous, &quot;Golden Legend&quot; carries you along as it brings you through the image-filled lives of the saints. Crowded, in a most woundrous fashion, with miracles, long martyrdoms, impossible but believable feats, quotable lines, long explanations of extreme intricacy, intriguing dialogue and a most enjoyable theme, it is enjoyable for those who read page after page and enjoy the long story, ending in triumph. It can also be accessible to those who enjoy anecdotes, except here they are pious. They begin the same way, usually--&quot;A friar minor...&quot; or such. It's hard to stop paging through i
Must-have for Cisco Security. As I am currently working on my Cisco Security Specialization (CSS) I have read all books related to CSS. Out of the four books this is definately one of the most valuable references when it comes to Cisco network security. This book is well-structured, referencing all the potential threats and countermeasures that exist to network security. I really praise the author for his clear explaination of  IPSec and PIX concepts. For those seeking to pass the MCNS 2.0 exam, this is a great reference and study guide. All necessary topics are covered, except the Cisco VPN Client, which has been added to the MCNS exam during version 2.0. Overall, a great book by a great author, a definite must-have for the future CSS1, CCIP/CCIE security specialists
The Best of its Type. Csapo's book is a must-read for anyone interested in myth theory, especially as it pertains to Greco-Roman myth.  Not only does he give detailed explanations of the theories he covers, but he also does a good job of explaining the cultural milieu from which each theory arose.  This cultural approach makes it easy for him to draw attention to some of the weaknesses of each theory (though he treats all of them with the appropriate respect).  My one warning would be that, while his style is pretty easy to follow, the book can be a bit dense at times, and might alienate those who don't already have a working knowledge of most of these theories.  So, while I wouldn't recommend this book for high school students looking to cut their teeth on myth theory (Alan Dundes' 'Sacred Narratives' or Fritz Graf's 'Greek Mythology' would be better for that), this book is a real treasure for more advanced students, and will even help those already acquainted with the ideas gain fresh perspectives on them
Simply Superb. This book cuts straight to the point without any nonsense inbetween.  It is a valuable resource for any teacher or parent, no matter what field.  Hightly recommended
Avoiding diabetes. Rebeccasreads highly recommends ATKINS DIABETES REVOLUTION for everyone who is a bit overweight & for their children who seem to be following in their footsteps.If you're new to the Atkins way of life, then this huge, reader-friendly manual will introduce you to another way of looking at that aphorism: You Are What You Eat.It is packed with a ton of information about lifestyles, scientific case studies, health programs & success stories as well as recipes & eating plans -- the rest is up to you.ATKINS DIABETES REVOLUTION is for getting the best out of the rest of your life
great!. wonderful for any reader interested in philosophy, ethics, and history of the USA. great
Eye-Opening Book for Those Interested in Place or Language. Though you may not immediately think that there is a connection between language and the places where you live and pass through, your sense of your surroundings and of language itself will be transformed after you read Gaston Bachelard's &quot;The Poetics of Space.&quot;  Bachelard argues that language--especially poetry--can reveal hidden aspects of our experience of space, especially of our home space.  For example, he considers how common phrases such as &quot;go up to the attic&quot; and &quot;go down to the basement&quot; are revelatory of our typical sense that stairs to an attic are stairs one ascends, while stairs to the basement are stairs one descends--in spite of the fact that both sets of stairs must be equally ascended and descended.  As he does with other such observations, Bachelard extends his observation regarding the directionality of different staircases into a discussion of how the attic and basement hold different roles in our daily and imaginary lives.  In addition to exploring how we experience space and place, Bachelard equally attends to the way in which language can function either as a daily and common means of communication or as a site of new and creative insight; roughly speaking, he argues that poetry happens when the motions of language itself open us up to a new way of seeing or understanding something.  By reading this beautifully written and engaging book, you will likely come to understand or see anew experiences from childhood through adulthood that pertain to places where your have lived, grown up, felt comfortable or alienated, had a feeling of wonder or fear, etc.  I recommend this book to anyone interested in the experience of place or space, in language and what it can reveal to us, or in what counts as poetry rather than as common everyday language
A classic self-improvement book. Anyone that has ever made a living in sales has heard of this book.  There is a reason why it's so well-known: it's damn good!  Frank Bettger, a former major league baseball player, details the numerous techniques -- habits, ways of thinking -- he discovered, on his own or from others, that elevated him from near drop out to top-producer in insurance sales and speaker on Dale Carnegie's circuit.  While the goal of the book is clearly to help others improve their sales skills, H.I.R.M.F.F.T.S.I.S. is also inspirational in that it demonstrates that you, with the help of others and drive/determination, can really improve yourself...in whatever you do.  Get good advice, follow it religiously and succeed; that's the underlying theme of the book.The book is well-written and interesting.  Younger readers will notice some turns of phrase or speech not commonly used today, but the book is still relevant."Sales" may mean different things to different people and there are certainly many facets to being a good salesman.  But it comes down to only a few things.  Most simply, sales is getting the customer to genuine like and trust you and be interested in what you have to say.  Most of the great information in H.I.R.M.F.F.T.S.I.S. relates to improving people skills. Even if you're not in sales, you could greatly improve your professional standing by reading and applying Bettger's principles and methods.  Put another way, it's a must-read for anyone that wants to improve how s/he relates to others
Most Overlooked Book of past 10 years. Reading this brilliant novel, I can't help but thinking what a shame it is the author remains largely unknown.  Part Fitzgerald/part Bukowski, Ames is a master of noticing 1st person male neuroses but and is as inventive with his characters and dialogue as any modern out there! Aone with a sense of humor needs to read this!!! Hysterically funny this is a book you'll read in one sitting, not because of simplistic style, but because it's that damn good!!! Oh, and you'll never look at a transexual the same way again
Excellent practical care for the horse owner. This little book packs a punch when it comes to explaining what tendon and ligament injuries are in the horse.  It covers everything from anatomy, diagnosis, and treatment of horse injuries.  One nice thing is that it also covers complementary medicine and also presents some nice case studies.  A great book
Excellent Book. A "must have", if you will, to those who are intrested in the history of the Black Panthers.  The articles written by several authors covers the whole range of things associated with the Panthers and provides insights and information that make this book essential to your education
This hits home for me as a KSU student. Yesterday I picked up this book at the Kent State bookstore as I finished out the semester.  I had seen this one before, and it looked good.  Even  though I haven't completely finished the book yet, I can say already that  it is something special.  Gordon presents many facts, interviews, and  testimonials that make you wonder if there really was a conspiracy at Kent  State.  I don't think it's false information that he's giving.  Alot of it  makes you wonder what happened.  At the beginning of the book however,  Gordon bad-mouths Kent State for not commemorating the 4 students that were  killed.  Yes, they did dedicate a memorial to the &quot;event&quot; of May  4th, but since being published in 1995, the university has dedicated a  number of memorials to the 4 students, including blocking off 4 parking  spaces where the students were shot.  All in all, this is an excellent  book
Meant to Be: Miraculous True Stories to Inspire a Lifetime o. One of the best books I have ever read. I was inspired, amazed, uplifted and brought to tears time and time again. I wanted to savor it but couldn't put it down. Each story was so amazing and unlike anything you will read  elsewhere. You won't be disappointed by purchasing this book. I've been  recommending it to everyone I know
Please re-publish!. We got this book out of the library and the baby is NUTS for it.  It's also a wonderfully affirming thing for his daddy.  Each page asks a question like &quot;Who lets me go riding?,&quot; then you pull down the  flap and the answer is &quot;Daddy.&quot;  Before you pull down the flap,  you see what the baby is imagining, such as the baby wearing a cowboy hat  and riding a horse; when you pull down the flap you see what is actually  happening, such as that the daddy is letting the baby ride on daddy's back.   I WISH WISH WISH they'd republish this book so I could buy a copy new
Documenting 80's self-indulgence. I started reading this book (through the library) when it originally came out in 1987 and I was hooked on it. Finally, i thought, an open book into the thoughts (through writtings) of some of the most prominent contemporary artists of the day. Now, (2000) I have finally acquired my own copy, and I am thoroughly enjoying it again. Do not expect literary masterpieces from this anthology. These are not 'authors' in the strict sense of the words, but mostly visual and multi-media artists who included writings in their opus. They are not manifestos or critical pieces (not a lot of great 'ideas' either), but just 'writings': as self-indulgent as the 80's post-modern art to which they belong. If you like the art from these artists, you will enjoy their writings
Green, but top of the line, Kitchens. What? Yet another book on kitchens? And what does GREEN mean in terms of a kitchen, certainly not the color?San Francisco based writer Jennifer Roberts has developed a philosophy that discusses the remodelling of a kitchen in terms of its impact on the world.Key to her philosophies are reuse, recycle, salvage, and when buying new avoiding old-growth or tropical woods, particleboard or plywood made with urea formaldehyde-based glues (that can out-gas bad things into your house). Green includes appliances that use less energy, less water, and cost little more (if any more) than un-green equipment.The book is a heavily illustrated study of several green kitchens that clearly illustrate that being green does not have a penalty in design, style or utility. Nor do they have to be cheaply made. Here are green kitchens with professional grade appliances
One of the Best Marketing Books I've Ever Read!. Brilliant! This book covers topics ranging from broad issues like strategy and product presentation, to the more "nuts and bolts" aspects of marketing. Roy Williams' makes a point simply and directly, and generally does a good job proving his points as makes them. I give this book very high marks for the information it contains, but I am also impressed by its "read-ability". Williams uses allogory and illustration with great skill, and often provides practical examples which make the information very easy to digest and retain. I also loved the 100 mini-chapter approach. I not only learned a great deal, but also had fun reading this book. After reading Wizard of Ads, I will most likely read anything Roy Williams writes in the future
Marvels, an engrossing study of a world with heroes. Marvels is one of the few books that examines the plausability of a  world in which superhumans are a reality.
Maze of deceit. Barbara Vine (a.k.a. Ruth Rendell) is back with yet another fascinating psychological portrait of what could be called the ultimate dysfunctional family. A young Swedish caretaker (Kersten,  pronounced "Shastin") is sent to work for the Cosway family, four unmarried daughters and a disturbed son who are ruled by the apathetic 80 year old Ida Cosway. They live in a rambling ivy covered mansion which features a mysterious maze inside a locked library. Kersten soon finds that the family members pretty much hate each other and their lives are governed by sexual jealousies, secrets and lies. Fascinating and compulsively readable, this is the author at her best. Vine knows how to provide just enough minimal information to hook the reader and a wry sense of humor pervades. For mystery and suspense fans who want more than just a whodunnit. Excellent
An enjoyable and education experience!. Having read and then re-read this book over the years I must confess my puzzlement at some reviewers who can't grasp the excitement of the story.  I won't bore you by repeating what has already been written about the plot but let me share what i found fascinating.The personal transformation of the book's protagonist, Ciff Stoll, is so compelling because he demonstrates that rare and most valuable tool in science - a mind willing to expand and grow.  Cliff, by his own admission is your typical left coast liberal with knee-jeck reactions to any government agency carries a three letter acronom.   Yet through his own investigation Cliff is led to discard some prior conclusions and even personal bias to embrace a new - as he puts it more mature understanding although he is still on the political left. He realizes he is - like every other adult- a stake holder in society and he has a real and very personal responsibility.So Cliff is drawn into a year of frustrating communication with these very agencies he would have once considered enemies of freedom.  In place of the utra-rightwing attitudes he discovered to his dismay somethng far more harmful for our nation , a miserable conglomeration of overlaping agencies all of which have no clear authority to act and further handicaped by congressional mandates that forbid domestic action and encourage and sometimes even forbid intra-agency communication. Anything shared with them is like dropping information into a black hole.  The will not even coordinate and instread just whatch him struggle even when they know more than he does which is a rarity.It is frustrating to read about let alone live though.  It is amazing that Stoll didn't just give up when met over and over with an unfeeling government that didn't really care and a system almost perfectly designed for failure, even though some individuals in the system were really wonderful, knowledgeable, and civic minded.Stoll's is the classic story of the underdog bucking the system and against all odds winning.  He is one of the most unlikely heros and yet you will grow to like him - a lot.  If every educator in this country could explain the complex as well as Doctor Stoll does, education would markedly improve.  He has a unique ability to speak at the level of his readers even though he is clearly capable of far more complex explainations.No matter what you knowledge of computers or lack thereof - this book is an enjoyable and education experience!
WOMEN with "real backbone", absolutely a terrific book!. If you like strong, brave women, the old American West, "quilts", and just want to be really proud to be female, this is the book. We have no right to complain about the switch on the microwave, or the too dark toast, etc., makes one feel quilty about the simplicities and pleasure of putting a quilt together today.  This book is a "can't put it down" read.  The pictures are well worth the cost of the book, THANK you Sandra Dallas
Novel Exceeded My Expectations. Here's a novel that many accuse of not being a novel at all, at being a polemic, a bunch of essays and diatribes, disguised as a novel. True perhaps but the craft and aristry of Coetzee is so exquisite that he pulls it off. Here's the situation: An aging writer Elizabeth Costello, award-winnning novelist and humanist and animal lover, is asked to lecture after winning her awards and she speaks on a variety of subjects--the role and responsibility of the novelist, the nature of evil, Christianity vs. Greek philosophy, the brutality of animals and an argument for vegetarianism, the nature of the third-world novel. Each subject is presented in a separate chapter in which Costello either lectures or argues with other intelligent people, so that you get, not just Costello's worldview, but a vigorous opposition.In this way, Costello's views don't go unchallenged. Also her views, especially comparing the slaughter of animals to the Holocaust, causes great controversy and animosity between her and the community. In another case, she accuses the novelist Paul West of exploiting Nazi evil in his graphic and indulgent portrayals of it resulting in the writing community to accuse her of cencorship. These contentious scenes give her arguments a context and a drama that essays wouldn't have provided.Vulnerable, fragile at times, not always prepared to answer her detractors, Elizabeth Costello is a very human advocate for her positions and never comes across as a bullying superhuman to mouthpiece Coetzee's philosophy. He's too subtle an artist for that.I think there is a place for a novel of ideas. Gulliver's Travels and Voltaire certainly were such novels and Elizabeth Costello is worthy of following their lead.
An important Book. This was one of the books that first showed many people the interrelationships between the Platonic and Archimedian solids.  Critchlow studied under Buckminster Fuller and many of Bucky's perceptions find their way in to these pages.  Not without a few small errors here and there but overall a groundbreaking book of its day and still an essential volume on the shelf of anyone who works structurally in 3-d.  Highly recommended
Complete Star Wars Trilogy Radio Dramas, WONDERFUL SHOWS!!!. How did Luke come to know Biggs? How did Leia get the Death Star plans? What happened to her in her cell after Darth Vader came in with the interrogation droid? How did Luke become a Commander? These questions, which have been asked by many fans, are answered in the original radio dramatizations of the Star Wars Trilogy. Since some readers may be considering the purchase of one of the dramas or possibly the whole set, I will endeavor to give details of all the dramas. Please note that this is an in-depth review of all three dramas and is therefore somewhat more lengthy than many reviews you will encounter. If you would prefer a shorter review please feel free to scroll to the next review. I will start with the original Star Wars drama from 1981...In 1981, the Star Wars radio drama was released. Many people were skeptical about the success of a completely sound-based Star Wars universe because Star Wars is a highly visual world that is based largely on visual special effects. They wondered how Star Wars could be experienced without the stunning special effects of the movies. Though the drama does lack visual effects, the sound effects from Ben Burtt and the wonderful score from John Williams provide a fabulous listening experience. Many of the characters from the movies have been replaced with substitutes. Mark Hamill takes on the role of Luke Skywalker and Anthony Daniels provides the voice of C-3PO. Although the substitutes take some getting used to, over all they make better representations of the characters than the movie actors do. Perry King provides a humorous Han Solo. Although his voice is gravelly, he seems to be the kind of guy who could be Han Solo. His wise mouth and humor enhance his image. Ann Sachs takes on the role of Princess Leia. Although she lacks the cold voice of Carrie Fisher, she displays more emotion. To illustrate my point, Carrie Fisher showed little audible horror when her planet and people were destroyed. Ann Sachs provides a more realistic outpouring of sorrow and grief as she screams and cries out as her planet is savagely blown into space dust. She also displays a great deal of emotion in the scene where Darth Vader is interrogating her in her cell. This scene was not in the movies. Though the scene is not for the squeamish, it does illustrate Vader's cruelty and utter lack of caring. His heartless mental attack and Leia's screams of anguish and pain serve to drive home the sheer evil of Darth Vader and the Empire. Brock Peters plays Darth Vader. Although he can not replace James Earl Jones, he has a deep booming voice that can turn from calm to anger in an instant. He also displays emotion more effectively than James Earl Jones. For example, in the freezing pit of Cloud City in The Empire Strikes Back, he expresses glee, anger, pleading, and pain. It is obvious from his increasing tone, pitch and volume that he is becoming angry with Luke. Mark Hamill is irreplaceable as Luke Skywalker. He is the perfect Luke. No one can be Luke, not even a substitute. His cockiness at the beginning of the play when he races Fixer turns to fear and anger as he meets Ben and finds that the Imperial troupes have slaughtered his aunt and uncle. He eventually gives way to despair as Ben is killed, but he soon is filled with elation as he destroys TIE Fighters as the Millennium Falcon attempts to escape from the Death Star. He and he only could be Luke. Bernard Behrens plays Ben Kenobi. He does a wonderful job, especially in the scene where he and Vader fight. Anthony Daniels and Anthony Daniels only could play C-3PO. He does a stupendous job of enhancing the personality of C-3PO in this drama. We find out how he and R2-D2 met and how their relationship came into being. Anthony Daniels as C-3PO and the electronic R2-D2 have a deeper friendship than is apparent in the movies. Their quarrels are often humorous. The special effects in the drama are absolutely staggering. Many of the sounds from the movies, and many more not found in the movies have been included. Despite the early time of its release, the original drama is in full surround sound. Unlike in the movies, the characters are also in full stereo. In the movies, the characters occupy the center channel while sounds occupy the side channels. However, in the radio dramas the characters, music and sound all are stereo. You can hear them moving in different directions. In the movies, it is apparent what they are doing by looking at them. With radio there is no visual. Therefore, there must be some way of letting the audience know what is going on. Since there is no narration besides that found in the beginning and end, the characters must let the audience know what is happening. In many radio plays, this can be quite annoying. However, Brian Daley has cunningly written the script to make the descriptions realistic. Here is an example. "Han, Storm trooper to your left!" Blast! "Aaargh!" Storm trooper falls. "Got em!" Although the drama is not perfect, I would highly recommend it due to its staggeringly advanced nature. I would expect something of this magnitude and nature to have been made nowadays. I can hardly imagine how such a monumental task was under taken without most of the computer and digitalized technology of today. Over all, it is a stupendous performance. It spans thirteen episodes, each approximately a half hour for an overall running time of six and a half hours.The Empire Strikes Back radio drama is another delight. The cast remains the same. Billy Dee Williams plays Lando just as he does in the movies. Paul Hecht plays the Emperor. He does a passable imitation of the emperor's voice, though it could be more sibilant. John Lithgow does a great job as Yoda. Although Frank Ozz is still the only true Yoda, John Lithgow's imitation is pretty good. This production features a huge number of sound effects not found in any of the movies. Those that are found in the movies have been used to their fullest extent. This drama, like the first, is also in full surround sound. The music, just like in the first, is absolutely stunning. Mark Hamill puts on another phenomenal performance of Luke Skywalker. When he is attacked, he screams in fright and pain. He coolly kills the wampa and escapes. He attempts to walk through a blizzard back to base. His performance there is wonderful as he strives to overcome hypothermia and the desire to lie down. He actually seems to be freezing and shaking with cold. His greatest achievement comes when he acts with Brock Peters in the scene on Cloud City. He meets Vader with cocky confidence. Vader overcomes him and eventually he lets out an agonized scream of pain as his hand is cut from his body. He seems to be in terrible pain as he learns that Vader is his father. He eventually falls onto a weather vane. His desperate cries for Ben and Leia are heart-wrenching. As always, the other members of the cast have made this play a distinct pleasure. There are a wide variety of new characters and actors. They all have done a wonderful job. Over all, I would highly recommend this dramatization as well, especially if it is combined with the first radio play. The show has ten episodes, each running for about a half hour for an overall running time of about five hours. It's a superb listening experience.The period after the Empire Strikes Back radio drama was a dark time for Public Radio. Due to circumstances not related to the plays mentioned here, funding of Public Radio was greatly lowered. No more dramas were produced for many years. Finally funds were increased in the nineties. HighBridge Audio released the first two dramas on tape and CD in 1993. Their great success led to the decision to finally make Return of the Jedi. The production team for the original dramas was brought together again and the actors who had starred in the previous dramas were called back to play in this new drama. Unfortunately, Mark Hamill does not play Luke and Billy Dee Williams does not play Lando, but substitutes have replaced them. The new Luke is more serious, but he still serves as a passable Luke. The new Lando also makes a passable imitation of Billy Dee Williams. As always, the music and sound effects are stunning again and in full surround sound. The performances of the actors are wonderful. Paul Hecht again plays the emperor. His voice, though lacking in the sibilant hiss of Ian McDiarmid does have a distinctly evil quality. John Lithgo's performance as Yoda however was a bit of a disappointment. Although he is great in The Empire Strikes Back, he sounds a great deal more human in Return of the Jedi. His death scene is moving though. There is one major flaw in this radio drama. The first two plays had ten to thirteen episodes, which allowed for a great deal of character and story expansion. However, Return of the Jedi only has six. Some of the scenes, such as the destruction of the shield generator, the Rebel fleet's jump into hyperspace, the crash of the Super Star Destroyer Executor and the bulk of the battles had to be abridged. This drama, although not as fulfilling as the previous two, is still a wonderful addition to the trilogy. It has six episodes, each about a half hour long with a total running time of three hours. I would most certainly recommend it for people who like swift entertainment instead of the slow but thorough plodding of the first two plays.To conclude, I think personally that all three of the above mentioned dramas are astounding. I would recommend purchasing them all. There is a boxed set with all three dramas available for sale. However, another option is the Limited Collector's edition, which features some extras, such as deleted scenes, promotional spots by many of the actors, music, interviews with the cast, and a section that features the Speeder Bike scene without music or sound so we can see how it sounds as it is performed by the actors in the studio. This set also features the "get well" card that was made for Brian Daley just after the last recording session of Return of the Jedi. Although this set is the most expensive, it is much more extensive and provides some interesting little tidbits not found in the regular editions. I would highly recommend any of these sets
Living Out Loud Review. I LOVE this book. It's filled with wonderful creative and inspiring ideas. I bought one for both of my sisters too!
A Must for the Jazz Drummer. I'm simply going to reinforce what you may have heard elsewhere: this is as good a foundational text on jazz and bop drumming as you can find (along with Ed Soph's and Jim Chapin's books).If you are interested in learning to PLAY jazz and bop on the drums, this book takes you from a level assuming some knowledge of the drum kit, little knowledge of jazz, and brings the two together in a very logical way.I have milked four years (so far, many more to go) out of this book with regards to the density, depth and entertainment/interest-level of the material
The hidden history of Christianity. Norman Cohn's history of the Zoroastrian idea is one of the most informative and useful studies of a complex subject available. The influence of Zorastrianism on the emergence of monotheism should be common  knowledge, yet seems to escape public attention in its exclusive focus on  the Judaeo-Christian tradition. Highly recommended for students of  religion, and/or of world history
A perfect learning tool. A compelling story of the development of mathematics.If students were taught from Osen's book, they would have greater appreciation and interest in this mportant subject.  Teachers, especially, couldn make the subject of mathematics considerably more interestin
A good start with several flaws. This is a good start.  In its sheer breadth of knowledge it covers a vast array of questions from pre-emptic strikes to the status of civilians and the question of responsibility.  WOnderful discussions on all aspects fo waging war from blockades, to the question of appeasement.  A very fascinating read with several minor flaws.THe first major flaw is the preoccupation of this book with western conflicts.  Major wars, with millions of dead, have been waged in this century alone that did not involve the west, for instance the Iran-Iraq war.  Little analysis in this study is given to the question of a non-western perespective on war and what it means for western nations confronting non-western ones, who live by completely different rules.THe second major flaw is the all to often obsession with treating terrorism without mentioning Islam.  In the chapter on terrorism and guerilla war their is a disproportionate focus on the IRA and the 'Stern Gang' which would make one assume that these organizations were disproportionatly good examples of terrorism.  The opposite is true.  Not one sentence, in fact not one word in this study deals with Islamic terrorism, which just happens to be the main confict in the world today.  THe question of 'just wars' was obviously aimed at the recent Iraq war, so why not deal with the question of Sept 11?  FLaws such as this point to an overreaching political correctness which takes away from this volumnes very heroic attempt to understand modern war.Seth J. Frantzma
Sylvia ...i love her. What can i say that everyone already knows...She lifts your spirit.  Even if some of you don't want to believe...it's ok...i do and that is all that counts.  She is a wonderful writer and i love her
Just when you think. Loves the books and characters and this series just kepps getting bette
Right on target. The gist of the book is to stay out of the arguments; let them work it out.  I have half heartedly done this before, but felt guilty for not trying to teach them how to work it out.  I no longer feel guilty and realize they can learn this on their own. Amazingly enough, they are learning and I am not being brought into 50 daily conversations of "He took my gameboy."  "But, he called me a baby."  "But, he made faces at me." And the conversation where every parent is up the creek continues...As for the language...yeah there is some vulgarity in the book.  It probably did not need to be there.  I would *not* not buy the book because of it.  Just skip on past it and latch on to the points of the book
Awesome!. This book contains a wealth of information about 165 essential oils. It is a wonderful reference guide for the begining as well as the experienced aromatherapist. Detailed information about each oil includes; botanical name, safety data, current &amp; historical uses, blending companions, method of extraction, uses for common ailmants, main chemical constituants, and photographs pf the plant. There are also narrative sections on the historiacal roots of aroatherapy,blending, perfumery, and an explination of chemical constituants. This book is concise, comprehensive , and gives information on more than just the most common oils
For lo! for this is a great book!. This is a great version King Arthur. It is wonderfully written and has magnificent illustrations. This is a must have for any fan of Howard Pyle's "The Merry Adventures of Robin Hood".If you haven't already read Pyle's Robin Hood, I highly suggest it. You may also consider "Ivanhoe".From the back:In these wonderfully illustrated tales, renowned storyteller Howard Pyle carries us back to the enchanting world of Arthur and his Round Table. The book chronicles the adventures of Arthur as he courts and wins the heart of Guinevere. Later he suffers from the treachery of the wicked Morgana le Fay and witnesses the tragic fate of Merlin the Magician. The legend comes alive in Pyle's classic retelling, the unsurpassed children's version of the Round Table tales. More powerful than any of Merlin's spells, THE STORY OF KING ARTHUR AND HIS KNIGHTS has enthralled and delighted generations of readers fascinated by chivalry, magic, and the unforgettable drama of medieval times
John O'Neill is a modern hero. I bought this book on sale at K-Mart, and it was definitely worth the few dimes I spent for it.  This book reads like a novel, fast and furious, not much down time.  If you don't know about John O'Neill, a true hero, or martyr in this case, then you need to read this book. Yes, O'Neill has his faults (don't we all!!), #1 -  he is definitely a ladies man and has three ladies plus an undivorced marriage on the string, and #2 - he becomes forgetful and loses things that almost cost him his job.  But hey, that's only two negatives compared to the positives this guy was made of.  His story is a compelling statement made against our current President and his predecessors that did not follow up on his predictions that Al Qaeda would strike again and again.  To top it off, he even predicted his own death in the Twin Towers the day before.  If you don't read this book, then you don't care how terrorists have us under their grip and won't let go.
A book which raises many questions....... What more can be said which already hasn't of this extraordinary book written by an extraordinary man of courage?  With 900+ reviews, I will not make this an overly elaborate review, as the book simply does not require it.  Elie Wiesel's story is one of one man's courage, will and fortitude to push on when all around him was lost; friends, family, belongings, even basic human dignity.What struck me more than anything else from his personal story was the retelling of the hanging of the three men (well, two men and one boy) while he was in one of the concentration camps.  Millions perished, but the way the boy who suffered during the hanging stayed with me.  His story is the story of millions who perished and who never got to tell their tale, and one of the few books I would call a must read.Different instances in the book I am quite sure will strike readers differently.  One of the things which struck me and stayed with me was how he kept on looking for God, even amidst the enormity man sometimes will carry out on his fellow man.  What also struck me was the woman on the train who was saw the flames at the camps even before they arrived.   And the times he scolded and questioned himself and his ethics for even thinking selfish thoughts even though he was dying.  I still think would I (could I?) do the same if I was in his terrible position?This book shows the worst of mankind, and sadly this terrible event known as the holocaust is not entirely unique in man's history since the freeing of Elie Wiesel.  We have witnessed Rwanda firsthand in the 1990's, and have been told by world authorities that "this will never happen again."  Yet in modern day Sudan(and North Korea, and Tibet.....), we see much of the same.....the world turning its back on millions of people.  There may not be furnaces involved, but the crime of complicity through inaction is little different than a world which allowed human beings to be fed into furnaces.  I guess the final question I come away asking from his book is "Will mankind ever learn?"
Please, read Arif H. Akhunzada's Review with caution!. I request customers and other visitors to read the article by Arif H. Akhunzada titled "Bacha Khan legacy is Questionable"  with caution because in Pakistan objective interpretation and description of history is mostly marred by the official stand on history enshrined in the so-called "Pakistan Ideology".Pakistan Ideology i.e. the Idea that sparked the struggle for Pakistan is a highly communal, theocratic, and Pan-Islamist  view of history that considers the people of the Subcontinent to be divided into two religious communities-Hindus and Muslims-with entirely different ways of life and very little in common to live in a single state or society. According to this ideology, the Idea of Pakistan was born when the first Arab Muslim invader i.e. Mohammad Bin Qasim invaded India (Sindh) and converted some of its inhabitants to Islam.This divisive and jingoistic philosophy very well serves the interests of the military bureaucracy that has been ruling Pakistan since inception and the allied religious and fudal classess.As Abdul Ghaffar Khan aka Bacha Khan espoused a non-communal approach to life in which the highest spiritual act and worship was the "service of humanity" irrespective of religious affiliation and practically upheld what he thought as the true purpose of life ( evident from his personal life and joint struggle with Hindus, Sikhs, etc. for freedom), he, therefore, is an anathema to Pakistani national elite. This elite, through a systematic campaign, has tried its best to malign Abdul Ghaffar Khan, mispresent him to the world and his own people i.e. Pashtuns, make him controversial, and permanently erase him from history and the memories of the successive generation of Pashtuns. These elite want Pashtun society to evolve the Taleban way.There is also another dimension to all this. The political, bureaucratic, economic, and intellectual elite of Pakistan predominently comes from two communities; Punjabis and Muhajirs. The other three communities of Pakistan i.e. Sindhis, Baluchis, and Pashtuns have only peripheral rule in Pakistan. The Punjabi-Muhajir elite wants to build a Pakistani nation based on Islam and Hindustani Muslim Culture. Therefore, any thing that gives these marginalized communities (i.e. Baluchis, Pashtuns, and Sindhis) a sense of identity, pride, self-esteem, and confidence is virtually unbearable for the Punjabi-Muhajir elite that dominate Pakistan.I will request the world not to forget Bacha Khan. The values and the view of life he upheld are eternal and humanistic. His legacy belongs to the entire humanity rather than a specific community. As a Pashtun, I believe that my people i.e. Pashtuns can achieve spiritual and material success only if they follow Bacha Khan's philosophy of non-voilence and peaceful struggle for personal and collective development. Unfortunately, initially British and later Pakistani state ruthlessly  suppressed his movement and philosophy. The politics of the Cold War, in which radical Islam and Jehad were used as counter to communism, also have its share in weakening Bacha Khan's "Khudayi Khidmatgar Movement".I will further request that readers should read anthropological studies on Pashtuns than relying on superficial views about them here and there.
An eye opener. From the beginning to the end, you are just kept impressed by the common-sense but refreshing view of marketing concepts.  I also liked the way Professor Kotler illustrated his views using various real-life examples practiced by many quality companies
Reflections on a golden studio. Although a little dated (originally written circa 1969) this is still one of the great inside stories about what goes on (or more precisely did go on) in the old Hollywood.  Written about the time that the old studio system finally collapsed, it collects some great anecdotes for film buffs.  Besides, it is well written
Concise but comprehensive. Concise but comprehensive might sound like a contradiction but I couldn't think of any other way to describe it. John Piper really introduced me to Jonathan Edwards, and between the two of them I would say that no other author has had as much of an impact upon me in the last few years as these two. Now Piper introduces us to Augustine, Luther, and Calvin also. This is the first book in a series of three and well worth the investment. I read it in my spare time in just 1 week, have the second book ready to go, but regret not purchasing the third at the same time. Piper's strength is not only in presenting one very compelling argument about the triumph of God's grace (or "Sovereign Joy"), but to do it by presenting numerous facets of the work of Augustine, Luther, and Calvin, which are easy to follow and understand, gives an excellent overview of their lives and ministries, and which leaves you wanting to (and feeling confident of being able to) read from the original sources. Every page was a gem. Be warned though, I got about 10 pages into the book then realised my mistake ... I should have read this book with a pencil and note pad in hand! There are so many great quotes from Augustine, Luther, and Calvin, not to mention Piper himself that you'll want to write some of them down to chew over later (or file away for sermon illustrations). This is an easy read and a great introduction the some major figures in church history, not to mention excellent food for the soul. In a day when people are so biblically illiterate as well as ignorant (or contemptible) of church history, this book demonstrates that our impoverishment is foolish and unnecessary. We need more books like this! I would have given it 6 stars if I could, simply on price, readability, and content alone
Country bumpkin alternate reality in North America. Imagine a North America where things in the early 1800's were different. How different? Imagine if the magic and folklore of the Native Americans had more influence on history. What if white man had a different relationship with the natives while they settled the West?This is the backdrop for The Seventh Son. Alvin is the seventh son of a seventh son...a magical thing, indeed. He is gifted in ways that bring him power but also to bring condescension and exclusion in his town. He finds that his "knacks" may be more than he thinks. He is discovering evils that he doesn't understand, but knows that he must build things in order to fight those evils that seek to tear down.One of my favorite things for an author to do, if they do it well, is to "accent" their dialogue with plain talk and bad back-country grammar and dialects. This really gives grittiness and realism to the story. The author's use of historical figures (George Washington, Ben Franklin, e.g.) is somewhat humorous in that they lived different lives that what we came to know in our history classes. The political geography is also different with similar names (Appalachee or Irrakwa) which give a hint of location or culture....but different.The underlying conflict, which I think is very interesting, is one which pits spreading Christianity, which most modern day Americans understand, against small magic, hexes and spirits. This is really the basis of the alternate reality that the author paints in this book.Since magic is technically a fantasy prop, I'd consider the Alvin Maker series to be fantasy in an early American setting. Hard core fantasy readers may not get into the small-time magic that the author presents in this book and series, but readers who like "What if", alternate reality stories will like this book. The characters are real, dirty and smelly. They work hard on the American frontier.Orson Scott Card is the author of the Alvin Maker series of which The Seventh Son is the first book. He has also other science fiction tales, such as the Ender series and the Earth series. He also has written a set of three romantic, speculative stories of three prominent "Women of Genesis", Sarah, Rebekah, and Rachel.
Just in the "Nick" of time. We were planning on giving this to my son for Christmas, however, the day before he came down with a bad cold and fever.  The book gave him something to laugh about and he enjoyed all of the fun pictures and rhyme
A must for all ESL/EFL teachers and trainers. In '91, I took the first addition to Nicaragua and left it there for the  new EFL teachers at the university where I worked. I have two copies--one  at home and  the other in the office. If the second edition is an  improvement then it should be on your desk if you are in the field and at  all interested in improving your teaching
Excellent Account and Audio Read. This review refers to "In The Heart Of The Sea" by Nathaniel Philbrick, Unabridged Audio edition, read by Scott BrickNathaniel Philbrick leaves no stone unturned in this very tragic and complex, but true account of the wreck and sinking of The Whaleship Essex. Rammed by a huge sperm whale, that from all accounts was a definite attack on the ship, the crew, men who lived and profited by the sea and were the slayers of whales for the precious oil provided, were now the victims as the hunted became the hunter. It is an incredible story of man's will to survive against all odds, that was the inspiration for Melville's "Moby Dick".Philbrick immediately draws you into, not only the lives of the Essex's crew members, but the entire town of Nantucket, from where the ship sailed,detailing the close-kint families, the women's roles and the daily life in Nantucket. Often revealing some very intimate details. The life on board a whaling ship, the hardships of the journey for both the crew and their families, and the journey itself through the vast ocean are all very much a part of this story.You will feel like you have gone back in time to 1820, and are there with them, as the whale attacks the ship, the men nearly frozen by horror and disbelief, and the beginning of a long, horrifying journey,a fight to stay alive under some of the worst conditions imaginable.For thousands of miles, and many months, I was constantly amazed at their ingenuity, and stamina  as they tried to find safety, food and water. Steering clear of islands they thought might be inhabited by cannibals, they later found they had to resort to that themselves. Questions still remain as to the actual circumstances that occurred.A handful of survivors left to tell the story, not all agreeing on some points, but enough so that this tragedy at sea and the men who lost their lives as well as those that survived may be remembered for their bravery. Philbrick delves into all the details, from the people involved, to procedures at sea, and even what became of the survivors through the years.The book is so well written, that it will grab you right away and won't let you go. Sometimes you have to keep in mind that this amazing tale is not an adventure novel.The reading of this audio book is excellent as well. Scott Brick sets the tone and captures the importance,the tragic events, and the emotions involved. This unabridged edition has 7 two-sided tapes, each one running about an hour and a half.Most of the second side of tape 6 and all of tape 7 is devoted to notes, journals and resources, which I found to be quite a big help in pointing out other books I may be interested in reading more about. I found the sound quality of this edition to be very good, with an occasional voice heard in the background(not sure if it was an echo or someone else speaking), that in no way interfered with the reading. Sometimes the reviews for all editions of a book are lumped together on the product page. If you are interested in this audio edition the ISBN, or ASIN(listed on the product details) is 0736655042.A book that will certainly get read again and again. Highly recommended read for anyone, but for those who love tales of the sea...an excellent account of a tragic story.
An Amazing Author not to be Underestimated. If you like short stories you should love Roald Dahl's "Tales of the Unexpected" I bought this book having already read some of his short stories years ago and read the entire book the next day because I just couldn't put it down. Every story end with a shocking and original twist.
This book fills a desparate need for reflective teachers. Mr. Lortie has written a study that cuts to the heart of the teaching profession.  He analyzes the overt and subliminal messages that teachers are bombaded with from the first day that they enter the profession.  I recommend this book to teachers and those interested in understanding the unique social structure that we call &quot;school&quot
A book with a relationship. I can remember the first time that I saw Silver Pigs it was in a school library around 8 years ago, it was not the story that truly interested me but rather the relationship between the two main characters and its supporting cast.  The plot is very good but the real meat of the book lies within the relationship between both the characters.  What is more gratifying is that it develops along with the series and their lives take a life of their own.  Lindsey Davis does a good job of mixing both the story and the characters within her books.  I didn't read it for its mystery but that should not deter anyone who wouldn't want to read it because the lack of it
Foreshadowing Tess. The Woodlanders is said to be one of Hardy's more descriptive novels and Hardy is also said to have a love for this part of the country. I thought this was a beautiful passage:"From the other window all she could see were more trees, jacketed with lichen and stockinged with moss. At their roots were stemless yellow fungi like lemons and apricots, and tall fungi with more stem than stool. Next were more trees close together, wrestling for existence, their branches disfigured with wounds resulting from their mutual rubbings and blows. It was the struggle between these neighbors that she had heard in the night. Beneath them were the rotting stumps of those of the group that had been vanquished long ago, rising from their mossy setting like decayed teeth from green gums. Farther on were other tufts of moss in islands divided by the shed leaves--variety upon variety, dark green and pale green; moss-like little fir-trees, like plush, like malachite stars, like nothing on earth except moss."And this description of Winterborne as a wood-god really stood out for me:"He rose upon her memory as the fruit-god and the wood-god in alternation; sometimes leafy, and smeared with green lichen, as she had seen him among the sappy boughs of the plantations; sometimes cider-stained, and with apple-pips in the hair of his arms, as she had met him on his return from cider-making in White Hart Vale, with his vats and presses beside him."It is said that Winterborne was a creation derived from Hardy's own father.The book also has the typical Hardy realism and tragedy based on innocence and wrong choices, the unfair position of women, mere chance, or should I say Chance, in keeping with the way Hardy uses it.  For me, somehow, the more descriptive nature of the book, while not that descriptive--Hardy is a realist not a romantic, gave the book a hazy, almost somnolent quality that almost distracted from the clarity and meaning of the book. Maybe it was Hardy's intention to have the woods form a kind of shadowy hold over the characters, the readers--there's the strange effect a single tree had on Winterborne's father, and another on Grace. But Hardy's description of the moors in Return of the Native had more power for me. Also, the characters seemed undeveloped to me, especially Grace, who was a main character. Marty seemed more real, though maybe that was intentional as the book ends with her, and poor Grace floated un-fixedly in the non-place between two classes.I love Hardy's novels and poetry otherwise I may have given it 3 stars. I just read it--it may be I need to ruminate on it for awhile.
A 'God' Who Learns to Forgive. This review is dedicated to my father. Along with "Midsummer Night's Dream" and "Macbeth," "The Tempest" was one of my father's favorite plays. This play begins with an unfortunate ship caught in a storm. In the next scene, we move from the ocean to a nearby island. There we learn that the tempest was not from natuaral causes, but from the magic of our hero Prospero. Prospero has a grudge against certain members of the ship. Prospero tells his daughter Miranda the story of his past. (Miranda must be in her late teens at least, but she often sounds a lot younger. Quite possibly due to the fact that she has lead such a sheltered life.) His brother Antonio usurped his dukedom and handed control over to King Alonso. Prospero and his daughter were banished, and the benevolent Gonzalo furnished Prospero with books he loved. Prospero has been called the greatest representation of Shakespeare himself. We may also note that while Prospero is the hero of this play, he does have one notable fault. He does enjoy playing God. One example is when his fairy servant Ariel begs the promised 'freedom of air.' Rather than asking politely for just a little extra time, (which is certainly not unheard of between friends), Prospero reminds Ariel that he rescued Ariel from imprisonment by Sycorax and he threatens Ariel with consequences if Ariel brings up the matter again before it is time. Moving on, we meet the deceased Sycorax's remaining son Caliban. Prospero tried to be nice to Caliban, but Caliban crossed the line by trying to rape his daughter Miranda. (Again, Prospero plays God. Rather than using his magic to destroy Caliban, he keeps him alive and makes Caliban perform services that he finds disagreeable. 'Disgrace is more painful than death.') We later meet Ferdinand. (The son of the King on the ship.) He sees Miranda and loves her. Prospero feels he can not let his daughter be won too easily, and like Caliban, Ferdinand is subjected to manual labor. Onto Act 2. The crew of the boat from 1.1 has survived and made it to the island.  Shakespeare uses an interesting technique here. Through Prospero's passages, we see the king as his enemy. But we are allowed generous sympathy for him when he is struck with sorrow over his missing son. And even Ariel (Prospero's loyal servant) thwarts an attempt by Anotnio and Sebastian to kill the king. Caliban then meets Stephano and Trinculo. The three become friends (through the comical use of some wine) and join together to defeat Prospero and take over the island. Onto Act 3. Ferdinand and Miranda express their love for each other, and Prospero (watching from an unseen location) is pleased. Anotnio and Sebastian make another plan to kill Alonso. At this point, we can infer that Ariel has warned Prospero of the Caliban/Stephano/Triculo conspiracy. But Prospero sees yet another chance to play God. Antonio, Sebastian, Alonso, and Gonzalo are starving. So Prospero and Ariel create an image of banquet long enough to tantalize them before they make it vanish. (Some people may find this funny, but it is somewhat below the belt, and it does prove my point that Prospero likes playing God.) Onto Act 4. Prospero shows his gentler side when he tells Ferdinand that he consents to the marriage of Miranda to him. (Like a reasonable father, he asks that Ferdinand 'wait' until the marriage is performed.) In a beautiful "Midsummer Night's Dream" nostalgia moment, there is a dance of fairies. One interesting thing we notice here is yet another reason why Miranda sounds a lot younger than she is. (She must be in her late teens. But as I said before, she sounds much younger. A little too sweet and innocent. Well, Prospero does NOT confide in her. Prospero DID not tell her of the conspiracy against him.  One reason may be that Prospero who likes playing God thought the attempt on his life was laughable. It may also be that Prospero realizes that the concept of a conspiracy against his life would be beyond the scope of this gentle and kind but too sheltered Miranda. Recall, Miranda was still an infant in exile.) Moving on, Prospero gives the famous and beautiful passage: 'Our revels now have ended.' It is tempting to believe that Shakespeare is getting ready to say farewell to his art seeing that "The Tempest" was his 2nd last play. Well, the joy of the moment is broken as Prospero realizes his enemies are still out there. In 5.1, Prospero gives yet another beautiful passage on his accomplishments. And with the help of Ariel, Prospero realizes that revenge is not a virtue. (Rather forgiveness is. Interesting that someone who enjoyed playing God finally realizes that forgiveness is the true merit of a God.) Well, Prospero reconciles with the King, Antonio, and Sebastian and forgives them. Soon afterwards Prospero informs the king that his son Ferdinand is safe and happily getting ready to marry Miranda. Even Caliban, Stephano, and Trinculo are forgiven. The play ends in utter happiness. Some people like to think that Prospero 'breaking his staff' is an indication that Shakespeare will write no more. But as Isaac Asimov said: "This is too sentimental...a compulsive writer like Shakespeare could not deliberately plan to give up writing while he was still capable of holding a pen." And in support of Isaac Asimov, Shakespeare did afterwards write "Henry VIII" as well as parts of "The Two Noble Kinsmen."
A Book to Push you Through it All. The Runner's Book of Daily Inspiration:A Year of Motivation, Revelation, and Instruction is most likely the best investment I have ever made.  Last year, I made a resoltion to myself to get in shape, eat healthy, and  basically be a fit person inside and out.  This is not a very easy  resolution to fulfill, as I soon found out.  It was my plan to run at least  3 times a week, and supplement it with another form of aerobic exercise.   Very quickly, I lost my motivation, and was not living up to my  expectations.  I came upon this book soon afterwards, and tried to regain  my motivation.  After restarting my exercise program along with reading  this book, I am now running every day of the week, rain or shine, hot or  cold, I run through it all, all due this very book.  If you buy one book in  your life, buy Catcher in the Rye.  But if you buy two, buy this one too
Sorry I Am Hooked. I admit at first that I love mysteries.  I especially enjoy mysteries where I care about the characters.  Finding a new series with a superb hero and a great writer is a treat.  It takes over your life.  Every Sunday I read the Times religiously.  But Booked to Die changed that.  I tried to read the Times but I kept thinking I should use my reading time to find out what is happening. So I had to read the Times a day late.  The only interruption I could handle was to watch the Yankees win their 4th straight against the hated Red Sox.  To make up for that I was up at 4 this morning to finish this wonderful book.I have always loved books but Cliff Janeway shows a whole new understanding of what that means.  The story is okay but the characters are what made me stayed glued to the book.I would like to write more but I am anxious to start the second book of the series which I have on my night table.  The Yankees won the fifth game this afternoon so I have nothing standing in my way.Dunning is just a terrific writer writing a terrific series.  I will write another review of the next one when I get it finished.
Finally, a book with some science. After shelves upon shelves of books, magazines, and essays have been written about the brain science behind our childrens' developement, we finally have a book that actually discusses the evidence rather than shaping it for a particular goal.  Mr. Bruer is not an advocacy group.  He's not a political action committee.  He has researched his book thoroughly, sourced it, and even interviewed the original scientists whose studies were horribly misinterpereted, misconstrued, or just plain misused.  If you listen to the media, there are mountains of data regarding the connections between your baby's environment, and his/her brain developement.  Mr. Bruer lets us hear from the scientists themselves that this is not true.  They tell us that what little scientific evidence we have regarding such connections is incomplete, and should not be extrapolated to any practical parenting curriculum.  In sum, we should raise our kids with common sense, love, and care.  What a comfort that such a time-honored notion should still prove true
The Conservative's Bible. Kirk's book is supposedly the bible of Conservatives. Not neo-conservatives, but Conservatives. He sets up the long standing debate between the French, and Voltaie, and the English, using Burke as it's spokesman Supposedly Kirk would limit the vote, have a professional class of government officials, reduce if not eliminate most taxes, and let each individual strive for success. This is the basic mantra of classical conservatives, and is all well and good as far as it goes, but only a few of the many ever succeed this way. One of the surprises is how young Kirk was when this book was written; it's as if he had some inspiration for on high (probably not), or was cherry picking history (probably closer to the truth).After reading this book I had a better understanding of where the Conservatives are coming from, althohgh I still don't understand why an obscure Royalist politician from the 18th century should be their flag bearer. Royality as a form of government most likely will never occcur in the US, although we seem to flirt with it from time to time.Conservatives seem not admit of a meritotocracy, as we currently have in the US: they would rather rely on accidents of birth, cronyism and college organizations to select administrators, rather than people who have succeeded in other venues. A very informative, albeit frightening, book.
The secrets of Wireless Hacking. An excellent resource both for the novice as well as for the advanced user of WLAN. If you work professionally with wireless LAN you should own this book
John Densmore's experience with The Doors. John Densmore is a musician involved in multiple projects.  He has also been involved in the theater.  But the like it or not, he will be forever remembered by millions of people as the drummer for The Doors, a rock band that had a 72-month run from 1965 to 1971.  In this book, he recounts those days."Riders on the Storm" is a combination of his first person recollection of the events and a letter to Jim Morrison the charismatic artistic leader of the Doors who died in Paris in 1971 from drug/alcohol abuse.  In this letter, the author pours out his feelings about those days, questioning Morrison's motivation and expressing the things he never did while the lead singer was alive.John Densmore, Ray Manzarek, and Robby Krieger, although competent musicians and talented songwriters, have always stood in the shadow of Jim Morrison. In fact, on the cover of this book, we find Densmore behind Morrison, peering over his shoulder.  The author tries to move of the background, asserting that he had a more important role in the band and several times that he is a superior drummer.Densmore give us little to indicate that he thinks very much of Manzarek.  We also see a bit about his maturation as a person - remember that these were four young men in their twenties, trying to figure things out with the extra distraction of fame, fortune and all that comes with it. He shares a lot about his relationship with his girlfriend, his philosophical growth and the conflicts of his lifestyle with his Catholic upbringing.We see the conflicting thoughts as he recalls the good old days of the Door's sometimes dark music and riotous concerts but bemoans its use in dark, riotous and violent movies - a'la Apocalypse Now.  The young Densmore put down materialism yet owned a home and a Jag.  We see how he and the remaining members of the band did not want to `sell out', yet continue to produce books, collections and videos.  Hey, everyone's got to make a living.  Morrison was spared from "selling out" by drinking himself to death - hence the mystique.This is not supposed to be a work of literature but one man's thoughts and feelings.  As such there will be conflicts, contradictions and emotion.  This is what make us human.  This is not written as an official history, but as a personal one.  As such, there will be discrepancies from other accounts.  If you add this to other accounts of those days, you will probably get a fairly accurate picture of how it really was.  Doors fans should pick this one up
The First of the "Meme Wars". John Barnes assembles a vision of the future in the best tradition of true science fiction visionaries.What happens if society decides to experiment on itself by altering the fundamental manner in which it raises its children, with the intent of producing vastly smarter and more responsible youngsters capable of entering the workforce at an earlier age with adult-like attitudes and skill sets that would make a modern college graduate green with envy?  What happens to the adults upon whom the responsibility falls to raise the children in such a manner?Whatever does happen, it had better work, because the Earth is failing rapidly as a result of ecological warfare on an unheard of scale, with the biosphere's state swinging first one way, then another.Mankind needs new crews to man the great interplanetary transports that are hoped will be able to ship enough people off Earth and enough food back to keep everything from the brink of collapse, and the only way to get enough competent crew, crew who are willing to spend their lives in space and want to stay there, indeed, have every reason to stay there, are to raise them there, so that is their home from the beginning.And how do you get a crew like that quicker than the 25 to 30 years a typical top-flight astronaut takes to develop?  You take a new system of learning that completely revolutionizes the education process.  The technical results are impressive, but the social results are interesting, to say the least.The characters of the novel are the children of the experiment, and a few adults.  For the most part, it is a coming of age story told anew, for it is a coming of age to adulthood far earlier than any children in history.  It is told with bright-eyed clarity and absolute precision.  The author tells of pre-adolescence from the point of view of those going through it.The technology, its assumptions, and the society built by the expediency of need, and its assumptions, all drive the combination of assertions that create the knitted whole that is Orbital Resonance.Those who are well-read enough to know of Alexi Panshin's book Rite of Passage (Nebula Award winner for best novel, 1969), will appreciate this book even more.Orbital Resonance was a Nebula Award nominee for best novel, 1992
Fabulous. This is the best book I have found for a general study of the of neural networks.  I found this particularly useful when looking at how to write my own NN frameworks.  The depth of the mathematics allowed me to easily answer questions like: 'what if I replaced function abc with xyz'.  I have found other texts failed to show key mathematical derivations, or to explore the subtleties of what the maths imply.The book covers a plethora of topics from simple gradient descent through second order techniques and conjugate gradient, through to the use of 'bayesian techniques' (basically confidence intervals on network outputs), monte carlo techniques etc.  Similarly error functions, non-linearities (sigmoids, softmax etc.) and data preparation are all treated.The extensive bibliography also provides excellent references for further study, (a whos who of the field, as well as actual titles).  My copy is now dog earred from frequent reading
PERFECT. This is a perfectly executed novel.  Not a word can be cut out or changed without ruining the story.  How writing used to be....  No, even in Waugh's day, this book stood out (I think) for being mannered yet anti-frilly.  Amazingly current and timeless.  Universal, eternal themes treated include the mixing and degeneration of cultures and civilizations, class consciousness, imperialism.  I'm glad it hasn't made into a movie (at least I don't think it has been).
Part Two- Highly Improbable. This highly improbable sequel to The Hithiker's Guide to the Galaxy is as enjoyable or maybe even more so than the first installment.  Like the first book, there are numerous characters that make the book hilarious-Hatblack Desiato- the rock star of the group, Disaster Area, whose music is so loud, it must be observed from distant planets.The Mutant Star Goat- the menacing creature who swallows planets.The Ruler of the Universe- like most of the book, he is not what would be expected.The Talking Meat- because it is better to eat an animal that wants to be eaten than an animal that doesn't, right?The Golgafrinchamians- the hairdressers and telephone cleaners, also our ancestors.The concept of time travel is introduced in this story, and the author makes a humorous grammatical observation about time travel- time tenses are confusing.  What tense would you use in English if you were describing something that was about to happen to you in the past before you avoided it by time-jumping forward two days in order to avoid it.  Tricky.  As a missionary struggling with the complex grammar of a foreign language- I found this chapter regarding grammar hilarious.Enjoy the book and don't hurt yourself laughing.
This is a must for any woman going through a crisis. I first heard of Alice Domar and the Harvard Mind-Body Institute's Infertility Program in an article which highlighted a research study that found that infertile women who underwent a relaxation program had a higher rate of pregnancy than a control group.  Living nowhere near Boston, I was very interested to discover that Dr. Domar had written a book.  The book is wonderful and I recommend it to people going through infertility all of the time.  I am not one to go for touchy-feely stuff, and this is not at all like that.  Rather, it is a down to earth, medically-based, normal, and intelligent approach to getting our lives together.  It is a very important companion to anyone undergoing infertility treatment
Entertaining. I found this book very entertaining. It is written very simply to satisfy a broad audience. The pictures are stunning. Mr. Attenbourough and his team have been able to show us animals I have never even heard of. I can hardly wait to get the DVD
The Design Resource for every designer. I was a student of Miss Reed's (1972-73), even have her hand written notes in my class notebook that I kept, and have always kept these notes close to me, they included everything that she wrote on the blackboard at Pratt Studio. This book will become the the most valuable guide and should be in the library of every designer. So glad to see this book happened, to share some of her teachings. The first thing that I have written in my class journal:&quot; Structural principles parallel visual analysis can create an aesthetic disipline.&quot; the next line is &quot;I don't like to go around saying that gray haired men were my students, but they were..&quot;(former student, now GM executive dropping by her class to say hello) then back to her lecture, basic relationships: volume,plane,line,value,texture,color,space. This book covers these topics
Inspiring. It will transform your therapy practice. Milne,a 3rd generation Scottish osteopath, has the celtic gift of healing through word and touch. He shares the long multi-cultural history, precise techniques and profound implications of cranial work with quiet passion and  reverence. His approach is an extraordinary blend of clinical expertise and  spiritual authenticity. A must for any therapist using this approach
Not what I expected. I expected yet another basic how-to with lots of step-by-step instructions and writing exercises. None of that is in there, but I read it anyway, and this book is GREAT. The style is conversational and direct.One of the best pieces of advice I found was the chapter on 10 ways to fail as a writer, such as "Keep a journal." Instead the author advocates "Save your creative energies for paying work." Having read journaling books, I can see the author's point: if I only have an hour in a day to write, should I journal or work on my novel? Which one has the potential to result in a check?Another one: "Write screenplays instead of novels." The author again makes an excellent point that writing a novel takes as much time as polishing a screenplay, and is comparitively easier to sell. So why not write the novel and be paid millions so someone *else* can write the screenplay?There's also some debunking about leading chapters with hooks and ending them with cliffhangers.This book is full of very practical, real-world advice. For beginning writers, though, I'd suggest a basic introductory book on the elements of novel-writing. If you've a bit more experience and are ready to really roll up your sleeves and produce, this book is definitely for you
A Tribute, Not a Review. I studied with Robert Lowell at Harvard in 1963 & 1964. I wouldn't presume to review his Collected Poems, only to testify that he was a giant of a human -- witty, sensitive even toward brash young would-be poets, immensely knowledgeable, immensely conscientious. Having known him remains one of the great privileges of my life. Reading his poems is a great privilege for all of us
Oh how I know you Miss Julia.... I do believe all of us know a Miss Julia, and Ann B. Ross writes her so well.  I have read all of Her Miss Julia books, and laughed and cryed my way through it.  If you want a fun read Miss Julia is the way to go
The Full Sum of the Man, His Work and His Times. With this volume, Richard Ellmann elevates Oscar Wilde into the select circle of Ireland's other literary giants of whom he wrote so eloquently:  William Butler Yeats and James Joyce.  (It was left to Michael Holroyd to  give George Bernard Shaw his due.)  While this volume is a sophisticated,  wide-ranging, scholarly biography, it also brims with Wilde's wit and bold  life, which, as Oscar himself pointed out, was where his genius lay.  The  slow, steady accumulation of detail, allusion and anecdote pays off as  Wilde reaches his pinnacle--the original production of &quot;The Importance  of Being Earnest&quot;--only to plunge into the abyss of imprisonment.  As  Wilde tempts fate with rough trade dalliances and his ill-conceived  challenge to the Marquess of Queensbury, you find yourself almost shouting  out for him to stop and save himself.  But he doesn't,  because Ellmann  makes us understand that Wilde's nature led him to that point.  The end is  sad, but his wit never deserts him, right up until his death throes when he  notes that either the wallpaper in the room must go or he must--which he  does shortly thereafter.  Today, qualities that Wilde pioneered are a part  of modern life:  camp humor, scathing put-downs, an emphasis on style, an  obsession with appearances.  In Wilde's day, he was an almost solitary  figure in that regard, leading the way into the modern world.  The  witticisms of &quot;The Importance of Being Earnest&quot; are as humorous  and apt today as the day they were first spoken in London in 1895.  Richard  Ellmann helps us understand why
Great Book, a fast read. I am a big fan of the Luca Davenport character, but even with out Lucas, this book had me from the first page until the end. I read it in one night. I highly recommend it
A must read. For a long time I've felt that this book should be required reading for every American high school student.  The book details the campaigns of the U.S. Marines in the Pacific war.  It neither villifies the Japanese nor glorifies the Marines.  The author merely presents the events in a relatively objective manner but in such a compelling way that if it doesn't grip your heart and bring tears to your eyes at times, then you're just not human.Wheeler presents the events of the campaigns.  He shows both the mistakes and the heroism.  He presents the facts as they affected the man in the trenches, not as they appeared to the generals and the admirals.This book is very inspiring.  The men he talks about were real people: rich men, working men, poor men.  They were all men who had nothing to gain and everything to lose.  Some came back home, and some didn't.   It challenged me personally but I can't quite explain it without sounding trite. You just have to read the book.Every American should read this book
Well-written, easy to understand, interesting. Terrific book for anyone interested in not only propaganda and its history, but public relations, marketing, advertising, et
I love this book because this book inspires me to know about the african american drama. A raisin in the sun is a good book for people to read, because you can learn more about African American drama, but this book not only talk about African America it also relates about class society, and it talk about different type of racism.This play is about a group of character that want get out of a little apartment. Mama is a really good character, she adjusted to many things in life and overcome many more, and her face. Mama get ten thousands dollars check from a companies for her husbands death she want to use this to pay schools for her daughter, but mama's son name Walter want to set up a store liquor with his friends. Everybody in the family want to spend their money in different way, and the rest of the family anticipate of using Mama money for themselves. Another character that I like is Beneatha because she was talking to Asaigai like he never understand between men and woman there is more than one feelings can exits. I also like Asaigai because he is proud his African roots and is proud of the color differences.The Character that I like especially is mama because she is strongest person in the Whole play, and she is the best.I think with out no mama the play would not be interesting, Mama give the play life I learned a lot of stuff about life from reading it. I would suggest more people to read this book.
SF criticism strikes again... and hits. A wonderful compilation of essays edited by James Gunn and Matthew Candelaria. Some are out of print or hard to find canonical articles, such as 2 chapters from Darko Suvin's _Metamorphoses of Science Fiction_, other from Robert Scholes' _Structural Fabulation_, Alexei and Cory Panshin's Science Fiction and the Dimension of Myth, or even David Ketterer's The Apocalyptic Imagination.... Others are more recent or even written for the occasion, as is the case of Gary K. Wolfe's Coming to Terms, on the almost impossible task to define the genre.It is a wide ranging and impartial collection (it is very hard to find Suvin and the Panshins side by side on other compilations), which is a must if you have a theoretical interest on this literary genre (particularly teachers on any level), but also recommended for everyone who just reads SF for pleasure and wants to know a little more on its history and significance.Will The Scarecrow Press and the editors be willing to have it on mass market paperback, thus reaching a wider audience
BOOKREPORTER.COM REVIEW. It's impossible not to fall for the winningly eccentric cast of characters in Laura Pedersen's laugh-out-loud sequel to her acclaimed novel BEGINNER'S LUCK. Pedersen reunites 17-year-old card-shark Hallie Palmer with the zany Stockton clan, including cause-obsessed sixty-something radical Olivia and her flamboyant son Bernard, whose unparalleled passion for antiques, old musicals and theme dinners makes for never a dull (or hungry) moment in the household. Add in a highly unusual pet --- Rocky, the alcoholic chimpanzee --- and hilarity ensues around nearly every corner. But underneath its witty repartee and humorous goings-on, this novel poses more serious questions of the heart that everyone can relate to, namely: "What does your heart desire?" and "How do you know when someone is 'the one'"?If Hallie had the answers, she'd feel a lot more content as her first year away at college comes to an end and she finds herself more mixed up about love (and lust) than ever, despite her numerous string of short-lived boyfriends. In addition to her romantic woes and raging hormones, she also suffers from financial worries and must somehow find a way to come up with next year's tuition or be forced to drop out. With her parents cash-strapped from raising seven other kids and her previous high-yielding pursuits of horse betting and casino games ruled out now that she's gone straight, she accepts a summer job back in her hometown doing yard work at the Stocktons.In spite of their eccentricities, they were the ones who had taken her in two years earlier and managed to reform her status as the town miscreant, a title she'd rightly garnered after dropping out of high school, running away from home and having several brushes with the law. Now, however, it's time for Hallie to return the favor by helping Bernard Stockton cope with his depression over the break-up of his twelve-year relationship with Gil, who had left him and started dating a woman. For once, Bernard doesn't have a Bette Davis quote or a blueberry blintz recipe in his arsenal that can bring back his usual good spirits and high humor.And in another mark of just how much she'd matured since leaving for school, Hallie is approached by her frazzled mother (pregnant again, this time with twins) for help in trying to get her hard-partying younger sister back on track during a streak of adolescent rebellion. For the first time, Hallie glimpses the pressures and responsibilities that come with being an adult, and despite her shock at being on the giving, rather than receiving, end of advice, she rises to the challenge with typical aplomb.While excelling at helping others with their troubles, Hallie falters when it comes to making sense of her own romantic life, and a new love interest combined with an ongoing attraction to her old high school flame doesn't help matters. Meanwhile, Bernard's decision to adopt a Chinese baby proves to be just what he needs to bring back his feisty show-tune singing, theme-party hosting ways of old. Convinced there's no obstacle that a good redecorating project can't overcome, he throws himself with new vigor into revamping the house and gardens to win over the adoption agency.By summer's end, several surprising turns of events have transpired for both Hallie and the Stocktons as they come to mutually discover that love can arrive in unsuspecting ways and patience pays off in spades because "Your heart's desire may actually be an as-yet-undealt card." With its appealingly honest protagonist, clever dialogue peppered with hilarious one-liners, and buoyant combination of charm and feistiness, HEART'S DESIRE demonstrates the importance of friendship in deciphering matters of the heart.--- (...
Confused? Get this book!. There are varying differences between men and women and Mr. Gray takes his time in this book to explain what they are. What I got from it was a new perspective, a new way to understanding what needs to be understood--how to interact with the opposite sex. What's most important is to take the time to actually listen without formualing what you're going to say next. I can see why this book is so popular now. Along with this one, I also recommend "Man Magnet.
Excellent resource. This book is an excellent resource for anyone studying terrorism.   I used it as part of a bibliography for my final Army War College paper.  Though the paper was about National Missile Defense, I found an incredible amount of data I could use.  It is sober, insightful, and easy to read....unlike many books on the same topic.  I have loaned my copy to other Army officers as a primer for curent events.  Hope I get it back
Very Helpfull. Even on my poor english this book is very helpfull and the author is one of the best designers i ever heard about
refactoring. a good and clear book for improving your code in small steps. a lot of (not language specific) good examples.
My First J. D. Robb. I have enjoyed Nora Robert's books for a long time and this is my first experience with J. D. Robb.  I thoroughly enjoyed this book.  I love the relationships Eve Dallas has, especially with Roarke.  Her inner battle with her past makes her more human.  Her pain is evident. On a lighter note, I especially loved the section where she and Roarke are talking about being coaches to their friend who is having a baby.  I read it to  my husband and we laughed.  This is a mystery after all but having a section like that in the book was refreshing.  I look forward to reading more J. D. Robb.  Peace Always
One of two books all electrical engineers should own. Trouble shooting analog circuits gives tips on trouble shooting along with extensive analog quirks in common components.  If you didn't know that cermet pots are better, there is a danger in using too many ceramic bypass caps and the capacitance of the human finger nail then you NEED this book. P.S. The other book is the art of electronics by Horowitz and Hill
Not for everybody. Nikki Giovanni as a credit to American poetry but one has to realize that what she write is for everybody.To compare her to somebody less controversial like Maya Angelou for example is not unthinkable. She has never written along those lines and at this stage of her life she never will. The beauty in her poetry comes in her raw honesty. Giovanni isn't writing for a particular audience, she isn't reaching out to be the next poet speaking at a presidential convention, she is speaking from her heart. Her experiences are not those of many people, both white and black, so many people can not relate. However for those that can, Nikki Giovanni is more than a writer, she is an American treasure
Learn how to debug Linux code at both kernel and application levels. Learn how to debug Linux code at both kernel and application levels through a hands-on tutorial which covers all kinds of performance optimization issues. From cache misses and memory management issues to network performance and dump analysis from crashes, Linux Debugging And Performance Tuning Tips And Techniques is packed with real-world examples, with screen shots and code lists helping explain debugging logic and procedures. Highly recommended for any Linux systems administrator involved in debugging processes.
Evoluting and Grahamesque. After reading and re-reading this collection, the first thought that crossed my mind was, &quot;I want something magnificent to happen to me today!&quot;  I felt myself dissolving from today and re-emerging into a mythical tomorrow, where words and phrases would be coins of the realm.  Graham is the owner magic; spellbinding and lucid and yet swirling together the elements of The Actual and The Figurative; hybrids of each other, till the eventuality of their meanings and intents just simply trade places!  Graham's poems are the unravelling of mystery that , in the end, remain more mysterious than ever.  And to live, there must always be mystery, lest our lives lose their meanings. I was not the same when I set the book down
Our children are so much nicer to each other. When I read the chapter about predictable and preventable sibling conflicts, the author wrote as if he had placed a camera in our home. So many of the situations were familiar to me. This book is an easy read for a  busy mom, and the suggestions have been right on target
Planning, not just plans. Unlike most business plan guides that focus on producing an impressive document, this book actually helped me plan to run a company. It anticipates and explains virtually every potential pitfall for a company-builder. The book transforms the business planning process into something that you can and should use every day. It touches all aspects of analyzing your business and deciding where to go next. I highly recommend it
Wonderful recipes and a great resource. This is a wonderful cook book, even after pregnancy.  The recipes are some of my husband and toddler's favorites - we particulary love the flank steak with salsa verde, bbq chicken, and goat cheese and tomato pasta salad.  I refer to the book frequently - there is so much great information in here.  Many of the recipes are great for entertaining - easy, wonderfully tasty, and special
Great!. The anthology is well put together and samples many influencial poets while providing indepth biographical resources and essays.
Excellent Book!. This turned out to be an excellent book! The main character in this bookis John Wells.He is a CIA agent who has sucessfully infiltrated al-Qaeda.He is a soldier in bin-Laden's Army in Afghanistan.He has even done combatduty with al-Qaeda in Chechnya against the Russians.He has seen duty inAfghanistan after 9-11.There is still suspicion of his true motives afterhe failed to alert the CIA handlers of the 9-11 attacks.His case handlerJennifer Exley is the only CIA official who does not question his trueloyalty to the United States.The rest of the CIA group has no trust inWells what so ever.Osama bin-Laden's assistant,Ayman al-Zawahiri assigns Wells to carry outa mission in the United States.He shaves off his beard and gets a haircutand teturns to America still not knowing what his mission will be.Once inAmerica he is turned over to Omar Khadri.He also manages to contact hisCIA handlers.After al-Qaeda attacks in Los Angeles and New York suspicionsof Wells mount on both sides.Wells discovers another attack on American soil is about to occur again.The magnitude of the attacks are frightening.It falls on Wells to stop theattacks.This makes for an exciting conclusion of the story.Read this book.You will find it to be very entertaining
Emotive peek of life in Haiti and Haitians in the US!,. Krik! Krak! Edwidge Dandicat's second stroke of genius (the first being Breath, Eyes, Memory), takes readers through the terrors and triumphs of Haitian life with nine short stories. In Haitian folklore, storytellers say Krik! to alert listeners that a story is about to be told. Krak! is the response of listeners alerting the storyteller that they want a good tale told.Dandicat not only captures the essence of Haiti, but the deeper levels of the human spirit with her trademark lyrical prose. A doomed refugee adrift on a cruel sea, a knowing prostitute and a frustrated father battling with the truth of his own dismal future are among the most memorable characters. Reading Danticat's splendid collection of stories gives you access to a world of people and places that you will grow to love. With tragic characters, subtle images of beauty and hope, and gestures that are never overdone.Danticat's writing accomplishes the greatest task of any short story writer; she lets you empathize with her characters and walk around in their shoes. These stories are good for the heart. In a time when book stores' shelves groan beneath the weight of "girlfriend fiction," Dandicat's work is a refreshing reminder that good literature is not dead!
Exceptional: History and Horsemanship. This is one of the books that I actually took to college with me due to its unusual author. Xenophon wrote this work from the his viewpoint of a cavalry commander several thousand years ago. Even though the work is literally dated his knowledge has never ceased to be of interest to modern riders. Perhaps the first novel ever written on horsemanship it includes training troops, choosing horses, and putting on army displays. Although not the best choice for a person who desires a book to teach them to ride, this book will be a delight for any horseperson desiring to learn about ancient cavalry practices and the origins of the horse in military settings
One of my very favorite children's books. Oh how I wanted to be Elizabeth Ann when I was little and first read this book!  First of all, I thought that Elizabeth Ann was far and away the most beautiful name I had ever heard in my entire life.  And I definately identified with the dull suburban upbringing, though perhaps my parents weren't quite so hypochondriatic.  How I wished that some distant relatives with a farm would suddenly appear, and take me away so that I could eat maple sugar candy and learn how to churn butter and rescue kittens and go to a one room school house!Twenty years after I first discovered this book, it is still one of my favorites.  Written by a leading advocate for Montessori-style teaching, this book empahises the importantes of self-reliance and self-teaching.  Although I recognize the moralizing, now that I'm a grown-up, I never felt it when I was a kid and simply delighted in reading (over and over and over again) about the adventures of Betsy and her eccentric Vermont relatives
Without Consent or Contract by Fogel. This is an excellent work on the impact of slavery in the Americas.Between 1600-1800, the New World slaves numbered under 1/5 of thepopulation in the Western Hemisphere. Before the AmericanRevolution, sugar was approximately 1/5 of English imports andslaves produced commodities in England at about 30% . Sugarplantations had a sugar factory with 20% slave labor. The workersground the sugar between rollers to extract juice. The juicewas filtered to remove impurities. Curing sugar involveddripping molasses and a distillation process leading to rum.In Cuba, railroad production was encouraged to serve the growingsugar industry. The process of converting peasants to industriallaborers was difficult due to the extreme resistance.In the 20s and 30s, Stalin complained about resistance ofRussian muzhiks to the demands of modern assembly lines.Andrew Ure, the apostle of the factory system, noted that it wasnearly impossible to convert persons past puberty to becomeuseful factory hands. This was due to the behavioral unwillingness to be dehumanized. The absence of sugar productionin the USA meant fewer slaves proportionately than in theCaribbean. Cotton was not a major crop until the 19th century.Between 1800-1860, there was a westward movement of cotton andslaves. The Civil War achieved continued struggle of poor blacksand whites and an improved economy. The contents of this bookwould be an important contribution to American and World Historytexts
A Life Worth Living, A Life You Can Have. There are how-to books on breaking into the art world, then there's Paul Dorrell's 'Living the Artist's Life.' In an inviting colloquial style, Dorrell offers both practical advice on 'getting yourself out there' and provides an almost unimaginable personal testament to the unbeatable blend of heart and perseverance. He has a perspective as the prospective exhibitor that is no less empathetic toward the aspiring artist. This reader could taste - from Dorrell's own travails as an aspiring (and successful) author and gallery owner - that he WANTS us to succeed! As an artist, prepare yourself for a welcome challenge . . . and an indelible change through this book.
AWESOME BOOK!. One of the best feline books I have ever read! Gives a lot of insite into the Feline behavior, , and social structure. I have YEARS of animal experience and I walked away with a lot of new knowledge from this book. Definatly a must have or must read for any multi cats household!!!
For Former High School Players. If you have ever played high school football under the lights, you will enjoy this book.  When I started the book I realized it was very slow in the beginning and began to expect a below average book, but I kept reading and it turned out to be great! The end is very exciting and emotional for all former football players.  I highly recommend this book
Ten Apples. This is an excellent beginning reader. It provides practicing counting and even though it follows a predictable sequence, it is fun to see what will happen next.
Wing to Wing, Oar to Oar. &gt; This anthology on Courting and  Marrying was very interesting and bolstering of  many things I knew to be right and good.   The authors say that all the selections are not what they deem a single coherent  traditional teaching on the subject, but that they are offered &quot;in  wisdom-seeking rather than wisdom-delivering-spirit, as writings that make  us think, that challenge our unexamined opinions, expand our symnpathies,  elevate our gaze, and introduce us to possibilities open to human beings in  everyday life that may be undreamt of in our philosophizing.&quot; pg.19.  It was eye-opening to trace the decline of courtship at the beginning of  the 20th century and what the emergence of dating methods did to male and  female relationships. The authors see an increased failure of marriages NOT  because courting isn't done the old fashioned way  but because certain  elements of what makes marriages work are no longer even considered. .  Largely elements  that have become secondary in importance to the current  all encompassing reason for marriage, ROMANTIC LOVE. Not to say that  romantic love  shouldn't be a factor, but that it is not necessarily the   greatest or only factor.  Also included are reflections on the virtue of  modesty, the merit of waiting and the fulfillment of partnership and  parenting. A good resource and thought provoking book
Stupid Stupid Rat Tails, I love them. The Stupid Stupid Rat Tails is a excellent comic book. I love the way Jeff Smith draws. I have read all his Bone books and Stupid Stupid Rat Tails and I have never been disapointed or let down. I have become one of his biggest fans. The talking monkey Mr Pip is truthfull, I love his wit. The baby creatures of the forest whos parents were ate by the Rat creature queen are cute and cuddley. I just love this comic book
A poignant and profound tale. Winner of the Michael L. Printz award in young adult literature, Looking for Alaska is a novel for adults and older teens that deals with serious topics - suicide, death and dying, and lives spinning out of control. The protagonist, Miles "Pudge" Halter, is a young adult with an obsession over the last words of famous historical figures; fed up with his safe, bland life at home, he dares to venture into the unstable world of Culver Creek Boarding School. There he meets Alaska Young - beautiful, funny, clever, and utterly messed up and self-destructive young woman. She steals his heart, but a stolen heart alone cannot derail her from her spiraling self-harm. A poignant and profound tale of coping with upheaval and drama, adjusting to radical transitions, and reflections upon what lies behind the end of life - the "Great Perhaps"
For young dinosaur enthusiasts... My five year old daughter specifically asked for this book as a Christmas gift after checking it out at the library during the summer; it made a huge impression!  The simple text and vibrant illustrations are perfect for young children
Very Good Beginning. For starters, let me say that I very rarely write reviews for Amazon. However, I feel like I needed to say something to offset some of the negative reviews. Everyone has a different opinion of what constitutes a good book, but some reviewers seem to imply that the enjoyment of this book will be raised or lowered dependent upon your intelligence and/or age.I read fantasy for one reason, to escape the realities of life. I don't read fantasy in order to develop a new way of thinking. It's a book! The content has been written by an author with different experiences than mine. She has made up a story so that I could wile away an afternoon (and frequently most of a night) lost in another world.Several reviewers have commented on a lack of morality, stilted dialogue and/or cardboard characters. Whether or not you agree with those statements will always be a personal matter.I notice that most of the reviewers recommend that I try George R. R. Martin because he apparently writes intelligent fantasy. Well, I have tried to read GRRM and couldn't bring myself to finish. The violence was incredible...horrific...even nightmarish...and that was just the first part of the book. Ugh! I know, I know, I am among the small minority that fervently wishes for less sex, less violence, and less language. This book is surprisingly free of foul language, has a minimal amount of violence (that fits within the flow of the story) and just enough romance to make your heart beat faster.I hope that I have given you a reason to give this series a chance. I will not compare this series to Tolkien (what can?), but I do not feel it is the drivel that others have implied. I was a little apprehensive after reading some of the other reviews and I was pleasantly surprised to discover I enjoyed it. Now on to the rest of the series
Useful Tips. This book is setup for effective reading or just finding a quick tip. The author brings lots of experience and the information is useful for a person of any skill level interesting in machining or metalworking.
Love this one. I love this book. Nice pictures and easy to follow directions for the advanced beginner that I am ...The  baby kimono and log cabin are just a few projects I plan to hopefully  start.. Lots if nice ideas for knitting things for the house if you are like me and do not want to attmept sweaters  that probably will not fit me..
Roberto. Plain and simple, this book is a must have for any Barista or any one that enjoys a drink
Chilling Book. All of us are aware, or so I would hope, of how close the Cuban Missle Crisis was to nuclear war. This book tells the story from those who were there - Americans and Russians. Chilling reminder of how fragile we are and a sad testimonial to our ability to produce weapons that could make us all extinct
Delightful mental jousting with a beautiful muse. Fun from beginning to end, John Fowles explores the never-smooth relationship between the author and his muse.  Miles Green verbally and physically jousts for 200+ pages with his muse, Erato, as well as Dr. A. Delfie and the voluptuous Nurse Cory.  If this doesn't excite you, I don't know what will.  Extra fillips of pleasure for those who detest various sorts of modern criticism.  It's a wonder John Fowles' Twaynes English Author Series Volume hasn't been recalled.  He does not spare the rod.  A warm, funny, smart book
Helpful information and encouragement toward lifestyle changes. This book gives the reader a sense that they can be in charge of their body and how disease effects them. It gives some commons sense and not so common sense ideas of how to take care of yourself when dealing with cancer. I would recommend it as an alternative therapy resource and guide to making positive changes
A solid excellent book. This book roots in a majesterial examination of the documentary records of the Warren Commission and the FBI, a product of careful, hard work conducted over the decades of the type seldom met with in most histories today and rarely in the JFK inquiry.  In addition it is well written.  The results are devatating to the coverup inflicted upon the American people by the Warren Commission.  It should be noted that four of the members of the Warren commission did not believe their own Report, nor did LBJ, the District Attorney of Dallas, the Police Chief of DAllas and even the FBI and the Secret Service--as the documentary record shows beyond cavil. Russell and Cooper, members of the WC, did not believe the SBT, for example, and left records to the fact.  Further, interviews with the head of the Secret Service and Warren Commission records prove the Commission and its staff saw the X-rays and medical photographs, some as early as December 1963.  It is unquestionable that the WC and its chief counsel Rankin early on [January, 1964] worked with this knowledge, e.g. Jan. 22 executive session of the WC. To argue otherwise is blindly to accept and faithfully to reiterate the political devices employed by investigators as they realized late in their investigation that they had to coverup their nefarious actions and leave a pious paper file that to scholars is further affirmation of their failure. Breach of Trust's objective and scholarly presentation will assist the reader to understand the workings of the WC and lead an inquiring mind to the light. McKNight's unique book ought to become the standard reference to the crime for decades to come
Practical suggestions in every chapter!. I found practical suggestions in each chapter -- a useful resource to help us round out our fund raising program. With uncertainties in the Washington, DC mail due to anthrax, we are especially interested in increasing visits and gifts through our Web site.  This book will help us move towards that goal
Bringing back Chinese culture!. Bringing the cultures of China back into the world, once again, Amy Tan completes yet another exquisite piece of work, in composing The Bonesetter's Daughter. Ruth Luyi Young is the daughter of LuLing Liu Young, two characters in which the novel's central theme revolves around, discussing the importance of family and mother-daughter relationships. As the novel is written in the perspective of both Ruth and LuLing, one can easily trace the steps of their family's early history, culture, and traditions, such as the importance of ink making and Chinese calligraphy, the history of the bonesetter, and the famous "curse of the bonesetter's daughter" which was cast upon Ruth and LuLing's family. During the course of these events, Ruth and LuLing both come face to face with reality, realizing that life is not as easy as it may seem and that everyone should cherish it no matter what, which subsequently impacts their relationship towards each other and brings them even closer together. The Bonesetter's Daughter is a story that all teens, and even mothers should read, because it reminds people of what they have and to not take advantage of it. It especially reminds daughters and mothers of the importance of that special mother-daughter bond and how important family should be
Read THIS. One of the best non fiction books I have ever read.  If 9/11 leaves some questions in your mind and the government is not giving the whole story, Peter Lance gives all the fact with 50 pages of footnotes.  The book is great reading, I couldn't put it down.  Peter Lance does a superb job of connecting the dots leading to 9/11.
Worth Reading. I've recently discovered and began to enjoy Nora Roberts' books. 'Private Scandals' kept me entertained, but the identity of the stalker/obsessive fan/murderer was easy to figure out, since I'm HORRIBLE at solving mysteries and my guess turned out to be correct. The book did drag at spots, certain things became repetitive and were more in depth than necessary. The abundance of sex scenes became annoying. I don't think that for normal couples, every little kiss morphs into a ridiculously passionate lovemaking session, but then again, this was in part a romance novel. But these parts were not necessary to the plot and I began skimming over them after a few. Other facets of the book were somewhat far-fetched, but again, it's fiction. Worth reading, but check it out from the library instead of purchasing the book
Highly detailed framework for team development. Overview:The Wisdom of Teams presents Katzenbach and Smith's contention that real teams are the best approach to building a high-performance organization. The authors blended together their highly detailed framework for team development with examples of how several corporations successfully or unsuccessfully implemented these team principles. While acknowledging that teams may not be the best solution for every organization's problems, the authors unashamedly insisted that businesses do themselves a disservice by not considering the team-based approach. The book's twelve chapters are organized into three parts: Understanding Teams, Becoming a Team, and Exploiting the Potential.Summary:Part One, Understanding Teams, introduces the reader to the authors' thesis that teams present the best approach to creating a high-performance organization. Teams are defined as a "small group of people with complementary skills committed to a common purpose and set of specific performance goals" (21). Teams are not the same as work groups, committees, councils or task forces where the emphasis is on individual performance and accountability; that is, the sum of individual bests. Neither is every group that calls itself a team a true team. They may exhibit team-like characteristics or share team-like values, but those in and of themselves do not make a team. The distinguishing characteristic of teams is the synergistic effect created when individual accountability is exchange for mutual group accountability and shared group responsibility. Additionally, teams need to do real work in order be characterized as a real team. They must produce a specific work product that contributes to the organization's mission and success. However, achieving real team status is often difficult. In order to become successful, potential teams must overcome bureaucratic inertia, managerial biases, confusion about what makes a true team, negative past experiences with pseudo teams, fear of failure, and individual resistance to shared accountability. These embody a daunting array of factors to overcome, but the authors insisted that a top-level commitment to team-based solutions could lead to building a successful team.In Part Two, Becoming a Team, the authors used their "team performance curve" to graphically illustrate the process necessary to create winning teams. A group does not become a team when initially formed. They may be a working group committed to better coordinating individual efforts toward individual goals benefiting the company, but they produce no joint work product. While this may be the best solution to a company's problem, the decision to become a team requires the conscious decision to assume the risk of mutual accountability and joint responsibility. If provided the right catalyst, a working group can transition to either a pseudo team or a potential team. The pseudo team fails to implement the basics of team building. They call themselves a team but are still focused on individual performance and not group results. Potential teams show an enhanced desire to formulate a group mission but have not adopted mutual accountability. They demonstrate improved team effectiveness, but their impact on the corporate problem is no greater than the working group. Real teams have a clearly defined mission for which they hold themselves mutually accountable and produce a joint work product. High performance teams are real teams that develop a deep personal commitment among the members of the team for one another's personal growth and wellbeing. These teams are both highly effective in their team effort and produce high quality results for the organization. However, to rise to that level, team members must make the critical choice to invest themselves in the team and its mission while overcoming obstacles that threaten to cause the team to regress to one of its lesser effective counterparts. Successful teams need quality leaders who help focus the group on the mission, endorse a team-based philosophy of shared accountability, and foster a climate of courage and success.In Part Three, the authors forcefully championed their assertion that teams are the building blocks of successful organizations. Teams, they insisted, are the best organizational tool to deliver the results necessary to build customer loyalty, shareholder value, and employee satisfaction. Provided a company has a strong performance ethic and vision-driven leadership, teams can contribute the necessary skills, energy, and performance values that drive successful businesses. The ultimate decision to incorporate functional team rests with executive leadership and its willingness to transform bloated hierarchical structures, managerial parochialism, and individual-based incentives.Review and Reaction:Brevity and succinctness are not the strengths of this book. Once one is able to navigate the business techno babble, the mind numbing repetitiousness, and awkward sentence structures, the authors' point becomes clear: Teams are good for business. The genuine strength of the book is in the examples. The authors' ethereally academic presentation of team concepts finds a clearer voice in their reflections on how these concepts were applied in "real world" corporate environments. While not every example speaks with equal adequacy to its point, the reader can gain an understanding of what factors help build or break teams. Many of these factors, as the authors' asserted, are common sense.
get the whole story. In the words of John Henrik Clarke, "what we know as Black History, are actually the missing pages of World History.." Anyone who is a true student of history can easily see the motivation, methodology, and justification of non-Africans in suppressing the whole truth. Cheikh Anta Diop is nothing less than a hero. His work continues to baffle the eurocentric ideology, which is already crumbling under its own weight.
But If We Do Want to Invade Poland... I gave this book one star before. What it said appalled me. And it still does. But after reading it, I scanned it once more. As much as I hate to say it, if you want to invade Poland, accomplish something great, make your  thumbprint on the  world, you will need this book. It's the best for this  purpose. But this leaves out about 99% of the population. And probably you  and me. This is really a &quot;commander's guide to organization&quot;. So  for 99% of the population, I still give it one star. For that 1% of the  population who want to climb Mount Everest or help cure world hunger, I  give it five stars. Good luck
My head still hurts. I have long been a Steven Pinker fan. It is great to have a neurologist appear who can explain the workings of the brain in a fairly easy to understand, often humorous and precise way. Words & Rules, though made my head hurt. I felt a little like the rat in Flowers for Algernon: a vague feeling that I might have understood this more easily at one time not too long ago, but boy is this difficult to wade through now. Which is to say I blame myself rather than Pinker. I think it's a very difficult subject and my tenuous grasp of grammar didn't help. Unlike his previous books, an actual understanding of the parts of speech helps here.That said, delving into the minutiae of how the brain works is ultimately rewarding, even if I only understood maybe 75% of this. Watching vicariously as Pinker et al close in how how we think and talk is truly awesome. I find myself paying close attention to how I speak; how I hesitate in choosing words; what associations I seem to need to find a word or person... . Very cool, though you can probably get sucked into some kind of fugue state if you overdo it.Still highly recommended, but make sure you're snowed in somewhere and have a lot of coffee.George
Short - and an absolute classic. This book is short but extremely thought-provoking.  The story and characters are much different than they are portrayed in modern versions.  What happens if we get rid of all inhibitions?  Is there a vile, little monster inside of each of us?  What would be the result if we could take a potion and allow only that part of us to control our actions?  Once you indluge that part of you, either with a potion or otherwise, will you ever be able to control it again?  Was Stevenson just talking about our ability to control evil thoughts - or could it be about acoholism or other addictions?Stevenson created a short story that will leave you thinking for a long time.  The story is unique, dark, and mysterious.  And it is about much more than a potion.  It is about life, and whether you can control the bad parts of you after you have induldged them - or are you forever after a slave to them?
Review of "Against The Gods". This is an excellent book on the history and development of the concepts surrounding and the measurements of risk.For the first time, a book on this subject was prepared that stands as a guide to help the individual in his professional career and investing activities and serves as a legitimate academic work worthy for incusion in capital markets study.Professor John W. Kercheval, IIIGeorgetown UniversityWashington, D
Very gooding fantasy writing!. In Brazil they butchered this edition (subtracting some stories), but it's still a great read
how to become a gazillionaire!. Wayne of Rebeccasreads highly recommends THE ULTIMATE GUIDE TO ELECTRONIC MARKETING FOR SMALL BUSINESS from author, speaker & all-round whizz-bang TOM ANTION as worth the time spent on multiple readings if only for the nuggets that will help launch future online gazillionaires.Books with a title this long & this full of promises (the ultimate anything is a big claim) have got to deliver on three things:1. Can the audience -- in this case small business owners with little net or marketing savvy -- understand a darned thing he says?2. If they do understand it, can they act on the suggestions (does it say stuff like, "first, get a million dollars in funding")?3. Do they work?On all three fronts, Tom Antion's book works well, if not perfectly
Sustainable Communities. Judy and Michael Corbett have written a brief and thoughtful, not to mention well-informed book on the subject of designing and building sustainable communities. The various chapters on the history of their subject, on their seminal and justifiably respected community in Davis, CA,  and on elements of the planning process and the integration of real estate  pragmatics with environmental ideals will serve as both a user-friendly  introduction for lay readers and a handy reference for professionals  looking to expand their horizons. The writing is clear and uncomplicated,  the design of the book is simple and straightforward, and there is the nice  sense throughout that it has been put together by people who know wherof  they speak. One complaint: it's unclear why a paperback published by a  non-academic press would be priced a bit high but it is unfortunate, as it will  serve to prevent this book from reaching the broader audience it deserves
The Skinny on Hiassin. Were someone to write a biography of Carl Hiassin in fifty years it is hard to imagine that he or she wouldn't focus on the author's latest triumph, Skinny Dip. It is one of his seminal achievements. The book simply shines with humor, well drawn characters, action and as usual everyone gets their just desserts. It is also one of his smoothest rides. One gets the feeling that Hiassin was very confident in every sentence that he wrote.Here is an overview that will stimulate readers' interest Hiassin's. The book opens with Chaz trying to kill his wife by flinging her over the rail of their cruise ship, but by some twists and turns and luck Joey survives long enough to be rescued. Much of the rest of the book circles around the characters interactions and relationships as Joey and her team pursue vengeance. By the midpoint of the novel Chaz is already an emotional wreck and it doesn't look like Joey is about to let up any time soon.The moral backbone of the novel is twofold. One is the pitting of the Everglades Forest and her defenders against big business and her pollutants. The Everglades is quickly turning from pristine swamp into another type of ecosystem entirely and many Floridians want to prevent the remaining land from being destroyed, which means millions of dollars loss to the big agricultural business. Hiassin's two segments on the real life plight of this swamp standout a bit apart from the book, but also lends it a feeling of seriousness.And two is the pitting of criminals against victims who aren't going to take it anymore.  Hiassin is at his when he reapetedly refers to the attempted murder as an insult to Joey. As most survivors of violent crime can ascertain there is a severe indignity attached to one's helplessness.There are six main characters in the book: Joey and her horny husband Chaz, Joey's rescuer Mick who is a kind and eccentric ex-policeman who lives alone on an island, Joey's brother, a rich expatriate who raises sheep in New Zealand, Mr. Hammernut, the owner of a large agricultural empire and Tool, the books muscled goon who undergoes a moral transformation. The small group of sub-characters is entertainingly populated in part with a hermit who lives in the swamp, a street-tough hairdresser, a slap-happy senior and a cowardly lawyer.Though similar elements live in many of Hiassin's works his books never feel like he has used a formula to create them more easily. This can't be said for all or most of crime writers and should be accredited to Hiassin's love for storytelling, his skill as a plot weaver and his ability to evoke so many different emotions. In this line of thought this reviewer took note of the characters subtle (except for Tool) character changes throughout the book. Joey for example seemed learn a bit more restraint as she calmed down a little and the same can be said even for characters that have appeared in some of Hiassin's previous works (Mick).Hiassin has never been a fan of superficial materialism, but the issue is slightly complicated by Skinny Dip and does not simply fall into place along character axes. While the villains all crave money some of the heroes are loaded too. Joey maintains a very frugal existence considering her $ 13 million trust, but her brother spends lavishly. Joey's rescuer on the other hand lives on a disability check. One may wonder if the only difference between Chaz and his wife is that she never had to work or hustle for a buck, but there is one other way in which the enemies contrast and that is the way they treat their associates. Chaz is continuously scrambling for something and in his desperation - be it for sex, money, or escape - uses other people as tools rather than relating to them as equals. On the other hand, Joey has a good sense of humor and she enjoys the companionship of her pals.Like most of Hiassin's work this book is not an overly violent one. Although it begins with an attempted murder, the event is quite peaceful. There is no struggle, no blood and the victim, Joey, does not die.After reading Skinny Dip I immediately lent it to my best friend Katie who has not been able to put it down. So, potential readers be warned: Like Katie you may not be able to get any work done for a day or two, but the time is not wasted on Hiassin's best work to date. One comes away gaining not only pleasant memories of laughs and smiles, but also the feeling that one has poured one more drop into the bucket of our minds that we must fill in order to make this world a better place. In short, Carl Hiassin puts us in touch with the good guys in ourselves
Excellent perspective on Miami. I read this book so many years ago, but I just now realized I had never shared my opnions about it.  I had lived in Miami for about eight years, and I think I was in my 5th year or so when I finally heard about &quot;Miami&quot; by Joan Didion.  It was only after I had finally moved to the Beach that I happened upon it, at Kafka's.  At any rate, it is an excellent book.  I think about it every time I hear on the news about the bumbling CIA or news of Castro makes the NYTimes.  Incidentally, 1987 also saw the publication of &quot;The Corpse Had a Familiar Face,&quot; by Edna Buchanan, another equally excellent non-fiction book about this city.  I also highly recommend &quot;A Book of Common Prayer&quot; by Ms. Didion
Great Source of Historical Information. This book is excellent.... EL Konigsburg describes the apprentice Salai's service to Leonardo very well... It seems as if you are watching it take place before you, instead of in reality reading it. The Mona Lisa has always been a mystery, how Leonardo labored painting a merchant's wife whilst other noble families begged him for theirs to be done [such as Isabella d'Este]. The thing that really fascinated me throughout this book was that, it was all based on something real. This book was supposed to be a book report, ended up being my spare reading book that I read when I had spare time. Ahh....Thank god for book reports..
GREAT READ, FROM THE FIRST PAGE TO THE LAST AND EVERYWHERE INBETWEEN!!!!!!!!!!!. MISERY----5 STARSWhen reading this book, I could not put it down.....i LOVED every single page of this book, I really enjoyed it....it was INTENSE, SAD, and FUNNY....What this poor guy Paul Sheldon goes thru is absolutely unimaginable. I cannot believe it......I feel so bad for this guy....how he adapts to living the way he was forced to, by this psycho crazy [...] by the name of, Annie Wilkes....UNREAL.....go out and pick this one up....like I said before, I couldn't put it down. It took me 2 days to finish it, and I did not speed read it, I TRULY enjoyed it, and was very disappointed when it was over. I am currently reading "IT" and I will review that one when I have finished....GO PICK UP MISERY!!!!
A book that's part tribute, exploration, and witty!. How many comedy writers have surrived so long with one performer?  The author started with Lucille Ball on the radio series My Favorite Husband.  She and her partner Bob Carroll Jr. wrote for the full 6 year run of I Love Lucy. (Jess Oppenheimer, who created the series, left after the 5th season.  By the way, this book makes a great companion to his book.)  They also worked on the Lucy-Desi Comedy Hour, The Lucy Show, and Here's Lucy.  In between, they wrote the story for her feature film, "Yours, Mine, and Ours," plus various specials.  Sadly, the final series, Life With Lucy, is best forgotten. The author does a good job of dealing with various stories regarding I Love Lucy and its main star.  You won't read about the problems that broke up the Ball-Arnaz marriage here.  Ditto for the strife between Vivian Vance and William Frawley.  There's also no mention of the scare regarding Lucy's onetime registration with the Communist party.  Ms. Davis may have wished to protect the now deceased stars.  Or she wasn't directed involved in such matters. This book provides a wonderful behind-the scenes look at Lucy's various series.  Ms. Davis tried out many of the stunts beforehand.  Would a woman be capable of them?  While her partner is listed as a co-writer, this is essentially her story.  We learn about the struggles she had as a woman comedy writer.  There's material on her personal life too. The author writes with great affection for both Lucy and Desi.  She notes that his contributions were often overlooked.  Ms. Davis and Mr. Carroll later became producers on Alice.  I caught one goof in the book.  Earl Hamner did create The Waltons.  But he wasn't involved in Little House On The Prairie. Still, this is a very good read.  Please check it out
Enjoyable fiction tying past & present. Based on the description, I expected this to be a DaVinci Code knock-off, but gave it a shot since I recieved a free copy.  Comparing Labyrinth to The Davinci Code do it injustice; this is definately not an imitator and is worth reading in it's own right.  I enjoyed the characters, plot, and switching between the past and present.  I'm not sure it has literary value (I wouldn't argue that The DaVinci Code does, either), but it's certainly complex enough to make you think about the plot and character relationships without being difficult to follow
A Collection of Eclectic Reading. To be blatently sales related, an organization such as a design firm has a difficult time in selling itself. What can you say that doesn't sound like pure puffery - we do neat designs, we have brilliant people, look at what we've done in the past.The Pentagram partnership instead decided to publish a series of papers, monographs really that talk about something that interestes the partners. The papers cover an eclectic range of subjects. A paper on Cuban cigar bands may be followed by a paper on rural Australian mailboxes or improvision in Cuba after the collapse of the Soviet Union.The papers have enough interest in their own right, in their acceptance by the Pentagram customers that they have kept up this practice for 35 years. And they keep the name Pentagram in the minds of their readers.Here for the first time are all of the Pentagram Papers bound together in a single book
Another pilot's thoughts. Running into the Sky was both very informative about the technical and practical aspects of learning to fly Powered Paragliders as well as being a very entertaining saga. The author has a great sense of humor which is mixed in good proportion with valuable information.Anyone who flys or dreams of flying a ram air wing, powered or non, should give this a read
THIS WILL ONLY WORK FOR PEOPLE WHO WANT TO INCREASE SALES AND COMMUNICATE EFFECTIVELY!. The fact that you are reading my review shows me your interest in a balanced and honest viewpoint on how well THE UNFAIR ADVANTAGE will work for you.  However, let me honestly tell you it will only be relevant to you, if you decide that increasing your sales and making more money is important to you. If so, I strongly feel that this book will help you if not for any other reason than myself, and other TOP-PERFORMERS use the "unfair advantage" to increase our sales.  Now, if you choose to order the UNFAIR ADVANTAGE will have an easy to follow road-map for success, the only problem is all the paperwork you will have to process as a result of, your sales will increase.  This is the easiest way to put NLP to work for you without the confusion and in depth psycology that others in the field of NLP provide.  I've read everything by everyone about NLP and Duane Lakin's Unfair Advantage has proven to be most beneficial, easiest to understand, sure-fire method of acheiving success so quickly, it may even surprise you!
Excellent book. I read this book several years ago, and just recently purchased it for my daughter for her birthday. I thought it was an excellent read, different, and very moving.
Beats the Summer of Night. I loved this book, the final twist made it great. The Summer the kids faced the darkness at the old school left its mark. Dale is quite beleivable as a college prof that is all too human, and has faltered. He goes back to his roots and the location of his damage, to explore his flaw. Some of the ghosts from that summer are still there.
Another fun read from Nevada Barr. I've been tearing through Nevada Barr's Anna Pigeon mysteries ever since I discovered them.  The tighest and best story in my opinion is Firestorm - this one was a little harder to follow and I'm not sure I ever totally understood the denouement of the mystery.  But like with all the Pigeon novels, the characters and physical setting were interesting and well-drawn, and the story arcs that continue from book to book are intriguing, such as the relationship between Anna and her sister, and the relationship between Anna and Frederick the FBI agent (be prepared to be surprised!)  I don't think I'm going to read anything else until I've finished all the Anna Pigeon books out there - on to Blind Descent!
The Simple and the Grandiose. I have read a number of other books by Shusaku Endo and I have come to appreciate his unique (to me) Christian theology.  He made a very powerful statement in "Silence" and another one in "Deep River".  Endo doesn't trumpet his points but they are clear nonetheless.  He is even more subtle in "The Samurai".  It doesn't take long for us to pick out a most unusual "bad guy".  Father Velasco, despite his continuous efforts to overcome his sinfulness, depicts everything that is wrong with modern Christianity.  I use the term "modern Christianity" to refer to when the Church became more important than the Word.  As a counterpart, we have Rokuemon Hasekura, the title character.  He has no need whatsoever for Chritianity but it is through his eyes that we are able to glimpse the true nature of Christian faith.  The subtlety of "The Samurai" lies in how the majesty of Velasco's Christianity overshadows the simple understanding of Christianity that Hasekura uncovers.  At times I thought Endo had so lopsided the comparisons as to lose the meaning of it all.  Only later did I realize the beautiful way that simplicity won out by its' own nature.  I suppose it is possible to enjoy "The Samurai" without being touched by this comparitve examination of Christianity.  This is an excellent work of historical fiction that focuses on Japan, the New World, Spain and Rome in the early 1600's.  However, for me the book challenged me to examine my own expression of faith, both outwardly and inwardly, and see if I was Velasco or the Samurai.  I'm still in the process of that examination.
memories. This CD, with several people were reading the texts, brought back so many memories of my own father.  I had to buy copies for my two sisters as well as for a good friend who recently lost his father. I have also recommended it to several others
You Can Have, Do, or Be Whatever You Want!. Esther and Jerry Hicks's books on the teachings of Abraham have inspired millions already. For those not yet familiar with the Abraham teachings, this book is definitely where to start. It is the perfect introduction to how we use our thoughts to attract what we want or do not want into our lives. For the current student of Abraham, there is much that will enhance and clarify past teachings.  The section on segment intending, setting forth your intention regarding each segment of your day, is especially helpful. Abraham also speaks with common sense upon such topics as the power of our emotions, whether evil really exists, and why we cannot control other people.The book is a must read for anyone who wishes to have a happier, more enjoyable life. Having been a student of Abraham now for two years, I have seen results in my own life from these teachings, and this book only makes me feel more clear and calm in my wanting process.  Read The Law of Attraction, and when you have finished, read The Amazing Power of Deliberate Intent and Ask and It is Given in that order so that each lesson will continue to build on the one before.  Attract Good Into Your Life!- Tyler R. Tichelaar, author of Iron Pioneers and The Queen City, available on Amazo
Autobiographical Look at a Paranoid Schizophrenic. This book is one of Philip K. Dick's most autobiographical, and is about the least well known time of his life.  He had just left his wife and kids in a stately house north of San Francisco to live with the junkies and vagrants of San Mateo.  The house that he lived in became well known as a place where people that were into drugs could go and always find more of what they were looking for, and usually something new as well.  Dick himself only did acid once-he preferred the more predictable effects of prescription drug abuse-and he called his experience with LSD the most terrifying 8-hours of his life.The loss of identity that this book takes to extremes really did affect the people of Dick's house in San Mateo.  Paranoid theories ran rampant, and no one really knew who was a narc and who wasn't.  As such, it is an interesting portrait of the collective state of mind that predominated this period.As a work of fiction, this book has a lot to say about the sources and apparatus of control in society.  The movie version does a poor job of conveying what is the central evil in the book-and in society-that Dick was trying to get to the heart of.  NewPath is an organization that purports to be the only one in society to be able to deal with the epidemic of drug abuse that 'Substance D' is ravaging on society.  They are however, the only group in society that is outside the realm of surveillence.  To quote _Enemy of the State_, "who watches the wathchers?"  That is definitely true of this book, and reflects Dick's deep distrust of the FBI/CIA.  To see how far this analogy goes, read _A Scanner Darkly_ and then ask yourself some key questions about the War on Drugs
My son loves this book!. He will dig through his basket of, say, 20 books just to find this one.  He is too young to read and has trouble even waiting for me to page through it with him, but if I leave him alone this is the book he picks.  I suppose it is the primary colors and the simple shapes.  I suspect I will have to pick up some more of Barton's books to see if they work too..
If the golf tours interest you this is a must read. The author has captured the escence of the Developmental Tours and the exciting yet mostly futile efforts of the multitude of young pros trying to earn their stripes onto the Big Tour. Cotton humorously details the trials and tribulations of the players in an entertaining, informative and flowing style that is pleasurable to read. His interviews and insight on the inner workings of the management and origins of several mini tours is unique. I have read dozens of golf books and this is the first that explains the interests and business plans that motivate one to start and manage a mini tour. The author travels to many events and his travel log trapses cross country from Poduncville,Iowa to Nowhere Nebraska.His 2 day trip, jammed in the back of a packed car with the player and caddie in the front, and him fighting for space amoungst the food wrappers and hanging clothes in the back is particularly entertaining. This is a must read for any golf afficionado
Riveting. When I started my endevour to read presidential biographies I had no interest in LBJ - he did not seem very interesting or appealing to me.  After just a few pages of this stellar book I was riveted.  It turns out that LBJ, though a vile man, is one of the most compelling stories of American political history.  The book is as well written as any I have ever read (and I've read quite a few).  I could not wait to read volume 2
An Exciting Ride of Suspense. This book is an exciting story of a man called Richard Hannay who is led into a secret by a mysterious man called Scudder who was killed in his apartment. Now Hannay must be on the aware of the police who suspect him as a killer and he is in fear of his life from the secret whom people would kill for.This engages in a serious manhunt across Scotland. This a well written thriller definitely a must rea
Strongly influenced my decision to quit drinking!. I am an alcoholic.  After reading this book, I understood better why my body can't handle alcohol the way other's can.  That was one part that helped me to abstain, even in the face of the intense cravings which I experienced in the beginning.  Another very enlightening part of the book is the discussion of the influence of the alcohol industry on laws relating to the use and abuse of alcohol.  That angered me to the point where, even if I want a drink really badly, I don't want to support the industry!  This was a fascinating read and I recommend it for alcoholics and the people who love them
A mirror of history.... A well researched and well written book on the life of Maximilien Robespierre.  Considering the limited amount of information available on the subject, I found this book to be rather informative and not just another recycled version of an older book.  Ruth Scurr delves into the conflicted mind of Robespierre and examines the French revolutionary's descent from man of the people to murderous tyrant.  An excellent look at one of history's most misunderstood, yet fearful, figures.  A fine example to anyone interested in understanding the value of using terror tactics in supplanting dictatorial rule.
The Seven Story Mountain. It was quite refreshing to read such clear prose describing a journey of faith from over half a century ago.  Merton is writing from his time period, aware of prejudices and doubts from the WW II era, but there is timeless message about the beauty and power of faith.  Interesting that a monk who took a vow of silence is one of the 20th century's most eloquent writers, able to convey what he thought and felt as a young man, growing up in France, England, and the United States in the shadows of war
Valuable for the curious and the more experienced. This is a famous art text and justly so.  If you are wondering &quot;just what is this modern art stuff?&quot;, this book will help you.  If you are thinking &quot;I don't know much about art but I know what I like&quot;  this book will surprise you with its magnificent colour plates and images.   Robert Hughes can write reviews for the art glitterati, but he can also  write for the average person with an interest in Modern Art, and very well  he does it too
a beautiful and brave novel. Michael Ignatieff's novel is written from the perspective of a son who has a mother with a family with a history of dementia.  The title reflects the fact that scan of the brain shows scar tissue, and this is how her condition is first diagnoised.  The son, the protagonist, is a philosophy professor who has successfully started a life of his own, complete with a very satisfying career and a family of his own.  The novel captures the story of his mother, father, and his brother and their experiences in dealing with the mother's diagnosis of premature senile dementia and the progression of her condition.This book won the MIND Book of the Year: Allen Lane Award (an annual UK award given to a Fiction/Nonfiction book about mental health) and was short-listed for the Booker Prize.  The writing is astounding, and as a result I was unprepared for the author's ability to describe the emotional journey of the protagonist.   I found myself haunted by the themes and subject matter in the same way that someone passing by a car wreck can't help but stop to stare.Ignatieff examines what dementia does to the identity of the sufferer and he references the de Kooning, the famous American painter who developed Alzheimer's disease and yet continued to paint.  He also examines what dementia does to his own identity, as he find himself trying to figure out who he is when his own mother no longer recognizes him as her son.This book is a great achievement and will especially appeal to those readers who are seeking a book about illness and the philosophies related to illness and identity.
A Look at the Death Penalty. This book is not only interesting but gives a great deal of insight into life on "death row," at least in the state of Mississippi, and the appeals process involved with stays of execution and commutation of sentences.  It touches on activities of the Ku Klux Klan. It was my impression that the author leans toward those who favor the abolition of the death penalty.  However, some sympathy is found for the victims of crime.  The story centers on Sam Cayhall who is sentenced to death after several trials over a number of years following the crime.  Sam's grandson becomes his attorney during the last months of appeal from "death row." The latter part of the book leaves one wondering whether or not there will be an execution.  Meanwhile Sam shows repentance and response to the prison's chaplain.I found it to be one of the better John Grisham books.
Three Florida cases:   Jerry Rogers, Roy Swafford, Peter Ventura. Jerry Layne Rogers, Sr. -- wrongfully convicted and innocent. From 1989 - 1992, I was his investigator at CCR [The Office of Capital Collateral Representative, a state agency representing death-sentenced persons].Mr. Rogers' case consisted in 1992 of at least 80 boxes of documents, from court files, prosecutor and law enforcement files, trial and evidentiary hearing transcripts, etc. Mr. Rogers's case was the largest and most complicated that CCR has ever represented that I am aware of.The second largest and most complicated was that of Mr. Gerald Stano, whose lead attorney during most of the development of his case was Mark E. Olive.In 1995, Mr. Rogers began receiving pro bono representation from the Washington, D.C. law firm Covington and Burling. The result was an unanimous Florida Supreme Court (FSC) 26 page opinion ordering a new trial in Mr. Rogers' case due primarily to prosecutorial misconduct, in particular Brady v. Maryland violations.To read the opinion, go to the FSC website, then at "Public Information", to the recent opinions, to the year 2001, then toward the bottom at February 15, 2001, one will find the FSC opinion.During the summer of 2002, Mr. Rogers was re-convicted, however sentenced to life upon the jury recommendation. Now twice Mr. Rogers has been wrongfully convicted.In 2004, the Florida 5th District Court of Appeal denied relief. The FSC declined to accept jurisdiction and thus denied the petition for review.Mr. Rogers' case is pending Federal review.For those interested in reading the narrowly decided by four to three vote Florida Supreme Court opinions regarding two more death sentenced persons whose innocence is an authentic issue, please go to the FSC website, then go to the recent opinions, then chose the correct year and scroll down to the following two cases:Roy Swafford: April 18, 2002Peter Ventura: May 24, 2001Additionally, the issue in the below cases is DNA testing that proves that Roy Swafford did not rape Brenda Rucker:Roy Swafford: March 26, 2004 Case Nos. SC03.931 and SC03.1153Please also read other books about Florida's death row by David von Drehle and Michael Mello - also availabe at Amazon.
very good book. I, Michael L. Rayborn, did NOT write that reveiw below. Despite my known interest in the reavers of Northumbria (which is where my ancestors came from), I am not the only person in the Heathen movement that is interested in that. I do NOT agree with what the reveiwer wrote below as I have always enjoyed Swain Wodenings works and direct everyone interested in the Anglo Saxon Way to his website www.ealdriht.org . All of his works are very researched and I would not even dream of detracting anyone from them. Bottom line.I highly recommend this book
Many editions to choose from. This a challenging read, but with film, audio and interpretive editions there are an embarrassment of riches that make it a lot easier. Here is the strategy I followed: 1) As background reading "In the Heart of the Sea: The Tragedy of the Whaleship Essex" (2000) recounts the real-life story that inspired Melville to write "Moby Dick", and gives a good background on Nantucket and the whaling industry. It provides needed historical context for the modern reader that was common knowledge in the 19th century. It was after reading this that I was inspired to read "Moby Dick". 2) The 2005 audiobook version narrated by William Hootkins (25 hours unabridged) - Hootkins should win an Oscar for his performance. I'm an audiobook junkie but this is one of if not the best audiobook performance I've heard, his reading is perfect for the book. I never would have picked up the amount of humor, satire and sheer emotion without his professional interpretive skills, every character sounds different. 3) Read along the audiobook version with the Norton Critical Edition (2002), which contains plentiful explanatory footnotes and other material such as contemporary reviews, pictures, maps, criticisms, etc.. 4) See the 1956 John Houston movie. It's 90-minutes and is a spoiler (save it for last); the sets, acting, costumes, accents all bring it alive in glorious technocolor, the film is a classic in its own right. For example Pip and the tambourine seems incongruous in the book but makes sense in the film, and the preachers pulpit visualized with Orson Wells delivering "The Sermon" is as good as it gets.The novel is written in the Romanticsm tradition (cf. Lord Byron, Sir Walter Scott, "Les Miserables") and the language is full of symbolism and subtle layers of meaning. Yet, strangely, Melville turned this emotional, poetic style to a near documentary treatment of what is otherwise a fairly dry subject in minute detail. It's like writing poetry about the details of the nuclear power industry from backhoes to graphite rods to cooling ponds. Yet somehow it worked, the immersion is so complete, the details so real and "true of the thing" (Melville) that the main storyline becomes all that much more credible and powerful. The story its self is not that complex or even original (it's based on a Shakespeare tragedy) but the symbolic depth of the language, truthfulness of the details, and mythological power of the characters (Moby Dick and Ahab in particular) combine to make this "strange sort of a book" (Melville) a canonical work
Stunning book on culture and worldview... Godawa's book is a must-read for those who are interested in the meshing of culture, worldview, and the arts
Prose with a unique flavor. Other reviews have given the outline of the narrative, but a good way to convey the strength and variety of the writing - not always cynical, as some suggest - is to follow the example of the reviewer who quoted the first line as a touchstone. (Sell the apples by offering a free bite.)  In that respect, here are a few more snippets -"Good and evil keep very exact accounts" said the Centaur, " and the face of every man is their ledger."""...I wonder now if any of you gentlemen [he is talking with four archangels in heaven... never mind] can give me news of that Lisa who used to be my wife?"  He described her; and they regarded him with compassion."But he does not only talk of emotion in terms of a contrast between cosy, if imperfect, domesticity, and casual eroticism. He acknowledges passion. Queen Anaitis says:"For I, and none but I, can waken that desire which uses all of a man, and also wastes nothing, even though it leave that favoured man for ever after like wan ashes in the sunlight."   To me that ranks with Racine's famous "Venus toute entire  sa proie attache."Incidentally, an amusing example of that casual eroticism which got the book into so much trouble is when Chloris is somewhat alarmed by his *staff* and therefore  "Jurgen hid his staff where Chloris could not possibly see it."  You can see where that could cause problems in the 1920's. The great enforcer Comstock had only died a few years before and his "Society for the Suppression of Vice" was active.  Today it rates nothing more than a mild chuckle and an appreciation of an alternative to biological detail
very informative. I guess vampires really do exist..but instead of sucking blood they suck your energy. Knowingly or not.  I experience some of the symptoms they said to look out for like being tired after dealing with certain people. It also shows techniques for cleansing.  I liked it
Worked for me. As a relatively new archer. I found the simple explanations defining the fundamentals to be extremely helpful. My son and I shoot 3D targets which simulates hunting, as well as target shooting for fun indoors. My scoring improved tremedously and when I do falter, I simply return to the fundamentals.I recommend this for any instinctive shooter and would like to find a distributor in Canada for shooting friends as I don't want to lend my copy out
I'm a fan. Kurt Vonnegut knows how to draw your attention, and it's often only after you've finished the book that you realize the level of seriousness that he was trying to portray.Having read Slaughterhouse-Five, Breakfast Of Champions, and A Man Without a Country, I was excited when heard about this one from my friend Eric.It's about a guy writing about the day the bombs were dropped on Heroshima and Nagasaki.  He's also telling his story of how he converted to Bokononism.In real life, Vonnegut is a notable humanist, and the cyncism of man-made religion is evident in these pages.  Bokonon is a religious leader who follows a few basic steps to creating a good religion.  He lives life as an outlaw voluntarily, and he admits from the beginning of the Books Of Bokonon that his religion is all lies.The plots seems to shallow out a bit in the middle (only slightly) but by the end you are flying through pages to find the ultimate fate of the wonderful and crazy characters.Dark humor on par with Catch 22, it is difficult to decipher what is meant as farce and what is absurd, but overall a highly entertaining read, and a very good take on organized religion
Fantastic Again. This book is cracking. Just like the Skinner I thoroughly enjoyed it. Took 3 days to read and that was only because of work food and sleep breaks!Dragon, and Ian Cormac are back... and this makes for some real fun. There's big, bigger, and biggest nasties roaming around, a good splattering (and i use that word with a chuckle) of violent death, a decent amount of sci fi, and a damn good story to boot.The last book I read of his was Cowl and it didn't feel quite like Neal was enjoying himself writing it. This one is different. Mind... if i wrote stuff like this.. i'd enjoy it too.One small note, if your a first time Asher buyer, i'd suggest picking up Line of Polity first. Its not absolutely needed, but it'd certainly give you a good grounding
A masterful achievement!. Tom Hopkins has set a standard to which all others must aspire.  This book is the epitome of good selling techniques and the lost art of just down right communicating in a language all interested parties can understand.Reginald V. Johnson, Author, "How To Be Happy, Successful And Rich
this is an excellent songwriting book. Jason Blume's "6 Steps to Songwriting Success: The Comprehensive Guide to Writing and Marketing Hit Songs" is an excellent songwriting book.  I've read just about all the songwriting books that exist and Jason's is one of the best. If I could only read one songwriting book, this one is it.Ande RasmussenEditor and Publisher of "Inspirations for Songwriters"past president of the Austin Songwriters Groupwww.AndeRasmussen.com
Very good first book on Jefferson. If you have read several other books on TJ, then this is probably not for you.  This is a very concise 200 page book that somehow covers his entire life in seemingly precise detail considering it's short length.  Very well written and difficult to put down.  I also liked it because it seemed objective - Bernstein discusses some of the negative attributes that some viewed Jefferson as having.  He also discusses the Sally Hemings issue at length.Great starter book on Jefferson.
Blood Red Horse. By: Kevin 12-7-05Title: Blood Red HorseISBN: 0-8027-8960-9Blood Red Horse by K.M Grant "You need three things to become a brave and noble knight: a war horse, a fair maiden, a just cause." When reading this book I found out that this quote is important because the book is about the knights. William De Granville gets a beautiful and red colored war horse named Hosanna. He has a fair maiden Ellie, but she is suppose to marry Will's older brother Gavin.  The cause is a great crusade to the Holy land. Blood will be shed, lives will be taken. In this historical fiction book you will travel with and you will see the lives of the De Granville's, the Father and the two sons, and what they went through in the crusade.  Why the knights went on the crusade is that they were called on from King Richard the Lionheart, also they were promised that they would go to heaven if they died in battle.Blood Red Horse was a page turner for me. I was interested through it all; it is a great story of the brothers of De Granville and the character Kamil linked to Saladin the enemy of the Christian knights. For me I connected to William De Granville the best, because I am like him in a way. When I love something so much I can't stand losing it. In this story it happens twice to Will, his father and also when Kamil takes Hosanna Will's war horse. The genre was historical fiction. I like reading historical data and books so anyone like me would probably like reading this book or anyone who wants a good book to read. My mind didn't wander off when I was reading this book.  Something that shocked me when I was reading this book was during the end of the book when the two armies faced off outside of Jaffe. Hosanna was struck by an arrow and Will was shocked, he started to pray with Kamil, Gavin, and Hal. They got Hosanna to a stable and revived the Great War horse that was inspiration for the Christian army. All in all this was a great book that should be read.
a true master of realism!!. Balzac's wit and and talent is simply unsurpassable!!As Lucien is manipulated by the rich aristocrats to the point of self distraction in order to pursue his talents in poetry, we learn the price of fame and status and condemn the aristocratic society where can be a fine line between pleasure and pain. Balzac's theme-like mythology- on the confilcs of high and low society is never aging..
Good introductory text and overview of the industry. I read From Alchemy to IPO for an MBA course on entrepreneurialism in the pharmaceutical industry. Given my background (undergraduate business, financial analyst role, limited in-depth scientific knowledge), I found this book to be a very useful and balanced guide to both the business and technical aspects of biotechnology.Robbins-Roth includes enough information on initial public offerings (IPOs) and merger activity among biotech firms to warm the hearts of the most resolute business student, but the drug discovery and development process is also covered in sufficient detail to give the lay reader an understanding for the operational challenges faced by firms in this sector.Add to this the competent yet necessarily superficial descriptions of more esoteric terms such as monoclonal antibodies and combinatorial chemistry, and you have a solid text that covers the industry and its ongoing challenges very well
Funny, Funny, Funny. I love the humor in this novel. It is so natural, and I found myself laughing out loud--all my myself! It's a feel good story, yet is not sappy. Read it! You'll love it
Magic, Unintended Consequences, and When All Seems Lost, a Happy Ending. One day, Sylvester Duncan, an endearing young burro whose hobby is collecting unusual pebbles, happens upon a truly extraordinary one. Not only is it particularly beautiful, but as Sylvester is soon to discover, it possesses powerful magical properties.Sylvester's intentions are good and he plans to make use of the power of the pebble to help others. Nevertheless, the use of magic quickly becomes tragic, and Sylvester finds himself in a desperate situation from which escape seems all but impossible.Reading this book to my daughters, I found myself on an emotional roller coaster ride, as the little donkey is extricated from his plight just as all hope is lost.This is an excellent book, beautifully illustrated, and clearly deserving of the Caldecott Medal which it won in 1970.
A great book for working girls. I bought Cash in the City based on a review that I read in the USA Today newspaper. I can say that I was not dissapointed. This book gives great tips for any hard working girl on saving money and getting ahead in tough economy. Truly a must read
Clinical Psychologist's review (with twins)--outstanding. I'm a Ph.D. and gay, coupled for 18 years.  We have twins via surrogacy (our daughters are now 10--yes, they are simply lovely).  I completely applaud Brooke's frankness and honesty of her horrid struggle through what I, as a man, have not undergone.  As a 16 year old, I left work early (as a pharmacy typist) to see "Blue Lagoon"--a fan, I suppose!  Hearing Brooke on CD is quite shattering to one's soul as well.  Thanks so much, Brooke.  Your honesty and integrity are highly appreciated
"The name of the little riddle is Revenge". The previous book in the series was good but left me with a somewhat bitter taste. The reason was the J.D. Robb plunged into the unnatural events genre alla Laurell K. Hamilton. Since I enjoy the work by both authors, I would rather see each one of them write about that which they "know" best. This is why I was pleasantly surprised when in this book I found no references to events outside the boundaries of the futuristic world of 2058.Finally, the year 2058 is coming to an end, and it is unbelievable how much has happened in just a few months: Lieutenant Eve Dallas and Roarke meeting and getting married, Eve remembering crucial events from her childhood, Mavis seeing her career surging forward, and many others. The current case involves a serial killer that punishes people that have strayed from the path of the Lord. The first victim Eve finds was not only killed, but also tortured savagely. To complicate matters further, the victim is an old friend of Roarke, from his time in Ireland, when Eve's husband was involved in certain activities that would not be appreciated by Eve.In the case of the second victim, the killer's intentions become a little clearer, since he calls Eve and gives her a clue useful for finding the victim before the time of death. So now it is personal, since the killer wants Eve as an opponent and the second victim is also a friend of Roarke. The relationship between Eve and Roarke is put to the test, since Roarke's secrets from his past may aid Eve in the investigation, but these secrets make him criminally liable. Is Eve more concerned about justice than about keeping her husband? Things really heat up when Sommerset, Roarke's faithful servant, becomes a suspect in the investigation.The quality picks up considerably compared to "Ceremony in Death", with Robb focusing on what she does best and also limiting the passionate scenes to more reasonable levels. These had gotten a little bit out of hand in previous works in terms of their frequency and lack of variation in their development. Now the author creates a much better balance, presenting the scenes for those that crave them, but not repeating them so much so as to make the book a little boring. Hopefully, the quality of the series will remain at this level until the end.
From Bad Cook to Good Cook. I was possibly one of the worst cooks on the planet until I discovered Giada De Laurentiis and bought 'Giada's family dinners' book.  It truly inspired me to enjoy not only the cooking but also the preparation of the food.  It's georgously glossy with lots of lovely photos and the recipes are so simple to follow that I have so far failed to produce a disastrous result which in itself is a small miracle.  All of the ingredients used are easily available. The suggested menus are also a great idea especially for someone who needs all the help I can get.  One of my favourite recipes is the Lasagna Rolls and whoever heard of grilling lettuce? - but it works!  I would also recommend Giada's "Everyday Italian" book for all the same reasons plus the fact that the Vodka Sauce is heavenly.  Thank you Giada, I'm no longer scared of the kitchen
Conjures up Images that Stay with You. His prose is excellent, but his poetry (the black riders / war is kind) is what stays with me.  The striking images, dark humor and subversive fight against authority bring me back to the book decade after decade.  These aren't Shakespearean sonnets; if he was born a hundred years later he would be channeling his raw feelings into writing lyrics for Rage Against the Machine.  His poetry seems so modern it is hard to reconcile it with the completely different feel of The Red Badge of Courage and his splendid Spanish American War reporting
Warm and Charmimg. This book is is full of adventure and imagination. I would recommend this book to any parent or grandparent because of it's content, charm, sense of action, and the wonderfully articulated paintings that give the manuscript direction and life. The book promotes family time, quiet time, and the wonderful comraderie between grandparent and grandchild. The writing was fluid and easy to recite, and the illustrations were filled with vibrant figures, landscapes, and color--lots of warm color!This book was well worth my money. My grandchild and I read it each time he comes to visit
&quot;Zelda,&quot; By Nancy Milford. I absolutely adored this book. It is extremely depressing at times to read considering the life of the woman the book is based upon, but other than that, it was fascinating. Milford' writing style is unique as well as informative and quite objective. The details about Zelda's life could only come from an author who has done her research. I would definetly recommend this book
A Second Grader's Review. The Chocolate Touch teaches the lesson not to always think about yourself. During the story John kisses his mother and she turns into chocolate.   I liked it when John admitted that he was too greedy, and is willing to give up the chocolate touch in order to save his mother.  I think this book is terrific!Sara
As for accomodation guides ... Hi all -I note that people have mentioned this guide is short on accomodation listings. The New Zealand Automobile Association (AA) and a company called Jasons both provide very detailed accomodation guides which you can pick up in NZ when you arrive. I think both of these are actually free too.Hopefully useful information from a resident Kiwi ... enjoy your travels
A Wonderful Novel. Charles Frazier's Cold Mountain changed me.  As a writer, he really showed me how much I need to learn.Mr. Frazier's bold use of period music throughout the novel has inspired me to reach deeper into research for my own books.  Beyond that, his careful, precise use of language kept me hooked throughout the pages of this wonderful story.  I enjoyed the cadence and the way new words from that era captured my thinking.  I say "new" but they're really old words that have evolved or dropped from modern usage.Deep in the heart of this rich, colorful narrative you'll find a tender love story.  You'll also find the land lovingly described in a rich tapestry woven together as only Mr. Frazier seems capable of these days.The war and it's brutality is described in some detail, but it only serves as the backdrop to Inman's struggle to return home to his true love and the country he knows and loves.  Being a person that loves the mountains and desires a simpler life, I found myself identifying with Inman from the very beginning.While the film was okay, forget it and buy the book.  There is no way to translate to film what Mr. Frazier has accomplished with the language and the music.  Simply put, I love the way he describes the sound of the music.  Try and describe the sound of music sometime.  It's not easy.  Especially the type of music described here.There are many surprises in this novel, but from my perspective, there is no way a thinking person can read this novel and NOT walk away a little bit richer, a little bit more fulfilled, and having their view of the world altered just a tiny bit.Obviously I recommend this novel.  In my first novel, only one novelist made the acknowledgements portion of my book.  That person is Charles Frazier.  Thanks for the lessons, Mr. Frazier.
Wonderful and beautiful. This is one of the best purchases I have ever made from Amazon.  The book is one we give for birthday's all the time now.  My 4 1/2 year old loves the book and my husband and I both enjoy reading it.  The watercolor is beautiful and the storyline simple and compelling.  The retelling of these old chinese stories is done in a wonderfully accessible way for both kids and adults.  I strongly recommend it.
Koko love, Koko good. The story of Koko, the gorilla who knows sign language, and her kitten, Ball, is told by Penny Patterson, her owner and mentor.  Koko loved books about cats, and one day, she got a little gray, tailess kitten of her own.  Koko named the kitty All Ball.  There are wonderful photos of Koko cuddling and playing with Ball.  Looking at them, it's easy to see that humans don't have a monopoly on love.  A sad part leads to a happy ending for the wonderful Koko, who is now 31 years old. This book is especially recommended for anyone learning sign language
WHAT THE WORLD NEEDS NOW. The Skin You Live In is a wonderful book for a world full of children who need to feel special and good about themselves.  Everyone looks different on the outside, but the basic human is the same on the inside.  This teaches children and adults with rhyme and colorful pictures, about being themselves and accepting others for themselves. WE live in a world where hate,fear and prejudice are still around.  Please stop the cycle by reading to your child and instilling in him the joy of all the different children in the world.
Haunting Ending. I thoroughly enjoyed this book.  As with all of Ms. Didion's books, I take  my time with them, to truly cherish her writing style.  I am a huge fan of  her use of characterization, as well as her use of grammer.  (Besides this  book, I regularly recommend Play It As It Lays and Miami, two other great  books by Ms. Didion.)  Everytime I think of this book, I think of how the  brave narrator, in the course of the developments of the novel, regrets,  with the last line in the book, the opening statement she made in the  book's lead.  One of the all-time best books I've ever read, you have got  to give this book a read, too
Review on Catwings, a GREAT (but short) book by Ursula Le Guin. Hi! You can call me StoryMaker. I just read Catwings, a wonderful book by Ursula Le Guin. I checked it out from the library just the other day ago. It is a wonderful book that starts out about a cat named Mrs. Jane Tabby, a tabby cat that lives in the alley. She is VERY surprised when her kittens are born, because - guess what - the kittens have WINGS! However, one day, Jane thinks she knows why her kittens have wings - she can't afford to live in the noisy, dangerous alley any longer, and the least she can do is give her kittens a chance to escape. One day, Jane tells her kittens to fly far, far away. After some weeping, the four wonderfully winged cats fly away, as their mother instructed. If I continue this, I will litter my little review with plot-spoilers, so I better stop. Anyways, the story of Catwings is extremely great, however it is probably the shortest chapter book I ever read. Only 40 pages total! This book's reading level is pretty low, and if you're a mother who wants to get your kids to read longer books, you probably don't want to depend on Catwings to sasify your teaching needs unless you want to get a child to read thier very first chapter book. Another complaint is that there's a tiny bit of bloody talk on one page. However, the plot and pictures are so good that this book still is a full 5 star book. Signed, StoryMaker. "Gotta trust the kid's review!
November 7, 2006 Election Adds More Evidence to Support Right Nation Thesis. The fascinating thing regarding the election held only two days ago was the alleged conservatism of a number of Democratic Party candidates.  Some were anti-abortion, pro-gun, strongly against illegal immigration, and desire victory in Iraq.  Are they conning the voters?  We will find out soon enough.  Nonetheless, they didn't run as liberals!  An affirmative action measure was even resoundedly rejected in the Democrat dominated state of Michigan.  Admittedly, the Republicans lost control of both the U.S. Senate and the House of Representatives---but newly elected Virginia senator and Viet Nam war hero James Webb will probably irritate his left-wing Democrat cohorts.  British journalists John Micklethwait and Adrian Wooldridge wrote Right Nation before the 2004 election.   They clearly saw that a decent size majority of American voters substantially embrace conservative themes.  At this point in time, there is little evidence that explicit and unambiguous liberalism will stage a comeback.  Liberal politicians will often have to pretend to be conservative.  This almost assuredly will continue to be the case as long as Islamic nihilism threatens the globe.  Sadly, widespread economic illiteracy somewhat protects Democrat politicians.  What happens if more voters are converted to the economic doctrines of Milton Friedman and Ludwig von Mises?  Will the Democrats face oblivion?  Right Nation may be slightly dated.  It is, however, worthy of your time if you are trying to better understand the future political trends of the United States.David ThomsonFlares into Darknes
Easy read highly encouraging. This is a wonderful compliment to the book Heaven.  It gives wonderful stories to illustrate the greatness of heaven.
What was it like to be a cowboy on cattle drives?. This book has the answers.  Exciting stories, concise writing (too concise sometimes).  Siringo is honest about his faults.  He obviously tries to capitlize on his tangential involvement with Billy the Kid (whom he knew and admired).  Ever wished you could have a beer with a real Texas cowboy who was there when the cattle drives started?  Well, here's your chance
A must read. This is a must read for any Paulsen fan.  Boys will probably find it more interesting.  Paulsen tells the true stories that inspired the actions in the Brian books--from crazy moose to monstrous mosquitoes.  This was fascinating reading because it was TRUE
A Masterpiece. This is the defining book on the man who defined the game that defined America in the early 20th century.  The Big Bam is a wonderful set piece about Ruth and the times in which he lived (and shaped to a large degree). The anecdotes about the Babe are insightful and entertaining, the narrative is lively and lucid, and the whole is greater than its parts.  I came away with a keen sense of the man--that he was a perpetual adolescent whose enormous talent helped transform baseball from "chess on grass" to the modern power game via the home run.
Ok book. I think the reviews so far are a little unfair. This is really a pretty decent book, and for its price, it does justice. You will be able to get Hibernate up and running and get over all the basics with this book alone
the real life. its the best book ever. even tho its about a spanish girl and spanish religions, its really good for anyone to read. i read it and i couldnt think of anything else. ezperancas experiences happen to a lot of girls. i think its a book that everyone should read
Best Description of a Marine I've read. Page 58 has one of the best descriptions of the type of person who becomes a Marine.  Kopeland made me proud to be a Marine.
Absolutely fabulous!. This is a splendid chronicle of a remarkable career, though I can't help but wonder if Evans wouldn't have been happier if he had just learned to love himself for who he is
the new one. I want another like it. Mr braver...please let us know when you are gonna write one as good as this. Does anyone else think this would make an awesome movie?!!??I DOJami
The Best. So readable. A great effort at giving the "big picture" of Europe. Most European history books are lamentable as to their content on anything east of Germany. This one isn't. It aims to be balanced, which of course is quite upsetting to the reviewers who did not get their standard "half truths about half of Europe" rehash of how superior Western Europe is to the "New Europe".
Great resources for all financial professionals. As a new financial manager I was searching for a book which will show me  to prepare a budget and understand a budget process.  No doubt  understanding budget is the most immportant role in this field and this  book I found was most helpful.  I strongly recommend this to all finaltial  professionals
Library Lil thrilled our second grade. I am currently interning as a school librarian. I read to second grade, but I think it would appeal to a wider age group as well. Lil is all about books, and the details illustrated by Kellogg are as always, wonderful. My only issue w/the book is the pool table in the tavern. I think the story would have been the same w/an arcade center or pool hall,not a tavern complete w/bartende
Very enjoyable!. Honest, humorous, well written.  Ms. Baez dosen't pull any punches as she shares the story of her career and escapades with her readers.  If you are a Baez fan you will enjoy this book.  I had no idea that Joan was such an accomplished writer.  I wish she'd write more
The Barrowers. It was really great i loved it it showed me the meaning of true friends and that it's okay to  be a little differen
A nice light De Lint... Yarrow is one of his less complex stories, but that doesn't make it any less enjoyable.  The idea of an author being able to tap into an &quot;otherworld&quot; to gain story material is a notion I really wish were true
Whirlwind of a read. Palast bares it all. Put me through all 5 stages of mourning- from disbelief to anger to despair
Excellent Reading. This book is a great read. A poignant account from a group of WWII airborne veterans, not high-ranking staff officers, that experienced the inhuman realities of war. But more than that, the underlying message, as the book was appropriately titled, was a group of young men with eclectic backgrounds and aspirations came to be brothers. I would be doing the book injustice if I tried to write an accurate synopsis of it, and by accuracy not only do I mean the historical facts but also the human emotional triumphs and travesties that is conveyed in this work. I'll let the author and accounts from the various members of Easy Company, speak for themselves. Get this book, it's definitely one to add to your library
Bodansky and his "think tank" outhinking about everyone i've read. Bodansky's books are to my opinion the BEST books written on middle east politics,at times you have to wonder where all the information comes from.Obviously he has contact with inside sources in the middle east,who know what is going on and he is not afraid to say what needs to be said about state sponsored terrorism and how it is cynically used without care or consideration for those whom it disastrously harms.At times you have to laugh at Bodansky's blunt style in assesing mideast politician and dictators motives and methods of operation.While you may have to disagree with some of Bodansky and his information sources you can't deny that even if he might be wrong at times,he's not far off at all.As a matter of fact like Dennis Hopper said of Kurtz in Apocolypse Now,"he may be crazy,but he may be right"!!I would finally say that someone has figured the mideast situation out enough to make sense of it,if that could ever be.I use Bodansky's books all the time when I see a news story on CNN and I have to know what Bodansky has to say about it.Read him cover to cover or use the back index for select topics either way "You Win"!!You're as close to an expert as you can come,now if you can just remember what you read and if you can find someone who'll listen to you,like Cassandra.As I read this book i became aware that Bin-Laden is just the tip of the iceberg on the troubled politics of the middle east.Bodansky obviously uses the Bin-laden sideshow as a forum to present even more alarming facts about state sponsored terrorism complete with their networks and multi-layers of deniability and financial sources. He offers solutions as well
Exactly what I needed to read. This book really hit home.  I was so relieved to see someone else had struggled thru and survived.  Nancy Hagener's honesty is so refreshing.  Thank you!!!!!!!!!!
A book for pleasure and engagement. I absolutely adored this book.  Philosophy, most would agree, isn't read for entertainment, but edification of some sort.  It enlightens, it provokes, it challenges, but it feels, at times, like eating spinach - delicious for its nutrients rather than its unadulterated taste.  Alain de Botton, however, manages to make philosophy relevant and readable.  No, I take that back...his philosophizing is positively delightful!Status Anxiety is an examination of the incessant concern of one's standing in the world.  De Botton suggests that we desire two kinds of love; the love of our close friends and family and the love of the world at large.  This need to be adored by humanity is a subject that the sophisticated and well mannered among us are loath to admit or discuss.  It may be crass to speak of, but people tend to value themselves and their accomplishments only as much as other people do. We assign ourselves the value we see in the mirror of other people's approval.The frequent externalizing of our self-worth, the author argues, is the cause of enormous human anxiety.Without doing Alain de Botton the disservice of butchering his well-organized tour through human status anxiety and the possible solutions offered by philosophy, art, and culture, I will merely commend this wonderful book to all.
Nephilim Unveiled. I bought this book (2006 version)at B&N on the spot I was so impressed with it. The author clarifies the Biblical issue of the Nephilim using  the Book of Enoch as well as archeology... without going into the Icke reptilian thing, nor does he borrow anything from Sitchin and the Annunaki-- which amazed me in itself!He also clarifies what I had read in John Keel's book Mysterious Beings (esp. Chapter 24), and Chuck Missler's book Alien Encounters: The Secret Behind the UFO Phenomenon. I think they'd agree with Mr. Heron -- we don't need ETs to explain anything about the UFO issue, the origins of man issue, nor the issue of strange things around the earth (eg, Mothman).Fast reading, riveting, and worth the time and money
Slice of Life with a Twist. This meticulously observed slice of life showing the writer's motivations is Roth's Bildungsroman of a fresh new writer (a young Roth, no doubt) who has recently won an award  studying for a few days in the country at the feet of his hoary idol (Saul Bellow?). But it is apparently Roth whose nature is incorrigibly promiscuous. The older writer has not only a devoted but aging wife but a young female houseguest chronicling his life along with the protagonist. Literary conversations alternate with veiled references to the erotic frustrations of matrimonial imprisonment combined with the lure of the fetching houseguest. The protagonist is told by the older writer ("It's like being married to Tolstoy," he says following his dejected wife out into the snow after an argument) that one does not simply leave a woman after thirty years because one wishes to see a new face while drinking his orange juice in the morning.  Roth's literary erotic imagination goes to work in the book's middle after hearing snippets of a conversation that leads the reader to think, and him (or his protagonist Zuckerman) to imagine, that the fetching woman is the most famous Jewish writer of all time.  And, no, he is not referring to God.  A clever literary coming-of-age novel with a highly imaginative twist (I won't reveal it here) as well as the usual Rothian semitic and sexual obsessions-a slice of life with a twist
Excellent for excercises. This book has TONS of exercises!  If you are looking for THE encyclopedia of bodybuilding exercises, this IS it.  I have tried Arnold's guide, but found this one much better for exercise form and variety.  It even talks about potential for injury in some exercises.  The illustrations are very good and somewhat easy to follow.  The book is organized in sections by body part and the exercises are rated by difficulty.There is a very informative section on eating and health, too.  This book was obviously created for weight trainign, focusing on the bodybuilder.  There is a section on posing, and history on a couple great bodybuilders.Pearl doesn't try to go overboard on the motivational stuff, either.  Short, sweet, and to the point.This is a very good manual and reference for anyone who wants to build their own program or is very interested in bodybuilding/sculpting.  Using the thousands of exercises in this book, you will be able to work all angles of all muscles.The only reason I gave it 4 instead of five stars, is that the book does not give much startup information for beginning bodybuilders as far as how much weight to start out with, stretching, and lack of illustrations of some basic exercises that new wieghtlifters may not be familiar with.  Getting Stronger (also by Bill Pearl)is actually the book I used when I started lifting 12 years ago and it covered those basics.  For the experienced, however, Keys to the Inner Universe is an outstanding manual!  Between the two, you will not need a third book on weight training.
A haunting yet true account of the horrors of Black hatred. This book is an accurate account of the horrors and stereotypes that surrounded Diaspora Africans in America.  It is my hope that every African American read this bok, and treasure it as I have
Taste the World!. Many of my family's favorite foods are "ethnic" so we thought we'd dive right in and discover what else the world is eating that we haven't tried yet. Just looking through the pages makes you want to start cooking! We'll be better prepared now, to dodge the familiar "What's for dinner?" with an enthusiastic response and a taste adventure. Children of all ages can prepare most of the dishes, and there are activities and trivia from several countries represented in the book. We decided to buy it after briefly looking through a library copy
Once Were Warriors. I'm the author of AKA DOCTOR. Alan Duff's writing of this book and the sequel, What Becomes of the Broken Hearted, grabbed me by the shirt collar with both fists. Alan opened my eyes to do my own research of the Maori culture. I have friends in Nelson, New Zealand who helped in this research. Alan hits close to home, with this riveting insight of the Maori culture. A violent, hard hitting story of world magnitude. My hidden emotions were brought to the surface by the movie. A must see
A Must for All Puppy Owners. First of all I have to respond to an earlier reviewer who says that Shirlee Kalstone doesn't know anything about dogs and suggests that people should instead read a book by someone who does -- namely, Stanley Coren.  I'm still laughing over that.  Stanley Coren!?  It's widely known in dog circles that Coren gets almost everything about dogs exactly backwards (read my review of THE INTELLIGENCE OF DOGS for further elucidation)!  It seems to me, from reading this person's review, that she somehow misunderstood the simple information in Kalstone's book and instead of admitting her own inability to follow instructions, she blames the author.Okay, now to my review of this very useful housebreaking guide, one that I recommend to all my clients with new puppies.  I have to say that except for Kalstone's occasional forays into punishment, via the alpha theory (which we now know is totally false), this book gives you almost everything you need to know about housetraining.  The fact that she's broken-down the various schedules any dog owner might need, allowing for various work schedules and life-styles, makes this book a must-have for every owner of a new puppy.  (It's why I recommend it to all my clients -- it saves them and me the time of sitting down and writing up a schedule of their own.)She also gives good advice on how to acquaint any puppy with a crate, and gives the info (that most other books don't) that a puppy's emotional and physical development prevent him (or her) from really learning this stuff before about 3 1/2 to 4 months of age.  Just please, please, ignore everything she says about being the pack leader, being alpha, etc., and you and your puppy will do just fine.By the way, most of the information in this book (and a little more) is also contained in Kevin Behan's NATURAL DOG TRAINING, with just one omission: Kevin doesn't include the actual training schedules that you can rip out of the Kalstone book and paste on to your refrigerator door!I rarely give ANY training book 4 stars.  Yay, Shirlee Kalstone
African American Spirituality. Peter Paris has written a well-reasoned treatise exploring the relationship between African spirituality and African American spirituality. Whereas other writers see more discontinuity between the two, Paris perceives continuity of beliefs and practices between African religiosity and African American religiosity.Reviewer: Robert W. Kellemen, Ph.D. is the author of "Beyond the Suffering: Embracing the Legacy of African American Soul Care and Spiritual Direction." He has also authored "Soul Physicians," "Spiritual Friends," "Martin Luther's Counseling," and "Biblical Psychology."
Excellent - a Mind opener. After reading this book and listening to the audio tape as well...I must say I was transformed. I used her tape to guide my meditations, during which I had a vision of my sister in the hospital. I called home and found  out my sister was in emergency surgery and had almost died. If we just open  our mind, it's amazing what we can see
Colorful and well-written. On one hand this is a product manual hyping what "Toys in Babeland" sells but it is also a great example of sexual information made fun and readily available.  The photographs are excellent and well laid out so the book is pleasing visually.  The information is well-written and well-researched with opinions back by experience and facts.  Contrary to the store's name, there is not just toys and information for women.  There are also nice little stories about how the store has affected people's lives, both customers and workers.  I just wish the resource list was longer
Making Aromatherapy creams and lotions. I really enjoyed the book.  I found that the book was explained in logical sequence with plenty of background information as to why you will use one oil over another depending on what your desire is.  The book is not one where you can flip through it and AH! there's the recipe I want.  You will need to read and understand what Donna Maria is trying to teach you first and then mix up your own concoction.  However, she does include many of her own favorites.  Otherwise, read the book and then pick your ingredients from each of the list (similar to ordering from a chinese restaurant) and chances are, you will have a nice product. I would write down your ingredients while you are making the product, because it will probably come up quite well and you will have to sell it
A Must Have. I bought this recipe book when I really did not have the money to invest in recipe books. Now that I can buy the pricier books I find myself constantly returning to this old favorite. Very very good recipes. Lowfat goodies made with easy variations. I highly recommend it
Thrilling and dark sci-fi. I finally got around to reading the book "Jurassic Park" by Michael Crichton. Paleontologists Dr. Alan Grant and Dr. Ellie Sattler, chaos mathematician Dr. Ian Malcolm and lawyer Donald Gennaro are invited by Hammond to his resort island off Costa Rica. To their astonishment, they discover that Hammond and his InGen Corporation using fossil DNA, supercomputers and gene sequencers have been able to clone dinosaurs at the Jurassic Park. The group is also joined by Hammond's grandchildren Tim and Lex Murphy. They all set out on a park ride to check out the dinosaurs when all hell breaks loose.The story in the book is deeper, darker and much different than the movie. I hadn't expected this. The book is just as nailbiting as any Crichton book and I ended up being awake until 5AM (and yet another weekend sleep went down the drain). Malcolm with his chaos theory ramblings is highly entertaining. There are more varieties of dinosaurs introduced in the book than in the first movie. Crichton's books always have some smartass way of division into sections. This book is divided into "iterations", with each one slowly progressing to form a fractal accompanied by Malcolm's quotes alluding to the same. The underlying message of the book is that genetic engineering without careful understanding of the consequences can be devastating. Though written back in 1990, the book's takes on genetic engineering are surprisingly accurate seen in today's context. This is an excellent pop sci-fi thriller
Wonderful view of Heaven and Hell. I have read alot of classic poetry, and it is great to read one in its native language,which is very beautiful. After reading this I can see, and you will be able to see why this is one of the most well known pieces of literature around. This along with The Divine Comedy (which I recommend) are responsible for many peoples present views of Heaven and Hell
Flat out amazing. I have owned this book for over 10 years now and have cooked most everything in it. I'm telling you honestly that I have yet to cook something out of here that doesn't get snacked on constantly or rave reviews from people that visit. My original copy of this fell apart from being used so much! What I wound up having to do was cut the spine off of the book and rebind it myself.I'm honestly very surprised that this book doesn't have more reviews than it does. Not only are the recipes wonderful to eat, they are fun to read. The author adds fun descriptions and background information with every recipe. Reading these will actually make you want to cook them. Almost every recipe book that I've read since has been disappointing in this respect. This book raised the bar!Actually there is one recipe that I haven't been able to cook very well, and that is the biscuit. I've dedicated entire days here and there to do nothing but cook batches trying to get it right, but they always come out hard and don't taste very good.
My First Hoffman...and I'll be back for more!. My friend recommended this book to me and it came at a perfect time when I was looking for something to get totally engrossed in.  Warning:  Do not pick this up if you do not have time to finish it!  It's a page turner.March Murray returns to her hometown in MA after being away for 19 years.  She knows that she will have to face her past and most importantly her first (and only) "love" and she's not sure what will unfold.  The book takes a turn towards the end.  Great character description - you'll feel what the characters are feeling
Good for leisure reading, to unwind a bit. I thought this book was not as bad as some of these reviews suggest.  I didn't think there needed to be  a "point" Tyree needed to prove but that it was interesting enough just following this man's life story.I bought it at an airport and read most of it on my roundtrip flights.  It kept my attention, except toward the last 1/4 of the book.It is nice to see a book about black people just dealing with relationships, life, and managing themselves. Much better than having to use graphic sexuality to maintain reader's interest as I've noticed a lot of authors doing
One of the best books on the subject. I cannot say enough about this extraordinary book. Everyone who is interested in the environment that led to the rise of Christianity will find this book fills in many details. Brown's analysis of the decline of classical Greco-Roman civilization is well done, concise, and comprehensive. I highly recommend this book
An Exciting New View of Elementary Particles. I enjoyed this book because it developed an exciting new approach to quantum field theory that appears to solve the divergence issues that have plagued quantum field theory since its inception. The method proposed brings in new quantum dimensions that are only evident at super-high energies. The usual Standard Model of elementary particles and classical gravity are the &quot;low energy&quot; sector. The book is written in textbook style with a thorough description of the features of this new type of QFT. However the reader is assumed to have some knowledge of quantum field theory. Although I was concerned about the integrals over quantum operators that appear in the development, the fact that the author developed the theory using both a canonical quantization approach and a path integral approach convinced me of its correctness. Even the Fadeev-Popov ghosts fell within the framework of the approach! A thoroughly enjoyable book that presents exciting original results
Destruction and pain are the formula for LB #5: Apollyon. What a mixed bag this book was. it was typical Left Behind fare: 400 pages of theorizing, agonizing, and evil antichrist mischief in the face of God's chosen people; but still, things are slow in the LB universe at this point, so while it is entertaining, nothing really of note happens in this book. Nothing concrete, anyway. This is the book, though, where a LOT of things get rolling, though.Thumbs up for Apollyon
A terrifying and unique Supernatural story. This novel has a wonderfully unique premise. The themes of the darker aspects of Greek Myth, sinister woods and what lurks within them, unreality right beneath our world, make for a delightfull story. While the plot is a  bit mundane towards the center of the book, overall this is compensated  for. If you've ever let your mind wander into the origins of ancient myths,  and have been a bit shocked by what you imagine this is the book for you.  The sexual aspect of the supernatural events is key, and overall adds to  the one's attraction and repulsion to the concepts beneath the surface of  this book. Machen was akcknowledged by HP Lovecraft as a major influence,  and one sees this here. Also, Spare's illustrations, while not done for the  book, are quite appropriate to convey its themes. Highly reccomended
Oh Mother!. Moms have a way of embarrassing us. They don't mean it of course. They just do it accidentally in public places. And from what I've heard they still do it long after you've moved out and started your own family. But we all still love them.Savannah (from Savannah) is alarmed to hear that her mother has chained herself to the monument of the 10 commandments outside of the courthouse. She can't believe that her beauty queen mother, who always has to look perfect, is willing to sit outside in public in the same clothes for days. Thus Savannah tries to distance herself away from her mother, dealing instead with a homeless lady who keeps asking her for food, a beauty queen killing her boyfriend and a new female reporter who's caught the eye of every guy in town. Eventually, Savannah comes to realize her mother's stance and respects her.I liked how this story had Savannah come to better terms with her mother. In the first book, the reader is shown how the two are completely different. This story had Savannah finally understanding her mom, standing up for her, and learning to be proud of her. I found the scenes with Amber funny as usual. Between her rehearsed speech on Ronald Reagan and her chasing and beating up the purse snatcher I was in stitches. The scenes with the picnic with Grant was touching because it's hard to when someone you love has moved on with another. I was also relived that Savannah has decided to cut back on the coke. It's a wonder that she doesn't suffer from caffeine overdose or stained teeth!I'd recommend this book for anyone who likes chick lit, mother-daughter stories or Southern culture
Far, far better than the newest movie. Okay, I went into this book after seeing the remake of Haunting of House Hill. I've never seen the original and can only pray that it does more justice to the book.It's a short and easy read, but interesting. The characters don't seem too developed, but it is a ghost story, and I think it does it's job at being creepy.I've read The Lottery by Shirley Jackson, and plan on getting more of her stuff
A nice tale mixing Myth with Timetravelling. This book is great all the way through, following Jon Shannow trying to have a break from being himself.  Jon finds himself trying to go to the other side of a large wall where men have been trying to climb and pass  with no success, the land seems to be run by lion-men, men have been  mysteriuosly turned into walking lions and soon the great beasts of the  wild themselves.  The sword of God is an interesting part in the story as  the reader wonders how sword could be suspended in the air. Also the story  has a link with Atlantis as a gateway has opened between the past and the  present, a tidal wave aproaches Atlantis with the capabilities of  destroying the past and the future
Witty. Alexander McCall Smith's latest series introduces us to characters ranging from the egocentric Bruce whose full time job consists of taking baths and admiring his looks in the mirror to Irene, the neurotic mother who has encouraged her young son, Bertie, to learn Italian and the Saxaphone despite his protests and then there is Pat, the attractive college student on her 2nd Gap Year who recognizes the good in people despite falling in love with Bruce, albeit temporarily.  While I enjoyed all of the story lines and characters, I found the relationship with Pat and Domenica, her elderly neighbor, most interesting given that many young people dismiss the elderly as being boring and unworthy of their time which is so often not the case, as Pat recognized.Like other reviewers, the only potential downside to this book was the references to Scottish politics and customs that I couldn't relate to not having lived there... at the same time however, that is what makes it interesting because it opened my eyes up to another world which is the whole point of books in my opinion.
Very personal readings. I sometimes find poems in remarkable ways and these seem so personal, as if the poet had written them for me.   Such is the experience of other readers, and this book is filled with these personal accounts.  The accompanying DVD of 27 poems features an even greater view of the person reading their favorite poems.   Several of the poems of loss are most touching, and I thank those readers for sharing, particularly Olivia Milwards selection of Goethe's "The Holy Longing" and associated butterfly that came to her garden.Included are poems from everyone's favorite poets (multiple picks of Robert Frost, Emily Dickinson, and Shakespeare), but also lesser known (in United States) poets from other counties, such as Amichai from Israel, Evan Jones from Jamaica, or  Youssef from Iraq.   It is also striking the variety of occupations of those selecting the poems; there are construction workers, attorneys, soldiers, investment managers, and even a poet (Stanley Kunitz).
A true classic. I read this book while spending the summer backpacking around the Rocky Mountains. Anything that you carry around in a backpack for that long has to be worth the weight and this one definitely was.Thanks Eagle Man! :
Brings you Back in Time. This book really makes you feel like you are in Europe during the Middle Ages.  Although a little of the book is for younger children, most of it is appropriat for all ages.  All of the crafts are well explained.  The only  fault I find is that the books explaination of chess is off.  Other then  that, it is very worth while
One of the most wonderful books ever!. This is one of the most wonderfull books ever writen, no doubt. The story of the bible is the point of departure for a beautiful analysis of humanity, full of humour and grandeur. The book is big and one has to read it carefully to enjoy it completely. Every sentence is a jewel, every passage is full of simple life elements that wonder and links us to the past to a point were we conclude that being human is a universal experience, independent of time and space. This is all blended in with a carefull historical research, a detailed reading of the Bible and of the sacred texts. A masterpiece at its fully extent that is curiously not that popular in the english language
persuasive enough!. A perfect one-sided story carefully equipped with opinions of heavy-weighted thinkers elaborately designed to persuade, but one-sided nevertheless
How to predict what the consumer thinking about. First of all , i would like to thank Mr. baker for his greatest book and i  hope this book is a reference to all student who studying Buisness minior  marketing because in my college the American University in cairo we studied  a very bad book callled the consumer behavior. you do not understand the  book just the process of thinkning without explaination but when you read  this book you will see how the consumer buy and what is the motive that let  people buy and do not buy. so read and read when you meet any one wont to  buy any thing from you. have fun sayed omar( somar@aucegypt.edu
More than what it promises. This is more than a look at the development of the urban organization. It's an examination of society as a whole. This is one of the few books that actually covers all intresting areas of human social developmen, i.e  political science, religion, sociology, anthropology, economics, etc. The  book more than tells the story of the cities development, it explains why  today's society functions in the way it does
Engaging. Not as moving as some of my favorite books, but this was an engaging look into three generations of the Brangwen family in small-town England.  Interesting portrayal of the roles and rights off women in each generations and the repercussions of changing standards
Interesting collection of essays. While this book contains essays on the lesser discussed women of Dada, it also covers gender and identity in Dada - including Marcel Duchamp.  It is also worth pointing out that while most of the women covered are Dadaists, not all are.  Specifically, Georgia O'Keefe doesn't really fall into the Dada category.  I would recommend this for those interested in the intersection of gender and early twentieth century art.
A Profound Opening into the Origins of Love and Culture. I am sorry to be so blunt about this, but previous reviewers Sierra and whomi do not appear to have really grasped Winnicott's work in this book (Sierra really has no clue at all). I have to respond at some length. But better to just read the book.Winnicott (henceforward DWW) creates--in an enormous leap away from Freud--a vision of the complex and beautiful relationship of the infant and primary caregiver. In fact he speaks of the "mother infant dyad," rather than two separate persons during the first few months of life. From this union, if all goes well, the child gradual emerges and develops a sense of self through a process of disillusionment by the mother, in doses the infant can withstand.As this occurs, the child symbolizes the lost union with the mother in what DWW calls "transitional objects" and begins, with the comfort of these objects, to begin to play in what DWW calls the "potential space." We might call it the realm of culture, of love, and of religion. Only with successful caregiving does the child have a chance to fully develop as a person, and DWW shows, in loving detail and case histories, how this happens through the devotion of the mother.This is why DWW's work is vital not merely to psychoanalysts, but to every person on this planet. His work has influenced two generations of therapists, theorists, and educators and, indirectly, every one of us. Further, his work has increasingly been supported by developmental insights gained from attachment theory and other experimental and verifiable studies.I don't normally write reviews on amazon.com, but I could not let foolish misreadings by other reviewers stand unchallenged. Sierra's attitude is not only condescending, it is lazy. Enough said. As for whomi, I appreciate the thought there, but DWW *does* allow for gradual disillusionment through experience of the external world. If whomi missed it that does not mean it is not there. As for using Derrida to read DWW, I imagine that is useful. Go to it, if you like. But let's not forget that the work of Lacan is inconceivable without DWW, and the work of Derrida inconceivable without Lacan.DWW indisputably and deservedly stands as one of the most influential psychological thinkers of the 20th century. Further, his use of language is simple and yet always provocative, finding new depth and meaning in the simplest of words.Please consider reading DWW and judge for yourself.Franz Metcal
Wonderful Strategic Planning Tool. I found this text to be a useful tool in understanding the strategic planning process.  It was especially helpful due towards the public/nonprofit focus
Fun read. I had no idea that when I bought this book at the airport on a flight from London, I was buying one of the funniest and entertaining books I've personally read. Must read. Brilliant
Straightforward, good beginner information. This is actually a pretty good book for those first entering the realm of the Yoruba religion.  It has some good straightforward beginner information.I don't agree with every aspect of this book however - as I dont see the need to constantly compare our religion to others, our elemental energies to chakras, etc.  But simply because I don't agree with everything included does not change the fact that it is a good Yoruba primer
Must have!. If you are interested in animal behavior and welfare, this is a must have book. Very straightforward with several practical examples based on consistent scientific knowledge.
A guide which blends in teachings from the world's great spiritual thinkers with insights on health and lasting happiness. Kathleen Hall found great success in her life but had yet to identify a real purpose and meaning to it: her survey of relationships between mind, body and spirit results in a guide which blends in teachings from the world's great spiritual thinkers with insights on health and lasting happiness. Chapters discuss how to create and foster calm and serenity in daily life, use exercise to restore health and energy, and understand the impact of food choices on mental and physical well-being.
liked it. I really was happy to find these books by Robin Hobb I have really enjoyed all 9 books.
Kidder does it again. tracy kidder is an excellent down-hope/real-life author.  The biography here offered of the dedicated (obsessed?) physician attempting to extinguish TB world wide is fascinating and moving at the same time
Should be required reading for baseball fans. I must preface this by saying that I read this book after it was reccomended to me by the sports editor of a local paper.This book, and Veeck's life, are nothing short of amazing. In these times of high ticket prices and salaries, it is fasciniating to read about how Veeck bought and sold major league franchises, sometimes with little to no capital or cash to start with.Veeck is also the pioneer of the idea of going to a baseball game and being entertained. He came up with some of the wackiest and funniest promotions and ideas ever and they are all contained in this book. On top of that, he was a genuinely funny guy, which also comes across throughout the course of the book.Every baseball fan should read this book to realize exactly how much Veeck shaped the experience of going to a baseball game like we know it today
Not only a great writer but a wonderful person. I love the book and am impressed by the author in general
A Must for Hitchcock Fans. Daniel Spoto is well known for his fascinating biography of Alfred Hitchcock.  "The Art of Alfred Hitchcock" fleshes out The Master every bit as much as the biography, but in a different way.What makes this book a must for Hitchcock fans and, in particular, those interested in studying his mastery of the film craft, is that Spoto, bolstered by many interview hours with Hitchcock, is able to get inside a creative film genius' mind and give us an idea of how he explored his basic themes as well as the manner in which he manipulated audiences through exploiting his unique brand of suspense.  Spoto also gives us a look into the technical side of the master film craftsman, letting us know how he kept audiences mesmerized with compelling scenes such as the killing of Janet Leigh in "Psycho" and those incredible special effects in "The Birds" in which it appeared that the winged creatures were about to lay total siege to the previously serene Northern California town of Bodega Bay.In addition to what he actually did, Donald Spoto is also to be commended for something he did not do.  In so many retrospectives of film greats, be they directors or performers, authors believe in devoting an equal or relatively equal amount of space to every movie with which they were involved.  Thankfully Spoto did not do this, devoting greater attention to the classic Hitchcock movies that generated the most discussion among filmgoers and cinema historians.  Not surprisingly for those who have studied Hitchcock's films, Spoto regards "Vertigo" starring James Stewart and Kim Novak as Hitchcock's most complete and artistic work and explains why, providing excellent insight into the film in the process.Another film that continues generating widespread praise in the Hitchcock oeuvre for its technical genius and inventive plot and characterization is "Notorious" starring the dynamite team of Cary Grant and Ingrid Bergman.  Spoto covers this screen classic with comprehensive scrutiny.Spoto covers the wide sweep of Hitchcock's career.  We move from his beginnings in London in silent films and are finally transported to Hollywood and Hitchcock's impressive debut for producer David O. Selznick with "Rebecca"
A cheater exposed. If you are still blindly defending Barry Bonds at this point, you really should have your head examined, or at least your G.E.D. rescinded. "Barry Bonds never failed a drug test" might be the most idiotic phrase uttered since "walk-off home run" (or maybe "Free O.J."). It's time to pull your heads out of you-know-where, people. The guy put on 30 pounds of muscle during one off-season. You don't do this with a Soloflex and flaxseed oil. Think these "trainers" don't know their way around a urine test? Pull the other one.When news of the imminent publication of this book was revealed, Bonds and his lawyers didn't waste any time trying to suppress its' release. Hey Barry, if you're clean, then what's the problem? If this book is fabrication, then stick it out. Eventually, the truth will be revealed. And therein lies the problem for Mr. Bonds. Because it already has.If you still have any doubts about this book, let me dispel them. Read it. It's thoroughly researched, well written, and most of all, IMPORTANT. It had to be written, because this situation had to be exposed. I must say that I was stunned, but very pleased, that there were actually two men in San Francisco with the guts to investigate Bonds, let alone put their findings in print. This took great courage, because I wouldn't be surprised if these guys received death threats from knuckle-dragging fans.  I wish I could shake their hands and thank them personally for their efforts.To put it bluntly, Barry Bonds is a cheater, a disgrace to the legacy of the great men who have played Major League Baseball, and a miserable human being for good measure. He should receive nothing less than a lifetime ban from baseball, and all of his post-1999 numbers should be expunged from the books or, at the very least, printed in a bright red with this disclaimer--"*These statistics were achieved during what is known as the `steroid era' in MLB, and are not legitimate. Mr. Bonds has received a lifetime suspension." The same treatment should be extended to McGwire, Sosa, Giambi, Palmiero, etc. (If you want to throw the likes of Gaylord Perry and Mike Scott in there, be my guest, although to me, Vaseline and sharpened belt-buckles don't rise to the level of potent chemical enhancements). Anyone who reads this book with even the most elemental reading comprehension will come to the same conclusion. Or perhaps Bonds's "shrinking" numbers this year will be enough to convince you.
Awesome Book. I read pretty much everything I can find that is written about Heaven and what eternal life will be like. Randy Alcorn did a great job of telling what the Bible has to say on the subject and then he shares his own ideas and thoughts as well. Very factual and very inspiring. We may not know everything there is to know about life after death but this book will get you thinking. It also is excellent in refuting some of the old time traditional misconceptions about Heaven.  I highly recommend it
An Encyclopedia for Intercultural Understanding. In his SourceBook for Earth's Community of Religions, editor Joel Beversluis brings together the fruit of a lifetime of interfaith explorations.  Joel is an interfaith activist in contact with the many of the top groups in the world, and he works with hundreds of authors and  visionaries and religious people.  The SourceBook brings together a rich  array of insights on the work of interfaith activism, and is required  reading for anyone involved in interfaith work, or seeking to understand  the changes going on in religion today
Men of principle--even if it kills them. This book reads a little bit like a precursor to the novels of Ayn Rand. A group of men espouse almost impossible ideals, and then try to live up to them at any cost--or in this case, kill or die for them. The title refers to a group of well educated idealists at the turn of the century who are contract murderers, but only if they agree that the murder is morally justified. A potential client visits them and offers a contract--to kill the head of their agency. Strangely, the executive, Ivan Dragomiloff, finds this to be justified, sends out the order for his own death, and then spends the rest of the book in a deadly cat-and-mouse game with the men he has trained so well. This book was made into an entertaining, but not very deep, movie, around 1970, starring Oliver Reed, Telly Savalas, and Diana Rigg
Loved the book!  Did have to overlook some of the minutiae, though. This is a perfect book - educational, entertaining, strengthening.  The main character, Una, was at times restless, at times content, but always adventerous, brave, and in the end, a survivor.  It was a true page-turner, kept me entertained for weeks, and left me a more confident woman.  And I learned a lot about whaling
Great fun,for the readers rather than the characters. The Bauldalaire children are likeable,intelligent protagonists,but since their parents died in a horrible fire,their lives have been filled with misery and despair.The first installments in the series tell about their visits with three eccentric gaurdians(Uncle Monty,Aunt Josephine,and the wicked Count Olaf).Lemony Snicket is a mysterious and engaging narrator who dedicates each book to his lost love Beatrice (who seems to have died in a fire).This darkly humorous,wickedly entertaining series will appeal to children who enjoy the works of Roald Dahl (JAMES AND THE GIANT PEACH, MATILDA etc.)Like the children in Dahl's books, the Bauldalaires are surrounded by dimwitted adults,who believe nothing the kids say.This is an atmospheric,exciting series that will stretch reader's imagination while it enriches their vocabulary.
Another exemplary title in The Missing Manual series!. Even iPhoto veterans will appreciate the excellent coverage of new features offered in iPhoto 6 over previous versions of iPhoto.The first part of this book goes outside the iPhoto application itself and presents the basics of digital photography with brief discussions of camera selection, terminology and image capture techniques (in roughly 60 pages). Nice for a digital photography newbie, but fluff for those who already own any one of a multitude of books on digital camera photography.Parts 2 and 3 cover the majority of iPhoto's features in enough depth and detail to represent the missing manual moniker perfectly. This is great for relative newcomers to iPhoto, but some chapters will seem like a re-hash of the basics to an iPhoto veteran. Part 3's chapters cover the sweet spot of iPhoto 6's new features and their integration within the iLife '06 suite of products. It also makes a compelling case for purchase of iLife '06 if you don't already have it.Some of the most valuable information for the beginner and experienced user alike, can be found in the sidebar topics that cover gotcha's, FAQ's and power user tips. These are sprinkled throughout the book, and keep the reader's interest.Part 4 covers more advanced topics like using iPhoto to generate desktop backgrounds correctly, automation & scripting, and file management. I was hoping for much more depth on creative ways of using Automator and AppleScript with iPhoto 6, but then again this isn't a book on AppleScript or Automator.The last chapter on iPhoto file management skips talking about one of the biggest mistakes that many iPhoto users make. That is; mucking around with the iPhoto library files by renaming, relocating, and deleting files and folders directly in the Finder. Thus breaking the iPhoto database. From a troubleshooter's standpoint, I'd like to see the authors advise readers to resist the temptation to do this. It'd make a nice sidebar to their core discussion of managing iPhoto libraries and archiving. The appendix covers techniques to recover and/or rebuild the iPhoto database once broken and misbehaving.This book is a great reference to have at your side when working in iPhoto, especially when using it as part of an iLife '06 workflow. Highly recommended
Ma-ki-sin-waa-big-waan, the Moccasin Flower. This is such a pretty book that tells the tale of the Ojibwe legend of the laddy slipper or moccasin flower. The illustrations are simple and colorful and greatly add to the folk atmosphere of the book. A little girl must go on a heroic journey through a freezing wintry night to find healing herbs when her whole village is stricken with terrible disease. She is encouraged along her route by the spirits of the stormy environment who speak to her in the Ojibwe tongue. This is an exciting and satisfying story and makes an excellent conversation starter to teach little ones about communing with the elements of Nature
Forty blend shapes... Brilliant concepts and discussion of details, but somewhat slow in painting the big picture. He never really comes out and says it, so I will. The end result is a control rig for 40 blend shapes, each painstakingly hand drawn and tuned. The state of the art doesn't allow shortcuts; I don't think it ever can or will. If you can accept that all 40 shapes are needed to model the range of human facial expression, this book is for you. Osipa makes a compelling argument that each is necessary; guides you through the modeling to make it possible; and wraps up with an elegant rig to control and manage them all. The result is a talking head, simply amazing in its range and control of nuance. Still, 40 heads per character is a huge investment. Is it worth "Doing Right?" Or can you continue to fake it? Buy the book; play with the rig; and find out for yourself.
Good Reference mr Book. This a book that can help you understand how mental ray works. The tutorials are easy to follow, some take sometime to render specially when rendering the final images, but that's obvious since mental ray it's very computer intensive. The author covers pretty much every shader of mr; there's an explanation of each one, a simple tutorial to follow and understand what the parameters alters the render, also covers indirect illumination using GI and FG, used alone and together.The only part that I didn't like is the tutoria of caustics by reflection, after completing the render they didn't look realistic as i was hoping... but as in almost book out there, there are things to do by yourself and do trial and error renderings until you get the result that you like.So if are new to mental ray, this book can help you out on understanding this powerful render engine, how it works, what it can do, what things need to be considered before applying shaders; the author made a book that's easy to read, lots of pictures of reference in full color so there's no way you can get lost while playing with the parameters within max
From dubiosity to admiration. LOST IN A GOOD BOOK may be a painful rite of passage for a linear thinker.Here, in author Jasper Fforde's England of 1985, people keep dodo birds as pets, a special police unit drives stakes through vampires' hearts, Tunbridge Wells has been given over to Russia in war reparations, London to Sydney travel time is 40 minutes by Gravitube through the Earth's center, air travel is by lighter-than-air airship, cheese is contraband, there's a duty on custard, Homo sapiens neanderthalensis has been recreated from recovered DNA and now provides society with its minimum-wage untermenschen, time travel is a reality, and 249 wooly mammoths in nine herds migrate back and forth across Britain.So little of this parallel universe makes sense that I at first doubted my ability to finish the book. But, intrepidly, I carried on.The heroine of the story is Thursday Next, a Literary Detective in department 27 of SpecOps, the national law enforcement megaforce. The mission of SO-27, among other things, is to validate the authenticity of recently discovered works by dead authors. The title of the book refers to the ability of certain trained adepts to physically enter book plots in real time, much as Mary Poppins and her young charges were able to pop in and out of chalk pavement pictures in the film MARY POPPINS. This talent is so rare that, here, Next is coerced by a representative by the world's monolithic business corporation, Goliath, to rescue his unsavory half-brother previously marooned by Thursday within the pages of Poe's "The Raven" in the first book of the Next series, THE EYRE AFFAIR. In return, Goliath will restore Thursday's husband Landen, who has been eradicated. And, as if that wasn't enough of a bother, Thursday must also thwart the imminent destruction of all Life on Earth by rampant strawberry flavored Dream Topping.Perhaps you can see where a linear thinker might suffer a migraine.The enjoyment of becoming lost in LOST IN A GOOD BOOK isn't related to a nail-biter plot because what plot it possesses isn't; the word "peripeteia" comes to mind. Rather, the joy comes from the expectation of reading what clever quirkiness the frisky imagination of Fforde cranks out - sort of a present-day version of ALICE IN WONDERLAND. Indeed, the Cheshire Cat is one of the book's characters. It's that imagination that compels me to award the novel five stars though it goes against my grain.I'm not particularly driven to read THE EYRE AFFAIR, but I have ordered the next in the series, THE WELL OF LOST PLOTS. It will undoubtedly spend time in the waiting room with the twenty-some more linear works awaiting my attention until I get the urge to lose myself in a bit of benign madness
Brilliant. Weinberg never disappoints the serious student of theoretical physics. There is no good reason to ignore perusing his texts.Weinberg is a master expositor and creator of modern physics.There simply is no good reason not to purchase his volumes
An Awesome Resource. This is another great guide of recommended books by Kathleen Odean. In this book, there are over 750 books about the things kids love, and many, many different subjects. Whether you like cats, kings and queens, basketball, math, or magic tricks, there's sure to be a book in here that is right for you. The book is divided into subject categories with categories about the subject. (e.g.: sports, than one of the categories is football.) The back of the book includes a basic reference shelf for home, book-related parties, tips for reading out loud, lists of books in series, and much, much more. This is an invaluable resource and a perfect gift for all kids
Intense. Clancy really keeps you going on this one. Like inside Delta Force, this book takes you inside how these teams work and the stress they are under. Keep them coming
Compulsion And Healing. When I started reading this book, I had little or no sympathy with Dana Lustig, and his decision to return all the little rocks his late mother had collected from Britain's ancient landmarks seemed inane.Although Lustig makes interesting connections between his mother's private, secret pathology and the collecting obsession that affects nearly one out of every three of us Americans, it is still something of a shock to see a son washing his mother's dirty linen in public.I guess if she didn't want the world to know about her mania for British rocks she would have destroyed her collection, or (for we collectors hate to throw anything away) she might have been more upfront, asked her son never to expose her peccadillos to the world.  She wasn't the world's best mother, by Dana's account, so maybe a bit of filial resentment motivated his memoir, which takes the familiar "creative non-fiction" format of ANGELA'S ASHES and turns it into a travelogue in which we see the now middle aged Dana trotting back to England and trying to alert officials and the media in each town that he has landed and that long ago his mother had done a bad thing and tried to steal their history.Some of the officials are sympathetic to his quest, others treat him like he's some kind of shady character.  British wit and understatement are in short supply nowadays, or so it seems from Lustig's colorless interactions with these bureaucrats and tabloid hacks.How I wish this book had an accompanying CD in which we could hear the revealing radio interview his mother gave, long ago, in which Dana finds her voice still speaking to him from beyond the grave.  He parses her syntax to little bits, isolating the words in which she condemns herself, and shows them to us as proof of his thesis.This book deserves more attention.  It is ultimately a warm, healing portrait of a man who, while attempting to right family wrongs, comes to understand his beloved "Frankie" wasn't as awful as all that
Stereophotography of the Civil War. This book in an excellant introduction to Civil War stereophotography. The pictures are wonderfully composed and provide insight into the war. There is a good foundation placed and a simple history written
Thoroughly Convincing. Darwinists are scared. They are very scared. You can tell from all the hystrionic attacks on this erudite, logical, convincing treatise which eviscerates the PHILOSOPHY posing as science, called Darwinian Evolution. Give it 50 years, and Darwinism will join the ranks of the Geocentric Earth Theory: totally discredited and very, very embarrassing.But just think about it--all these guys with letters after their names are going to have to find new jobs. NO WONDER they rant and rail against Johnson's sword of reason
Marxist Jesuits. First of all Malachi Martin did NOT walk out on his order to marry a foreign correspondent during the Vatican Council, as claimed by a previous reviwer.  In 1965, Martin received a "dispensation from all privileges and obligations deriving from his vows as a Jesuit and from priestly ordination."  (Congregation for Institutes of Consecrated Life and Societies of Apostolic Life, 25 June 1997, Prot. N. 04300/65).Why would a Jesuit priest request such dispensation?  It is likely because the heterodox Jesuit heirarchy would never have allowed him to publish this book.  He would have had to break his vow of obedience to his superiors within the order to both research and write this book.  Had he not requested such dispensation, Fr. Martin would have joined a host of orthodox Jesuit priests, such as Fr. Cornelius Buckley, S.J. and Fr. Joseph Fessio, S.J. who were either silenced or the attempt made to silence them by their heterodox brethren.I had never heard of Malachi Martin before I picked up this book.  But I have attended two Jesuit universities and I've seen the war between orthodox and heterodox Jesuits up close.  It is real and it does exist.  Heterodox Jesuits continue to support the dogma of Liberation Theology which is, in reality, a blend of Catholicism and Marxism that is neither authentically Catholic nor authentically Christian.  Heterodox Jesuits teaching in universities are having symposiums on such philosophers as Michel Foucault which, when you consider that Foucault advocated sex with children, seems more than a little ironic.  It goes on and on.  My own experiences with the Jesuits lend a boatload of credence to what Martin writes.  The Jesuits haven't merely betrayed the heirarchy of the Roman Catholic Church - they've betrayed millions of faithful Catholics all over the world - especially those faithful in Central and South America who were murdered and starved and oppressed by the very same Jesuits who said they were there to "help".This book reads like a spy thriller.  I literally couldn't put it down once I started reading it.  It seems clear to me that Martin had sources that were well placed at very high levels, both at the Vatican and within the Jesuits.  It is also evident to me that Martin is more right than wrong.  If you want to know what's wrong with the Roman Catholic Church, this book goes a long way towards explaining it
Excellent book!!. I purchased it for my 2 year old because her hair can sometimes be tough to comb.  She loves it. I want to instill a positive outlook about herself as well as her hair. I have been natural for ~4 years and I do love my hair
Do it again!. I would give it an 11 if I could. This book is flawless. From the first page, I was hooked. The characters were the best I had ever read in a novel. Hiaasen's humor was incredible-I found myself laughing often. Even though the movie didn't cover as much ground as the book, I think the movie was much better than most people have let on. READ THIS BOOK-you will love it. I have gone through 3 copies, I've read it so much.[...
too many mistaken reviews. I find it surprising that so many reviewers find this "unrealistic" and too "intellectual" for discussion of desire. This is not a nonfiction research text on prostitution, a sexuality manual, or a work of realistic fiction. In fact, it is just the opposite of all of those things. It is a simple parable wrought with symbolism, which makes a complex universal point. The story is engaging, philosophical, light, and familiar despite making an important and essentially human observation about the timelessness of love and sex. It is this wisdom and timelessness that captures the hearts of Coelho readers time and time again.
Biblical Amnesia: A Forgotten Story  of Redemption. Scott Gustafson in clear and easy to read language speaks about some startling ideas that are found in scripture, but which have been forgotten due to our cultural relgion covering up the message of the Bible. The fact that morality comes as a result of the human fall into sin, and is a force for death, rather than life, was a new way for me of seeing the context of the Biblical writings. He makes use of the work of Raine Eisler to define dominator and partnership ways and shows how the scriptures both Old and New Testament are examples of a partnership model trying to survive in a dominator system. This book would be helpful to anyone who is working on models of change both in the church, as well as any political organization. Anyone in a position of power in an organization would find it useful in defining a role that has as it purpose, the fostering of partnerships rather than autoritarian relationships.
Disturbingly fantastic. Listen to the other reviewers: this is NOT a parody. It's not funny. I was expecting funny. What I got was one of the most dark, haunting, poking-into-uncomfortable-areas experiences with literature I have ever had. And I loved it.As other readers have noted, it turns the romanticized pro-slavery ideology of GWTW on its head. If you don't want that, okay--don't read it. But it's done in such a masterfully emotive way that reading it is painful, humiliating, mesmerizing and sweet/sad. It's an experience everyone should at least try. There is such a wealth of careful detail here, and every bit of it hangs together, i.e., is plausible based on the events depicted in GWTW. (I always did wonder why bad things seemed to happen to Melanie whenever the slaves were close by.) The one thing I'd say Randall forgot to address was Will Benteen and Suellen O'Hara's claim to Tara.
And Alexander said, "I share your fate.". I had the pleasure taking Dr. Kurke's Leadership class while working on my MBA, and of seeing him give two uplifting presentations on Alexander the Great. I am so glad that he published his book, giving all of us more access to his insight into this majestic leader.  Thank you Dr. Kurke! I highly recommend this book
Beaches was an exelent book.  Two thumbs up. This book is about two friends, Cee Cee Bloom and Roberta White, who met durring their childhood and stay friends until Bertie dies.  The book is so real.  You really get into it.  A couple of times, I even wanted to slap one of them.  You'll definatly cry in the end
Sci Fi , Mystery , Romance ...  Oh My!. I guess I'm hooked.  I read everyone of J.D. Robb's books as soon as they make their way to paperback. They are always a quality, gripping read.  No exception with this 19th installment.With each book the relationships of the central characters deepen.  This novel focuses on Dallas and her relationship with her longtime partner, Detective Peabody. Eve and Roarke continue to harmonize and share adventures.This series of books is solid, and like most mystery readers I appreciate it when the writer takes the time to grow the characters and keep the plot turns interesting.
Couldn't put it down. Seriously, and I've met few non-fiction books that I can say that about.  I'm not a hunter but I found this book quite engaging.  Hunting is only one focus of the book.  There is great appeal for readers interested in  wilderness and conservation issues in the U.S.  Remarkably detailed,  intelligent, and colorful examination of deer across the U.S.; Alaska,  Texas, Wisconsin, California, New York, etc.  Very well-written; not a word  is wasted and the whole is beautifully composed
It Shall Be Done. This book is a must read for businessmen, educators, coaches, and anyone who feels like they are in need of a lift!  The parable in this book is a great motivator.  In today's world where most everyone is trying to find the easy way out and pass the buck, this book teaches you to be on the lookout for what may seem like a dubious task, but in actuality is a &quot;blue vase&quot; test!  I read this book in about two hours, easy reading!  Should be required in all schools
Making the Difference.... Nance's book is one that I keep with me all the time.  It seems that every time I come across a tough patch of communication with someone about a difficult situation or subject, there is always assistance in this book.  It opens up a huge new world of communication and support for those people we want to help, or when we need help.  If everyone had this book, we would no longer be afraid to commmunicate, both in speaking and listening
Appeals on many levels. Part travelogue, part history (of the Balkans and the Middle East, most notably), part Agatha Christie biography, the book satisfied this reader on all three levels.  Eames sometimes tried too hard to coin meaningful metaphors, but those instances were easy to overlook.  What wasn't easy to overlook was his mis-categorization of Syria as part of President Bush's axis of evil which, as far I know know, included Iran, Iraq, and North Korea.  It seems that would have been a relatively easy fact to check.  One suggestion for any future editions would be to include more maps, perhaps one at the head of each chapter.  Overall, an extremely enjoyable read
Frontpage 2003 Review. When I first purchased the Frontpage Software I should have bought this book at the same time, in fact they should actually be sold together.  It is very well written and a very good guide once you are up and running.  I would recommend this book to anyone who has a basic understanding of MS Office products
Excellent resource for students. I am currently using this as my Game Design textbook. As a student, it provides not only mere theory, but valuable interviews with upstanding designers. It is clear, and a joy to read
A good plan to end terror. I have to agree with the authors.  There is far too much anti Americanism in the world today.  Everywhere you go, people are blaming the bad United States for all the evils in this world.  Some of these evils were born in Third World countries dominated by a dictator, and the population just blames the bad ole U.S.A.Muslim fundamentalism was born in a Wahhabi Saudi Arabia and spun out to the rest of the Arab world.  This fundamentalist religious movement turned into a political movement fascinated with terrorism.  What is America to do with all these threats.  The authors give an idea of what to do in this book.I don't agree with everything that is said in this book.  At least the authors have a plan on how our country should lead the world to face the conflict of terror.  It will not be easy and it could cost some blood and treasure, but at the same time the USA will face down some of those threats to its existence.  This involves confronting Saudi Arabia, France, Iran, North Korea, and China.  No wonder the authors got so many negative reviews.  As the authors state, this doesn't mean war with these countries.  It does mean that the United States must take a tougher line against those who condone or even encourage the use of terror.This is a nice thought provoking book.  There is a lot of suggestions which the United States ought to think about or even implement
Excelent reading. Very well written, easy to understand and a well ballanced opinion and explanation on the subject. I would recomend this book to anyone with interest in the subject
Good, But Lacking In Comparison. Scene of the Crime is the latest in a recent influx of collections of crime scene photography, and it has added appeal in that some of the images are of famous cases, such as the Black Dahlia murder and the Manson Family slaughterhouse. The book is laid out in the same manner as most of these books, with black and white images presented in the first half of the book, and information for each photograph at the back. Unfortunately, many of the photographs piqued my curiosity, only to find a sad, unsatisfying, "case information unavailable" comment awaiting me in the back of the book. Still, many of the images are so well-composed and interesting that they could be seen in art museums rather than cold case files, so this is a minor quibble.However, there are also quite a few lesser and uninteresting images as well, which left me feeling a bit cheated given my suspicion that the LAPD coffers are overflowing with many more graphic, historic, and fascinating images. Comparing this book to the classic LA crime gallery Death Scenes: A Homicide Detective's Scrapbook serves to further point out this collection's shortcomings. There is nothing in here as punch-in-the-gut brutal as the image of the decapitated baby on the cutting board or as surreal as the peaceful head sitting in the middle of a road after a traffic accident, both from Death Scenes. Taken on its own merits, I might have given the book a five skull rating, but in comparison with its more amazing brethren I'd have to rate it a four
Feeling alone in the arene of ORM. I am a proud owner of Visio for Enterprise Architects, the only case tool I own, and I've have also purchased and used T.Halpins text regarding the use if this tool. In this text, Terry goes thru great efforts to promote the use of object role modeling, ORM, in conceptual designs. I am somewhat sceptical about why there no other book or author using ORM in their explanations of conceptual designs. I whish I had $5k to purchase a copy of ERwin so I could be in the main stream.I also contacted Microsoft and asked if they were enhancing Visio for Enterprise Architects in Visual Studio 2005. They told me that it will still ship with it but that there are no changes to accommodate SQL Server 2005.My feeling is that I've joined the ranks of the "Lone Ranger".
wonderful information!. My husband is a great dad. I gave this to him as a birthday gift. He loved it! He read it in 2 weeks. He is now an even greater dad!!!!!!! I advise you to buy this for any DAd you know who has a girl. Dads sometimes underestimate the power they have to shape their little girls. Your little girl will be formed by her Dad r/to: future jobs, relationships, life skills, choosing a mate, the list goes on and on. Yes, as a mom, I read it too! Buy it today!!!! P.S. Our little girl is 6 years old
Excellent History. Having read many, (if not too many according to some), US Civil War books and specifically books on Gettysburg, I am by no means an expert but I do think I do know a good book on the subject matter and this is a good book. In fact I'd recommend it as one of THE books to read on this battle . . . and yes I'm including Coddington's study. Here's why. In a military history it's very easy to get bogged down in mind numbing detail on weapons, personnel, maneuvers, strategy, jargon ... doesn't happen in this book. Secondly, this author does a very good job at setting the scene for the battle ... again without overwhelming the reader with historical detail. Lastly, and I think this point will be appreciated by novice and "expert" alike, the author deals with all the "controversies" - J.E.B Stuart's absence, Pickett's Charge, the "choice" of Gettysburg as the battlefield, and especially what was going on between Lee and Longstreet, (as well as much more), - in a rational and factual manner. This is a well written, engaging book that I would have no problem recommending to either a Civil War novice or buff ... not something I normally do ... but similar as to how McPherson's "Battle Cry of Freedom" captures the whole war, this book does the much same for the Battle of Gettysburg.
My awesome review. Hatching Magic by Ann Downer is a great book to read in your spare time. It has magical critters and holes in time. There are a lot of really odd animals like wyverns. There are two wizards and a girl as the main characters. All three characters have trouble in this story. It starts in older times and then to a now a day's time. I read this book and I liked it because of the magic, mystery, and excitement that it has.
A good story for your young book worm!. I read this story as a child at the school library (after seeing it on Reading Rainbow) and enjoyed it very much. Now I'm an adult and have collected the books I remember from my childhood for a bit of nostalgia. Gregory is one of them. I have also collected it for my nephew. It's a sweet story and easy to read, perfect for any child
Laugh out loud hilarious. Truly affecting.  It's a book that crosses genres as I'm not a parent, but I was consistently moved and often laughed out loud.  I don't often find a book that is actually "difficult to put down", but Paesel keeps your attention with her insight and delicious wit.  It's excellent
The Essential Introduction to 21st century spirituality. Read this book and it will change your life. Perhaps in subtle ways, perhaps profoundly. How does Seth compare to the Celestine Prophecy? How about timeless wisdom compared to hack writin
I'm very happy with this. I'm a strong intermediate player with some habits that limit my playing. Scott Tennant's tips helped cure some fatigue problems, helped me play with more ease and helped me to improve my tone. Scott is into the Alexander Method of body mechanics, so he understands the positions and actions that are natural for your body. (Some of the other classical guitar "giants" use contorted hand and body positions that will hurt you, and teach them as the "proper" way-  beware!) Scott has incredible playing technique to emulate, a great teaching style, and clear examples in the DVD. Besides the course material, just watching him is valuable. Does this replace coaching sessions with a master? No. You can't get that from a book and DVD. But if you want some great exercises and valuable tips that will fix the most common bad habits, this is worth every cent. Pumping Nylon really helped my playing, and explained things that my 3 teachers never mentioned
Rewiring the brain. I found this book fascinating.  When I was a young mother, I knew it was important to relate to my child in a helpful, healing way.  I read many books on childhood development and none gave me the information that this book does.  In the early chapters, the book explains the mechanics of brain development and the importance of the bonding relationship between mother and child.  Watching a close friend of mine with her infant son has given me the opportunity to be an educated observor of this (thirty years too late for my own child!).  The second half of the book takes the reader through a case study of a woman whose upbringing did not provide any opportunity for healthy development and whose subsequent life reflected this.  Through the parenting process of therapy the counselor actually restructured her brain, helping to close the pathways that caused pain and pathology in her life.This book would be helpful for therapist's needing to understand more fully the transformative nature that therapy can provide.  Also I think young mothers could also benefit by understanding the choices that mothers make and the consequences in raising their children.
An intelligent read. On one level, this novel is a whodunnit - we are following the trial of a fisherman accused of killing another fisherman. But since one is Japanese-American and the other white, the book is also an examination of racial bigotry and hatred.  It is set in the American North-West among a strawberry growing and fishing community torn apart by WWII and the internment of Japanese-Americans.  There is a love story, a vivd and visceral description of being a soldier in WWII, and the narrator's slow decline into loneliness and professional failure.  But the book scores highest when is shows us how fear turns to mistrust and mistrust to injustice and hatred, all without becoming preachy
GREAT READ, FROM THE FIRST PAGE TO THE LAST AND EVERYWHERE INBETWEEN!!!!!!!!!!!. MISERY----5 STARSWhen reading this book, I could not put it down.....i LOVED every single page of this book, I really enjoyed it....it was INTENSE, SAD, and FUNNY....What this poor guy Paul Sheldon goes thru is absolutely unimaginable. I cannot believe it......I feel so bad for this guy....how he adapts to living the way he was forced to, by this psycho crazy [...] by the name of, Annie Wilkes....UNREAL.....go out and pick this one up....like I said before, I couldn't put it down. It took me 2 days to finish it, and I did not speed read it, I TRULY enjoyed it, and was very disappointed when it was over. I am currently reading "IT" and I will review that one when I have finished....GO PICK UP MISERY!!!!
A truly  fantastic adventure. This is one of the most unique and interesting books I have ever read.The perils of PI's adventure are of the most original concepts and are justa pure pleasure to read. It is hard to talk about this book without giving away anything about the story, so suffice to say that this is a must read
Fantastically useful. I read Gowa's book for a graduate course, and found it to be immensely helpful for contextualizing international relations debate.  She writes in a clear style and her insights are well-articulated.  Highly recommended - research is also meticulous and precisely documented
Powerful little book!. This book is basic, small, and simple, but it packs a very powerful punch. Copan has a way of writing that cuts to the chase. The whole book is designed to first presenting common &quot;slogans&quot; or misconceptions  about certain things (i.e. all truth is relative), and then Copan  systematically deflates each misconception or falsity. The thing I think I  like most about the book is its simplicity. When I say simplicity, I don't  mean unintelligent. I mean Copan can take fairly complicated ideas and make  them easily understood (that takes talent). Thus, this book will enjoy a  wide variety of readers. Moreover, Copan, for such a brief work, covers a  lot of material. Copan discusses things such as the absolute nature of  truth, moral relativism, exclusivity and religious pluralism, the person  Jesus, and the reliability of the gospels. This is a very handy &quot;ready  reference&quot; work for those who have found themselves wondering,  &quot;how can I respond to that objection or comment?&quot
An Enjoyably Quick Read. The Itch was a good quick read that kept my interest to the end.  Although  the situations in the characters' lives could have been covered a bit more  in depth, the story still kept me wanting more.  I really hope there is a  sequel, to see how things will work out for Abra with her new  self-discovery, and how Natasha continues on with her life after Miles
Excellent Commentary on an unusual play. Shakespeare is not my favorite author, although I do understand the concept of his Iambic Pentameter and its style and flourishes are highly regarded.  While I can appreciate the labor it must take to put a story in such format, I frankly find the poetics of it hard to read.  That makes the commentary (which is about half of this version) very helpful to people such as myself.  By reading the corresponding notes, I was better able to put the story together with the style, making for an exciting tale.  I would highly recommend this version to people who have difficulty deciphering Shakespeare's style
Five Factor Fitness review. I have tried the program for three weeks now and have lost five pounds and gone from three pound weights to eight pounds without feeling overstressed.  The program is very well written and can easily be done by anyone
Reads like a good mystery novel. My colleagues and I have been designing and facilitating leadership development programs for about 20 years.  I've also served as a VP of three Fortune 500 companies.  I recommend this book to everyone who is a leader or who wants to be one.  Not only does it contain THE secret to true leadership, Mr. Jaworski has written his account so that it reads like a good mystery novel.  You wonder what will happen next.  And he has written this book from his heart.  I hope our paths cross one day soon
An important book in Science Fiction and Space History. When I was a kid, I dreamed of being an astronaut.  That wasn't to be, but this book inspired me to go into science and engineering and now I'm a successful programmer; I've heard the book influenced many other people similarly, including many who worked on the space program. If you have similar interests, I think you'll find Rocket Ship Galileo absorbing, even if dated
The whys of suicide. Sharon McCone's brother Joey commits suicide, and the death ties in to a case involving another suicide, that of a young man who was maybe harassed to death by an online magazine. The plot thickens as McCone delves into the shenanigans at the magazine, as well as in the life of the family who has hired her. Nobody is particularly likeable, here. It's actually a lot more entertaining on some levels than Marcia Muller's usual stuff. I liked it a lot
One of my favorite webcomics. Ever since I found Earthsong while wearily roaming the depths of the internet, I've been a fast fan. While I generally prefer grittier fiction, Earthsong's highly enjoyable, if straightforward, dialouge and plot keep me engaged, and the subtle (and not so subtle) references to various mythologies and other works of fantasy are well executed, rather than tacked on, as is sometimes the case in similar works. While not quite at the level of some other comics, like Sarah Ellerton's Inverloch, Earthsong's art and formatting are still among the best of any active webcomic. The facial expressions of her characters, fantastically designed in their own right, are especially well done, although certain perspective shots do occsionally come off rather odd.The printed collection itself is somewhat lacking in terms of extra features, but Lady Yates can be forgiven, considering the immense amount of dedication and effort she put into its publication, completely redrawing every page (and making vast improvements in terms of pacing and art quality). Over all, volume one of Earthsong is a must have for anyone interested in webcomics, or simply a classic fantasy adventure
Borderline Nation. This is one of my favorite books.  I love Wurtzel's story as well as her writing style.  However, some of the things that I most love about it are the same things that may turn some people off to it. The novel is a memoire and it covers Wurtzel's long term depression.  She writes an entire book about her suffering with this.  Naturally, some may find it whiney, self centered, or even pitiful. However, people who can relate to her struggle are most apt to find this work none of those things.  If you've dealt with depression and/or self mutilation and/or suicidality, I think you'll be able to really appreciate Wurtzel's openness.  I read this book quite awhile ago so I can't recall whether or not she calls herself this but to me(I am a mental health clinician), she is very borderline(having Borderline Personality Disorder). Although the book is not advertised as being a memoire of BPD, I find it to be one.  The last thing I want to mention is that I would be careful about recommending this work to someone who is actually in the throws of depression.. It is not the most hopeful work and may not boost anyone out of a depression if theyre already in one.
BRHS reviews Misfits. Stop your searching, grab your car keys, and head towards your local bookstore, or for you new high tech types head for amazon.com, because you must read James Howe's coolest book yet called The Misfits. The Misfits is defiantly one of those books you just absolutely have to classify as a classic. The story follows the seventh grade years of Bobby Goodspeed who is the all about lovable "fat kid" that everyone teases. Along with some of Bobby's close friends, he sets out on a quest, under the guidance of a some what pushy friend named Addie, to add a third party to the student council elections that will stand up for the so called, "minorities." After being called a very wide range of names about his "fat" Bobby dares to take the elections by storm, but as all you readers should know the unpopular kids don't always get the votes. No matter how good their campaign may be to win this election Bobby and his team will have to really give the students something to say wow about.Readers this book is a must read for gossip fans. Any one who was once a little kid in school always trying to stay on the "in" of who was doing what with whom. From the begging this book explodes into your mind with a very interesting twist of a start, not what you would expect for a book talking about a school election. The book keeps its potential as it adds a few unexpected little twist with characters personalities and emotions, but don't worry readers, Howe, who has written many children's books, keeps the story easy to follow. Everyone will love this story! After all I don't know how many people can resist a story about a fat kid, a tall smart kid, a 70's gagster kid, and the infamous misfit of the time, a gay kid.Readers Howe has really captured the troubles of being a teenager. Even if the characters are in the seventh grade, with the present times it won't be long until these problems really do hit home for the seventh grade era. When I was reading this book I really could relate it to the life of a high school freshmen, so don't be surprised, readers, if you too find yourself connecting to the plot. Readers over all I give James Howe's The Misfits four stars out of five. "Sticks and stones will break our bones, but names will break our spirits.
Great Overall Book. I thought this book was amazing.  While the writing for some might be difficult at first, the later chapter are the ones that capture the imagination.  The morals of Lord Henry might seem somewhat selfish and shallow, but I guarantee his quotes will make their way back to reader's head.  This is definitely the most influencial book I have read.
Another Good Sams. Sams again turns out a great home manual for working with a complex product
great book. My girlfriend gave me this book and told me I needed to use it to have a long life.  After reading it, I think it will help me do just that.  This book has great advice on health and nutrition, and I hope I can have the discipline to put its instructions into practice
fun for all ages. This is a great book! It has wonderful illustrations, hence The Caldecott Medal, and an engaging story. My son loves this book, especially turning the pages to find out what the overcoat will become next. This is not just a children's book, since I gave it to my professor and his wife and they both loved it. This is one of the books that I don't get tired of reading over and over
Inspiring, informative...and good karma!. This is one of the best books I've read about the business of voiceovers, and I've read them all. Hearing "how they did it" from some of the best performers in the country makes for a fascinating read, but there's plenty of real world information from the artists as well, including marketing tips, studio conduct, union membership and the "art of the craft."I appreciate that the proceeds of this book are being donated to the Alzheimer's Association. As a voiceover performer myself, I'm acutely aware that the word "voice" means much more than simply an instrument for talking. The voice is the means by which we convey our soul; it is the stream of our identity. Successful voiceover performers, such as those featured in this book, are able to convey emotion and heart through their work, and the listener has a sense of who they are from the way they shape the words. All of us who make a living in this business have contemplated losing our voices, but for an Alzheimer's patient, the loss of voice is much more profound than losing the ability to communicate; it is the loss of identity. Using a book focused on voiceovers as a means to fight a disease that robs its victims of their voices is inspiring, and very creative.For voice performers, this book is a wonderful addition to your personal library. If you already make a living using your voice, or hope to, purchasing this book is an investment--you're "paying it forward" as you learn from the best in the business.
excellent reference guide. This is my favorite handbook for chrocheting.  I use the pattern gallery to create my own sweater and scarf designs.  It is very easy to understand the directions
Sing It Sister!. Finally, a woman writer, attempting to help women!  Regardless of her political preferences, one can not ignore the convicing arguments establishing how so many liberal democrat powerhouses, do indeed attempt to suppress other women's happiness.  Regardless of your political affiliation, if you are a woman and seek to be happy, you should read this book.In order to get the full benefit, you will need to devoid yourself of emotion and drama, and read this objective non-fiction book as purely factual.  Although this is very difficult for women to do, it is possible, and although you may feel as if the author is attacking you, she is not.  Stick with it, and you will realize she is one of very few women powerhouses, who are actually on your side.Whether you want to be happy is up to you.  Happiness is not defined by others, it is defined by yourself.  You may try to appear to others as though you are happy, but if you desire the deep-down contentment, read this with an open mind.  It is about the best therapy you can reap
Very Enjoyable and Informative Read. The History Buff's Guide to the Civil War by Thomas R. Flagel was very informative and provided this individual with many bits of information that haven't been seen before.As an individual who reads twenty or more civil war books each year I would strongly recommend this read to those who desire those little bits and pieces that are not usually found in more well known publications.The book is well written and presented in very readable fashion.Well done
THE BEST GIBSON. PROBABLY THE BEST GIBSON YET. A MUST READ FOR HIS FANS AND A GOOD BOOK FOR NEWCOMERS TOO. A REAL THOUGHT PROVOKING READ!
Exciting Urban Projects. A great collection of different planning straegies. Provides unique and refreshing solutions for designing different urban hardscapes, mostly in the U.S. and Europe. It is also well put together and well thought out
No better time to get your Ahimsa and Satyagraha. This is a book that should- and will- profoundly affect you.  On the one hand its wonderful and inspiring.  But I find myself instead feeling heart-broken.  Mournful.  I grieve for an alternate reality where our leaders have either the education, curiosity, wisdom, or courage to embrace the lessons of great people such as Gandhi.  It's not exactly esoteric stuff.  Everyone knows the name Gandhi and has at least some sense of where he stands historically.  Even for the non-readers, there was the movie.  It was a big deal.Gandhi's true transformation occurred when he realized that violence is demeaning not just to victims but to the perpetrators.  It is an intoxicating release of sadistic impulses.  Impulses that are addicting and toxic.  I was reading this book and think about the state of the world, and found myself thinking the tired clich:  give peace a chance.  It feels so trite, a well-worn sixties throw-back.  But it also a courageous sentiment.  Peace takes courage and creativity, and it isn't as quick and easy as violence in the short-term, but it is more than just a dream.  Peace is a bold assertion.What kinds of things crossed my mind when I was reading this book?  When John Kerry returned from Vietnam and testified about atrocities being committed by both sides, he was vilified by the right wing, portrayed as a traitor.  But it was an act of courage.  He obviously wasn't saying we should stop the war because American soldiers are bad people.  He was showing how violence leads to more violence, how the violence of an unjust war corrupted the souls of good young Americans who were drawn into warfare.  Violence leads to violence, but most importantly the converse is also true.  Non-violence is just as contagious.  We see peace leading to peace on all levels, from the macro international level all the way down to individual relationships.  Another example that crossed my mind is the all-to-recent transformation in the culture of inpatient psychiatry.  In the past, restraining people was considered a good treatment option because it quickly stopped dangerous behavior and gave staff a sense of control and safety.  But now, the attitude has changed.  Restraints are no longer seen as a treatment option but instead as a treatment failure, a last ditch resort for extreme cases only.  And the results?  People are actually safer.  Violent patient behavior eventually goes down when staff thinks creatively of non-traumatic solutions.  Those are some of the things that crossed my mind as I read this book.Something else I like about Gandhi, as reflected in his writings:  Whether or not you believe he was born destined for greatness has to do with your spiritual bent, but either way, he accomplished what he accomplished as a political leader and philosopher through the hard work of personal journey and spiritual exploration.  He was an anglophile when he was young, buying into the classism of the oppressors.  When he became radicalized after witnessing the cruelty and the glee with which the British soldiers repressed rebellion, the pendulum at first swung all the way the other way.  He became a separatist, not unlike Malcolm X prior to his spiritual transformation.  In fact, Gandhi was almost a middle-aged man before coming up with the magnanimous observation that violence degrades all involved, victims and perpetrators alike.  That was a surprise to me actually, that Gandhi rejected separatism at an older age than Malcolm X did.So read Gandhi.  Read, share your books, talk about what it stirs up.  Dream of a better way.  And find a way to act on your dreams.  And read John Stuart Mill, Emma Goldman, Malcolm X, Martin Luther King Jr., Edward Said, Chomsky...  Agree, disagree, but read with an open mind.Sorry for all the chatter.  Thank you for listening, bye bye.
Believe in Your Art Ability. This is a fantastic book on believing in your ability to be an artist.  It also teaches you to do art on a daily basis to stretch and grow in the varied mediums.I have kept journals for years, but never art journals.  I was amazed at all of the fantastic work that can come from drawing on a daily basis.  I even started drawing with pen rather than pencil to allow the mistakes to be there and not be afraid of them.I would recommend this to anyone who doesn't believe they have any talent in art and for those who do and have been told over and over again that they just aren't quite right for 'today's art market'.  Get out there and draw!
The awk bible a must have tome for all Unix power scripters. I second the feeling here, this awk book is the most concise, clear and useful scripting book on unix period with the exception of perl. Its also a job life saver. At work we cant use perl on our unix servers because of management attitudes so awk and sh are the only tools to script with. Become a Unix power scripter with this cool book
Book sale. I wish I had noticed that the book was in paperback form; I thought I had bought a hardcovered bookThe item was as stated. And I appreciated the fast deliver
Another generation to add to the fun!. In this book we are treated to another generation of Emerson, and even though they are all under six, they do add to the story, and give us all something to look forward to in upcoming books.  I also recommend that this book should be read in order.  So many of the things that happen in each book are dependent on things that happened in previous books.  This is another great adventure that is set in Amelia's beautiful Luxor.  Even though The Great War is over, it doesn't mean that the Emersons are in less danger.  Danger always seems to find them in the guise of tomb robbers, murderers and other nefarious characters.  I won't say anymore.  You will need to read this wonderful series for yourself, but be prepared for an exciting journey when you first begin your journey with the beloved Emersons
She knows what she is teaching... First a warning: I bought this planning to hand it off to my disorganized junior high school kid who gets either A+ on his homework or F- because he cannot find it in his backpack.  BUT this book is written for the parent.  And it is a great book.  It is an easy read in the best sense.  The book is very logically organized, progressing thru backpack, workspace, locker, etc...  The author became a professional organizer many years ago when she had to rescue her own disorganized kid.  We spend so much time and money teaching our kids English, math, foreign languages but we forget to teach them how to organize their work and thereby teach themselves.  It was worth the price for me
A work of applied philosophy. On of the most basic conflicts in any management is the conflict between quality (do it right) and output (do it fast).  Crosby starts our with the typical north American assumption that the two are embroiled in a zero-sum game, and then he blows the lid off - suggesting that by focusing on quality you can increase throughput.  For example, by spending tens of thousands dollars on education to *prevent* heart attacks now - spent only on a targeted risk group - a health insurance company could avert heart attacks later, saving a million dollars or more.  For a second example, if a manufacturing table has physical waste (scrap) and labor waste (re-work of bad parts), both can be eliminated by having zero defects in the first place, with a net increase in performance.Crosby also spends a little bit of time talking about how to inspire the workforce to save money with a 'buck a day' program.Then Crosby provides step-by-step suggestions on how to implement those philosophies in a manufacturing environment.  I give the book four stars because it is a little dated, and is heavily oriented toward manufacturing.  Still, this is a classic in the quality movement.  If you are studying quality, don't go for the five-page summary of Crosby's ideas - go to the source
shows a deep understanding of science fiction themes. As a longtime science fiction fan, I thought I was reasonably versed in the main themes of this field. But Moylan's critique is at a far deeper level than my usual comprehension of science fiction. He writes at an analytic depth that shows a deep appreciation and awareness.For you to get the most benefit from his book, you should already have a background in traditional English literature, as well as science fiction. The utopias and dystopias he studies in the latter are correlated and contrasted to themes already present in the broader literature. Unfortunately, I lack that traditional background, and so much of his arguments were lost on me.
Best bedtime book!. Very sweet & relaxing.  I've read it almost every for the last year.  Calming & sweet, before they understand animals.  Fun after they start learning about animals, babies & parents.
ANYBODY's guide to goats. I first bought this book several years ago for an 8-year-old friend who was getting her first goat.  I think I have borrowed it back half a dozen times, and regularly recommended it to adults as well as &quot;kids&quot;.  Although geared toward children, it does NOT talk down to children.  It tells the reader (of any age) everything the novice goat owner needs to know without all the extra detail that just gets in the way when you are looking for the basics
Ruskin's Venice. This is a deeply inspiring photographic account of Ruskin's commitment to Venice.  It serves as a remarkable and revelatory companion to Ruskin's THE STONES OF VENICE and, to any one who cares about this city, it is an  entirely necessary book.  It is difficult to imagine how it might have been  done better
An extensively researched and scholarly accounting. The Dead Sea Scrolls and the New Testament offers expert analysis in the study of The Dead Sea Scrolls by George J. Brooke, Rylands Professor of Biblical Studies at the University of Manchester, England. While most studies draw links between The Dead Sea Scrolls and the Old Testament, The Dead Sea Scrolls and the New Testament demonstrates how scholars can use the Scrolls to learn more about the linguistic, historical, religious, and social contexts of first-century Palestine and therefore better understand the New Testament. An extensively researched and scholarly accounting, with a select bibliography, and separate indexes of Bible references and Non-Biblical sources.
Invisible Cities worth reading at least once. I was recommended this book from my friend shortly after finishing graduate school when in need of a good detox-read.  To me the book was far from the brainless entertainment I was hoping for.  In fact, Invisible Cities was full of thought provoking and poetic images of imaginary cities expressed through dialogues between Marco Polo and Kublia Khan.  At first I was struck by the unusual premise for the story and then later struck by the highly symbolic descriptions of the cities.  Through Calvino's use of symbolism I began to have a different appreciation for the forms and structures of cities and civilizations.  This could have been the first time I really thought about cities as a living architecture and the container for our memories and dreams.With all of the above said, one problem I had when reading Invisible Cities was my mind seemed to easily drift off the page.  The book reads more like poetry then a novella and I felt that halfway through the book the form of the chapters became almost too redundant.  I think that if I were to re-read the book and spend some time with it I could have gained greater insight into Italo Calinvo's perspective and creative mind.  Although I am not rushing to re-read it anytime soon, I would possibly read it again in the future
Hillarious!. The first time my father read me this book, he fell of the chair laughing! I was right behind him
A good book for beginners, but mediocre for more advanced readers. Most of the things that Cassandra Eason describes are in fact a lot easier than they seem from the book. Psychic development is a personal discovery of one's own natural abilities. Thus it is unfortunate, that certain things and the techniques that the author talks about are simply not true or incomplete. In her defence, however, it has to be said that a lot of these abilities, such as clairvoyance, or astral travel, etc, are techniques that are very difficult to describe. I would say that about 80% of the techniques outlined in this book could work, whereas the remaining 20% are nonsense.For someone, who already has certain psychic abilities that he or she is aware of, this book will probably be a disappointment. You'd be better off looking for something more specific. However, for most people who are yet unaware of their abilities or who are just interested in what is possible, this book will be very good, as the general outline is excellent. Further, this book provides some very good examples of what is possible within us.This book should be awarded 3,5 stars out of five, since it is generally very good, but fails to deliver some consistent information. It is a very good book for beginners thoug
You Just Have to Know Where to Look. Scott Weidensaul deserves recognition as one of the best naturalist writers working today. Here, Weidensaul follows in the cross-continental footsteps of Roger Peterson (the bird guide guy) and James Fisher, who in the early 1950s wrote about their bird watching journey across North America and created the environmentalist classic "Wild America." Weidensaul is also a bird fanatic, reporting on the astonishing variety of avifauna he encountered while tracing the footsteps of Peterson and Fisher, but he also imparts great amounts of knowledge on all other forms of wildlife as well as larger issues of ecosystem health. Weidensaul certainly finds that many of the natural areas visited by Peterson and Fisher fifty years previously are in worse shape nowadays, with encroaching development and pollution, and great decreases in plant and animal populations. The most distressing example here is the continuing ecological disaster taking place in the Florida Everglades, while the state of nature in several of the other areas covered is barely heartening.However, Weidensaul actually finds that nature is surprisingly strong in some of the areas he visited, such as the quickly urbanizing Rio Grande valley in Texas, or the forlorn Pribilof islands off of Alaska. Concerned local citizens in many bountiful areas are fighting for preservation and sustainable development, though there is still much work to be done. Weidensaul's main point is that wilderness and wildlife is certainly on the decline, and there's no reason to sugarcoat this troublesome reality. But there are still pockets of tremendous natural vitality in North America if you know where to look for them. Weidensaul also fleshes out his great environmental reporting with occasional snippets of realistic politics, which is a departure from his previous works. This includes an outstanding final chapter in which he covers the state of environmentalism in America and tells it like it is, with an honesty far beyond that of pundits and sloganeers. [~doomsdayer520~
A must for all early education centers. This book outlines developmental stages of growth in childhood.  It is easy to read and understand.  The parents in my program rave about this book and there is a waiting list to borrow it from our library
******WONDERFUL and I'd give it more STARS if I could!!!!!!!!******. I Wasn't Ready to Say Goodbye is such a wonderful, wonderful book!  To see my thoughts, actions, and feelings of everything that comes along during the grief of a loved one, particularly one lost by a sudden death.  I was even comforted by carrying it with me for over a year.  Just having it near me helped so that I could read it anytime.  I recently borrowed it to my best friend who just lost her younger sister to suicide and I actually feel very naked without my copy!My favorite aunt was murdered by my uncle (her husband/my mom's brother) and then he committed suicide.  Trying to deal with it was so hard because I felt there was no one in the world who understood my pain, my fears, my irrational thoughts, "griefbursts", guilt, and that overwhelming feeling of being lost.  This book helped me to find my way, to know that everything I was feeling and thinking was completely normal, and just to see it all in print is such a relief.  I've also lost an uncle to a heart attack, friends to suicide, other friends to vehicle accidents, and also the loss of a grandparent who died of old age; and this book has helped me to accept all those I've lost in the past and to realize that all people grieve differently, that there is no time frame for it and that no one can tell you when you're ready to "move on".  This book gives the griever power to accept what has happened and move through the grieving process and to understand it a little better.This book teaches you the grief process from just about every point of view possible (parent, child, sibling, friend, etc.), gives you tips on how to cope and memoralize the ones you've lost, advice on where to seek professional help when needed, and the writers tell their own stories of loss and everything they experienced.  I Wasn't Ready to Say Goodbye mentions the taboos surrounding sudden deaths such as suicide or homicide and lets you know that it's OK to talk about it and that you need to talk about it.Just an absolutely wonderful book on grief after a sudden death loss.  There are very few out there that will compare to this one, especially since this isn't a book about faith, as many grief books are.  It's a straight-forward grieving process gold mine!  I also purchased the workbook that accompanies this one, however, I did not get around to actually doing it so I don't know if it would be helpful.  For those of you who are comfortable with journaling, the workbook would be an excellent compliment to the text.Sorry for those of you who are having to look for this, but I am telling you, this is a wonderful book and one of the best out there!
A Key to Understanding the Enigma of U2. Christianity, metaphorically, has many "keys." Many prominent voices play major keys, promising blessings and offering comfortable settings. Christian Scharen, the author of One Step Closer, introduces a minor key--the theology of the cross--that fits U2's voice."The theology of the cross fits U2 because it avoids the all too common proclamation of faith, hope, and love that ignores the present realities of doubt, despair, suffering and injustice. It is a tradition that looks at the world and speaks the truth about what it sees: the good, the bad, and the ugly. In the words of the church reformer Martin Luther, the theology of the cross `calls a thing what it really is.'"This book helps "make sense of U2's style of talking about God, Jesus, the Spirit and the Christian life in a holistic way." It's an excellent resource for those wanting to understand the spirituality found in the band's lyrics.It also serves as a mini-lesson in theology, especially as it pertains to the cross and the different forms of communication found in the Bible. The author provides keen insight into the psalms, the wisdom literature, the parables, prophecy, and apocalyptic writing in the first section of the book. In each chapter a different pattern of speech is examined with examples of how U2 mirrors the style and content of that particular form.The second section focuses on the theology of the cross. With U2, it's a way of singing "truthfully and unflinchingly about God and the world God loves. It is a way of speaking that highlights faith over certainty, hope over despair, selfless love over the self-indulgent pursuits that tempt the church and its leaders to grab power and money for themselves." Once again the author provides specific examples from the band's music.The last section introduces the idea of living the truth as a way to live the cross. It provides an account of how U2 lives out their faith. For U2, following God means doing the truth.One can easily come away with a greater understanding and admiration for what U2 is all about. The band deserves credit for not succumbing to the popular self-fulfillment trends in the Church.What's especially valuable is the author's ability to introduce readers to the Christian tradition by illustrating from U2. His thoughts on cross-centered theology are rewarding and worth more than one read.This is a scholarly but easy to read work. The author displays a mastery of theology and U2. He more than adequately supports his contentions through Scripture (almost exclusively from The Message Bible) and an analysis of the band's lyrics and interviews. This book is a valuable edition to the growing volume of literature on U2.It would have been helpful if the author would have elaborated more on some of the controversial elements of U2. Though it may be a minor thing, their seeming indifference about drinking, smoking and swearing is hard to understand. Their critical attitude toward the Church and some Christians is understandable but a little troubling.Some Christians feel that U2 is not Christian enough. Ironically, you can see from reading this book that U2 follow in the tradition of the cross by speaking honestly and pointing toward sacrifice and service toward others. In so doing, they have turned it around and indirectly challenged the Church and individual Christians to be more Christian.
Beautiful Gift Book for Christmas. This is a simple, yet beautiful book of pop-up paper scultptures, each representing a theme from A to Z. It is not a book for young children, but rather for an older child or an adult who appreciates simple elegance and dramatic paper sculptures. This is also a great book for people who like to collect alphabet books. It also makes a beautiful "coffee table book" during the holiday season
Do You Dare to Look Behind the Attic Wall?. Maggie is a troubled and unloved child.  Shunted from boarding school to boarding school since the death of her parents,  life begins to change for her when she's suddenly moved to the home of the great-aunts she did not know existed.  The old ladies' strange ways baffle Maggie.  Only very odd Uncle Morris seems interested in Maggie.  Soon after arriving, Maggie begins hearing voices in the old house that no one else can hear.  In her search for the source of the voices, Maggie finds a secret place and a way to regain the loving childhood and acceptance she so desperately needs.NOTE:  This story is at once both fascinating and scary. Not for sensitive children
Code of the warrior. In Marcus Aurelius we find the roots of chivalry for the warrior code.  A classic work for anyone interested in history or military history in particular.  Stoic philosophy for all but especially the warrior in us all.
Great bedtime reading. "New Sudden Fiction" is filled with little gems--great to read before bed, while in the tub or when you have a few free minutes. The best stories leave you wishing for more.  There are author bios at the end of the book so you can explore more fiction by your favorite ones
Everest of the Ocean. Once a year in northern California a swell of waves appear, large enough to crush a town, that can only be described as terrifying. This once hidden surf spot is known to the surf world today as Maverick's. The story begins by telling about surfing's roots in Hawaii and the long, flat pieces of redwood they used to surf on. In 1969 Greg Noll, a highly respected surfer, caught a thirty-foot wave at Todos Santos, an island off of California. Todos santos was thought to be a America's last word in surfing until Maverick's was discovered. The book focuses on the five most dangerous days in Maverick's history. On the first day, the celebrated surfer Mark Foo was killed on a wave that crashed too soon. The wave sent him into a bottomless pit of white-water, where he drownd. A memorial service was held to honor his life. After the surf world discovered Maverick's the first competition was held there entitled The Men Who Ride Mountains. Darryl Virostki won the event after a huge cutback and an arial off a fifteen-foot wave. Maverick's today remains won of the biggest names in big-wave surfing. I recommend this book to all surfers
Fantastic. You know the plot.  Rebellion against authority.  You've seen it re-hashed a hundred times, but never treated this well.  In Cuckoos Nest, Kesey has made the authority palpably evil  - malicious and vindictive.  He's made the innocents perfectly pitiable.  He's made the rescuer a brash brawler fueled by testosterone - not admirable, but respected all the same.The Big Nurse embodies the tyranny of small minds who gain power, absolute power, over those who are helplessly subject to them.  She rules with cold authority over her ward of mental patients, twisting them inside so that they'll never escape her machinations until Randall McMurphy appears in the ward, having conned his way in to avoid work detail in prison.  Thus begins a battle of the wills that is full of high comedy and tragic results.Even told through the perspective of a giant Indian mental patient, McMurphy's acts are not glossed over as the pranks of a fun-loving mischevious kid.  The hatred that he and all patients on the ward have for the Big Nurse seeps out of the pages.  McMurphy's goal is to make them into men, not cowering rabbits, and his final Pyrrhic victory transforms the men around him.This is a modern classic that you will not be able to forget
Look into this NOW -- you won't regret it!. It's one of those things you tend to put off until tomorrow, but . . . this has such a beautiful presentation and is so user-friendly that it will help you get started today. I bought one for my mother and one for myself and treat it as a work in progress. It's great to have a place to put your thoughts and to get organized and started on a meaningful and important project. Your kids will really appreciate it one day, too. Check out the website for more examples of how it works: www.yourethicalwill.com
Great book for preschool and up. I really enjoy this book and have given it as a gift many times. Good for slightly older kids (not toddlers) as the fingerplays are a little on the hard side for very young children. We enjoy this book a great deal
EXCELLENT. This book is excellent! If you don't have a finance background but need to understand the financial statements this book will teach you everything you need. If you already know about finance this book will teach you what you don't know
A great psychic mystery!. Others have given the plot of this book in their reviews, and done it very well, so I'll stick to giving my opinion of the book. Abby does a favor for a friend and ends up trapped by a Mafia boss who pulls no punches in getting Abby to work for him. I found this book to be slightly darker than the first, because the Mob boss is one REALLY bad dude.  All the characters that I love are here, starting with Abby herself. Ms. Laurie makes her such a real person, and such a likable one, that I wish I could meet her and her troop of friends. (Especially Eggy!) This is a great murder mystery and had plenty of psychic insight for those of us who love that sort of thing. I loved this book and have read it twice so far. Like revisiting old friends. I have also read book three and can't wait for 4 to be released in Sept. Read and enjoy
If Liberals talk about the author instead of the book. The book must be true
Mayra Calvani. Since its creation in 1919 by pulp writer Johnston McCulley, the character of Zorro has captured the hearts and imaginations of young and old alike. The infamous, romantic hero has been played by numerous actors through the decades, from Douglas Fairbanks Jr. in the 1920's to Antonio Banderas in the late 1990's. Now, Isabel Allende, born in Peru and raised in Chile, bestselling author of highly acclaimed literary works such as The House of the Spirits (1985), adds intricate texture and a new dimension to the legend by blending the two things she is best known for, magic realism and historical fiction.Born to Alegandro de la Vega, a Spanish aristocrat, and Toypurnia, a Shoshone Indian warrior, Diego de la Vega (a.k.a. Zorro, or "fox" in Spanish) is a product of his mixed heritage. His grandmother, White Owl, a healer and shaman, plays an enormous role in the formation of his character. At an early age, while witnessing the injustice committed against Indians, his alter ego begins to show as he becomes increasingly obsessed with justice. Together with his inseparable, mute friend and "milk" brother Bernardo, Diego is initiated into manhood in the Indian tradition and it is during this experience that he comes into contact with his spirit totem, the fox.At sixteen, Diego is sent to Barcelona for a classical education and, while perfecting the art of fencing with Manuel Escalante, becomes a member of the secret society La Justicia, where he pledges "To seek justice, nourish the hungry, clothe the naked, protect widows and orphans, give shelter to the stranger, and never spill innocent blood." During this time, Zorro falls hopelessly in love with Juliana de Romeu, becomes best friends with her sister Isabel, has a duel with Rafael Moncada, and organizes several rescue missions in the midst of political upheaval. Eventually, together with Juliana and Isabel, he's forced to leave Barcelona in disguise. They walk across Spain, live with Gypsies and are captured by pirates. To Diego's chagrin, Juliana succumbs to pirate Jean Latiffee's charms. Eventually Diego and Isabel make it back to California, where Diego's father has been imprisoned on charges of treason. As if this isn't enough, his mortal enemy Rafael Moncada has followed him here seeking revenge.There's no doubt Allende is a gifted, consummate teller of tales. Under her pen, Alta California and Napoleonic Spain come alive in their most vivid, historical detail. From the modest adobe houses and exotic war paint on Indian faces to the filthy, excrement-filled dungeons and the black eyes of Gypsies to the sparkling diamonds against the plump, white dcollet of Spanish belles, Allende offers us a vibrant saga dripping with adventure, romance, history, politics and a touch of magic.It's a pity, though, that Allende spends a large part of the book in the trivial, Barbara Cartland-style romance between Juliana and Jean Latiffe, while Zorro assumes a secondary, nearly silent role, to the point where one has to wonder whose story is being told.Like many other Latin American writers, Gabriel Garcia Marquez among them, Allende uses the omniscient point of view and her paragraphs are long and almost entirely devoid of dialogue. This evokes a magical quality, the sensation of sitting in front of a bonfire while listening to an old and wise storyteller, but at the same time causes a lack in dramatization. One can't help thinking that Allende has so many stories to tell that if she added dialogue, the book would easily turned into a one-thousand page manuscript. Of course, the lack in dialogue, and so much "telling" rather than "showing" pertains to style and not to a lack of literary skill. Another interesting aspect of Allende's writing is the power she gives to most of her female characters. Damsels in distress? Not in this novel! The women here are wilful, intelligent individuals to be reckoned with. Allende also keeps the identity of the narrator a mystery until the last chapter.Though Allende ultimately fails in lifting Zorro from his place as a two-dimensional, comical character, her remarkable prose and action-packed story make this book a pleasure to read.
How the West was lost. This is a fantastic classic detailing the demise of the plains Indians and deals with them incident by incident, tribe by tribe, chief by chief from around the 1850s to the early 20th century.If the only good Indian was a dead Indian, and if civilisation was to prevail, this book is a stark examination of the lack of morality in the process, or at least the victory of might and legality over right.One thing never mentioned in discussions about the US war of Independence is that the British wished to maintain treaties with the Indians and protect their land rights wheareas the Washingtonians were already in the process of making a land grab before the war took place.  The Indians took the side of the British and they had hell to pay long afterwards as they were wiped off the face of America, along with the Bison.Geronimo, Sitting Bull and Custer's last stand.  Read about it here
More than simply Stimulus-Response psychology. Anyone who accuses B. F. Skinner of championing a mechanistic, stimulus-response psychology needs to read this book!  In it, Skinner takes the reader on an exercise in looking at the world and our place in it through the lenses of personal learning history and the cultural context influencing what is important (primarily Euro-American---but one can only handle so many things at once.)  Although, as other reviews have written, some of the terms and circumstances date the book, the themes contained within remain valid
Great from personal experience.. I'm a UC Berkeley student who has recently taken prof. Dundes' folklore class...this book is part of the reading list (hehe, well, if you're going to teach, might as well use your own book, right?).  You'll enjoy &quot;interpreting folklore&quot; for it's interesting stories and witty writing...Dundes really knows what he's talking about and has always been very clear about getting his point across, even in his lectures...his books, then, are even more succinct and concise.   Buy this book and support the work of a down to earth, awesome professor/folklorist who is passionate and dedicated to this topic. ...plus, be entertained and educated at the same time!  Great deal
A deficit of cartoons to accompany this awesome book. This is one of the best of the best of the 'really ticked off conservative white guy's rage against things' genre I've ever read in a bookstore.Miller has had enough of his own party, who have become a bunch of far-left insane madmen intent on destroying America (starting with the armed forces that cost $80 gazillion a year) and now it's time to rage.  Miller just goes off on this, that, and the other thing, pointing out how low our culture is, how our values are in the toilet, and how the conservatives are on the run from Hillary Clinton's army of replicants, etc, etc.But the best part of the book is when he blasts insults at people, at various lowlifes that occupy the media, rappers, political hacks, etc, etc.  I mean, what's better than a guy going loco about a 'deficit of decency' than a guy letting fly with various insults and indecent remarks to make his point about this 'deficit of decency'.  See, Miller makes the point by being indecent, and showing you that there is a deficit of decency in the USA.Conservatives on all sides have no power anymore, so instead of doing anything about the appalling celebrities that run our nation, or rappers who say bad things, they write really bad books about how bad things are.  Then we all join the Republican party, and the country gets even worse for 90% of people.  At least we know that formula works!  Here's to hoping Miller and others like him return the USA to the days when we had a decency surplus
Great book, great advice!. After being at my wits' end trying to figure out just what was going on in the head of my scaredy-dog, I picked up Brown's book.  On page after page, she described behaviors I was seeing develop, and offered solutions to those behaviors.Fortunately for me, my dog is not as scared as the ones she describes were.  That said, many of the techniques she outlines have been saving graces for me.  Most importantly, I now use a crate in the car when I drive with my dog.  No more barking wildly at buses, motorcycles, other dogs, and trolleys!  No more trying to clamber out the window after those offensive pieces of machinery!  I have no more fear about how my dog is going to act in the car, and she has a lot more security while being in the car.There are many other strategies I will consider using with my scaredy dog.  If your dog is the kind of dog who reacts unpredictably in a wide variety of situations and you want to keep your dog, other dogs, and other people safe around your dog, this book provides a strong and solid base from which to begin your work.  Highly recommended
--Powerful and Unforgettable--. GODS AND GENERALS is an extremely well done and fascinating book.  The author, Jeff Shaara, did an excellent job of interpreting the characters. His task was a difficult one because his father's book, THE KILLER ANGELS is a classic in the chronicles of Civil War stories.  This book precedes the one written by his father.GODS AND GENERALS takes the reader to the beginning of the Civil War and through many of the battles. The major players in the story are Winfield Scott, Robert E. Lee, Stonewall Jackson, Winfield Hancock and Lawrence Chamberlain.  The career biographies of these famous men were striking.  After reading of their early lives and service experiences, it gave me a better understanding of just how horrible a civil war was to all of these men who had formerly served together in the Union Army. They were an outstanding group of soldiers and the sadness that they all faced was to go to war against fellow soldiers and friends.I listened to the unabridged books on tape version read by Dick Estell.  He brought the characters to life by his narration. This book is well worth the time and truly is an unforgettable part of our history.
A Vital and Prophetic Tool. A wonderful teaching tool.  This book, like a solid, trustworthy, open pathway into the future awaits the readiness of men and women who are called into Interspiritual ventures in their response to God's call upon  their lives.  This book is like a hidden map rediscovered by folk who are  following their depths into the inevitable, realistic and mystical unknown  that awaits the faith-empowered who say Yes to the Journey. THE MYSTICAL  HEART is inspired by a Mature Spirit of Wisdom.  It is a practical, vital  and prophetic tool that will resource, encourage and guide us to greater  consciousness and awareness in our work
As good a detective novel as you will ever read. From page one the strength of narrative and the wisecracking of the PI Bernhard "Bernie" Gunther is a detective novel readers dream.  Philip Kerr is able to bring 1936 Berlin alive it all it's nationalistic insanity.  His ability to describe how the Nazi party had taken total control of this nation is remarkable.He has picked-up the nuance of how people delude themselves into believing what they are told, no matter how implausible.Right from the start you know that Gunther is as cynical as you can be, without being arrested by the Gestapo (which he is at a later point of the book).  The way he weaves the disillusionment of the average German, while at the same time showing how they just acquiest to what was going on.  Unlike most books about Germany at this time, he presents the Nazi's as people not cardboard cutouts.  He does, though, show them in all their sadism and brutality.  But it is a brutality that has become humdrum and expected.  No one is surprised by what is going on.  Everyone is just hoping it doesn't happen to them.Especially appealing is Gunther's gumshoe comments and asides as to what is going on.  At one point he gets out of his car and gives the "Hitler salute" when the party standard is paraded by. His comment, "it's not worth taking a beating for not saluting". He tells of a circulating joke, that next to Jews, Hitler hates homosexuals and cripples the most.  The punch line is that everyone but Hitler knows that his Minister of Propaganda, Joseph "Joey" Goebbels has a club foot.You can just imagine Robert Mitchum or Humphrey Bogart playing this "fleabite" PI.  He drinks, he smokes, and he's like a junkyard dog when it comes to doing his job.  There are great descriptions of the war between Reichfurher Himmler, the head of the Gestapo and SS and Prime Minister of Prussia Hermann Goering.The ending, is just a pregnant pause, we know that there are two more books in the "Berlin Noir" trilogy, and that's the way that Kerr leaves us at the end of this book.  You know you have to read the other two
The Cutest Child's Book of All Time!!!!!!!. I had this book for a very long time, and I loved it!  It's a cute book  that teaches children the alphabet and it's a cute game that I used to play  when I was younger.  I still have this book, and I have a reason to:  When  I become a mother and have kids of my own, I'll be able to read it to them!   :
A compelling tale that's truly educational. I read Paddle-to-the-Sea as a child (I was born in 1942), and its story, illustrations and maps have left lasting impresssions on me. It blends social studies, geography, 20th Century American history and wonderful artwork into a gentle, loving tale. It ought to be required reading for all American youths
Spooktacular. Some time ago I read one of this author's other books and it was undoubtedly one of, if not the best book of this type that I had ever read. I was therefore understandably excited when I found this book and began to read because I expected another masterpiece of the ghostly kind. What I found however was something quite good but just not up to the standards that I had set for this author. I must admit that I may be being a little unfair here because if I had come across a book this good by almost any other author I would have been impressed but from Jeff Belanger I just expected a little more. This grand master of the ghost hunter world has just set the bar so high in his previous works that it's going to be almost impossible for him to reach the same level of perfection with every new book. I guess that I'm just going to have to accept that fact, whether I want to or not.Over the years I have come to the conclusion that eyewitness accounts are indispensable to this type of book and that without them all you really end up with is a bunch of old legends. Belanger has a history of excellence in this area and this book is no exception. If anything he takes eyewitness accounts a little to the extreme in this case. The stories in this book are made up exclusively of interviews with eyewitnesses and these first person accounts are generally excellent. One pitfall of this style is evident in this book however and that pitfall is that some of the interviews will obviously be better than others. In other words, some people are just naturally more articulate than others while others are very articulate in person but their words seem to become less clear on paper. Overall though the interviews were excellent and were conducted in a very professional manner.The biggest problem that I had with this book however was that the author relied far too much on the eyewitnesses for the possible history behind the haunts. In some cases this worked just fine and the subjects were intimately familiar with the background of the ghosts in question. In other cases though there was little or no history to be found and it is sometimes hard to really get a feeling for a haunt without knowing what might have caused it. A little research by the author would have added immeasurably to a few of the stories but once again I may be being picky because this author has shown himself to be a more than capable researcher and I found that I really missed his work in this area.Still, this is one fine book of ghost stories and one that any ghost enthusiast will want to read and own. The interview with George Lutz alone is worth the price of the book and I must applaud Jeff for having the courage to take on such a controversial subject. Also included is an interview with a nephew of Ed and Lorraine Warren (another controversial subject) that is quite frankly marvelous. This is without doubt a five star book so I just regret that I couldn't give the last book I read by this author six stars
This book and the &quot;Quality Pioneers.&quot;. One of the unique qualities of this &quot;Five Pillars&quot; book is that it covers in detail the contributions of all the early &quot;quality pioneers&quot;--including Juran, Deming, Feigenbaum, and Crosby. It also covers the works of others who have contributed to our knowledge on &quot;management&quot; matters writ large--not just the far more narrowly focused &quot;quality control&quot; literature. For example, the works of Drucker, Iacocca, and the like are also covered and blended with those of the quality pioneers. The &quot;Five Pillars&quot; praises Deming for what he contributed to the quality movement, but also places his contributions in their needed perspective for those seeking real and not superficial results. Accordingly, it is not suprising that one Balaji S. Reddi from Pune, Maharashtra, India would not like the book. It will be noted that Balaji S. Reddie is an electrical engineer who specializes in teaching the &quot;Deming Way.&quot; In fact his e-mail address places him at &quot;DemingIndia.org.&quot; Within the pages of the &quot;Five Pillars of TQM&quot; the prediction is made that the book will draw flak from those who have turned Deming into &quot;The Man Who Discovered Quality&quot; and the &quot;patron saint&quot; of quality management. It took a long time for the flak to arrive, and then all the way from India!  In fact, a deciple of Walter Shewhart of the Bell Laboratories along with Joseph Juran, W. Edwards Deming made contributions of the &quot;SPC&quot; and &quot;SQC&quot; variety of &quot;QM&quot; but provided false and irrelevant guidance on most of the broader management issues. &quot;TQM&quot;--a term invented by General Bill Creech--is likened as &quot;Total&quot; because its reach is far broader than a set of quality control tools--and the &quot;Five Pillars&quot; book says that in an unambiguous fashion. (&quot;Process&quot; being but one of the five pillars upon which success is built.) What is taught at the DemingIndia organization is unknown to this reviwer, but according to Balaji S. Reddie's reaction it is certainly not the broad based approach to &quot;quality management&quot; that the Bill Creech book is all about. Read it and verify that for yourself
Want a tattoo? Read this book. This book takes you from figuring out what to put in your skin, to how it gets in your skin, what your body does to the ink, and how to care for your tattoo after. And, the history bits were fascinating, and the inside lingo, and how to attend a tattoo convention, and, how people may look at you differently, and where to put your tattoo... oh, heck, this is THE book to read about getting a tattoo. It's a great read even if you're just hooked on the TV tattoo dramas. (Kat ROCKS!
Elisha Watson Book Report Rules of the Road. This is a great book for ages 12+ and up.Joan Bauer has mad another great book. I could relate to it a lot from the family being divorced to not knowing much about the rules of the road. It takes place in, Chicago, Illinois during the hot summer. Jenna Boller is the best employee at her branch of Gladstone's Shoes-she can sell anybody anything. she is sixteen-years-old and has had her driver's license for six months. But her family problems are harder to handle, especially her drunk dad, and there are times when Jenna wishes she could just get out of town and take a break. Her dad is a drunk and embarrases at her job. So when Madeline Gladstone, the elderly president of Gladstone's Shoe Stores, hire Jennna as her driver for the summer to take her from Chicago, to Dallas Jenna leaps at the chance-right in the driver's seat. And that begins a cross-country adventure. They learn a lot about the rules of the road... and the rules of life. Jenna is having a nice time driving Mrs.Gladstone around and spending nights at the hottest hotels and most expensive places to eat. Mrs.Gladstone's son is wanting to take over the business because he says that his mother needs to slow down and enjoy the rest of her life. The only problem is that her son,Elden and her aren't very close with relationship and so they don't talk a lot. Elden only cares about the money, not the customers. He will try to sell you anything no matter the price or how it feels on your feet. Later, in a couple of weeks they are going to have a meeting where people will vote and decide who should still be president over Gladstone's Shoes. Jenna meets Henry Bender, the best shoe-seller in Texas. Jenna only knows him for about a week and it's like he becomes her own father. She never really had a dad who took care of her since he was drunk all the time. She mostly took care of him. Then some disturbing news happen, Mr.Bender was killed in a car accident hit head-on by a drunk driver. Jenna's heart is crushed. The real conflict of the story is that right before the meeting that determines who is the president, Elden captures Jenna and gets a plane ticket back home. He takes her to a taxi cab and leaves to the meeting. She tells the taxi to turn around and go back to the meeting, she sneaks in and stops everything. She gives a speech and lets everyone know that Elden is just looking for money instead of quality. Everyone votes for Mrs.Gladstone to stay the president! As Jenna and Mrs.Gladstone arrive home Jenna thinks to herself, all this time she has bent over backwards for her dad and was scared to hurt his feelings for not wanting to see him since he is drunk all the time. Then she realizes that it doesn't matter what her dad wants, she has been their when he wasnt' and she hasn't gotten anything for it. She understands now. She wondered why her dad had to be a acoholic. Now she knew, it was to make her stronger, different and most importantly it showed her how to say no in the darkness. This was a powerful yet hilarious book. I will most likely read it again and never forget it
Every Man Fights His Own War. I salute this author for his writing talents of transporting us literally into another space and time that not many of us will ever know of.I can only imagine the horrors of what our fathers went through.I can only hope that I should one tenth as brave as they were.I can only hope that it never happens again.Jones' use of the written word in this work is comparative in a way to the late, great Thomas Wolfe, and another- Virginia Woolfas lyrical poetry in a technical development.Five Stars.
You Bring Out The Elvis In Me. ELVIS IN JERUSALEM is less about the "Americanization" of Israeli society than it is about the "de-Zionization" of Israeli culture.Segev, one of the foremost Israeli "New Historians" (i.e. revisionists) sees the liberation of Israel from its drab, early, khaki-colored socialist-collective Pioneer culture as necessarily a good thing, and treats the resultant influx of American products, values, norms and even language as an amicable step toward globalization and Israeli normalization.Segev is correct, to an extent. The severe and essentially narrow views of Israel's founders have fallen further and further out of step as the State of Israel has matured. As early Zionist philosophies have withered, pluralism has flourished. Where Ben-Gurion and his fellows wanted to create a socialist "New Hebrew" human being and a parochially secular yet all-Jewish state out of the disparate elements of European, Oriental and New World Jewry, Israel today embraces a diversity of practices, and has re-embraced Yiddish and Ladino culture, as well as that of Jews from other lands.As the State has grown politico-emotionally there has been an increasing tendency to treat with the resident Arabs---Israeli Arabs and Palestinians both---on a more evenhanded basis. This is all to the good.Segev addresses (but of course cannot resolve) the inherent contradictions of living in a democratic, secular State in which Jewish clergy or Zionist philosophers control certain key social structures. These contradictions affect all Israelis, no matter their ethnicity or faith, and create the dynamic tensions which drive Israeli society forward (or back, depending on one's views).Segev views the American model as key. He revels in an open, pluralistic, multicultural society, but seems too close to the issue to see that these elements can also cause profound social schisms as they do in the U.S.. He never acknowledges the "Wal-Mart-ization" of this consumer culture, the substitution of instant gratification and cheap junk for quality and bedrock values, as in the least destructive.Segev seems to view most Israeli schisms as overwhelmingly political ("Palestine" versus "West Bank" for example) or religious ("Who is a Jew?"), rather than directly addressing the sea change in Israel from Pioneer Culture to Organization Man Culture, which, in effect, is the same sea change that has altered the American social fabric.Segev's "New History," in which he questions and debunks the accepted institutional mythos of the re-establishment of the Jewish Homeland, is thought-provoking. It would have been better and stronger had Segev bothered to document the majority of his statements and sources.Although Elvis, a Melungeon of Sephardic Jewish descent, has long since left the building, Segev provides the American reader with a view of an Israel profoundly altered from the day of CAST A GIANT SHADOW, a modern, vibrant, complex and confused place full of living, breathing human beings.
good not just for review but to learn. My son needs some real education in math (he is 7.5 years old in second grade).  I use this book to set the curriculum and scope of teaching him math.  This book serves as the basis to learn pre-calculus.  So far he loves it and understands math is not all about just addition/subtraction/multiplication and division.
Thorough history of Mary. As a Protestant convert to Orthodox Christianity I had the usual misgivings regarding the elevated role of Mary in the Orthodox and Catholic Churches. This book gives a thorough and scholarly approach to how marionology developed over the centuries in both the eastern and western traditions of the church. It was very helpful in enabling me to better appreciate why there is such a veneration of Mary even though there is not much biblical revelation about her. The most surprising thing to me was the Muslim connection to Mary. This book will certainly fill in your knowledge and appreciation for Mary and how she developed into such an icon of the church
The Answer. While devouring this book, I really felt that I was getting close to, quote unquote, "The Answer."  That's how powerful it was on both me and, as I see, some of my fellow reviewers.  So much of it has to do with making decisions, and making decisions is an integral part of Soren K's definition of truth.  But you have to get at it subjectively, not objectively.  There's one part where, let's say, you (the reader) are in prison, and you will get your head chopped off by the guillotine tomorrow.  You are afraid, naturally.  I, as your friend, can talk to you and say (objectively), "Oh, you're worried about the guillotine tomorrow.  You see, it's very simple: you just walk out to the scaffold, put your head down on the slab of wood, making sure to put your neck in the appropriate neck hole; they will cut a rope, the blade of the guillotine will come down, your head will be chopped off, and it will all be over in a minute."  You, the subjective decision-maker, do not see it in the same way
Taking Sides:  I'll Take the Whole Book!. This series of books is a must for anyone interested in modern political thought.  It is as interesting as &quot;Crossfire&quot; with more substance and depth.  The editors' political experience shows in the selection of authors and pieces chosen.  Though I'm sure the editors have their own opinions, both sides of each issue are well represented.  They have carefully culled differing points of view from intelligent people who make their arguments persuasively.  Highly recommended
Mobius rocks. I am a new knitter. After taking a class on the Mobius method, and getting into Cat Bordhi's fun and quirky head, it will be very boring for me to pick-up any of my other started projects. I have this and the first book, and was able to create many quick christmas presents that were a hit. Cat has found many ways that have simplified so many of the knitting methods, I am now able to transfer her methods to other knitting book patterns that I was afraid to try. I highly recommend trying these 2 books, you won't believe how how fun and strange it is, and knitting will never be the same for you
Babylon 5 is the best show ever made!. Babylon 5 is the best show ever made! The depth of which J. Michael Straczynski has created is far beyond all other Sci-Fi series or books I have ever heard of. He is Genius
An excellent work for Aikiju-jutsu beginners. I am an instructor of Goshin Ryu Aikijiu-jutsu and I really enjoyed this book. It is well organized and readable. The action sequence shown in the photographs is very clear. If you are familiar with the principles common  to all styles of this art you will be fond of this work, particullarly with  the references to counter-techniques, rarely seen. An excellent book
Enjoyable, hilarious, and hold up over time. Never read a book by this guy, but he's touted as being against big government, so I thought I'd take a swing. It's a pretty scathing book, and I loved every minute of it. O'Rourke tackles all the politics of the day, the day being just after Bush I took office. What's great about going back and reading a book like this is seeing whether or not his predictions came true. Not that there are a lot of predictions, but the ones that are there are pretty dead on.The great thing is that O' Rourke actually does some journalistic work. He spends a day or two in Congress, tags along with congressmen, checks out government offices, interviews foreign dignitaries, etc. and comes away with some great conclusions.Because of that, O' Rourke is able to do something that seems almost impossible: humanizing politicians. These guys work hard. I guess you would have to in order to waste the money and time the government does. But they work hard and they believe in what they're doing, no matter how ridiculous it actually is. So essentially, we have not necessarily elected crooks and thieves to Congress, rather, we've elected good people way out of touch. Oh, and some of them are crooks and thieves.But O'Rourke puts the blame squarely where it belongs in a democracy. He does, that is, if you believe voting makes a difference. I guess that's what makes him a Republican and what makes me....not. Don't worry, though, if you're a Democrat. O'Rourke seems to be an equal opportunity scather, and the situations he presents will make even the staunchest advocates of babysitting government try to figure out how we allowed this to happen.  Being neither a Republican or Democrat allowed me to squeal with glee at just about everything he wrote.We did, though, and thank goodness. Otherwise, we'd never get a fine book like this
The Platonic ideal of a historical novel... perfection. This is a book that dumps you squarely in the agora, the symposium, the trireme and the battlefield. There is not a single wasted syllable, not one sentence that rings false. Like a Mozart symphony, it is exactly right - the Platonic ideal of what a historical novel should be. Being set in the era of Imperial Athens, it naturally incorporates its own tragedy - more than one, in fact. Almost effortlessly, it leaves you understanding just why the Athenians behaved the way they did and how their arrogance led to disaster.Great historical figures spring from the pages, with all their faults and weaknesses as well as their magnificent virtues - Plato, Socrates, Alcibiades, Xenophon, Critias, and many others. Yet alongside the lucid rationality of Socrates, which rings true down the millennia, Alexias and his contemporaries inhabit a world of gods and demons. Zeus, Poseidon, Apollo, Athene and the Furies are just as real to them as the mountains and the sea
Overall a very unique and informative book. I read this book with some anxiety being a college junior and not a psychologist or psychiatrist.  I learned of it from my dad, a philosophy professor.  I thought it was really superb and answered many question I had about homosexuality.  For example, I am not gay and ever since the Matthew Shepard incident, I have been trying to understand why gay and lesbian people are the targets of hate crimes.  It didn't seem to me that the motivation for hatred of gays is exactly the same as hatred for other minority groups.  "Sexual Orientation and Psychoanalysis" explains the way that the homophobia-particularly in men has its roots in childhood- particularly the last part of childhood.  One point it stresses is that it often seems to be traced back to middle school years and is a special type of bullying.  Going back to my own experience with schoolyard bullies when I was in 6th grade-this made a lot of sense.  I also learned a lot about the different pathways for sexual development in men and women.  I now understand why "homosexuality" is not just one "thing" and how different gay and lesbian people are from each other.  I was surprised to learn how similar the sexuality of lesbian is to heterosexual women, and gay men- to heterosexual men (even though there are also differences of course).  Not all the material discussed in this book had equal interest for me.  For example, I wasn't all that interested in the last chapter which is about the way psychoanalysts have thought about homosexuality over the years, but it was enlightening to better understand why they used to think that homosexuality was a mental illness.  I did read some Freud and some of my teachers  hated him and some admired him.  At least with respect to sex-I appreciated knowing which of his theories are simply out of date.  Friedman and Downey think that some of Freud's views are still helpful as well.  All in all I give this book an "A" grade- and -even though it is demanding-it is worth the effort to read it.  One good thing about it is that it is very clearly written and without psychobabble or jargon
Not her best, but very good. I was a little wary of reading this book since she was never able to get it published during her lifetime despite trying for many years. I assumed that if she couldn't get it published that it probably wasn't very good. I was pleasantly surprised by the depth of this book. It is meant to be a satirical work mocking the Gothic romance popular during Jane Austin's lifetime. In such romances, there were fictional monsters and secret corridors and such, and in this book the main character, Catherine, keeps thinking that such things were going to pop up or had popped up, but they never really had. Towards the end, instead of some fantastic mythical monster, a real monster emerges as the culprit behing the pain Catherine experiences: pride in rank.  The father of Henry Tilney, whom Catherine has fallen in love with, refuses to allow them to be married because Catherine is of a lower rank and has less money that his family does.  Austin vilifies the wealth heriarchy of her day through both Henry's father and through her friend Isabella who tries to do anything that she can to marry someone wealthier than herself, leading Catherine to much pain.This is nowhere near as good as some of Miss Austin's other works, but it is good nontheless, and a fun read. It's much better if you understand what Gothic romance novels were like, since this is a satire on those novels.Overall grade: B
The content id Amazing. The amount of theory it's attached with a lot of circuits, and all easy to estudy and also deploy.Some circuit displayed are the easy way to have commmon problems in the electronic's life.its a good choice!
Similar but different true, but it may help build tolerance. I doubt that "Jesus and Buddha: The Parallel Sayings" will convert many Christians to Buddhism or Buddhists to Christianity.  I hope that it will help to build tolerance between the two religions, which is what I believe is the author's intent.  "Jesus and Buddha:  The Parallel Sayings" shows that there are many similarities between the teachings of Jesus and Buddha.  Both were great spokesmen for compassion and nonviolence.  However, by focusing on the similarities between the teachings of Jesus and Buddha, this book might be somewhat nave about the differences between Christianity and Buddhism.  A couple of reviewers have pointed to "John 14:6 'I am the way, the truth and the life, no one comes to the Father except by me.'"  The reviewers appear to be using the inherent intolerance of this teaching as a selling point for Christianity.  For me it was the intolerance of such biblical scriptures that drove me away from Christianity, the religion that I was raised with and that I once strongly believed in.  I could not reconcile how such teachings can be of a loving or just god so I eventually reached the point where I could no longer believe in or worship that god.  I then gradually started searching for another belief system.  Because of both the similarities AND the differences, Buddhism had a naturally strong appeal to me.  Buddha's teachings against attachment, even to his own teachings, are especially appealing to me.  Perhaps Jesus was actually speaking against attachments to biblical scriptures when he said "I am the way, the truth and the life, no one comes to the Father except by me."  Perhaps he was saying that only his words were the true words of God and telling his followers not to allow them selves to become attached to biblical scriptures that preceded him or may follow him (i.e.: some have argued that Paul was a corruptor of Jesus' teachings).  Unfortunately, if that is what Jesus meant, many Christians do the opposite.  They attach to biblical scriptures that allow them to chastise the sins of others and let go of Jesus' teachings.  This is especially true of his teachings that interfere with worldly profits, egos or vengeance (i.e.: "that which has Caesar on it belongs to Caesar", "it is easier for a camel to pass through the eye of a needle than it is for a rich man to enter the gates of heaven", "remove the log from your eye before pointing out the splinter in your neighbors", "let he who is without sin cast the first stone", "if someone strikes you, turn the other cheek", etc.).  Regardless of how Jesus may have meant "I am the way, the truth and the life, no one comes to the Father except by me", it is most often used as a teaching of intolerance toward other belief systems.  Books like "Jesus and Buddha: The Parallel Sayings", "Living Buddha, Living Christ", "Spiritual Advice For Buddhists And Christians" and "The Good Heart: A Buddhist Perspective on the Teachings of Jesus" might help build tolerance between the two religions.  That is why I am giving "Jesus and Buddha:  The Parallel Sayings" five stars.  Unfortunately, such books cannot change the inherent intolerance of some biblical scriptures.  That makes the task of these books much more difficult
Falling in love with "Anger". This book is a gem. Among many good qualities, it continued to deepen my understanding and compassion for that sensation we experience that we call "anger". The meditation in the back of the book is beautiful, as is much of Thich Nhat Hahn's writing. I read it to my yoga classes during relaxation at the end, and read it before bed often to sweetly and softly connect to this "human experience.
Fast Fun and Flexible ways to learn and teach. This is the most useful training book I have ever read. The format is easy to read and it is easy to learn the concepts. I have been doing training and psychotherapy for twenty-two years and I am an NLP practitioner. I  learned many valuable new things.  Especially the importance of teaching  all the types of intelligence's. I now realize that when I get all  excellent evaluations except for one or two I may not be hitting that  persons intelligence.  The marketing ideas are a very welcomed addition.  This book has helped my training and business immensely
Read before you visit the park. To begin with, I don't agree with game hunting at all. However, if you're planning on visiting Jim Corbett park in Uttaranchal Pradesh, India, I'd strongly recommend reading this book before you go. The park is beautiful, but knowing some of the history and the insights into tiger behaviour that Corbett provides is fascinating.
Great intro  for small  children. You've heard of being a little mouse in the room or a fly on the wall?   Well, Sammy is a spider on the ceiling! This is a good intro to Rosh  Hashanah for small children, who will love the big, colorful illustrations.   I also like the Sammy Spider series because it portrays spiders in a  positive way.  Spiders are our friends -- they eat flies and other annoying  bugs, and are nothing to be afraid of
VERY INTERESTING BOOK. SPOILERS!! BE WARNEDThis book is so freaky and thats why its great.  Its got a horror touch to it as those robots are pretty scary the way it does evil but acts like its doing perfectly righteous acts.  One reviewer mentioned that the main character is not likable. I dont know what he's talking about because the main character is totally great, honorable, just, basically everything you want in a human being or a hero.  The story is great because you can never guess whats going to happen next.  It keeps changing.  The ending at first seems pretty horrible, and I didnt realy like it but I think if it didnt end this way this book woudnt of made such an impact.   Oh and this book is exactly like that one star trek episode from the original series called NOMAD where that machine tried to "steralize" everything one but killing it.
The Immune System Cure: Great Info. This book is really helpful. Shows how certain supplementation can aid the immune system and the mind body connection in relationship to the immune system and is written in clear and concise form and intended for the layman. It covers some of the following topics - Thirty Days to Boost Immunity - Fats That Heal, Fats That Kill - Genetically Engineered Foods  - Plants Provide Great Disease Protection - Killer SugarEating Too Much Depresses Immunity - Yogurt: Super-Immune BoosterHow Can I Eat Enough Greens? - Fabulous Fiber  - Greens in a Glass - Protein for Repair - Are You Digesting What You Eat?Pure Clean Water - Green Tea: Your Coffee Substitute  - Your Body Has the Power to Heal - Nutrition: Cancer's Formidable Foe - Why Do We Get Cancer?Why Are North American Cancer Rates So High? - What Is Cancer? - Attitude Is the Key to Survival - Natural Therapies Pack a Punch Case History - Detoxification Diet: Jump-Start Immunity and much more! - I found a really good source of M.D. backed information on immune health with supplementation --  if you are interested email healthnc_at_aol_dot_com and request immune health info.
Delightful Range of Essays on Current Topics. This is a great collection of issues and debates in science that those of us out of the field -- or even involved in other research fields -- will find interesting.  They're as clearly written as editor Oliver Sacks' works and each has at least one topical issue to catch the reader's interest.  Some have several.Each story has something fascinating about it:* "The Forest Primeval" tells about an area of the Congo which humans hadn't penetrated -- and the impact of the wildlife on the ecology.  There are some surprising elements to it, including that it might once have been populated by humans.* Mann's article from Atlantic Monthly goes through what the New World might have been like prior to Columbus -- and highlights a debate between new historians and traditionalists over whether the continent was empty -- or whether Old World diseases killed up to 90% of the population before colonists began arriving.* "The Learning Curve" deals with the practical skills of learning to be a doctor.  Don't let me in the hospital any time soon . . .* "Notes from a Parallel Universe" deals with the people who try to convince scientists of bizarre theories.  At Berkeley they even keep the crackpots papers.* Learn about Seattle's Yuckies in "Shadow Creatures."* Gunjan Sinha's article on voles indicates that what you might be experiencing isn't love but a hormone called oxytocin.* The article from New Republic titled "Fighting Chance" is a great story of research -- and how a scientist's career decision got made.* "Why Turn Red?" unravels part of a mystery for why leaves turn red, an energy-consuming activity that often occurs when the leaves are at the end of the photosynthetic life.* If you want a GREAT theme for a scary kids story for a fiction class, the stuff in "Got Silk" has the raw material for good science fiction.* The essay on Hawking is interesting, if only because the bet that it refers to from 1997 was just settled about a month ago -- with Hawking admitting that he was wrong.* Cassuto's essay from "Salon" portrays the impact of a scandal on the science world, where the collateral damage can be as broad as in the financial world.* And finally, the last essay does justice to the career of Stephen Jay Gould, as a biologist, essayist and ardent enemy of creationist influence on public policy.* Plus, you can even learn which TV show retired lab chimpanzees prefer.I'm a sucker for the "Best American Short Stories" collections issued each year, but this collection of science essays exceeded my expectations.  So much so that I sent it to my daughter at college
A painfully honest book. I found Yancey's truthfulness to be refreshing. Whether you read this book as a Christian or someone just searching, you will find, I am sure, that Yancey is honest. In fact so honest that there are times that you feel like cringing. Why is Yancey revealing family secrets? Should he point out our weaknesses like that?I learned a lot from this book. I learned that a relationship with God is a difficult one because it is a relationship between a finite being with limited understanding (me) and an infinite, all-knowing God. No wonder I have problems relating.I suppose one of the most common questions people ask is, assuming God is, why he doesn't show himself to us? Yancey does not admit to have all the answers but what helped me to understand God's `reluctance' to show himself to us is that if he did it would remove our freedom of choice; we would have no choice but to believe. One of the wonders of this world is our free will.I think for those who are honestly seeking ultimate truth, this book will go some way in pointing someone towards the Scriptures and ultimately Christ Jesus himself. In the end, what will matter is our individual relationship with this invisible God.One gripe with Yancey was his reliance on Catholic authors. For an evangelical (if he is one), he leans so heavily on Catholic sources that one would think he was a Jesuit priest. But that criticism aside, I would highly recommend this book.
Read it again...for the first time. With the identity of Deep Throat now known, All the President's Men has an added bit of excitement.  I couldn't help but think, "wasn't it obvious?" as I read it and thought of Deep Throat's true identity.  Reading it, I realized that Woodward and Bernstein didn't try to hide the secret as well as all the speculation over the last 30 years would lead one to believe.Don't be like the taxi driver I had late one night in D.C. this summer who said he didn't need to read this book because "I lived through it."  Man that guy was a jerk.  He would not shut up
Home is Where the Hurt Is. Tom Bissell is fond of sprinkling aphorisms throughout the stories in this fine collection, so let's lay one on him:  Only a young man with his entire life stretched out before him could afford to be so pessimistic about life's possibilities.Granted, he's writing about places it's easy to be pessimistic about, god-forsaken Central Asian Republics spawned by the collapse of the Soviet Empire, places that are a "combo of Soviet paranoia and Muslim xenophobia" as one character puts it.  Five of the collection's six stories follow this pattern: take a (young) American; drop him or her into a central Asian country; stir; chronicle the resulting disaster.The first story, Death Defier, is probably the best.  A free-lance American photographer gets caught in a difficult situation in Afghanistan while trying to help a British reporter felled by a virulent strain of malaria.  The story poses an interesting question:  can you dive so deeply into the mechanics and aesthetics of war that you become immune to death-terror?  Bissell grapples honorably with the complex sensibility of war correspondents, people who are voyeuristic and deeply engaged, often at the same time.  Aral is about Amanda, an American biologist sent by the United Nations to study the shrinking Aral Sea (a hall of fame ecological screw-up).  Amanda consistently misreads the intent of the people around her.  She displays that combustible American mix of idealism, aggressiveness and ignorance of the local culture that's served us so well in Vietnam and Iraq.Expensive Trips Nowhere and The Ambassador's Son are ugly American stories.  In an Author's Note, Bissell acknowledges his debt to Hemingway's The Short, Happy Life of Francis Macomber for Expensive Trips Nowhere, which is about courage or the lack thereof on the steppes of Kazakhstan.  The Ambassador's Son is about what you'd get if you dropped the Jay McInerney of Bright Lights, Big City into the capital of Tashkent.  It should be noted that Bissell writes well about sex, giving it neither more nor less significance than the situation he's describing merits.  The final story, Animals in Our Lives, is the only one set in America.  Franklin, a recently returned expat English teacher, and Elizabeth, a med student, spend an afternoon at the zoo and experience the moment when it comes clear they don't have a future with each other.  It's a sensitive rendering of the kinds of pain your intellect can't protect you from.The title story, which won a Pushcart Prize, is about Timothy, a missionary in Samarkand whose faith gets subverted by physical urges.  Bissell gets the succumbing to temptation part just right, along with the heartbreaking juxtaposition of sex with hope that pervades the world's downtrodden places.  What's missing is a visceral sense of the struggle to hold on to God.  God may not live in St Petersburg, but Dostoievksi did, and the master understood that sin gains heft through the hubris of the sinner.  Something enormous was at stake for Dostoievski's spiritual criminals; they pitched themselves willingly on to the pyre, inviting and accepting oblivion for their defiance.  Timothy settles for the tiny oblivion of orgasm, then sits in a fug of post-coital remorse waiting for God to ring him up.  He's simply not a big enough person to carry his part of the argument, so the story falls short of the tragic dimension it tries to achieve.There's a lot to like about Bissell as a writer.  He's willing to engage with far-off, difficult cultures, and willing to wrestle with big ideas like death and sin.  He writes a prose that's both erudite and plainspoken, which is hard to do.  He can be both trenchant and expansive in his observations, often in the same well-turned phrase.  His efforts to describe the ways in which the personal and political infuse and alter one another takes him into territory mined so productively by Graham Greene.  While each of the individual stories may not be perfectly realized, it feels like there's something at stake here, maybe something important.He's an author work rooting for, and I'd definitely buy his next book.
"Why I Chose You" Gregory E. Lang. Powerful, emotional, exceptionally well done.  A perfect gift for anyone who has adopted a child and beautiful reading for the extended family.  It captures the almost indescribable feelings that unite a parent and child and will, at some point, be a valuable tool in expressing those feelings to the child.
A fable for the modern reader. Checkov was a master of composing life's largest problems into beautiful language and ordinary situations which the entire world could understand.  Granted he wrote them a long time ago but the underlying situation exists everywhere today.  Here are three sisters completely unable to move on with their lives.  They are unhappy, they are desperate for a change of scene, they are forced to give up anyone they love to someone else but yet they remain glued to the exact place where all of this occurs.  Olga has passed her prime, Masha loves someone other than her husband, and Irina has no idea what could possibly make her happy and all they do is talk about change, but never do anything active.  And in the end it all comes full circle and we as an audience, a reader, need to decide how to not fall into such a life rut, to learn by their actions as we do from Aesop's fables.  This play is just written a great deal better, with a little more comedy and tugging at the heartstrings
Framework Design Unraveled - Recommended for Developers & Architects. In the object oriented design and architecture, business objects are simply the entities which abstracts the physical entities in the domain that the component is written to represent. In "Expert C# Business Objects" Rocky Lhotka goes above and beyond this definition and walk us through the different steps of encapsulation, abstraction, behavior representation and business object implementation with distributed systems.Let's face it, in the coder to developer transition, one starts developing a framework on the top of the application program framework (.NET/J2EE) which abstracts and empowers the development by providing easily maintainable reusable code segments. This happens in the phases, either consciously or unconsciously and the end result can range from couple of utility classes to a n-tier architecture with support for network communication, database object relational modeling and web services interface. This book is efforts of trying to escalate this concept into practice by making developers understand the advance basics of framework design. In this 800 page book, Rocky has divided topics into eleven chapters all focusing on one specific area of framework design namely Distributed architecture, framework design, key technologies, business framework implementation, data access and security, object oriented application design, business object implementation, windows forms UI, web forms UI, web service interface, report and reporting and batch processing. Even though its focused on .NET framework based technologies, this book can be used for developing frameworks in other programming languages and platforms as well.Like other framework design enthusiasts, I've been following Rockford Lhotka's writing for quite some time now along with his development of CSLA.NET framework. CSLA stands for component-based Scalable Logical Architecture which is now in version 2.0 and provides a great deal of flexibility and power in terms of business object design. CSLA is an object oriented software framework which provides a standardized way to create robust object oriented programs using business objects model. Author in this book discusses design strategies, common problems they solve and lessons learned. Being a Microsoft regional director, a Microsoft MVP, and an INETA speaker, Rockford Lhotka has much exposure to the industry to do research in void. There has been significant community contribution in the CSLA framework as discussed by author himself in a recent episode of .NET rocks and I'd strongly disagree that this book is a manual for CSLA.NET. There is a catch 22 in framework style books i.e. either you can be theory centric with code samples or provide a solid framework code with theory snippets in between. "Expert C# Business Objects" follows the second paradigm and escalates the CSLA.NET and walk us through the steps. The first approach is followed by Microsoft Development series book "Framework Design Guidelines: Conventions, Idioms, and Patterns for Reusable .NET Libraries".If you are interested in solid, robust, reusable design and high level architectural business models for .NET, Rockford Lhotka's "Expert C# Business Objects" is a recommended read. The next version of this book with revisions and enhancements in the framework for .NET 2.0 is out now for both in C# and VB.NET titled "Expert C# 2005 Business Objects" and "Expert VB 2005 Business Objects" respectively
Enlightening. I read this book recently and was amazed at the amount of spiritual insight it gives.  Dr. Munroe paints a clear picture of how God created man (male and female), and explains through the word of God that men and women are equal, yet different. I recommend this book to both men and women who are searching for answers to why they behave the way they do and are looking to build better relationships
Excellent Book. I absolutely loved this book!  I was into it from the beginning.  From Thomas' problematic birth to the end of the story.  What a life Tommy and his brother lived.  I felt like a fly on the wall imagining everything happening.  What a tough, but inspiring life Tommy led.  His trials were tremendous and yet he overcame them all.  Eric's love and need for his brother was unexpected with his fortunate life.  This book brought tears to my eyes.  I cannot imagine the trials that Tommy experienced.  What astounds me is that there are many Tommy's in "real life".  I really look at homeless people differently now because of this book.  I could go on, but I'll end by saying: "You owe it to yourself to read this book"
great book but not the end all be all. This is a great source of information for the traveler.  It's the best large scope book I've found for finding information on intracountry travel via bus, train, taxi, etc.  It's also well written with a wry sense of humor.  Some limitations, however, are timeliness, as businesses are constantly opening and closing in China, and I've already found a few places mentioned in the book that are no longer operating.  Prices have also almost all gone up, despite the book coming out just a year ago.  Gotta love inflation.  The Rough Guide to China offers some better historical information and general overview of areas, but comes in short with getting around info.  I like the Rough Guide better for planning and the Lonely Planet more to help while actually travelling
The Best Work of Wells. "The Martians have arrived. Let the war begin." A catchphrase that could easily be employed for Herbert George Wells's most acclaimed science fiction "The War of the Worlds". This is a novel revolving around the highly improbable but simultaneously stunningly imaginative idea that the earth is invaded by organisms residing on Mars. Composed in a first person narrative,"The War of the Worlds" is a gripping saga of the millions of people's agony and loss of ease in the face of a confrontation that would change the world for good.The story begins directly with the theme. In the last years of the 19th.century,in the most unassuming and delicate of all propositions,England witnesses the most surreal threat:ten bizzare cylinders all containing Martians fall near London. A wave of bitter agony,nameless fear and hopeless apprehension rocks the peole and as the Martians gradually come to terms with the Earth's gravitational strength,the police and the military of surrounding regions stolidly enarm themselves for an imminent war. The greatest of all human fallacies is perhaps the absurd universal acknowledgement that humans are the most accomplished creatures anywhere. This myth is firmly exploited in the book a the narrator---an ardent follower of astronomy and scholar of philosophy---perceives a plethora of harrowing incidents that compel him to shudder to his boots.The narrator's town of Maybury is completely demolished and so are the nearby towns of Woking,Weybridge,Shepperton and others. The narrator manages to traffic his wife to his cousin's place in Leatherhead in asumed safety but himself gets entangled hopelessly and helplessly in the boughs of life and death. In his maddening and desperate escape from the clutches of the more intelligent and powerful Martians,the narrator pairs up first with an artillerman and then with a curate. The latter is a lost soul whose faith in God and religion has broken in the wake of humanity's greatest ever calamity and the former is confident and visonery whose preferred modes of survival in a Martian dominated Earth is not that improbable,if at all naive. H.G.Wells's artistry lies in speedily building up to a great climax and in a plot so utterly novel and unique and symmetrical,this is a marvellous diusplay of wit,intelligence and clearness of structure."The War of the Worlds" on one level may appear to be a mere science fiction with vivid illustration of beings from outer space and the havoc they cause on our planet but the essence of the book transcends much beyond this demarcation. The weahness of mankind in the face of unknown,unheard and unthought catatrophes is firmly delineated in this landmark novel and Wells applies a very,very subtle satire on humans' grotesque complacency on teir own abilities. When the artilleryman admits,"we're down;we're beat" with "absolute conviction",the reader fathoms the author's surrender of "the greatest power in the world" to Fate. On a much higher level,"The War of the Worlds" is a massive comment on man's petty as well as magnanimous follies garbed in a dress of science fiction.Composed in a sense of retrospection,the book does lose some of its charm from the very beginning that the narrator is alive and kicking. and the confinement of the sequence of events within a relatively small England territory narrows the scope of the novel and also trims down its volume. But even so,"The War of the Worlds" is a brilliant science fictin that leads the rteader on a journey on the back of an unfaithful wave that conpires to lead the world to the ultimate diasaster. H.G.Wells was a great visonery in the late 19th.century and it's no less remarkable achievement that this Englishman's great book is still being studied today and would be read for several decades to come. "The War of the Worlds" is a captivating and telling tale that would dazzle the reader by the shine of the writer's craftmanship.
Anthropocentrism without the hubris. Mr. Abel was a humanist that traced his lineage of thought from the English pragmatic humanist F.C.S. Schiller to the Greek Sophist Protagoras (420-490 BCE) and beyond. "Man is the measure of all things: of those that are, that they are; and of those that are not, that they are not." Protagoras' notion that judgements and knowledge are in some way relative to the individual. This is a line of agnostic thinkers that put man at the center of the stage. They claim no absolute knowledge. This last claim Socrates did one better by not claiming any knowledge at all. Socrates is the first of the great Humanists in the West, and Confucius was the first great Humanist in the East. Humanists are proud to be human beings. Humanists' two fundamental tenets are that a man should learn to think for himself, and values are uniquely human--man is the measure. Though a little too manthropocentric an approach to our specie's place in the Cosmos for my liking Abel nevertheless does manage to make me feel good about being human. I matter. Abel's pride does not seem to me to be the false pride of hubris. Rather he seems a very dignified human being that represents us well. I am sorry ladies, but you will just have to keep being patient with us men. I assure you when Abel says man he means mankind, men and women.With the above said Abel's "Man is the Measure" is a cordial invitation from a humanist perspective addressed to all human beings in regards to the central problems of philosophy. He believes in humanity, in our capacity to grow. The one and the many are invited to join in the philosophical debates. "Man is the Measure" is written with a friendly tone and in an elegantly simple manner. It is a very thorough outline of philosophical history, and you may join in if you like. Abel is to be congratulated for his ecumenical approach to truth. This is a very good place for those with a curious mind to begin or continue their examined life.
I FELL IN LOVE WITH SILENT PICTURES FROM THIS BOOK. When I first read the hardback version of this book back in the 1970's in film school, I fell in love with silent pictures. Kevin Brownlow's writing enabled me to visualize films I had never seen, and feel like I was there when American cinema was being birthed. His descriptions of films like Douglas Fairbanks' Robin Hood caused me to search for decades for copies of these films, just so I could glimpse the breathtaking beauty he describes. I wished I had been born during that era so I could have been a part of that "parade."Unfortunately, as happens with most things that are overly romanticized, one day I really was able to see Robin Hood when it finally came out on DVD. It had been fully restored and was a perfect representation of the original. I was gravely disappointed by what I saw.When I read Brownlow's descriptions of "tinting," I had visualized the kind of tinting that is done in still photography, which looks delicate and subtle. I thought of Broken Blossoms in those tones, and could only imagine how beautiful it was. Unfortunately, in the silent era, what they called tinting is what we today would call adding a color filter. When they wanted a night scene, they cast it in blue; when it was dawn, they made it yellow; when it was sunset, they made it orange; etc. I'm not talking about a subtle hint of color - I'm talking about one strong color that covered the whole screen. I was shocked by this technique, because I thought it destroyed the photography.His description of the music of the era was that it was something wonderful. The music in Robin Hood is repetitive and never-ending. I found myself longing for a break from it; but it never occurred.He describes Fairbank's acting as superb; I found it overly theatrical and almost carnivalesque. He was certainly athletic; but he carries it to the extreme of almost seeming like a circus performer, rather than an actor. Other aspects were equally disappointing.I know that the silent era laid the foundation upon which our entire modern movie industry - art and science alike - was built. I fully appreciate the contributions of all the talented people who came before. But it was, after all, only a beginning, and not the parade - certainly not the golden era - that those who lived then would have us believe. I think that Sunset Boulevard adequately depicts the delusions with which many of the tarnished stars of that era lived.I appreciate Mr. Brownlow's writing, which is very entertaining and interesting. There is no question that the photographs in his book are authentic and wonderful - almost better than the films they depict. There is not even a question that the era he describes was anything but astounding. But he does present it in a very romanticized light, and it does cause one to long for something that probably never existed, at least not in that idyllic form.Nevertheless, I still believe this book to be the most definitive work on the silent era in motion pictures.Waitsel Smit
Best bedtime book!. Very sweet & relaxing.  I've read it almost every for the last year.  Calming & sweet, before they understand animals.  Fun after they start learning about animals, babies & parents.
An American Classic. This work is vastly different from "One Flew Over" but only in positive ways. It is complex and intricate, powerful and emotive. Kesey's simultaneous usage of multiple voices is awkward initially but smoothes over time. The best way to approach "Sometimes" is to read it once and then immediately begin anew and read it again. On the second time through all the voice interruptions will make sense and your comphrehension of the novel will be therefore more complete. I highly recommend this work to any serious fan of American literature and though it is a somewhat difficult read it is ultimately very fulfilling
Brilliant or Real Horrorshow as Alex would say. You would think that it would be impossible to write a book about a 15-year old rapist/murderer and somehow have him come out as a sympathetic character.  Burgess has achieved that remarkable feat in this book.  The genius of it is in the use of the first person and in the use of slang to give voice to Alex.   The slang also serves to make the violence almost comical as instead of kicking someone in the mouth, Alex describes giving a tolchok into the rot and knocking out a few zoobies.  So even though the book is full of violence and rape, the language removes us from it in such a way that the book feels less violent than it is.  Although this may seem like it would make the book hard to read, it all makes sense when read in context.The story itself is a fairly simple and fast read.  If you have seen the movie then (other than the last chapter) you know what happens in the book.  Alex and his friends commit violent crimes, Alex gets arrested, he gets cured of his violence and then gets cured of the cure.  The movie follows the book almost exactly.  The key difference is that the original American edition left out the last chapter (the American publisher thought it was a sellout as Burgess explains in the introduction) and Kubrick followed the American edition of the book.  Is the last chapter a sellout?  Does it cheapen the book?  I think it changes the story to some extent.  Burgess suggested that it changed the book from a fantasy into a novel.  I think this overstates it but if you have read the American edition without the last chapter then you need to read it again with the last chapter.The book is a classic and should be required reading.  Although adult in concept and story line, anyone old enough to read the daily paper is old enough to read this book.  Beneath all the violence in the book, Burgess is trying to make a point about free will and what it means to be human but he doesn't overstate it.  The story and the language carry the reader and the message is just there to do with as you please.  As Burgess says in the introduction, "Eat this sweetish segment or spit it out.  You are free.
Emotions plus a desire to interact plus evolution = language. When asked to cite what he believed but couldn't prove, Dan Dennett responded by saying that language was required for consciousness.Interestingly Dennett's view easily harmonizes with strong trends in contemporary wisdom.  The larger view is that there is something particular and special about humans and their capacity for language that is materially different than what evolutionarily has preceded them.This book is a breath of fresh air for its helpful insight that humans are not materially different from what preceded them just more articulated in their thought processes and means of communicating them.In seriatim the book traces infant development for the capacity of spoken language and compares that developing capacity with different species of animals within the animal kingdom.  In a way, it's kind of reminiscent of the old medical school "ontogeny recapitulates philogeny."  For those lucky enough not to have experienced medical school, the famous saying refers to the similarity between developmental stages of an unborn fetus and the various lifeforms in the animal kingdom.  For example, the fertilized zygote resembles a one celled organism.  The early developing fetus resembles a fishlike creature and so on.In this book, needless to say, the more articulated the comparison being made between the infant's developing speech capacity, the more the authors will be inclined to use a more evolutionarily complicated life form.Significantly the authors use the similarities between humans and other animals to highlight their basic likenesses which according to the authors subsist in their mutual emotive acquisition of knowledge.  In this sense, this book is like Read Montague's Why Choose this Book wherein Montague merged Alan Turing mechanistic reasoning with emotive values to create an up to date model of cognition.Again, these features are all welcome.Where I think the authors falter is later in the book when they try to apply their theories to group dynamics.  But even so the book remains healthy food for thought and welcome insight if only for the knowledge that when we visit the zoo, the animals looking back at us are really not that much different at all but certainly not lacking consciousness just because they don't speak out language
Journal of a Christian. I bought the book looking to know more about Bonhoeffer's theology..and ended up learning more about my own. Though at times I didn't agree with his thoughts, I found myself agreeing with the man. These letters mix profound questions with small daily details of life. It is authentic and transparent in a way that typical straightforward "theology" books can't be. There is honest, articulate, and earnest faith in these unselfconscious and private thoughts.
Top five. This belongs on any list of the five best books of American Indian history, or of North American colonial history. Richard White is brilliant. Read this book.
I would give it 5000 stars if I could. Caution: Spoilers ahead. SPOILERS!!!I mourn the end of this book, I just finished reading the last page. I layed down for a moment, the book upon my chest, holding onto the adventures and the love that was shared with me through Fitz's eyes. I got up and looked online at all the reviews, just hoping to extend that feeling. Wow, I have never been so moved by a book. I cried ALOT. The poem the Fool wrote his beloved made me cry so much I kept having to stop, because my eyes blurred so. I missed him tremendously, and I was almost angry with Fitz for being happy, and that is when it hit me. Unconditional love, not bound in any way. The Fool would never stand for my being angry with Fitz for his happiness. As much as I was sad/angry for Fitz, and heartbroken for the Fool,  he was happy for his Beloved, and who am I to judge them?
Rural America like you've never read it before!. This is not a typical book about a standard American suburban families!  The characters in Safety in Objects are odd and disarming.  The stories are dark, the language sharp and the dialogue is crisp.  A.M. Homes has written tales that are bound to become cult classics.  My favorite stories are "Slumber Party," "A Real Doll," "Adults Alone," and "Jim Train."  As said earlier, these are not stories about conventional families in rural America.  These stories will make you think and perhaps even offend some readers.  This is not for the faint at heart.  Holmes is a fantastic writer and I look forward to reading more work by this author
Amazing writing, funny yet touching and real. This book is phenomenal.  Darbyshire debuts with strong writing and even stronger characters.  Best books I have read so far this year
Fun and original. Call me a sucker for wild west stories, and action-adventure in general, but from the first volume Et Cetera had me hooked. The story starts out a somewhat light-hearted, but eventually becomes darker and more serious, though it never loses its fun. I personally love the comedy, and it's emphasized with the artist's interesting style and hilarious illustrations. The first thing that caught my eye about this series was the art style itself. Love it or hate it, you can't find anything like it. It's unique and cartoony, and not your average, generic manga style. No two characters look alike. One other small thing I enjoy about this series is Benkate. She has got to be the ugliest female manga character I have ever seen. She's not your run-of-the-mill, busty, gorgeous bad girl with awesome battle skills like whoa. And Baskerville isn't your typical pretty boy character that all the drooling fangirls would...well, let's not go there.If you're looking for a fun action-adventure with an interesting style, you may want to give Et Cetera a try
Trust. It was the kind of action paced thriller that had me turning the pages.  It seemed to pick up in pace as it neared the conclusion, from Zurich to New York to Rio.  Gives an insight into the banking world.  Not as clean as the Swiss would like you to believe
Second in the series. In this book Father John O'Malley discovers a dead body beside the road.  His credibility takes a beating when the police return and the body is gone.  At this point, Father John makes it his mission to find the body and discover who has died.  When a commercial developer threatens to take over Father O'Malley's mission and turn it into a recreation center, he becomes distraught and is tempted to turn to alcohol, which has been the bane of his existence for many years.  Instead, he teams up with Arapaho attorney Vicky Holden, and tries to solve the murder while helping Vicky with her drug-addicted daughter, Susan.  This book, while not as compelling as the first book of the series, &quot;The Eagle Catcher&quot;, is still a good read
Truly written by a family man. I too first saw this book at the public library and afterwards had to have it for my own.  This book has really given me a lot of range for cooking veggie.  Most veggie cookbooks call for things you can only find in specialty stores and yield dishes that husbands nor children will touch.  I have really appreciatted a veggie cookbook that also comments on how to get you kid to like veggie food.  It made me happy to find a pizza SECTION instead of some off the wall pizza recipe!  This is a great cookbook for veggie and non-veggie families alike as it truly considers time, taste and expense
A decision point has come. A Time to Love, by Robert Greenberger, is the fifth book in the Time to... series of Star Trek: The Next Generation novels, taking place immediately before the movie Star Trek: Nemesis.  The first four books were up and down affairs, wallowing in Trek continuity and occasionally telling a good story.  A Time to Love, however, is the first one that's been fully satisfying.  It is rather lightweight, but for some reason it packs a punch.  It begins the story of how William Riker, first officer of the Enterprise, finally finds himself with a command of his own after all these years under Captain Picard.  While concentrating on this and his relationship with Deanna Troi, the book also tells a great story too.A Time to Love is a short book (263 pages), but somehow Greenberger packs a lot into it.  The first ten pages are a little slow as he summarizes what's happened so far in the series, but he does it in an interesting fashion:  having Troi and Riker going through crew transfer applications, commenting on what's happened so far and how it's affecting morale.  This scene is also important as it begins the realization, carried throughout this book and the next, that Riker has to finally make a decision about his life.  He's 42 years old, he and Troi have rekindled their romance (in the movie Insurrection, but they haven't moved forward. Just what is he waiting for?  Plus, he has turned down many command opportunities to stay with Enterprise, but is that still the right thing to do?  I've never seen such an effective summary before, giving us new information even as it goes over old.  Some of the later scenes, such as Geordi's, do slow down and tell us too much about the past without anything happening, but those scenes are not very long.The characterization in this book is wonderful.  Riker and Troi get the most, but everybody else is great too.  Picard is getting fed up with the boring missions that he's been given, mainly to keep Enterprise out of the spotlight and allow time for the furor to die down.  Picard feels put upon, and he wishes for a mission that he can sink his teeth into.  The Delta Sigma IV mission turns out to be just what he asked for, but perhaps too much.  His frustration when the ruling council on Delta Sigma IV is frozen with indecision is palpable, as his annoyance with himself when he realizes that he hasn't kept on top of the situation on the Enterprise very well during the mission.  Crusher's indecision about the offer to head Starfleet Medical is hanging over her head, and she keeps coming to the realization that she and Picard will never have a romantic relationship and she must also look to her career.  In the meantime, though, she is determined to do as much to help the people on the planet below as she is able.Even better are the scenes with the various security officers as they try to quiet the situation down on the planet before it escalates into even more violence.  We get scene after scene of these officers doing their job, many of which look like they're going to end with the typical "red shirt" ending, but they don't always.  This makes the scenes that *do* contain something bad even more effective.  Greenberger writes these scenes with tension, keeping the reader entranced to know what will happen next.  These scenes also give wonderful characterization to Lt. Vale, the security chief who is responsible for all of these men and women.  Greenberger perhaps has too many times where he says that Vale would give her life for Picard, over-emphasizing it a little bit, but overall her characterization is quite good.Kyle Riker doesn't figure a lot in this book, except by his absence and the effect of the search for him on Will.  These scenes are extremely effective, with Will contemplating what barriers that have been in the way of the reconciliation of him and his father, as well as taking stock of his life.  Riker is taken on his search by one of the natives and they visit the man's home as well, emphasizing just what Riker has been missing all these years.  While being full of action and conflict (emotional and violent), the book makes a very effective character study of Will, as well as the other regulars.  I found it incredibly entertaining to read.The only weak spot in the novel (and this may just be setting up something for the next few books) is the Geordi and Data story, where Geordi has to scrounge for parts by trading with various other starships in the area like some supply sergeant.  Data suggests that Geordi become a true supply sergeant by getting everybody's inventory and seeing what they have and what they need, facilitating the delivery of these parts through a Ferengi trader.  This subplot doesn't appear to have anything to do with anything except to give these two major characters something to do.  I hope that changes, but in this book they felt forced into the story, and as short as it is, I think the other storylines could have been developed a bit more.Still, that is the only true fault.  A Time to Love flows very nicely, flying by as you read it.  The prose isn't wonderful, but it's greatly functional, serving its purpose and getting out of the way.  These are the characters I know and love, and Greenberger manages to tone the angst down considerably.  No mean feat in this series so far.  This is the first true winner in the series.David Ro
The book for ALL technical writing. This book is ideal for the marketing communications writer working for a technology company. In it you will find more than 300 pages of valuable content when writing for the Web or crafting written words for any type of marketing materials. The book is loaded with tips on how to craft compelling content
Thank you Mr. Peterson. As a Program Manager on goverment contracts, being audited for many different areas is a way of life and always painful. Most times these audits take up a lot of time and if we are lucky we get a pass. Needles to say, any credible tool I can get my hands on to help us through gets my attention. Lord knows I don't have the time to get certified and become an expert to get me through an audit. I need something easy to read, uderstand and not filled with fluff. Any more books on the way for the IT Professional
Big Girl Knits. The text offers very helpful information, has great advise to Big Girls and compensates for the designs.  I did not find the majority of the designs flattering or appropriate for Big Girls
This one is personal. I have been reading the Inspector Banks series of books in sequence since In A Dry Season.  I suspect I will go back and pick up the stories prior to that one later.In reading the books the way I have been reading them, I have come to know the mai character pretty well, as the author had intended it.There had been substantial foreshadowing of one of the murders invrestigated in this book.  Alan Banks had always brought up the memory of his friend Graham Marshall and his unexpected disappearance in his previous books.  Robinson had brought the memory up as an example of Bank's guilt and messy history.  It punctuated his complexity as a person and how that complication marks his life so far and his work as a  detective.  As such, this book should have been the most emotional and cathartic.  Instead, it was pretty much business as usual, wich was disappointing but it also underscores the fact that there is really nothing cathartic in police work.Peter Robinson is an extraordinary writer, or else I never would have read this many books in such a short time.  His device of interweaving two separate story lines together would be disastrous in the hands of an amateur, but in Robinson's hands it is as natural as can be.  He steers the narrative easily amongst the stories and builds the tempo of the story equally until the two lines comes to a parallel climax.  In this book, the climax wasn't a real climax, it was just an ending, an explanation for the crimes.  I didn't exactly feel cheated, since I got my enjoyment out of the process of building the case and edging further into the story.  The nice moments of charater building was appropriate and it served to pull the reader into the character, made us sit notice of Alan Banks and Annie Cabbot and Jenny Fuller.One more note, Robinson could have used the same plotting device as In A Dry Season, soince both this story and that one involved going into the past to get at the truth, but he refrained.  I think it may have hurt his narative somewhatbut I also think it was pretty brave of him to lay off the same device and stay with this plotting device, just to stay fresh.In the end, the confrontation with Bank's past was somewhat of a let down.  The other story was actually quite engrossing, it did not quite supercede the Graham Marshall story, but it came close.  This whole book had the feel of an intermediate step to somewhere else.  But coming on the end of Aftermath, it was good to get into a standard whodunnit
A good read from both sides of the fence. Whether you "borrow" or steal from work, or have employees.  Theft from work IS happening.  Whether time, resources, or property a lot of people feel entitled to do it.  This book has tools and insight on both sides.  Even if you don't wear the "loss prevention" hat.  Employees and managers are involved and have vested interests in employee theft.  So much money is lost due to "shrinkage" - invest in your company and buy the book
essays from the evil mind. Joe Coleman is represented in other books, but the essays in this book , along with the reproductions, give the viewer an intimate glimpse into the twisted and detailed paintings of joe coleman! a bargain
an eye-opener. It is hard to say whether all Suzuki's facts are absolutely valid or not, especially when his discussion turns to what the Earth's true carrying capacity for humans is - but that is slightly beside the point here. The most important part of environmentalism is to wake people up and make them realize the effects that their everyday actions have on the world around them. Suzuki does this by explaining 1) how everything in this world is connected, 2) pollution of one area will invariably affect another area, and 3) we really do not understand all the elements needed for the proper functioning of the environment. This should make any person reflect on their own actions. The world's environmental problems (which in turn are deeply connected to human problems) will not be solved by governments' imposing regulations and all this Kyoto b.s. (not that Kyoto is bad... it's just a very small step and it is disgusting to see that both USA and Canada are stalling), change will only come when each individual makes sure their OWN actions do not make the situation worse. Buy organic when you can afford it, reduce or cut out meat entirely from your diet (I think 80% of farmland is used to keep livestock alive), buy local products, recycle, compost, reduce energy consumption. This isn't hippy crap - hippies never had that much self-restraint - this is about being a responsible person so that your grandchildren will be able to go outside and play without gas masks. Suzuki's book was what opened my eyes when I was 17... and it should do the same for most reasonable people
Extremely useful. Companies are looking for more and more business intelligence from their Web sites, both to improve their marketing efforts and determine ROI. This is a good thing. This is an exemplary "how-to" guide for Web Analytics. Extremely useful
An interesting look at how money gets distributed in the US. Andrew Hacker's Money is a great look at who has the money in America and how they got it. He talks in great detail about how the rich stay rich and the poor stay poor. I was astounded to read that in 1997 there were 137  individuals who claimed over $1 billion in income. Almost 70,000 tax  returns claimed an income of at least $1 million. There are far more rich  people out there than I thought and it leads me to believe that if they can  do it, so can I
Excellent Read for All Ages~. I thought this book was a lot of fun, and very informative. We should all be so lucky as to travel the world, and no less, in 80 days but to do it in the past with much difficulty is something else.The one thing I found confusing was that the author tended to skip arond in their storytelling, but still highly recommended to kids and adult
If you love golf, this is for you..... I have read many of the books in the Chicken Soup Series but this one really hits home! I am a golfer and everyone who plays the game will tell you that golf is a metaphor for life. These short essays really capture the  essence of the game. I suggest that everybody start with the essay entitled  &quot;A Wing Grew Back&quot; written by Jay Gearan. It is skillfully  crafted and immediately draws the reader into the inspiring story of the  challenges confronting a handicapped golfer. I certainly hope there will be  a second helping of Chicken Soup for the Golfer's Soul and hope to see more  work done by Gearan. Kudos for a job well done!!!
Real people stepping out from an Arthurian tapestry. Like many authors, Vera Chapman tackles the daunting task of retelling and rounding out the characters of a well-known story.  Unlike most authors, her retelling succeeds because it reads like her own story.  While you know how it must end, you look forward to the fun of getting there. 	The story is the tale of Sir Gawain and the Green Knight, in which Sir Gawain meets a challenge of almost certain death.  However, by some deft family-history work (which is completely possible to my knowledge) she succeeds in making the characters her own, whose personalities are new and whose attitudes are modern and easy to sympathize with while not being anachronistic.  	What drew me into the story most, though, was the author's wonderful use of language.  She writes in a lush descriptive style which leaves the readers with as clear a picture as a medieval tapestry.  These vivid descriptions make the pages pass quickly and make the book impossible to put down.  Luckily, the book is s! ! hort enough to make reading it in one (long!) sitting possible, since Chapman also knows how to make her storytelling concise while maintaining the atmosphere of a royal court. 	I highly recommend this book to anyone, teenage or adult, who loves to hear a good story being retold
An informative, entertaining read. What a monumental task -- telling the story of such a remarkable, complex literary figure.  Valerie Boyd does an outstanding job of revealing Hurston's motivations, inspiration and personal character.  I've always loved Hurston as a writer.  Reading this biography fortified my respect for her talent and sheer will to create.  This book provides a spiritual lift -- ZNH is solid evidence that creativity cannot be suppressed.  Additionally, the book is a virtual tour of the Harlem Renaissance and some its most illustrious players, and a thoughtful chronicle of the black experience in the early 20th century.  A must-read for students of African American history and culture
Virginia Is For Lovers (Of History). What an excellent book! The last I knew Fischer was working on a big book concerning plantation life in the south and I assume this is a book that developed out of the research he is doing for that book. This book concerns  migration from Britain to Virginia, migration within Virginia and then  migration from Virginia to other states. Most of the book deals with the  1700's up until just before the Civil War. I can't do justice to all the  interesting information that is in this book during the course of a brief  review. The authors explain how people migrated from different parts of  Britain and settled in different areas of Virginia. For example, people  from Northern England and the Scottish border area tended to settle in  southern Virginia. They brought their customs with them which tended to  make southern Virginia different from other areas settled by different  people. For instance, the Tidewater area was settled by younger sons of the  English nobility. These people came over to Virginia because under English  law they were not going to inherit estates back home as the first born sons  had that right. Different speech patterns developed in different areas as  well as different ways of cooking and different forms of architecture, etc.  The book also deals extensively with the lives of slaves and the  institution of slavery and how the mass migrations out of Virginia involved  many, many slaves being taken to other states with their masters or being  sold. When the Virginia tobacco based economy began to falter in the late  1700's the sale of slaves to settlers in other states was a great source of  income to the white people in Virginia who had fallen on hard times. Many  famous people had ancestral origins in Virginia, such as Lincoln, Henry  Clay, Stephen Austin, Sam Houston and General Patton amongst countless  others. There are many firsthand accounts quoted in the book from the  settlers so you get a real feel for the times and there are a number of  wonderful black and white photos, also. This short book is packed with  fascinating details. Thank you Mr. Fischer and Mr. Kelly
Awesome!. for me it is very hard to settle down with a book about magic, but this book....its like harry potter mixed with lord of the rings, its smooth, intricate and at times, hard core. I like reading the books where things you know can't make sense, in a way, suddenly do, read this book! it is very good
Original and informative. Pressfield presents the gritty, gory horror soldiers faced during ancient battles in a way that is both believable and entertaining.  Then, he layers macro-level politics on top of the story of fascinating individual epics to create an incredible book that is both fun to read and informational
An incredible translation. Concise and easy to read. Shakyamuni Buddha (Siddhartha) lived 2500 years ago and left this set of sayings or Dharmapada. Dharma means &quot;Laws, truth, virtue&quot; and &quot;pada&quot; means &quot;way or path&quot;. Byrom's fantastic translation makes it so captivating for the reader because it is concise without verbosity, easy to read and easy to relate to. Shakyamuni's message is not tainted with overbearing explanations but comes as quick and sharp with great wit and logical sense. In addition to this, this translation openly embraces all walks of life---making it relevant to both the laity and the ascetic. Purchase this book and read Shakyamuni's wisdom so that you may apply it to your own
Very Interesting Book. I'm currently reading Gulliver's Travels for my English class, and i have to say, what a very interesting book. I wasn't a huge fan of classic books, but this book so far has surprised me. I like how the author wrote the book to where you just can't put the book down. Sadly though, some parts can be quite boring, but the author is able to change that, and make it interesting again.So if anyone is reading my review, so get a copy of this book immediately, or else you will be missing out on something very interesting.
Riveting. Very well written for a historical-type text.  I've always had trouble staying interested in these types of books, however, this author added enough of The Human Element to keep me reading.  Honestly, I could hardly put the book down.  At once extremely sad and uplifting.  Definitely worth the time (but it's a quick read, I promise).
Short, surprisingly moving tale. Heard FOR LOVE OF THE GAME by Michael Sahara,a posthumously published baseball novel by the Pulitzer Prizewinning author of THE KILLING ANGELS . . . you might haveto dig some to find it, but your search will be worth theeffort.This is a short, surprisingly moving tale of an aging baseballsuperstar who is pitching the last game of the season . . . througha series of flashbacks, you learn about his career and theone woman he loves (but who is leaving him).The writing is compelling, and it makes you feel that youreally get to know the guy . . . plus, it has you rooting forhis every pitch and caring about what happens to him.There's a great ending, too.
The New Best Recipe/ Cooks Illustrated. They truly have unlocked the mystery to cooking the best of everything. I learned a whole new way to cook, and my family and I are eating better for it! Only one problem my family no longer wants to eat out
A girl from Lake Tapps says- a sad but heartwarming book!. Kira Kira is a heartwarming and fantastic book! It makes you feel thankful for what you have! I recommend it to kids within the ages of 9-14. I was told by a friend that Kira Kira was a great book and so I decided to give it a try!!! I don't know about u but I am a very picky reader and if I dislike even the begining I most likly won't finish! Enough about me...If you like to read sad book that send you into tears make sure you go 2 the  the nearest book store and pick Kira Kira.
EXPENSIVE ??- THINK AGAIN !!. This is the BICYCLE REPAIR/MAINTENCE BIBLE!!!Expensive? Think again!With the average mid price bicycle hovering around $800.00, and the better road bikes at $1,500.00 (and up)this book (AND THE PROPER TOOLS) will pay for themselves.Why fool around with other so called "bicycle repair" books which cover little more than chain cleaning/cable adjustments??The vast amount of small bike shops closing their doors & the remaining "Bicycle Superstores", who employ a new "mechanic" each week-Barnett's Manual will save your hair & scratches on your frame!Barnett's Manual will guide you through basic tune up proceedures/adjustments to keep your bike in top shape.YOU ARE NOT A "HANDS-ON" TYPE" PERSON??You STILL need this manual! The knowlage gained from Barnett's Manual will keen your eye to the "Mechanic" while he is repairing your bike!!ONE SIZE FITS ALL-IN DEPTH!!!ANY NOVICE can gain a thorough mechanical understanding of bicycle components, repairs, tune-up, & adjustments.ADVANCED!Simple tasks like the "correct" proceedure to mount a tire/tube right up to bottom bracket/headshell facing & complete suspension fork rebuilds are covered!HOWEVER! With the hundreds of makes, models, mid-year changes in spec'd equipment-not to mention modern bicycle technology which changes faster than dish TV programing, DON'T EXPECT EVERY MAKE, MODEL, YEAR of every bike/component to be covered.Providing you have the bicycle specific tools required, Barnett's Manual will complete your toolbox.PLEASE!Buy it from Amazon-Nice people! Nice Prices!
A must read. A story of great courage and resolve, of working conditions beyond the pale, and the vicissitudes of the courts. Well written, in journalistic style, this is a page-turner, as well as being thoroughly researched, and factually accurate
Excellent thumbnail sketches of most philosophers. I would recommend this book for the  reader who wants to have a ready source of information available to him about topics in philosophy and particular philosophers that he may encounter in his general reading of books dealing with history ,social science and biography.Some of the thumbnail sketches are too brief and a few contain incorrect information.For instance,the discussion of the principle of indifference(POI) references chapter 9 of J M Keynes's A Treatise on Probability.This chapter includes a brief summary of the POI.However,the main discussion of the POI occurs in chapter 4,not chapter 9(See p.410).The discussion of John Maynard Keynes contains an error.Nowhere in the General Theory(1936) does Keynes suggest or recommend a countercyclical fiscal policy based on deficit finance.In the period 1942-1944,Keynes did analyse and support the concept of a capital account ,separated from the rest of the government budget,that would deal with the financing of long lived infrastructure( public sector) projects that would  pay for themselves over the life time of the project.Only these types of projects would be initially funded by government borrowing.(See p.442)
Don't reinvent the wheel... this is the 'wheel'. Our 350 member church has studied 'small groups' intentionally for 18 months. We just launched 18 groups with 150 participants. Things appear to be going very well. This manual has grown continually in our esteem and confidence. It is thorough, Biblically rich, helpful in the extreme, organized, & educationally sound. A small group leader can take this resource, and with study and effort, learn how to start immediately as an effective leader and then how to continually enrich the group's life together. A church program can choose it as a foundation and better the odds for success greatly and instantly. Highest recommendation. Thank you, Willow.
A Memorable Story. I am now 20 years old and haven't read this book since Elementary school.  Today, I randomly found the book on Amazon and the familiar first edition hardcover. I don't know how old I was when I first read it, but I independently borrrowed it from the library at least 3 different times and enjoyed reading it every time.  I've always remembered, foremost, the cleverness of the Dolphins and the anxiety and relief I felt every time I read the scenes with the sharks or the baby being unhooked.  I would say Dolphin Adventure has made a positive and lasting impression upon me and that every animal-loving child should read it
Please, someone take down Donna Di Giacomo's review. Roland Topor's book about city life alienation is one of the most brilliant pieces of horror I've read in some time; while reading it I couldn't help it but find some parallels between Topor's book and Thomas Ligotti's own "My Work is not yet Done". Ligotti himself also happens to write a great introduction to this book's main course, focusing on the differences between "pessimistic" receivers of the Novel prize for literature and the REAL pessimist writers that go unnoticed. Also included is a selection of four previously unpublished short stories and a brief gallery representative or Roland Topor's ink drawings.But please, don't read Donna Di Giacomo's review on this page; I have no idea what she was thinking while writing it, but she pretty much fills it with SPOILERS for 75/80% of the novel, laying there for any unsuspecting readers to find and I have no idea why the amazon staff that usually checks these reviews before public viewing gave it the green light.. Fortunately for me I finished the book long before finding that spoiling wreck, but others might not be that lucky, and this is a very good book to have it mercilessly ruined like that
Not just for the legal trade. While I can easily see this book as assigned reading in every law school class for intellectual property, it really deserves the greater readership of those who found joy in reading Eats, Shoots and Leaves. Its erudition is apparent, but never pedantic.  The message of concern for our becoming a society that knows the price for everything, but is not willing to share anything of value, is woven skillfully into the fabric of its clever teachings.  And for those folks who like a nicely designed hardback book, people who know things about fonts and book cover color, this is a great book to own new.  The University of Chicago has given Ms. Bielstein the star treatment she is due
Annotated Anne a must have for serious Anne collectors. Everyone who is a serious Anne collector should definitely buy this book.  It gives &quot;Anne&quot; a whole new perspective.  Untill I read it I had  no idea how many biblical and literary allusions L.M. Montgomery had used.   I found out wonderful things about the book's background, such as who  Montgomery modeled Anne after.  I also got the chance to read some of the  poems that Anne read or  recited.  The Annotated Anne is a worthwile  investment for people who truly love Anne Shirley
The Vatican set the stage. At the begining of the 21st century we are witnessing a resurgence of anti-semitism. This is an appropriate time to read Mr. Kertzers' outstanding book in order to understand the terible historical burden the Catholic Church must carry for the rise of 20th century anti-semitism. This is a well researched account proving that the Church cannot wash it's hands of the blood of the victims of the Shoah. The book examines Church policy against the Jews from the end of the 18th to the begining of the 20th centuries. Kertzers' research clearly proves that there cannot be a clear and neat distinction between &quot;classical&quot; (i.e. religous) antisemitism and &quot;modern&quot; (i.e. racial) antisemitism. Racial antisemitism was not a divergence from Church antisemitim but developed from it. Chuch leaders (particularly the Jesuit press) were active in the various circles promoting modern antisemitism. The Church cannot distance itself from the annihilation of European Jewry. It's very doctrine set the stage. Present day Islamist fundamentalists promoting anti - semitism would particularly do well to read this book
Buy the Earlier Edition. Great book, but the cover is insulting.  A pile of quarters?  How does that represent Ayn Rand's message?  The earlier edition had striking, gloriously stylized, inspiring art on the cover.  This one has a plain,  naturalistic pile of quarters to represent the vision of an idealist and a passionate romantic? If Ayn were alive, she'd read the publisher the riot act over this cover.
Simple communication techniques expertly explained in an entertaining package. This book describes a few simple techniques for dealing with difficult questions from the audience after a formal business presentation, or from journalists after a press conference. In particular, the author explains how to control the interaction with the questioners, formulate answers that are less likely be perceived by the audience as contentious or evasive, and how to forcefully get one's message across as part of the answer.The techniques themselves could have been described in 4 or 5 pages. Nevertheless the author manages to put together a whole book - firstly by analogizing them to the martial arts, and then by providing detailed examples from the last 40 years of presidential debates. This works out very well indeed, and the reader is left with a thorough understanding of the mechanics involved in handling these situations - based on both concepts and debate examples described.After finishing the book I really felt I was coming away with something tangible that could be utilized to my advantage in a variety of situations - both professional and personal.
The Ultimate Cliffhanger!. I saw the reenactment last night on Inside Edition of the night that Natalee Holloway disappeared and it was really slanted, in my opinion.  Nobody who has seen Joran would identify him as being with the blonde, American girl "with the Dutch accent."The one thing about this book is that it leaves you hanging...a real cliffhanger.  Unfortunately, it's for real and we don't know what happened to Natalee. Hopefully, someday soon we will find out.I really enjoyed the book.  I only wish it had a happy ending
Who are you?. If you are a classical player, you probably shouldn't be picking up a classical book with "easy" in the title, don't you think? I'm a fingerpicker, and when I get stuck in a merle travis rut, this book is a great way to get out of it. Nothing all that hard, but well presented and chosen.My only complaints are the same as some other reviewers: the biographies would be better replaced with some technical notes (if I feel the sudden need to read about Sor's life, there's always Google).  Also, wire-bound would be nice so I wouldn't have to prop up my tuner and a beer can to hold the book open
Enjoying this book is no accident. I've always enjoyed books about family and everyday life. I feel books that can convey a sense of reality to a reader hold far more importance and reach a depth that any other book could ever wish for. Enter "The Accidental Tourist" by Anne Tyler.I read this book during a dry spell in life when I was fed up with life and finding my life too ordered and predictable. I know you may be thinking "well, what's wrong with that". I felt a need for something more. That's when I met Macon Leary. Macon is a travel writer who pens book for the accidental tourist. An accidental tourist could best be defined as a travel minimalist. They exclude almost every chance at fun and try to make sure their comfort zone goes with them on a trip. He or she orders his or her  life and never takes a chance for fear of it being far too risky. Beginning to sound familiar???With his life and marriage reaching the end, due mainly to the death of his young son, Macon meets Muriel Pritchett. She is his opposite in every way, but for some reason he can't stop the attraction. I won't give much more away but know that this is ultimately a love story. But, it is not the typical fall head over heels kind. It shows Macon making real choices in a real world based on very certain and uncertain consequences. At the end you may say what a fool or you may stand and applaud. I won't let out which way I went.I'm sure you will enjoy this journey by a master story teller like Anne Tyler. The novel combines humor, family, life, death, love and choice in a way like no other. I hope you enjoy!
This book saved my life!. I like Jane Austen, but this is a very special book, even for her.When I was widowed a few years ago, I read Persuasion.  Lots or people here love this book, but it holds a special place in my life because it gave me the will to go on. We live in a youth-oriented culture which tries to tell people that only the young, the rich and the beautiful have a right to love and happiness; this book says that all people can have a second chance at happiness. Persuasion taught me that the pain over losing the one you love does not have to end your life.  You can start again, and perhaps be even happier than you were the first time around, when you were young and didn't know what life was about. I know some people prefer the dashing heroes in Austen's other books, but Anne and Captain Wentworth are much closer to who most of us are. We are not flashy or rich; we don't always have supportive families; our beauty might only be seen by the people who love us the most because they've looked in our hearts. Love will not bring us land or access to the powerful, and it won't make our families act more kindly to us.  But what love does is act as a shelter from the storms of life- death, sickness, insensitive people.While women now have more freedom to love than they did in the early 19th century, they are still hampered by unrealistic ideas regarding how the mind and body ages, the value of maturity, how having 'baggage' can be a sign that one has been places and seen things, and how common sense and human decency may be more important in the long run than beauty or good fashion sense. Most women are still afraid to be alone with themselves or to carve out a satisfying life without a man. Because most women and men don't value these concepts, Persuasion is not ranked as highly as Austen's more exciting earlier novels.  Still, if I could only take one book with me to a desert island, this would probably be the one
Best book on Ayurveda I've ever read. I picked up Essential Ayurveda on a whim at a natural foods store when I was really looking for something else. What attracted me was the simple recipes and the pleasant, conversational voice of the author. When I began reading it at home, I was so glad I had trusted my instincts! I have been interested in Ayurvedic diet for many years but felt it was complicated and hard to prepare. But this author shows how simple it can be--and very clearly illustrates how the loving, respectful, harmonic way of living with and caring for yourself flows through all of life--not just diet. A wonderful book. I think it's the last book I'll ever need in order to understand Ayurveda better. I also already have "Heaven's Banquet," which the author recommends as a great source for balanced and healing recipes. Now I'll go back to that book with new eyes
I laughed, I cried, I laughed louder. It's my 14th read!!!!!. John Fante-or should I say...dad.  John has made me smile and love my family so much more. I read this book again and now begin to see myself. I have every book written by John. Since 1989 I have been to California 12  times,and each time I come home I read this book . I'm still italian,hard  headed,and love my family so much more---------thanks John,   May God keep  you by his side and watch over your faml
A riveting read. Refiner's Fire combines a gripping story line with well-drawn characters  and a real sense of the time and place in which they live. The book held me  captive to the very last paragraph and is particularly fascinating to  anyone with an interest in Romania. Highly recommended to anyone who enjoys  adventure
Serious great book. Anyone who is interested in philosophy's great relics but mainly reads books in English should see the Cambridge University Press translation of Kant's CRITIQUE OF PURE REASON by Paul Guyer and Allen W. Wood published in 1997 sometime to check the Table of Contents on pages 85-90, and compare it with Kant's original Table of Contents from 1781 on page 125, to observe how many parts of this book have become so well known that scholars consulting this monument to philosophical thought feel a need for 132 page references to find whatever interest in Kant they might have at a particular moment.  Such a summary might have been open before Nietzsche when he wrote in section 110 of THE GAY SCIENCE that "Over immense periods of time the intellect produced nothing but errors. . . .  Such erroneous articles of faith, which were continually inherited, until they became almost part of the basic endowment of the species, include the following:  that there are enduring things; that there are equal things; that there are things, substances, bodies; that a thing is what it appears to be; that our will is free; that what is good for me is also good in itself."  Kant was concerned with transcendental philosophy, the general problem of pure reason, but in I, Transcendental doctrine of elements, Division one, Book II, Chapter II, Section III, 3, A on "principle of persistence of substance" can be found on page 299;  Division two, Book II, Chapter II, Section IX, III, "The possibility of causality through freedom" can be found on page 535; and in II, Transcendental doctrine of method, Chapter II, Section II, "On the ideal of the highest good" can be found on page 676.Kant's practice of using large heavy type in the text for key terms makes his points much easier to locate in the Cambridge University Press edition, which features some of the heaviest type I ever saw in a book.  Page numbers for the A (1781) and B (1787) editions are located in the outer margins, making it easy to locate quotations by later philosophers who frequently invite their students to read the original work.  Schopenhauer, in particular, was adamant that Kant spoiled the 1781 edition when he removed pages 348 to 392 and "introduced a number of remarks that controverted it" (THE WORLD AS WILL AND REPRESENTATION, translated by E. F. J. Payne, Vol. 1, p. 435) in 1787.  This part of the Second Book of the Transcendental Dialectic, First Chapter, The paralogisms of pure reason, was originally intended by Kant to illustrate forms of reason which imitate logical thought, and appealed strongly to Schopenhauer as a basis for his own philosophy, which he declared had placed Will in place of Kant's thing-in-itself as claimed in the 22nd chapter in the second book of WWR, vol. 1, pp. 110-112.  Kant was not trying to make things easier for the philosophers who followed him by providing an easy platform they could use to proclaim their own views, as even Schopenhauer discerned when he complained that Fichte had "succeeded in turning the public's attention from Kant to himself, and in giving to German philosophy the direction in which it was afterwards carried further by Schelling, finally reaching its goal in the senseless sham wisdom of Hegel."  (WWR, Vol. 1, pp. 436-437).Schopenhauer does not appear in the index of the Cambridge University Press edition of Kant's CRITIQUE OF PURE REASON, but the index can be used to locate a few notes on Swedenborg.  In Gregory R. Johnson's Introduction for KANT ON SWEDENBORG, Kant's knowledge of Swedenborg's writings are linked to some of the key ideas in Kant's CRITIQUE OF PURE REASON.  "Finally, Swedenborg claims that his visions of the spiritual world do not show the spirit world as it is in itself.  Instead, his visions are spatio-temporal representations of a non-spatio-temporal reality.  Spiritual realities take on this spatio-temporal garb to accommodate themselves to the requirements of a finite intellect.  These teachings presage such central tenets of Kant's CRITIQUE OF PURE REASON (1781, 1787) as transcendental idealism and the ideality of space and time."  (KANT ON SWEDENBORG, p. xviii).  The notes about Swedenborg on pages 731 and 753 of Kant's CRITIQUE call attention to his "ironic attack on Swedenborgian spiritualism in DREAMS OF A SPIRIT-SEER (1766)" and spiritual qualities lampooned then which reappear in Kant's elucidation of the limits imposed by the general conditions of experience:" . . . or a special fundamental power of our mind to intuit the future (not merely, say, to deduce it), or, finally, a faculty of our minds to stand in a community of thoughts with other men (no matter how distant they may be) -- these are concepts the possibility of which is entirely groundless, because it cannot be grounded in experience and its known laws, and without this it is an arbitrary combination of thoughts that, although it contains no contradiction, still can make no claim to objective reality, thus to the possibility of the sort of object that one would here think.  As far as reality is concerned, it is evidently intrinsically forbidden to think it in concreto without getting help from experience, because it can only pertain to sensation, as the matter of experience, and does not concern the form of the relation that one can always play with in fictions."  (CPR, A 222-223, B 270, p. 324).For example of Kant's always already unthink fictions, I would like to suggest the experience of a rock concert, in which a crowd knows the most popular song of the evening.  It could be Liz Phair, doing a recent song, `stars and planets' in which "You know it's just the same old story.  Stars rise and stars fall.  But the ones that shine the brightest aren't stars at all.  They're the planets just like us. . . .  They're the planets that unite us.  And from big to small.  We all shine shine shine."  So we are
Written by a true Hardcore Warrior who knew what the hell he was writting about . This is probally the only book other than his Battle Axe book, where that you can find real case studies on what strikes and techniques work under real attacks. He details the various blows that were used sucessfully: Leopard-palm blows,half fist,ax hands,eagle claws,eye attacks to name a few. He also tells where the stikes landed and whatthe skels reaction was. His system is one based on simplicity,power and 100% ATTITUDE. He also includes his famous Tiger movement exercises, which if practiced will build tremendous tendon and ligiment strength. Get whatever reading or video material you can on this man for he is without a doubt a true SOB that you can learn valuable info that is not available elsewhere.Where others talk theory he talks reality.I am not and have never studied Kempo but feel that this books should get the recognition that it deserves. You will not find any fancy,flashy ballet type moves. They more or less resemble the WW2 Combatives of the old school that were true and time tested,(Fairbairn,Applegate,O'Neil,Styers).So the next time some pseudo tough guy claims that those chops and leopard paw strike would never work, you'll know other wise and smile inside.Unfortunately you wont find any Dim Mak, Pressure points, or no touch chi knock outs.Just hardcore,bone crunching workable blows." To be kind to you ememy is to be crule to yourself
The Truth About Iraq's History. Edwin Black has done it again, placing 7,000 years of Iraqi history into extraordinary perspective, reminding us of the truth and revealing the newly discovered facts to create an indispensible chronicle of that troubled land and its relation to Britain, France and the United States. That said, the book is really devoted to the last 150 years, when the importance of oil sprang upon the world and Iraq slowly rose to the top of the western nations' agenda as the greatest petroleum source of the new 20th Century. Black's access to heretofore secret oil company archives and his resurrection of forgotten military accounts reveals that Iraq has been desired by the west only for one thing: oil. This book changed my entire thinking and I highly recommend it for anyone who wants to understand how we got into Iraq and whether we can ever get out
The Greatest. Charles Dickens: humanist, brilliant writer of prose, creator of astonishingly endurng characters and creator of David Copperfield.Copperfield is Dickens' masterpiece and it is his semi-autobiographical approach which makes the work doubly fascinating. The similarities between Copperfield and the historical Dickens- which are numerous- add a potency and extra interest to the narrative.Still, it is the wonderful likeability and absurdity of so many of the characters in DC which really make the story. Barkiss, Peggotty, Ham and Agnes are wonderfully virtuous and kind- if uncomplicated in their different ways.Heap and Steerforth- who share in common their eventual villainy- are, by no coinicidence, contrastingly complex, unfathomable throughout and misguided.However, the problems of simplicity are evident in Dora: Dickens acknowledges limits to the virtuosity of simplicity. Her downfall is nevertheless tragic, but we know it is in the interests of David's long term happiness to marry Agnes.Dickens' achievement in the book is his profound sympathy for the human condition: there is virtue in every rank, but virtue takes many forms. Moreover, Dickens shows how inextricably he perceives one's life as constructed around the lives and fortunes of those one encounters in youth. It is striking that Copperfield's life is essentially determined by those he encounters in his formative years. The most important and complex role and character is that of his Aunt, almost an eccentric fairytale godmother character, whose contibution almost suggests her metaphysical condition as a kind of guiding light. She rescues David and looks after him when noone else will. The tenuous conditions upon which humans succeed and fail are clear because of her role.The book is memorable, complicated and profound: it immortalised Dickens himself as well as his characters
After all this time... here is a voice undimmed.  A voice so rare it's no wonder that the life lived behind it was as it was.  Perfect voice, perfect life.  Like others here, I too see there's no need to "review" a thing like Emily.  I merely take this opportunity in this new medium to state that Emily lived in Gnosis...this is her mysterious subject.  Here is where she becomes seemingly impenetrable...until you know her terms and her Terms, and then--she stands revealed as the Mystic she was and is
A GREAT IMPROVISATION is a Great Treat. The brilliantly insightful Stacy Schiff proves yet again that she is, without a doubt, one of America's most gifted biographers. Benjamin Franklin springs to life here in all his complexity: Schiff's elegant prose renders his seven-year stay in France utterly fascinating. The nuanced portrait of Franklin that emerges in these pages will be of great interest to anyone at all intrigued by this endlessly complicated figure and his role in American history. I would venture to say that A GREAT IMPROVISATION is as compelling as the very best novels--the sort that once you've begun, you simply can't put down. And this, I believe, is in no small part due to Schiff's prose, which is as lucid as it is graceful--qualities much sought-after but not often found by discriminating readers. One would expect nothing less from this Pulitzer Prize-winning author
Democracy lost. I found this to be a fascinating book, well researched and documented. Mr. Nace traces the history of the American Corporations from the earliest years of our union. It would be easy to draw the conclusion that Mr. Nace is anti-business, but that is not how I read his position. Instead, what he is suggesting is that we have created a monster with our catering to the "personhood" of corporations at the expense of focused small businesses.The premise is that corporations have now gained more rights than human persons have in our society. Along with longevity - corporations need not die - corporations have gained other "rights" not available to people. According to Mr. Nace, corporations enjoy a long list of such rights: limited liability for shareholders, perpetual existence, virtual location, indefinite entity or "shape shifting," minimum standard of treatment, national treatment and compensation for regulatory takings (such as NAFTA rulings, etc.). In addition, we have allowed corporations to enjoy rights equal to those of people, such as: Equal protection, due process, freedom from unreasonable search, jury trial in a criminal case, compensation for government takings, freedom from double jeopardy, jury trial in a civil case, commercial speech, political speech, Negative speech (the right to abstain from association with the speech of others).Armed with these rights and deep pockets, many corporations are formidable opponents in competing with people for resources, political access, and redress of real or perceived injustices. Nace argues that without restriction of companies through the Corporate Charter (articles of incorporation), we have turned a monster loose on society which we are now almost powerless to contain. Corporations have lives of their own and little to fear from governments - they simply do business elsewhere should they find the environment undesirable. The consequences of this evolved capitalist model are that we have a concentration of power and a polarization of wealth. The most insidious result of this creation is that democracy is no longer in the hands of the people; it is in the hands of large corporations and big government which is now a big business. They have no incentive to relinquish their power.Mr. Nace does not recommend radical solutions to this situation. Instead he advocates the "more hopeful scenario in which the pendulum swings toward a softer variant of corporate capitalism. Under this course, the corporation as we know it does not radically change, but society gets better at pushing back against its influence and excesses. Environmental regulation becomes stricter. Wealth taxes blunt the worst extremes of wealth and poverty. Antitrust regulations break up the largest corporate empires. Restrictions on corporate political activity revitalize democratic institutions."Regardless of your position on business in general or big business in particular, this book will provide food for thought and you will gain knowledge of how we have come to be in this place
Absolutely Life Changing!!. This book has been lifechanging not only for me but for many others that I am in contact with through our church.  Kris is very open, honest and straight forward with what he shares.  He uses his real life story to share his experience from going from a pauper to a prince in the kingdom of God.  This is a MUST read for teenagers through old.  Eye Opening!
alas! a woman to rape a man. don't get me wrong. I am very much fed up on reading stories that heroines suffer the most. well, the heroine here did suffer the most but at least in raping issues, she got the first score. Imagining those scenes will heat you up. Don't laugh.Well, I condemn rape strongly. No doubt about it. It was just I prefer this JL book than her others that also contains rape scenes. I personally didn't like her "A Pirate's Love" for that really depicted how women are so low and degradable. Read it and you will know what I am saying. At least, in here, you could be proud of what Rowena did...well not most of it....but she did fight. I also didn't like how Warrick still punished her after 3 days of retribution - a like for a like. It seems he get the most bargain between the two of them.To sum it up, the literature is good. I cried some of its scenes. Hate the rape and forcing. A woman who rapes a man....definitely a sexy and perverse thing but still not a good thing. HeY! I want to clear out that she was just forced by her vile stepbrother who turns out at the end of the story to become Warrick's vassal after saving her from falling from the roof. Geez....
Review by an Industry Professional. The latest edition of Effectiv Security Management is an invaluable reference for new security managers and a good tool for the experienced security professional. The book begins with the 30,000 foot view then quickly focuses on each aspectof security management.The reader gets a valuable perspective on corporate culture and the role of each member of the security team, along with good checklist for hiring new employees and creating job descriptions.The book does a good job of explaining on-the-job training and methods for discipline, motivation and promotions.The book also covers the role of security communications within the company.  The book covers techniques for managing the security department by defining methods for risk assessment, planning and budgeting with good examples. The book explains the importance of written policies and procedures and provides techniques for applying computer technology to department management along with ways to employ statistical analysis in managing a security department.There is an excellent section on relationships with Law Enforcement, industry and the community in this book.  The most amusing and insightful section was "Jackass Management". The reader is certain to find examples of management types they have experienced in the past and are likely to encounter in the future.  The book is well written and well worth the time to read.Michael Khairallah, PSPSecurity Design SolutionsCovington L
A really good introduction to International Finance. If the previous reviewer thought *this* was too complicated and confusing, I don't know what they'd make of the leading textbook in the field, Krugman's International Economics, which is a confusing, disorganized, and bloated mess.  In my opinion, this book is much simpler, clearer, better organized, and better written.  I just took a course with Krugman's text, and now I'm reading this to figure out what the heck Krugman was talking about, with great success
yeaaaa!. Bravo Bernabo! Was that how you spelled it? I can't recall. Sounds jewish to me, or something out of Edwardian adventure lit; not equally insidious but equally boring.White supremacist, then! male dominant! Bernabo Recites The Catechism: Pay Attention or You Are All Racist Sexist Homophobic Anti-Semites, hisssssssss
The Classic Novel of Gettysburg. Michael Shaara's "The Killer Angels" is well known to a couple of generations of American Army officers, for whom it has been required professional reading.  It is also well known to many fans of the Civil War as the basis for the 1993 movie "Gettysburg."  It may be, with Anton Myrer's "Once An Eagle", one of the best novels on the American way of war.Sometimes fiction does a better job of explaining what happened than conventional history does.  "The Killer Angels" may be proof of that truism.  Shaara has suceeded in capturing the key events of the epic Battle of  Gettysburg; he has also suceeded in humanizing some of the principal personalties.  The reader can appreciate what Gettysburg must have been like for Confederate Commander Robert E. Lee and his stalwart Corps Commander James Longstreet, and for Union officers John Buford and Joshua Chamberlain.  We see the unfolding battle through the eyes of these four individuals and a host of other leaders.  Shaara was generally faithful to the historical record when he wrote in 1974; his story is fictional to the extent that we are privy to the unrecorded thoughts and feelings of the men around whom Shaara builds his narrative.  We see these men as the human beings they were, not the semi-mythic historical personalties (or in some cases the forgotten men) they have become.In a series of well-written vignettes, Shaara relates the story of the battle.  In one, Union cavalry commander John Buford recognizes the key terrain at Gettysburg and holds it until the arrival of Union infantry.  In another, Joshua Chamberlain defends the extreme left of the Union line in an action that will win him the Medal of Honor and enduring fame for the 20th Maine.  Confederate General Lee struggles to reorient his army to fight an unexpected battle to which his absent cavalry commander did not alert him.  In several vignettes, Confederate General Longstreet struggles against his military instincts as he carries out the orders of General Lee.  Their efforts to make sense of the chaos of the battlefield, to lead their soldiers, make tough decisions and deal with their hopes and fears hold lessons for us in the present day.  Shaara's prose is highly readable, authentic to the period, even page-turning.This book is highly recommended to students of the Civil War and the military art.  Readers without background in the Civil War and the Battle of Gettysburg may find the narrative somewhat challenging to follow
A Mouse Called Wolf. I thought this book was a funny story.It was funny because a mouse learns to sing and the mouse is friends with a human. I thought the story waas interesting at times because when a human sees a mouse they scream but not Mrs. Honeybee she is nice to the mouse and gives them chocolate. I think you will enjoy this book because it was very interesting. I really enjoyed this book so you should to
valuable book on Gorky. Lader has done an excellent job of delineating Gorky's work. The color reproductions are fair.They are not top of the line but,then very few books on Gorky have good repros. I find the back sections on Gorky's theory and his techniques interesting. Gorky states his case that he is a  classical artist. His interest in the old masters backs this up..such as Ucello.an index and these special sections help to look things up when you want to review  his ideas and ambitions for art.The paperback edition will serve you well. It is light enough to put in your kit bag and carry it with you something that Gorky deserves
Collector's Encyclopedia of Depression Glass. Another Great book by Gene Florence.  This book is very well organized and contains the information that a collector will want.  I recommend this to every beginning collector.  I couldn't do without this book when searching for and identifying depression glass.  Large pictures are clear, in color, and show great detail.  Lots of information.  A must have
Even if you 'think' you don't want to quit, you will be anxious to after reading just a few chapters. Unbelievable.  I was a skeptical, heavy smoker for more than 20 years, and I've been quit now for more than two months.  I tried and did not quit with many other methods.Allen's way WAS EASY.  I swear.  I've NEVER written a book review before, but felt compelled to share with others.  In fact, I've even bought four other copies for friends.I had no withdrawals, no regrets and no cravings.  I kept the ideas he said to keep in mind, and like magic, I quit and loved every moment of it.  He tought me how to be and think like a non-smoker again (as we all are born).  It does feel more natural.The key?  Knowing, feeling and believing (which I found out was true) that being and feeling like a non-smoker, is waaaaaaaaaaay better than how I 'though' smoking made me feel (good).  I can't explain any more than that, but it did change my thinking dramatically.He takes the way we all as smokers 'think' about ourselves and our smoking, and turns quitting into a positive.  Not the negative that most smokers who want to quit, think of it as.  By the time you're half way through the book, you are joyful at the excitement you have at how great you're going to feel when you quit.  And it just continues!AND I DO FEEL GREAT.HE HELPS YOU TO THINK DIFFERENTLY ABOUT QUITTING AND TAKES AWAY THE FEAR.Go ahead, buy it. You will be elated that you did!
I love this book. If you're into discovering strange records this is definitely a book to read. The book is separated into chapters. Some are dedicated to musicians and others are to individual record collectors, which are amusing. It gives them the chance to talk about the kooky records they've discovered. There's a nice chapter dedicated to Yma Sumac, which taught me things I didn't know. Apparently she had a concert in 1987, too bad I was only four. She sums up her career rather nicely and expresses the problem she had at her comeback. "I can't sing with just two musicians!
Answered my questions. Admittedly, I already had a feeling for what was wrong with my first screenplay, but this book helped me identify what to DO about it.  After reading two chapters, I reorganized my material and turned a bore into a page turner
Simple and gritty. What is so interesting to me about this book is how simple the story is. Anse Bundren is the stubborn-old-goat of a father and husband who has promised his dying, and later deceased wife Addie that he will bury her in her home town of Jefferson when she dies."As I Lay Dying" recounts the death and then trip to Jefferson, one tragic mishap after the other, through the view points of the members of Bundren family and others associated with them. These first person accounts from the characters brilliantly reveal the rather gritty and mostly unfortunate existence of the Bundrens, which appears to be the point of the book even more than the story itself
John Glenn was reading his own book, so I decided to save. time &amp; go with the audio(albeit abridged) version.I figured it would be light &amp; easy. Not that Gleen isn't smart. It's just that there is no pretense to the man. His stories are interesting if his delivery leaves something to be desired. They reveal little about the inner man. It is a standard, straight ahead autobiography of a man who isn't a writer. He was sucessful in several different fields then retired to do the best part all over again. Hero is an overused word today. But he a real one. That's a go. So are his memoirs
An honest assessment. This book purports that through the use of positive thought and mental imaging, one can change their life and character. The way this book communicates this idea is by giving success stories and briefly explaining the process itself.Here is the real deal about this practice: It works, but it doesn't usually come all at once and give people continuous miraculous results. Like any skill worth possessing, it takes persistence, practice and trial and error.People often experience much initial success when first trying out the principle of mental science (or affecting circumstance through thought and creative visualization) but they often experience some difficulties also. Its not a panacea for life, its a practice that deepens over time and through effort and study.This is a great book because it tells you that you have tremendous latent power within you, that you have access to it and that it can change your life. Well, all these things are true and the world needs to wake up to the possibilities of the inner life. What the book doesn't emphasize is that more often than not, its a process that requires commitment and persistence to acquire as opposed to a magical cure all.Even so, the beginner will see results and those results will continue as they continue, gradually becoming more meaningful,  but perhaps not as explosively as this book emphasizes through its many dramatic success stories.My reccomendation for reading "The Magic of Believing:" Enjoy its positive tone and motivational nature, and try the practice for yourself. Claude M. Bristol has a way with words and this is a great place to start learning about some really cool principles. However, also know that sometimes the real transformation occurs not through a good book and a little bit of practice, but through sustained and sincere hard work just like any other skill or field of study.The good news is, if you find that metaphysics (the science described in this book) is your bag and you are willing to put in the hours, the results will be worth it
A King fantasy novel. This was the first King novel I ever read as a child, and I was hooked.  Although not typical of King's haunted cars or clarvoyant teens, King is most seen in his character Flagg, the evil magician.Without giving anything away, if King isn't your favorite author (although he is mine), this is a refreshing novel that first proved that he can write using other genres rather than his horror novels.  Although King has been more apt recently to write other things, this book was the first that was not so "horrific".  It is even a great read for a pre-teen or teen that isn't usually allowed to read King, given that the book is much like the popular wizard novels of this decade.
Excellent. I have seen risotto prepared in many different ways, unfortunately there is only one way to properly go about the task. Arborio or Carnaroli rice depending on your choice requires a certain method to extract all of the creaminess from the rice while maintaining a good al dente texture. In this book, the author here has done a wonderful job of illustrating the proper way to produce a quality risotto. Nice photos to give you ideas as risotto leaves much room for experimentation once you have mastered the basics
Heroes With Wood & Canvas Steeds. What a remarkable book!  There really aren't that many stories of WWI aviation that I haven't read, so I was delighted to find this one on Amazon.  It's written with marvelous attention to detail and with a great sense of authenticity.  Often I had to pause to look up a word that has fallen out of usage these days.  As other reviewers have mentioned, there are no "knights of the air" in this story, just young men doing a job the best they can.  In fact, the story's protagonist often finds himself mourning the deaths of the German airmen that fall to the British Vickers machine guns.  My only complaint (a minor one) is the cover:  It shows an SE5a in a dogfight.  Tom and his squadron fly the now-famous Sopwith Camel.  Altogether, a great read and a book that I will re-visit from time to time
In Search of Lost Time. George Bowling's life is pretty mundane even by his own admission: he has "settled down" into his middle age with his wife and two children, his mortgage and his steady yet uninteresting job. Frustrated, George looks back to the days of his childhood in a small town in rural England and asks where did it all go wrong? He tries to recapture those times, but can anyone really go home again?This is a beautifully written, funny and at times poignant story. Orwell depicts (with great skill) the dangers of middle-age drift, and of trying to escape from it by revisiting a past which only exists inside your head. He takes a swipe at various irritating types (many of them still around) such as the "respectable" middle classes who believe they are living in the countryside and are protecting it when they are in fact doing neither.It is interesting in that the feeling of decay, of falling standards seems to afflict each generation in turn. Although Bowling is careful not to idolise his past, pointing to the many faults of the society he grew up in, the novel does reveal that there is nothing new in nostalgia.G Rodger
An Excellent book tape for fans of Frog and Toad books. I am ordering this tape again for my four year old son. He listened to his first copy until it broke. It is fascinating to watch him listen to the stories with a half smile on his face as he recalls the pictures from the books. It is not necessary to read along to enjoy the tape. Mr. Lobel reads the stories perfectly. He clearly conveys the personalities of the characters without &quot;doing the voices.&quot
When you want to do something different... I've read the reviews for this book and can help but notice they are all 5 stars or 2/1 stars. Clearly there is a disconnect.I read this book a few months before I packed up my life and hit the road to travel for a year (I thought). Up until this point in my life my wildest travels had been traveling around Europe with my parents, a package trip to Tahiti, and many drunken nights in Mexico. Not the seasoned independent traveler. This book motivated me, and gave me a philosophy that just felt right for me. When I finished reading this I was super excited to hit the road - something that had been waning as the date approached.Well I left and my one year trip kept on getting extended. Almost five years and eighty countries later I finally arrived home again. And I still am a huge fan of this book. I carried the last chapter of the book (the ultra light guidebook) with me the entire time. I still have the mutilated original first edition sitting proudly on my book shelf (just last week I had to wrestle with my wife over my need to keep it.) I am eagerly waiting for the third edition when I will gladly re-read The World Awaits. Perhaps from the position of experience I will be disappointed, but I don't think so.In short if you have not traveled much (or have not traveled much in the developing world) and think that you might someday want to go on a trip - this book is for you. If you have no desire in traveling, and don't understand why anyone would want to put on a backpack and see what is out there - this book is also for you.If you have hitch-hiked through West Africa; gone to an airport to get on the next plane going someplace interesting; or keep your travel immunizations and passport up to date "just in case" - this book might not be for you, you've probably already developed your own philosophy and probably do not need to be encouraged to leave your house. But this book might still be a pleasant reminder that there are kindred souls out there...Peace and safe travels
A Gift to the Reader. Falwellian Fundamentalists and Borgian Liberals will find much to hate in this book, as will hard-line scholars who will no doubt demand footnotes, endnotes and references.As a popular presentation of the story and tenor of the Hebrew Scriptures (or Old Testament) this book is a resounding success.  It presents the Mr. Cahill's perspective on this history in a clear and even persuasive manner.  The vital contribution of the "Jews" to human destiny is plainly set forth in beautiful prose from cover to cover.
A very sound book. I found the seven habits to be very sound and unchanging. That is what makes any book worth while. The principles in this book will not change for 10 years to come. This book is not a quick fix and will not make your life easier. It will confirm that your life is on the right path and keep you on the path you want to travel.
Great coffee table book. very interesting - everyone will find something inspiring - whether you are an entrepreneur, a manager, an inventor or just looking to be inspired.
In a Class by Itself. I come from a background that is mostly asian, in terms of my exposure to inner cultivation.When I first picked up the book, which had been in my library for more than two years, I thought it was a book from an asian tradition. I was wrong....sort of. Many inner traditions are the products of gender and culture. What this book  does is remove all of that and get to the heart of inner cultivation......self realization. Realization that you are more than your flesh but yet your flesh is a part of your existence.Being that life is a balancing act for most people,Mr. Bardon stresses this which to me proves him to be a responsible person. To have information from a source that is accurate and responsible is rare and to be commended.The exercices are not all unique to this work but the presentation, balance, and formulation of what to do and how to do are uncanny. Many books are nothing but empty theory not based on the writers experience. You can spot this becuase most books lack explanation of concrete results related to completing the stated phase of training.Some are so empty that no real concrete training is even mentioned. Mr. Bardon does not lack in this area one bit.To sum it up. This book is for extremely serious mature people who wish to develop the awareness and ability to interact with duality beyond normal sight and sound. It is for those that are  ready to get some answers by the sweat of their efforts. All results that have the potential to lead to greatness will take time. Be patient and diligent if you decide to embark on this journey.
A Masterpiece. After getting and reading Primary Target as a gift, I immediately began picking up other Joe Weber books.  Defcon One, his first, was absolutely terrific.  Great plot line and characters.  The action is continuous throughout.  My suggestion is not to pick up this book to read up before going to bed because you'll never put it down.  Looking forward to reading his next - Shadow Flight.  My hat's off to Joe Weber.  Keep up the great work
Demo or Die!. Just bought a copy from a museum shop in Helsinki and cancelled my order. The book is well written and has great visuals. You can get it for a cheaper price from other online shops if you live in Europe. Just use google etc
A Profound and Important Way to Improve Your Life. I had read Dr. Ornish's books about diet and health, and found them to be very helpful.  Then, I read this one.  This is by far the most important book that he has written, because how we handle our relationships with  others is more important to our health than even what we eat and how we  exercise.  A little of this information was familiar to me from reading the  New York Times Science section, but most of it was not.  Clearly the  biggest disease of our modern culture is our estrangement from each other.   For most of history, we lived with others in small, intimate groups.  Now  that the population is much larger, we live in large groups with no close  relationships.  Even our families are losing that intimacy.  This book puts  the priorities back where they should be.  Having close relationships with  others comes first.  This book is a blessing to us all.  Thank you, Dr.  Ornish!  This book would be a great gift to everyone you care about on  Valentine's Day
"Dick" is a "bitch"... Moby Dick is not a fun book to read. The prose is old-fashioned, and that is partly what vitiates the pleasure (cf. Ivanhoe). Primarily, however, it is boring, plain and simple. There are endless digressions, and asides, and plot-sabbaticals. Very easy to put down. Undoubtedly an amazing intellectual feat to pull off (hence my five stars), but still...I'd estimate that 1% of high-schoolers assigned this book end up actually reading it. Can't blame them, either. To be fair, the last twenty pages, when Ahab and Starbuck have their final tete-a-tete, and Ahab famously snarls to his finned nemesis "From Hell's heart, I stab at thee!" do cause a frisson. And I don't regret reading the book...it's a great laurel to rest on, but I will never pick it up again. Eh, give 'er a go...if you finish it, you'll know that you're a man, not a boy
Must-read for those pondering parenthood. This book should be read by both men and women, though women are its obvious audience. The author skillfully weaves together personal experience, interviews and voluminous research. She uses these to detail women's lives and the choices and pressure they face in relationships, work and family. Her conclusions are too numerous to list, but even when the author seems to be stating the obvious, she offers examples of those who are overlooking the obvious because of internal or external pressure. The book is not quite representative because it focuses mostly on women of medium to high income, but the author does include a wide range of subjects. What I found most useful were the insights from the different age groups. It's clear that while professional mentoring between women of different ages is common, there aren't similar support relationships for women of different ages and life stages to frankly discuss non-work choices. This book helpfully fills in this gap in the conversation
A very pleasing read. I first read this book about 15 years ago, and have been trying to but it for many years now.  As a larry Niven fan, I first read it because of his name being on the cover.  It is unlike other books by Niven, and not part  of his 'known space' series.  If you find it, please give it a try!  It  certainly made me smile
